Vietnamese is very difficult for me. Because its pronunciation is much more difficult than Japanese.
It has sounds we can not pronounce well.
And It has unique tones.
However,it is very beautiful sound.
This winter was very cold, but it is getting warmer suddenly in March.
The starting of cherry blossoms may bloom earlier than expected.
I'm annoying with pollen allergy for ten years or so.
Pollen dust is a large amount in this year, I heard by the weather forecast.
However, good medicine was developed and I take it so my allergy is not so serious.
But many of Japanese are masked, it's quite strange...
Pollen dust is a large amount in this year, I heard by the weather forecast.
One of my Brazilian friend showed me pictures of fusion food which is mixed pizza and sushi!!
How awful it is.
I said I've never eaten and it seems like not good.
I wrote this letter that I want you to understand my feelings.
For long distance relationships, everyday greetings are important for continuing our good relationship I think.
To be honest, I am sorry to hear that you did not reply to me though I sent you good morning.
I understand you are busy with work and you have a lot of things you have to do..
I just wanted knowing my mind 
I will recall about my boyfriend, when I wake up in the morning, and when I go to bed at night.
I know well you are doing your best.
The spring break starts today.
I cannot contain myself for joy.
There are many things I want to do. Reading, drawing,playing instruments,sleeping,traveling and learning English.
I wonder if I will start from what.
There are many tests in this week!
I want high scores but I don't want to study more.
I went to Kauai island of Hawaii to learn Hula a month ago.
I'm really surprised that has passed a month already!
I learned Hula from differnt teachers and it was really excited to me!
But I was not sure English and I couldn't understand what they wanted to told me.
That's I'm sorry.
It had been on my wishlist for a long time, but I wouldn't have imagined that I bought it on UK PSN.
I created a UK PSN account and bought a wallet code just to get this game.
I enjoyed them, sometimes QTE annoyed me though.
The hilarious glitch can be caused at the serious climax scene.
Now I understand why people so get hyped about upcoming "Detroit: Become Human", which is a game the same developer created.
Today I was singing at Karaoke with my friend 2 hours.
but We sometimes study Chinese and Japanese during the time.
We were really enjoy the time.
This is the word from Hiroyasu Kamikawa who is a noble surgeon.
To receive criticism means to challenge something.
In recent years, more and more people criticize like a critic due to the expansion of the Internet.
However, most of them may not know difficulties to behavior actually.
Shuzou matuoka
Ihara says that curiously he stopped to sleepwalk after that, probably because of the shock of it.
After thinking deeply, Ihara delivers his conjecture:
2: Other events suggesting his sleepwalking were no more than circumstance evidences.
3: Therefore, Kimura might have committed the murder, having framed Ihara.
During his speech, Ihara has gradually begun to stare his face.
Detecting his intense glare, Kimura leaves there awkwardly.
Left alone, Ihara muses:
"Now after so many years, I can't nothing but appraise his ingenuity.
He might have changed his name as well as his deformed face."
You can read this by the link below if you like, because it's out of copyright.
Yesterday was White day, which is the day men or boys who got gifts from female on Valentine's day give them something in return.
My son got some, too, so I drove him to the girls' houses after work.
When we got home, the three-brother-boys who my daughter gave coockies were standing out side of our entrance in the dark.
I was frightened by them because I didn't expect anyone there that late and they didn't move but just standing there watching us.
My daughter gave them home-made coockies but they gave my daughter so many stuff; such as a bottle filled with candies, hand towel, strawberries.
According to their mother, she's trying to teach them that gentlemen should return to girls three-time of what they got.
The brothers have lots of friends everywhere and have got so many on Valentine's day, so I wonder how many gift she prepared.
I like chocolates and alcohol, but once I have them, I will definitely want them next day, and I would keep having them every day...
B:I came here with ex-boyfriend.
Sorry, I shouldn't have asked you that.
B:It isn't matter.
As I heard, this restaurant have a star of Michelin.
A:Yes, it has.
It's nice food, hasn't it?
My job involves creating leatherwork goods by hand.
I mainly make a wallet.
B:I've no idea.
Let's go to that restaurant next month.
A:Not cheap, but their food look very nice.
Dear Admission Officer,
My name is Will and I am an applicant of the MFA program this year.
Now,I have received the offer from the program.
However, my TOEFL score is 96 which does not reach the minimum requirement.
I want to ask if I can not meet the requirement before June 30th, could I still get the offer or do I have other options?
I notice about this news today.
Do you want to board this shinkansen?
I have an Alexa, Amazon smart speaker.
Usually, it reacts and listens to me when I say "Alexa", but recently I've noticed that Alexa sometimes even reacts when I sneeze.
He always makes me feel more alive and energetic than I am ever before.
A market street near my home will have a festival next weekend.
Some workshop and flee markets are held at the festival.
Handwriting
Students have to make her speech in every class on Wednesdays.
So I asked the new student if she had finish to put her idea together, organized and made a draft.
She immediately opened her notebook and I found that a few sentences had been written on it.
Instantly, I translated them in Japanese and she jotted down my sentences.
It was good season because it was not hot nor cold.
One of her sentences were like this.
It likes early summer weather.
It was cold this morning, so I get bundled up, but now it is hot so I take off a clothes.
I liked the music and watnted to play it on the piano.
I have been listening to the music many times a day.
There is a dumb waiter in our laboratory to carry water samples for experiments.
When we open the dumb waiter door, the dumb waiter makes For Elise.
Sometimes, I hear the music like an auditory hallucination even though the dumb waiter doesn't sound the music actually.
I referred to certain people who don't say it to certain people even though they say it to some people.
I'm grateful to them for their kind comments.
Her comment sounds like she didn't like me to write such a entry.
It's pity to read such an entry."
"Yeah, she is right" I think I wouldn't feel bad if I didn't correct them anymore.
However, this sounds like negative thought to me.
You say "thank you" and the person who is told would be happy and they say "thank you" to others.
I wish many people in the world would feel the same!
I know that it would be impossible to make all people in the world feel the same as me, but without doing anything, nothing would happen, so I want to try.
However, this sounds like negative thought to me.
I'd like to try to make better corrections, and then, they might feel like "thank you" is coming out naturally.
You say "thank you" and the person who is told would be happy and they say "thank you" to others.
I saw a shocking news just now.
I remember that I had many places which made me excited around me.
They are ranked how strong they are.
There was a good exmple, a wrestler who is 160 kg defeated a wrestler who is more than 200 kg yesterday.
The weight is nothing to do with the game.
Having said that, one wrestler said when he faced a big wrestler, he looked like a wall, and intimidating.
This apartment spoke of here is a kind of a large old Japanese house where dozens of students live in their respective rooms like a dormitory, not pubic but commercial one.
Because he was from a wealthy, rigid family, he enjoys his carefree life in this dorm-like apartment, beginning to make some friends.
However, one day Kimura, one of his friends, comes in on his room and tells a weird thing.
According to Kimura, last night when Kimura sleeps, Ihara burst into his room and began to debate on the difference between Plato and Aristotle.
It surprises Ihara, because he doesn't have any memory like that.
Kimura asks him whether if he might have experience of talking in his sleep by any chance.
Kimura suggests that Ihara might relapse into it, having aggravated into some kind of sleepwalking.
Considering the situation, Ihara believes that it was his deed and surrenders to police.
When he was a student decades ago, he was staying at an apartment in Tokyo.
This apartment spoke of here is a kind of a large old Japanese house where dozens of students live in their respective rooms like a dormitory, not pubic but commercial one.
Because he was from a wealthy, rigid family, he enjoys his carefree life in this dorm-like apartment, beginning to make some friends.
However, one day Kimura, one of his friends, comes in on his room and tells a weird thing.
According to Kimura, last night when Kimura sleeps, Ihara burst into his room and began to debate on the difference between Plato and Aristotle.
It surprises Ihara, because he doesn't have any memory like that.
Kimura asks him whether if he might have experience of talking in his sleep by any chance.
Ihara, having a vague memory of childhood when he talked in his sleep, agrees.
Kimura suggests that Ihara might relapse into it, having aggravated into some kind of sleepwalking.
Ihara accepts his guess, feeling pretty anxious.
From then on, a few events which suggest Ihara's sleepwalking occurs periodically.
Considering the situation, Ihara believes that it was his deed and surrenders to police.
Ihara's friends, including Kimura, strive to save him because his sleepwalking disease have been famous among them.
Although Ihara is acquitted because of his mental problem at last, he is devastated mentally because he believes he actually killed the person all the same.
The flower season of camellia is from December to April of next year.
This flower is mainly in red, otherwise in yellow or in white, which are very brightly colored.
This flower exhibition, as the largest one in our city in our city in recent three years, fully shows the species and technology of camellia.
In order to let plant lovers be accessible to get close to camellias, this exhibition will be arranged around the whole park to provide convience for tourists.
I don't want to be wet.
The problem is that a bathroom is under construction and I have to go outside to wash at the other one.
I am missing sunshine.
* practicing to make sentences *
I hang in there to study English.
I'm hanging in there to work now.
When I hung around a supermarket, I bumped into him.
I have hangover cause I drunk too much yesterday.
As I'm hungover, I need some water.
The number of traffic accident deaths in the world is more than one million people every year.
Actually, my sister had an accident when I was an elementary school student.
I want to reduce such accidents as much as possible through the work related with safety techniques.
I meant it as a joke, but As a result I slandered others.
I want to apologize it, but it's rare case to meet him.
It may be seems doubt him if I make chance to meet him.
I meant it as a joke, but As a result I slandered others.
I want to apologize it, but it's rare case to meet him.
It may be seems doubt him if I make chance to meet him.
Last night was a company 's year - end party.
I got an amazon gift card and a Starbucks gift card with a simple participation type quiz and was delightful.
First, consuming moderate amount of caffeine can improve blood pressure and lower the rate of depression.
But hey!
I woke up late recently, so I'll going to the office quickly now.
I did not notice very tired, so I think probably cause it.
I hope I have a long sleep time for get a refresh and relax.
Either way, I'll going to office fast today.
Cherry blossoms at school were so surprised at this warmth that it bloomed at once.
I went on a business trip to a department where I begin to work from next month.
The aim of the trip was to takeover the work from the previous worker.
I will come back there next week.
Anyway, I enjoyed drinking sake and eating local foods that contained sashimi, grilled beef, good rice.
The Narita Airport and The Haneda Airport
I will make use of the Narita Airport tomorrow because the charge of the tour from the Haneda Airport is higher than from the Narita Airport.
The Haneda Airport is good and useful consequently almost Tokyoite want to take there however the charge is high.
I went to several times to Seoul and sometimes used the Haneda Airport.
The international part of the Haneda Airport is beautiful because the building is new compared with domestic part.
Originally, the Haneda Airport was built for domestic flights and then the international part was built later.
I joined fre English class which hosted by my city.
It started at 3 p.
The class can join everyone who live in my city.
Four foreigner's teachers and four Japanese students includs me participated.
It was for first time we met except Ian.
I'm afraid I wasn't able to listen to your name clearly.
Dave: No, it's vary rare though.
I joined fre English class which hosted by my city.
m for an hour at community center.
The class can join everyone who live in my city.
It was for first time we met except Ian.
Dave:  Actually,it's my middle name.
Dave: No, it's vary rare though.
The Story is about two man who get to know each other in a hot spring.
One is Saito who have deformed face injured during the previous war and the other is Ihara.
When he was a student decades ago, he was staying at a apartment in Tokyo.
The Story is about two man who get to know each other in a hot spring.
One is Saito who have deformed face injured during the previous war and the other is Ihara.
After taking a bath, they talks about their pasts.
Saito talks about his tough experiences during the war showing his numerous old injuries.
This apartment here is a kind of old Japanese large house where dozens of students live in their respective rooms like a dormitory, not pubic but commercial one.
This may be one-thirds of it and I'd like to write the rest later.
One is Saito who have deformed face injured during the previous war and the other is Ihara.
When he was a student decades ago, he was staying at a apartment in Tokyo.
This apartment here is a kind of old Japanese large house where dozens of students live in their respective rooms like a dormitory, not pubic but commercial one.
This may be one-thirds of it and I'd like to write the rest later.
I do yoga everyday.
I watched TV program of yoga the day before yesterday.
I understood that yoga is good to mental.
Today is the last lesson of the 2017 fiscal year.
I' feel down
I attend English conversation class every Wednesdays.
when I start speeking something, the words slipping away and I just mumble.
When I am listening to other people, I enjoy listening, and even can correct some their mistakes in my mind.
I attend English conversation class every Wednesdays.
when I start speeking something, the words slipping away and I just mumble.
When I am listening to other people, I enjoy listening, and even can correct some their mistakes in my mind.
My best friend was found got few wisdom tooth.
The doctor pulled out one of them two weeks ago.
She had need to took a small surgery because the teeth grown in the gums, so cut open it and pulled out then sutured.
But when she went to take out stitches last week, there was infalmmation.
So she had to sufferd the pain again!
She bought a Teddy puppy last month, but he got sick and sufferd from diarrhea.
I can feel her very much.
My best friend was found got few wisdom tooth.
The doctor pulled out one of them two weeks ago.
She had need to took a small surgery because the teeth grown in the gums, so cut open it and pulled out then sutured.
But when she went to take out stitches last week, there was infalmmation.
So she had to sufferd the pain again!
She bought a Teddy puppy last month, but he got sick and sufferd from diarrhea.
Yesterday she told me that she wanted to kill herself.
I can feel her very much. Since I went through lots of terrible things many years ago.
I comforted her this is life!
I think many Japanese don't want to make futon dirty, so we tend to take a bath at night.
Soaking in a hot bath is relaxation and you can clean your bodies before you go to sleep.
Even so, I feel that it takes too much my whole family to take a bath every night.
In my family's case, we fill a lot of hot water with the bathtub but I recycle it when I do the laundry for conservation of resources.
However, not all of Japanese do so.
Do you prefer to take a shower even in winter?
Soaking in a hot bath is relaxation and you can clean your bodies before you go to sleep.
What is Your Purpose to Take a Shower or a Bath
I think many Japanese don't want to make futon dirty, so we tend to take a bath at night.
Even so, I feel that it takes too much my whole family to take a bath every night.
Boston Symphony is very famous.
Also Boston Symphony is famous in Japan, probably because Japanese music director Seiji Osawa.
I recently went to their performance.
The venue is pretty nice and the play was quite good.
It was all Mozart program: Symphony 34, 36, 41.
When I was in the Bay Area, California, I went to SF symphony, which is also good, but it was far from South Bay and it took over 2 hours to go to SF symphony venue.
Now in Boston, it only takes 30 min.
At the symphony concert, I always wonder why the average age of audience is relatively high.
The row in front of me, I over heard this conversation.
A: But they email special events of Boston Symphony.
I'm now on my way back to home.
It was wireless earphones released by Apple.
I paid JPY 18,000 for that.
I thought it was kind of pricey to get it compared to other earphones.
As soon as I bought it, I put the earphones on, and played a music, and I felt like it's just same as others, there is no special functions with it.
I thought why did I get it, I shouldn't have got it.
However, after I used it for a couple of weeks, it became really useful to me.
I realized that there is a only few differences between the earphones and other earphones, one of which is no cable with the thing that I can operate my phone without touching since it's linked to the phone.
When you knock the earphones twice, it activates the Siri that allows us to make a call, and listen to a music, which is something that other earphones can not do.
Japan Needs English Teacher
We should be aware of our behave.
He were keenly upset.
That priest loves pathetic children.
I tried not to write my vile feeling on my face.
He was ablaze with angry.
They risked their life and fought.
He were keenly upset.
A huff is useless.
That priest loves pathetic children.
He did a profane thing.
I tried not to write my vile feeling on my face.
I resolve with revulsion.
A rate for Personal Income Tax in Poland is 18% and 32%.
There is a progressive rate so it depends on a quota of annual income.
Income taxes are applied on the international level.
Local taxes are applied on the town level.
Employees should pay or so twenty percent of the wage.
All I can do to cure a cold is about nourishing and sleeping.
When I drank caffeine-free nutritional drinks, metabolism became active, and I sweated a lot.
It will be a maternity leave in one month, so I should think about how to spend every day.
I can't do everything alone, thus I have to keep asking them to do something with respects.
There are some people who get me angry, but I know that I should not actually do so to them.
I can't do everything alone, thus I have to keep asking them to do something with respects.
All I can do is just get on job first.
Vancouver is a good city?
I've been wanting to take a trip abroad recently since it took a pretty long time since I had done last time.
I also want to check and improve my English skill by talking to foreign people.
I thought about countries which I should go to.
My wife suggested Hawaii, but I didn't agree with it because many people speak Japanese there.
I've been wanting to visit Australia for a long time since I had heard of the country from my ex-coworker who had taken a trip there.
His story and pictures that he showed me was exciting for me.
I don't like a cold weather, so I gave up that idea.
I could go see them and have the local cuisine.
But, I turned down the idea because my wife suggested visiting there with the whole family next year.
I've watched on TV that a train ran through a vast forest.
I decided that I'll definitely get the train someday at that time.
So, I'm going to start planning to take a trip to Vancouver, and then get the train.
However, I think there is a huge difference between tourist and traveller.
A tourist gets superficial impression about place which he visits.
He doesn't try to immerse deep into a new city or place, because he travells for stereotypes which are imposed by mass-culture.
Conversely, a traveller explores and discovers something new for itself.
A traveller think that travelling is not only the way to know the world, but know yourself.
Here is my personal tips on a good travelling:
You won't see a real life there.
A real life is what you want to see, isnt't it?
Try to feel city or place which you visit.
When you take a photo, you are focusing on this process, but not on the getting your impressions.
Our impressions are these things, which will be with us forever and it more valued and important than any photo.
You can't visit everything for a short time and turmoil won't benefit for your journey.
There are a lot of people who love to travel and a well-known list "I was here" is seemed as personal life achivements.
However, I think there is a huge difference between tourist and traveller.
He doesn't try to immerse deep into a new city or place, because he travells for stereotypes which are imposed by mass-culture.
Conversely, a traveller explores and discovers something new for itself.
Here is my personal tips on a good travelling:
You won't see a real life there.
When you take a photo, you are focusing on this process, but not on the getting your impressions.
Our impressions are these things, which will be with us forever and it more valued and important than any photo.
You can't visit everything for a short time and turmoil won't benefit for your journey.
No sooner had Nolan stepped into the room than Sidney yelled, "Welcome to Joan's concentration camp, buddy!" Upon seeing several prisoners and piles of paper on the long desk, Nolan understood what happened.
I think that, as it was thousands of years ago with another societies, modern society is very influenced by idols, in this case, celebrities.
Nowadays, it is more easy to see what our favorite celebrities are doing, it is enough with sign up on instagram or snapchat and see what they actually do in their daily life.
My brother is hungry, Probably I'll finish later.
GOOD EVENING, IT WAS AGES THAT I HADN'T LOGGED IN LANG8.
YESTERDAY I WENT IN A English SCHOOL in order to ask I much it costs a full English course.
I guess due to the correct answer about conditional tence.
However there were Italian teacher, teaching English.
I supposed that it is not the best way to improve my pronunciation skills.
I need a native English support.
Thus, I reminded Lang8.
My goal is write every night something and receive feedback.
No vocabulary while writing.
It isn't worth it to wake up before you alarm goes off.
She talked that many of her fans also like ZABADAK so she planned joint concert with Yoko Ueno, who quitted from ZABADAK at that time.
I had been listening those songs over 25 years ago.
One day, I listened to her songs through YouTube and found a recording of a joint concert.
started approaching it towards me.
He had caught me off guard, and I am more than sure if I had been able to breathe that I would have screamed...
And then, as if it were a miracle, the entrance door suddenly swung open.
Right after, as if I strings that were holding me had been cut, my body fell to the ground.
Today was a English lesson once a week and my tutor came to my house.
She kindly spoke English slowly and used simple English for me, but sometimes I couldn't understand that.
After the lesson for 1 hour, I'm always exhausted.
English Lesson once a week
Today was a English lesson once a week and my tutor came to my house.
She kindly spoke English slowly and used simple English for me, but sometimes I couldn't understand that.
After the lesson for 1 hour, I'm always exhausted.
Espero que tengas la paciencia para corregir mis errores en el idioma.
POSITIVE PARENTING AFTER SEPARATION
Mom and dad used to hate each other but they didn't divorce.
Dad went to have a second wife and left us.
I think he didn't care about us, he even didn't spend a penny for us.
All he wanted was to revenge my mum at any cost, even if that cost was us, his children.
All I remember about dad and mom is fights, screams, loud voices and beat.
Once time, mum, sister and I travelled to Aswan to visit my grandma there.
When we returned, we found my dad change the door's lock.
He refused to open the door for us so we had to stay the night at our neighbour's home.
Although all these bad experiences, I sometimes feel I miss him.
On the other hand, even mum was good, but we are not friends.
I also woke up very late this morning because my daughter took a day off due to the graduate ceremony of her junior school and I didn't need to bring her to the school bus stop this morning.
The final meeting today had been planned to take just one hour, but it eventually took more than 2hours....
The boss told him many instructions.
At the end of the meeting, the boss told us stay the meeting room and called the other teammate.
The teammate brought one whole cake mad by the very expensive and popular patissier.
If I are him, I cry because it was just after my boss got angry.
Responsible, efficient, have analytical thinking, is able to solve complex problems.
In my eyes, the context within which we live is a main reason that might make us feel worse psychologically.
The individuals around us can push us to feel down, as well as the circumstances we live through have a vital effect.
On the other hand, I don't think poverty by itself is a reason.
However, I agree that the way we think and ruminate on our life and experiences shape a vital element in making us feel depressed or not in the mood.
For example, a lot of poor people don't suffer psychologically as they are satisfied with their own life, while others who are much better economically, face troubles in accepting their life the way it is.
Regarding the factor that can alleviate these issues, is support which is a very crucial solution to help people to change their style of thinking.
To find those who make you feel capable and strong enough to overcome your own struggle.
To have those who give you positive energy to go on in your life journey.
Talking about myself, I pass through a crucial phase of my life.
I have to make a decision either to continue my current way or to start over a new career with a lot of study, money and efforts.
Aside from my personal life that I don't feel comfortable with.
So far, I cannot make my mind as I'm this kind of person who needs to be pushed and charged to start over something new.
Those who are around me all that they do is to blame me, and told me it's too late to make changes in my life.
They force me to ruminate on the past opportunities that I let them go.
I know I'm the only one who can decide it but it's not easy with all this blame and overthinking.
I just need to feel relieved and relaxed so I can make my mind which is impossible in the atmosphere where I live now.
Even taking the first steps and making a schedule to start studying and brush up Spanish find it really hard to do.
So what is in my mind now is asking myself a lot of what ifs
It means that youth has an excellent opportunity to improve its knowledge without boring lessons or wasting time for getting to classrooms.
In addition, blogs, YouTube channels and sites of famous fashion designers, handmade masters, actors, writers, coaches and so on show workshops and give useful tips.
That is why I am positive that computers and the internet can contribute to youth mental development, if people use them to be better.
I have had a gastroenteritis from last weekend.
I got stomachache suddenly at midnight.
I went see a doctor by taxi with husband.
But my husband have got sick now.
But my husband have got sick now.
Yesterday evening I met my ex classmates of high school.
We remembered a lot of situations and episodes that happened.
I forgot some of them, but I liked very much when someone told us those situations.
After the meeting, alone in my car during my journey to home, I remembered which school subjects I didn't study very well because I didn't liked.
If I studied them now I'd do it very well, with passion and diligence
His mother once said, he was so creative that he could use everything as a toy.
At this point, it should be noted that he was a declared atheist during his entire life.
There had more or less 90000 households which used that method.
The less popular technology for watching TV was Internet.
In 2006, the broadcast was less used than Cable and Satellite.
The cable was the most common with 100000 households.
In 2009, Internet, with 120000 households, was become the most popular way to watch television while the use of Broadcast and Cable decreased strongly with 90000 and 40000.
In 2014, Internet, without contestation, was the first technology with almost 200000 households against 10000 for the Broadcast.
Therefore, Internet had conquered 20000 households while the broadcast lost almost all these users.
I bought a very simple long-nose black leather shoes with a single line as my first work leather shoes after graduation from university.
So I just picked up such a very simple black leather shoes.
He suffered another heavy setback, when he realized that he couldn't find any.
But the problem was, like, I had a crash on this guy named John.
And we're gonna go--he was gonna be like my only time I was gonna interact with a boy.
And then, like, I put my face in the table club.
I was like, "Hi, John.
I've met a girl who is from Germany and she lives in the UK for more than 20 years.
I didn't notice she was a German as her English sounded perfect and beautiful.
She told me that she went to school with British friends and grew up with them so she has no difficulty in communication as long as she is in the UK.
However, she told me that only when she counted the number or had to calculate something, her brain switched off English and switched on German automatically.
53+12=65 These kind of easy numbers are fine.
My brain already start calculating in Japanese.
It's impossible to do in English.
I've met a girl who is from Germany and she lives in the UK for more than 20 years.
I didn't notice she was a German as her English sounded perfect and beautiful.
However, she told me that only when she counted the number or had to calculate something, her brain switched off English and switched on German automatically.
53+12=65 These kind of easy numbers are fine.
My brain already start calculating in Japanese.
Today I had a productive day.
This morning, I went to work at seven and a half am.
I had a lunch and took a rest about 1 hour.
On time 1 pm, I had a English class until 5 pm.
I had done yoga too.
Tired and stress was disappeared.
I was sure this night I can sleep as well.
Are they same meaning?
It was a meaningful day, I have spent around 6 hours enriching myself, such as reading books, learning English and sum-up.
One of my must-read books is Zizhi Tongjian which is a great history book with well written and wonderful stories.
In the afternoon, I saw a movie called Paddington which was very funny.
The talking bear was very lovely.
My girlfriend came home very late because of her busy work.
She had not had lunch, not to mention dinner.
The boss wanted to take up all her free time.
I am currently training as an office management assistent.
The vocational training takes place on the one hand in the company and on the other hand in the vocational school.
In the company, you are 40 hours a week and therefore 8 hours a day.
At the vocational school 8 classes of 45 minutes each take place in theoretical lessons.
In order to pass the training, exams must be taken at the end.
The examinations and the monitoring of the training run over the Chamber of Industry and Commerce.
At the vocational school you have subjects like for example social studies, ethics, German and English language as well as word and data processing.
In the company one has different tasks, for example dealing with incoming and outgoing mails, sort and file away documents, organize different evevents and taking the minutes.
My favorit subject is German because I like to learn something new about spelling and grammar.
At the company I enjoy preparing and participating in events best because it is very diverse and, unlike the paperwork, it provides a bit variation.
Lately I bought a macbook for studying web design.
Current my job is not related with professional use of design, but someday I would like to have such job.
what is difference between consist and contain?
I remember as if it were yesterday when I first listened to Dire Straits.
I was at a party when I heard a breathtaking solo guitar.
Since then, my dream was always to attend one of its concerts.
Dire Straits had given many concerts in my city but for one reason or another, it had never been possible for me to attend one of their shows.
I had been waiting for more than 30 years and now my dream was going to come true.
However, I started having doubts about whether or not after having expected for so long, the concert would really live up to my expectations.
The evening of the event, I put on my old black leather jacket and went to the football stadium where the concert was to take place in.
When the concert began everything and everybody around me disappeared.
There was nothing but the group and me.
However, the best was yet to come; the solo guitar that I had heard that very first day was longer and more intense than in any of their albums.
If I had to choose a single word to describe this experience, that would be undescribable.
In a nutshell, that day I learnt that no matter how well music sounds in the comfort of your own home, there is nothing like attending a concert.
Musicians playing live always go the extra mile to satisfy their audience.
However, I started having doubts about whether or not after having expected for so long, the concert would really live up to my expectations.
In a nutshell, that day I learnt that no matter how well music sounds in the comfort of your own home, there is nothing like attending a concert.
In January, I went to Lithuania on business trip.
It's shameful to say, but I had very limited knowledge of Lithuania then.
Even the name of the capital Vilnius, I couldn't spell it.
Almost only thing I knew well was that a Japanese diplomat Chiune Sugihara who served as acting consul in Kaunas.
He risked his carrier, but took the the action to protect every individual indispensable life.
This story was famous in Japan and there is even a movie about it.
So I had wanted to ask some Lithuanians if they knew something about Sugihara or Japan since I came to Lithuania.
I couldn't believe the answers I could get because they were more than I had expected.
Of course, she knew Sugihara and heard of the whole story.
Thinking of the Lithuanian situation where many highly educated master graduates have to work as clerk in apparel shop or in fast food chain shops, it could be taken granted for that a Lithuania working at one of the Japanese leading companies had a profound knowledge of history.
But what if around 20 years guys who were not interested in school subjects could know Sugihara and tell me the history eloquently.
Maybe around thirty past four o'clock.
I had to stay up and work all night to fulfill the all tasks by the deadline.
By four o'clock I managed to have all tasks done and the only things left was to print out 50 each of 5 different documents and bring them to the headquarter by taxi.
By 20 minutes before the deadline all copies was done, but 50 more copies of an additional document sent from Estonia suddenly needed bringing to the headquarter together with the other documents.
It takes 8 minutes by taxi from my workplace to the headquarter.
So I thought then there were still 20 minutes left and I could make it.
The extra copies were done as well 5 minutes after then, I rushed to the entry where a taxi was supposed to wait for me.
When I look back on it now, it still makes my heart be beating.
If I could have called another taxi, I was told to have waited for it for 15 minutes.
It could never make it by my deadline.
That's why I thought I had to catch a taxi driving on the street along my workplace, but there was dark outside at twenty five past four o'clock in the morning and I didn't see something move.
For only a moment I could fortunately see a faint light in the darkness in a parking area of supermarket.
I was acting in instinct.
There was only 5 minutes left until deadline, so I didn't have any choice but run to catch the possibility still left.
The faint light was actually a car light and it was almost teenagers those who were eating early breakfast in the car.
I explained to them that I had to bring my documents to headquarter as soon as possible and asked if they could drive me there.
They were first confused, but I was not sure if they felt my sense of crisis and they accepted my offer soon after that.
What made me most surprised was that even these guys knew Sugihara and told me that almost all Lithuanians get to know him before you start to learn him and the story in a history class.
We arrived at the headquarter and I tried to pay somewhat, but they never took the money I gave them.
Story they told and their kindness made me beating heart very calmed.
Have hoy ever been in jail?
Fourtin persons have not been in jail.
It seems the spring already arrived here.
My schnauzer grandpa Jjang-A is looking out windows, and is taking spring breeze in his nosetrills this time.
Our products are part of a tradition that have survived for thousands of years.
I am working as a programmer in a big tech company which has many professional developers from different countries.
My short-terms goals are to improve my skills in this discipline, learning the new programming language, and improve my English skills.
I know it will not be easy, but I have a plan and I will do my best form my deem.
My grandpa Schnauzer Jnang-A is looking out the window 
There are many restaurants to choose for my lunch after the tiring work in the morning.
As a result, it is not easy to choose one of them so quickly.
But this song have not been sung recently.
Probably,the lyrics of this song expressing students' gratitude for their teachers would fit with the times.
I took my motorcycle to the public inspection place for the periodic vehicle inspection required by the Japanese regulation.
Almost users of vehicles ask the dealers of vehicles to pass the periodic vehicle inspection.
Though I did it by myself.
Of course, I made it.
The reason why I did it by myself is for the least cost.
It cost me about $200 included taxes and the mandatory vehicle liability insurance and the inspection fee.
If you ask the dealer of vehicles it, you will pay them more than $600.
I think it is waisting.
And I wanna say in a loud voice It is very easy.
It was very warm.
I went to the park with my children today.
They sweated and played.
We played out of a lot.
My grandmother cooked for dinner today because, she gave the radished from the landlord.
It mixied with rice and boiled.
making fire wood
I made fire woods with my wife today.
It was little bit hard for me to make fire woods with using heavy ax.
Finally I could made many fire woods.
But It got warm today.
Maybe the woods I made is for next winter..
Today, I run for 8km.
The pace is about 6 minutes per km.
It was slow pace and the perpose is recover from fatigue.
The goal of this month is to run 200km and build up physical strength.
I run for 10km yesterday and the pace is about 4'30" per km.
I was tierd and I had to recover from fatigue.
If I don't do that, I may hurt and I maynot run for a short while.
It is a waste of time.
I think practice schedule is important to achieve my goal.
I enjoy the process to achieve my goal.
After work, I went to a department store to buy cakes for my sister-in-law and four nieces who gave my father boxes of chocolates on last February 14th.
There were many men buying cakes or cookies at a confectionery section.
I just want to be a receiving side.
Too hard to learn something after working
And, it is too difficult keep learning someting after over time working.
How do you solve the problems?
It is too tired.
But, of couse we have to learn something even if it is too difficult.
I was riding my bicycle and it stopped because the signal was red.
He didn't apologize me at all.
There are also have many interesting activities and a lot of beautiful flowers.
People held Tet for everyone to rest, enjoy spring.
This is the time for people living at different parts of country gathering and spending time together.
English or Other Languages
I really understand learning English is important, but sometimes it seems to be too much emphasized.
Do Japanese people need English in the first place?
We see many foreigners who are non-native English speakers in our town, but students have to learn only English seriously.
Some students lose interested in English as they get a low score on the test.
English education in Japan drives students into a corner and makes them dislike English.
Students who fail to learn English have a possibility to master other languages.
I think that Japanese junior high and high schools should provide students more opportunities to learn other languages such as Chinese and Portuguese.
Thak you for reading.
I really understand learning English is important, but sometimes it seems to be too much emphasized.
We see many foreigners who are non-native English speakers in our town, but students have to learn only English seriously.
Some students lose interested in English as they get a low score on the test.
Students tend to think that to master other languages is also hard and dislike studying languages.
Students who fail to learn English have a possibility to master other languages.
I think that Japanese junior high and high schools should provide students more opportunities to learn other languages such as Chinese and Portuguese.
We see many foreigners who are non-native English speakers in our town, but students have to learn only English seriously.
I think that Japanese junior high and high schools should provide students more opportunities to learn other languages such as Chinese and Portuguese.
I really understand learning English is important, but sometimes it seems to be too much emphasized.
We see many foreigners who are non-native English speakers in our town, but students have to learn only English seriously.
Some students lose interested in English as they get a low score on the test.
Students tend to think that to master other languages is also hard and dislike studying languages.
Students who fail to learn English have a possibility to master other languages.
Today, we had a farewell party for retired coworker.
They will retire due to retirement age.
He likes reading comic books, he used to buy it every month.
Sometimes if they didn't sell in his city, he would take the train to another city to buy it.
Most of his salary was spent on it.
I think it's good for someone to have a hobby, but I think Helen's grandpa is not suitable for marriage.
Today I met up a friend Helen.
She has a job interview of teacher tomorrow.
She had her hair gray colored.
She didn't want to do so, because she thinks if she teaches well, that enough to take her in.
She intends to apply for the job of chinese teacher, but she wants more to be a math teacher, but she is afraid that she can't teach math as well as chinese.
Today I met up a friend Helen.
She has a job interview of teacher tomorrow.
She had her hair gray colored.
Someone suggested her to return the hair to the normal color, because it gets closer to the image of a teacher.
She didn't want to do so, because she thinks if she teaches well, that enough to take her in.
She intends to apply for the job of chinese teacher, but she wants more to be a math teacher, but she is afraid that she can't teach math as well as chinese.
I accompanied my friend Helen to go home.
To the place she lives in we have to take a small lane.
It's dark and narrow.
Besides, it has too much curves.
On the road a strange thought came to my mind that in China, there are many disappeared every year.
Once hidden, maybe during a long time there wouldn't be anyone to discover it.
It might take me more time to go back home, but I wouldn't be scared.
I picked up 100 dollars at night on the street in front of a train station after my Japanese class finished.
I waited for a while but no one came, so I planed to sent it to the police, and then I
I told them about the windfall and we all agreed that even I send it
to the police, they still can not find the owner.
It happened that all of us were starving, so we decided to have a drinking party using that money.
To be honest, if I picked up a purse, I would of course send it to the police no matter how much money in it.
Since it's just 100 dollars, I would keep it and feel sorry for the owner.
I decided to go the dentist today.
I had two decay teeth.
It made me headache.
In this video, I will speak about the first three steps that you should follow if you want to become fluent in Spanish.
My favorite manga is decided to animeted!
It was a manga that started about 20 years ago, and I knew that manga was already completed.
Since it is an old manga, I was giving up animeted.
Although it's a personal opinion, I feel that the manga is somehow linked with Fullmetal Alchemist.
If you like Fullmetal Alchemist, you may enjoy that animation.
Thanks for reading my post; I appreciate your help!
Mind fullness
I bought a book about "Mind fullness".
It is a good way to take a break for our brain.
We use our brain a lot automatically.
It makes our brain tired.
When we do "Mind fullness", we focus on present.
It is good to relax our mind.
People pushes us in many ways.
A lot of times we are forced to tell lies instead of being we ourselves.
In some sense that is normal, is a question of necessity.
As a social animal species, we usually have a necessity of belonging.
To belong to a specific circle, class or clan.
But is it fare in an open-minded society?
Who do not know 'a friend of' one's self that, for example, has an uncommon disease, has fallen down and pretend that no one saw it, does not catch up a joke, or enjoys collecting playmobil puppets?
Minimalism is trending.
It was focus on the idea of reducing all the stuff you have around you, that probably don't contribute you in any profit.
In a technologic and materialistic environment like mine, that idea shocked me.
Maybe the tape was exaggerated in the way the lead actor avoided any thing apart from the essential, but the concept is good.
Trully, many times we don't need some things that can result in an obstacle for live with intensity the real life, make the most of our face to face relations and to have a healthy habits.
I have rarely use English recently, but I want to apply for a overseas job training of my company.
Does anyone help me learn to speak English using Skype?
Today was a farewell party.
14 people left from my workplace this year.
It is painful for talented people to leave their workplaces.
We will have to do hard instead of them.
I'm looking forward it.
Do you know engawa?
Each company, including foreign companies, run a booth and exhibited many kinds of robots.
We could receive an explanation of the robots function since the staff had been stationed at the booths.
Before I visited it, I thought that robots were more powerful and faster than humans but they could not carry out fine works.
Almost all industrial robots had some articulation to assume the various positions, so they could move like as human arms.
In addition, they were ministurized and had sensors which detected contact of humans.
In Japan, we have been facing a shrinking population so we need to use robots instead of human.
Spread of the collaborative robots would help us with sustained economic growth.
It is one of the usage but I think that humans should be in charge of taking care of customers and robots should do background work.
It's white day today.
I sent a e-mail to my wife's mother for thanks.
I was asked the way to Ginza station from two Chinese travelers today.
Pleases give me a good advice!
Vietnam is famous for Tet holiday.
It takes place from the first day to third day of the first month of lunar calendar.
Although occurring in short period of time, it is the happiest days whole year.
There are many special food such as: Banh Chung,Banh Tet, sticky rice.
My son will graduate from the kindergarten this month.
So, mothers will hold a performance for their kids.
There are 102 mothers joining it.
We had several rehearsals during this month.
It will be excited to our kids.
The schedule is very comfortable which was adjustment by my boyfriend.
The apartment the balcony of which is 3rooms range will live my boyfriend on 22nd March.
The schedule is very comfortable which was adjustment by my boyfriend.
The apartment the balcony of which is 3rooms range will live my boyfriend on 22nd March.
The schedule is very comfortable which was adjustment by my boyfriend.
Yesterday and the day before yesterday I went to one but now I am at another one.
I actually didn't know how I got here but this one is better.
Then, I ordered this one and searched this type of coffee online.
I found another name of it is drip coffee.
This cafe is better than the one that I went to last night because it is lighter and the music is better.
It is Wednesday evening and I am in the Starbucks.
Yesterday and the day before yesterday I went to one but now I am at another one.
I actually didn't know how I got here but this one is better.
I am a regular visitor to Starbucks but it is my first time to see this kind of coffee and it is cheaper than other types on the menu.
Then, I ordered this one and searched this type of coffee online.
I found another name of it is drip coffee.
In order to save money, I will keep the coffee cup and come here with it tomorrow.
In spite of the number of an audience that the auditorium can accommodate, more British theatres don't receive money from the government and so they forced to seek additional sources of financing, arranging except platform performances, foyer music in the entrance foyer, backstage tours, writer's events, outdoor entertainment, tours, etc.
Contemporary theatres are experimenting not only with productions but also with theatrical interior.
Some of them don't have either fixed staging or fixed seating.
It is possible in particular to remove the seats and transform the room into the hall of impressive scale, where are fan-shaped and the high arrangement of seats or comfortably cushioned benches, allows you to get considerable span of the seats
Hope the package arrived safely.
2, Hope you received my package and they have no issue of damaging.
3, I would really appreciate it if you let me know you received my package and they are in good conditions.
Could you teach me the natural and polite way to ask someone that if they have received my package safely?
2, Hope you received my package and they have no issue of damaging.
1, Have you had the time to open my package?
3, I would really appreciate it if you let me know you received my package and they are in good conditions.
I fell better today after ate some medicine.
I almost not sleep yesterday with high temperature all night.
I thought that high-intensity exercise reduce my immunity.
The pictures show dandelion at the roadside.
I saw some dandelions blooming at the shoulder of a road.
I think that they are very strong and tough because they also endured a cold winter and began to bloom their flowers in spring.
I'll go to Australia in a week, and I'll be gone for at least a year.
Farewell Dr.Hawking
Dr.
I asked him "Is he still alive?" my boyfriend said, "yeah he is alive".
He doesn't like movies much, but we watched the movie "The Theory of Everything" because he wanted.
Although I wasn't so interested in Dr.
It became the best movie for me in 2014.
We always love you, Dr.
The new apartment is good overall, but the wall splits the next room seems to be very thin.
Being one hour head of you means that I'm in the future.
Being one hour head of you doesn't mean anything.
Being one hour head of you doesn't mean shit.
I wouldn't say anything to him because I know he's full of shit.
We don't need to know about rules when we're learning something, so fuck them.
He's the classic douchebag that nobody stands.
I like coffee and drink too many everyday.
I needed some change.
I'm inclined to have coffee a lot even though my friend suggested me not too have too much.
A beautiful woman in front of me said "oh dear" and was quivering because she just found inspectors on the tram.
I was told at the reception to put on a mask to prevent nosocomial infection.
The e-mail marred everything I planned for Saturday.
I can't relate to people who don't have fundamental understanding of human decency.
He lacks decency for everything.
I conducted her skincare since she didn't have good skin condition.
Something was pulling me into the marsh in my dream.
I'm not good at catching a glimpse for food what other people are having at the restaurant while deciding what I order.
I don't like all the people scorn other people.
Today I was asked.
"What do you think about socialism and communism.
these regimes are cruel and despotic.
tlel me what do you think".
And then I've explained differences between communism and socialism.
First regime is a pipe dream because it is an Utopia.
So privet property and people property are combine and you have got both of these property in your country.
If you want to know more write me i will ask your questions.
I haven't regretted that I chose English for learn language.
I felt fabulously interested in the language.
Do you hear the sound of waves from the video?
I would like to share this feeling with friends.
It seems that she's filled with pleasure, and this makes me happy, too.
Look at it, doesn't the weather look amazing?
I have been learning Japanese for more than three years, my daily conversation level is ok but writing is always a hard part.
Recently my work gets  envole with translating from English to Japanese.
I hope Lang-8 friend will help me with my writing.
Thanks you.
Recently my work gets  envole with translating from English to Japanese.
I hope Lang-8 friend will help me with my writing.
Good Routine is Important for Me
It is Wednesday morning and have just arrived at the office.
It was my routine to write something down every morning before work when I worked in China, now I want to develop this routine in my office in Hong Kong.
Rewriting notes is very important and it helps me to know what my main focus is and how to have my work done one step by step.
I came here to work in March 1st and it has been 14 days already.
The most important thing for me is to develop some appropriate routines that I am able to live happily in a sustainable way.
We were working hard in an office when the phone rang.
I'm going to Germany and Poland this autumn for sightseeing.
So, I'm learning German and Polish by myself for greetings, for shopping,for asking the way.
German is difficult enough, but, Polish is much more than that!!!!!
I can't even distinguish what word they are speaking.
Only I can hear is greetings and very few words like "Of course.", "That's right.".
But I keep myself up.
Today is what they call "White day" in Japan.
Boys send presents for girls.
My boyfriend will take me to a rich restaurant.
I like smoking a cigarette, but smoking space is very few and narrow.
I don't want to trouble to people around me, so I always go to smoking space if I smoke.
but there is always crowded.
and many cafes and restaurants don't have smoking space.
I really want to more space we can smoke.
Our country is making many "non smoking area" for Olympic in 2020.
There is nothing for it.
But, maybe they can improve quality of each smoking space.
I hope it.
If I had enough time, I wonder how should I use it.
Would I study English more and more or finish my task as much as twice?
I think that time is very precious because I only have a little time, thus I try to make good use of it.
If I had plenty of time, I would never appreciate it any more and start to waste it.
I only have spared time, so I try to make good use of it.
Many Japanese people don't know slant eyes gesture.
In Japan, this gesture is often used as angry gesture.
It looks angry face for us.
I guess many people don't get angry if they meet the gesture.
You can put your index fingers on your forehead.
Some kids says "yesterday my mom was like it" while they do the gesture.
Motivation to study
I have started thinking about my yet another attempt to approach English a couple of months ago.
I have just little demand in English.
There are a few people in Russia that you need to talk to in English in the office eve in international companies.
Let's leave aside a wide-spread case of trying to pass entrance exams and getting university education.
Let's imagine that you're an ordinary 30 y.
o.
person, who has an average income, who usually has applied, down to earth goals.
Why you doing what you doing here?
There is an opinion that spending tax dollars on finding signs of immediate life on other planets is just wastes, others believe that it is a big leap forward for all humankind.
Firstly, quite often governments do not have enough money to fulfill some social or economic policies, and subsequently, the level of life in society can slump.
Despite these investments can be very useful in the nearest future, for nowadays situation, this is very bad.
Secondly, in spite of the fact that people very sure that they will find life on other planets, there is a quite big break that we are alone in the galaxy.
So, if governments did not spend a lot of money on such projects, they would not face a lack of money because they still did not find life on other planets.
Firstly, these investments can be justified if they will find something on other planets because other planets have some resources which people can use too.
Secondly, the earth is becoming less and less suitable for life because of environmental problems, global warming and so on, and that is why finding other planets is not a crazy option.
Some scientists had argued that the earth will explode or die in less than a thousand years, maybe it was one of the main reason why some countries started such projects.
I support the first opinion because such project can be very useful in the future, however, the bulk of the population still do not understand it.
We were sprinting across the meadow, but we caught up only when the bag started being blown from left to right and from right to left, just as the staff sergeant had anticipated.
This zigzagging was to our advantage so that we almost reached the bag.
On the contrary, when the bag got caught by a stone, the staff sergeant used the stick, which he was otherwise constantly swinging through the air, to free the bag so that it could roll on.
Of course the staff sergeant immediately got ready to climb down the embankment to fish out the bag with the stick, but I managed to convince him that a bit further down the river we could find a place that was less steep and less slippery.
Some people believe that women and men are equal in their rights and should have the same opportunities in such dangerous professions like a soldier or a police officer, while others suppose that there are many differences between genders, and that is why women do not have rights to engage in "male occupations".
On the one hand, men and women are equal in their right and should have the same opportunities.
Firstly, a lot of people had thought that men are stronger than women, but with time they were wrong because time has proven that women often are tougher and more stress-resilient, and that is why they can solve problems in such jobs faster.
In other words, it is a stereotype which had been refuted.
For example, men are strong, while women are fast and crafty.
Moreover, despite men tend to actions, women quite often think before action.
So, as can be clearly seen from our nowadays world, there are many armies which mainly consist of women because they can operate some task better than men.
Finally, this equality in rights is a global trend, and it explains why more and more countries provide access to the army for female.
On the other hand, both women and men have some peculiarities, and this means that for one gender the profession is more suitable than for another.
Firstly, women are mothers for their children and they a greater impact on them than fathers, and subsequently, it is better for them to stay home and take care of children.
Secondly, if women enlist, it will lead to some problems at the army.
In addition, in some countries, the army is not highly developed, and that is why they can be raped.
Thirdly, the simplest argument, but the strongest is that women are just women, they should not be employed in jobs that require physical efforts.
To sum up, despite some people thinking that women must not have an access to army, policy and other structures like these, others argue that both genders should be equal in their rights.
I agree with that latter position because often women can operate some tasks better than men.
Moreover, army and police service can give some benefits for women like stability, social security or women just want to express their patriotism through such jobs.
To support my opinion, three reasons are listed as followed.
Easy to catch rap music
By the way, one of my aim is to catch what rappers are rapping without lyricsites.
If you know anyone who is rapping easy to catch, please let me know.
Easy to catch rap music
Despite March, my best 2018 song is decided on Rae Sremmurd - Powerglide.
By the way, one of my aim is to catch what rappers are rapping without lyricsites.
If you know anyone who is rapping easy to catch, please let me know.
If you know anyone who is rapping easy to catch, please let me know.
I usually start to sow some seeds at this time, for exemple onions, cabbages, peas, parsnips and leeks, but this year the soil is not ready yet, so the collect will be later.
I also have to prune my fruit trees, it's important for keeping them in a good health and having a good collect.
In short I will be busy when I finally could work outdoor, but it's not a problem because it's my hobby!
Could I work in the garden tomorrow?
I can't do anything since the beginning of the winter because it rained a lot, it froze and then it rained again.
I usually start to sow some seeds at this time, for exemple onions, cabbages, peas, parsnips and leeks, but this year the soil is not ready yet, so the collect will be later.
In short I will be busy when I finally could work outdoor, but it's not a problem because it's my hobby!
Even online dictionaries dont help.
The idioms I came across with yedterday turned out to be absolutely unknown!
Could you help me figure out their meaning please?
A bright lad in spats;
A little ditch known as Panama Canal;
To stop clinging to something.
Today, I was told that people could become happy by stopping clinging to something.
I have thought that I have to work at the current company to earn my salary.
That means that if a man wants to avoid something, his subconsciousness can't help recognizing it.
A man came from a center that deals with senior citizens' home introductions and related matters, who has been engaged in this business more than ten years.
Here's some important points regarding a wise choice on a purchase of a senior citizens' home.
They postpone it for many years, but one of the couples may get dementia or another disease that may disqualify them from getting into one.
The building commands a very good view of Kobe, one of "a million-dollar view" as it was called before, not only from your room but also from a large bathroom.
After that we visited another senior citizens' home B downtown.
It was about ten-minute walk from a train station.
In Home A, you have to pay a lot again to move to a nursing room from your general room in case you're too ill, but in Home B you don't have to pay another money.
They seem to be Korean.
They wanted to go to Arashiyama and asked me whether they can get to there by Nara Line.
To get to Arashiyama, you need to use Saganosanin Line, so I said to them.
They looked disappointed and said to me thank you, then walked away.
After that, I regret not taking them to the platform for Arashiyama.
I'm not good with direction and didn't have confidence.
Today, on my way home at Kyoto Station, two men spoke to me.
They wanted to go to Arashiyama and asked me whether they can get to there by Nara Line.
To get to Arashiyama, you need to use Saganosanin Line, so I said to them.
They looked disappointed and said to me thank you, then walked away.
After that, I regret not taking them to the platform for Arashiyama.
I'm not good with direction and didn't have confidence.
It has been six months since I wrote the last article in Lang8.
Now I finally have time to have a rest.
So it's time to throw myself into English.
I became shocked when I read about the death of Stephen Hawking.
He was a talented person that has known especially for the "Black Hole Theory".
He had a special diseases that can't move and talk at all, but even with this sickness he won Nobel prize.
Always, I feel the death is so far from these kinds of people.
I mean, I feel these people are immortal, but unfortunately it happens for everyone.
It is a big pity for humanity when these smarts people die.
My oldest son graduated from high school the other day.
It is definitely spring.
Today, my youngest son graduated from junior high school.
My daughters and wife gave me some chocolate on the Valentine's day, so today I got to get some gifts for them.
I remember her talking about it just a few days ago.
And for my wife, I'm thinking of buying some Haagen-Dazs ice creams.
I might change my thoughts at the grocery store, though.
Whatever I'd buy, I hope they'd like it.
And for my wife, I'm thinking of buying some Haagen-Dazs ice creams.
My daughters and wife gave me some chocolate on the Valentine's day, so today I got to get some gifts for them.
I remember her talking about it just a few days ago.
My daughters and wife gave me some chocolate on the Valentine's day, so today I got to get some gifts for them.
For the second daughter, I think Oreo cookies would make the best choice.
That's what I'm thinking right now.
To Be Controlled or Not to Be
I still had had some undone tasks when the closing time came, so I lingered at my office until 9:00 PM.
I hate this kind of day which lacks time leeway.
In such days, I feel that I was restricted and manipulated by someone.
I want to control all of my life by myself!
To make it come true, I am going to complete some of my desk work until the closing time.
Did you hear the sound of waves form the vidieo?
Can you see the deep blue sky and beutiful surface of sea?
It's extremely beautiful and peaceful view.
I would like to share this waves'sound and feeling with my feiends!
Ah, Namshan has been exciting on the east sea beach.
Although I can neither understand most of English news nor communicate with foreigners, I'll continue my English study.
For example, " people who has red clothes."
Please tell me that you are correspond or not correspond.
The ministry of finance in Japan revised a document related to a selling state owned land to one of private academic organizations.
They kept describing that all the procedures were done correctly at the Japanese parliament councils.
They completely denied that there was influence of some Japanese parliament members in the selling transaction.
However now they recognized to delete some articles on the document and in the document names of Japanese parliament members were found.
It is clear that they told a lie and they need to investigate whether or not the procedure was properly completed.
My lesson plan
*Intermediate lesson*
*Beginner lesson*
*Correction; phonics, sentences *
You can choose tight correction, smooth correction, no correction.
The tight correction goes like correcting every mistake.
The smooth correction goes like correcting big or repeated mistakes.
No correction goes like just focusing conversation without corrections.
A wave of works is flocking!
If you want to get a job in Japan, you have to make your resume in many cases.
It is often said that handwriting resume is still preferred.
When I was a college student, I was looking for a job and many people advised me to handwrite it, but I didn't.
I wondered why I had to handwrite it, so I made all resumes by my computer.
If I had a chance to change jobs, I would not handwrite it.
Handwriting Resume in Japan
I try to make tutorials which would be easy to understand in a short time 
In return my patrons will receive better content as my skills and technologies increase.
The tendency men like being taller than women seem to reflect on male-dominant society.
Also, there are many things like accessibility to the high places they can benefit from.
She has been searched work since last year
He has not still fallen 
He has never taken a cold shower in mornings
The water has not been warm yet 
I have already spent the chocolates
An old lady visited my house this morning to ask me whether I saw her cat.
She told me her cat had been missing for almost 4 months.
He is a boy and 4 years old and ran away on January 1st.
For her he is not just a cat but a member of her family.
Somebody in my neighborhood told her he saw a cat looked like her cat the other day.
Then she is trying him around here.
I told her that I would let her know if I saw him.
I hope she will find him.
I told her that I would let her know if I saw him.
It teaches me many diseases and I can know them.
What is the meaning of a launched mirror disc ball
I have read an article about a mirror disco ball which was launched to space in this January.
I recall that the mirror disco ball is called "humanity ball".
It has a functionality of reclecting the sun light because it is consisted of mirror.
In the other words, it is just a mirror ball, nothing special fucntionality.
I think that the way to use of this is to make an attention of people to space or advertize somthing by attracting people to topic.
At first, I thought that this will be one of the space debris which might be a problem of space development in near future.
But now, I have a second thought that this kind of action will be an impetus to rapidly develop a space industory.
I'm very interested in the space development and a posibility of going to space, so I'm now open to this kind of activities.
They find out that neither little streams not great rivers flow back.
A young people turning to an elderly just like green grass turning to yellow so soon.
It naturally suggests the pressure of the passing of time.
But however slow it is, the fear to it has struck on people.
The books are written about how to improve web performance, such as page loading speed or rendering speed.
They are a bit expensive, but I believe worth it.
If I had a cafe in my school, I could enjoy my meal because I get tired of box lunches.
I am wondering whether the tense of this sentence is right or not.
One of my colleagues is curious to your lesson.
She works parttime at our hospital and wants to have a lesson with her baby.
Do you mind if she join the lesson that I reserve on 20th?
Now, the national stadium is been building in Sendagaya.
If you come to Tokyo when the Tokyo Olympic is held I recommend you use train because the train tickets are cheaper than taxi and it will be safe compared with other transport method.
Now, the national stadium is been building in Sendagaya.
It is for the Tokyo Olympic which will be held 2020 in Japan.
I would like to watch soccer games at the new national stadium.
If you come to Tokyo when the Tokyo Olympic is held I recommend you use train because the train tickets are cheaper than taxi and it will be safe compared with other transport method.
I like to go a restaurant, and eat something.
I am wondering who invents such a great place like restaurant.
Anyway, I am now interesting with stake house in such a kind of restaurant.
I used not to visit like a stake house because I do not like eat meet like beef and pork etc.
But today, my situation seem to be different.
I am eager to eat meet in particular beef.
That is the silly story of my recent life.
My female friend 
A: Yes...
It will take more than 8hours to get there.
A: Yes...
A: Yes...
I love myself
I tried to study Japanese on my own several times, but it was hard to master even Hirakana by myself.
Therefore, I applied for the home-study course.
We will have our class at a meeting room for 20 minutes once a week.
She visited me for the first time today, and I learned Japanese alphabet like a child.
When I traveled in Tsushima island last month, I already bought two Japanese books.
My home-study teacher visits my office instead of my home at lunch time.
When can I read them?^^;;;  
I have so many errands to do.
I'm too sleepy to work now because I worked too late yesterday even though I have a lot of things to do today.
Now I remember the word of Porco Rosso "Don't work thorough the night.
Lack of sleep is an enemy of work.
I went to a supermarket on the way home from my office yesterday and bought a strawberry.
I ate some strawberry.
It's difficult to use the word "know" for Japanese people. 
Some people may that Vermilion wrote about it again if they saw my title, but I'll try this again.
I knew how to use the machine before, but I've completely forgotten it.
I just came to know how to use the machine.
I hope you will start to use the word "know" precisely.
I don't like cold.
I feel bad in winter.
Because I like flowers smell.
Because I like coloful flowers.
The tap should be opened to run water a little so that it won't freeze below-zero temperature.
When people learning foreign languages, it is really important to have confidence.
Especially if it is speaking, confidence is more important.
But I can feel how much important when I live in China.
First month in China, I was worried about Chinese might can't understand what I am saying.
Furthermore, many people using dialect out of school, especially when old people speak in dialect, I can't understood anything.
Now women can choose a wide variety of jobs than before and more women are active to work at many fields.
Now women can choose a wide variety of jobs than before and more women are active to work at many fields.
To verify the rationality of the proposed approaches, comparison with existing approaches are presented.
Chloe's parents suggested me to stay close like family and go for drinks in the future even though Chloe has died.
Chloe's parents suggested me to stay close like family and go for drinks in the future even though Chloe has died.
He was called "wandering poet of the time".
He was royal to his modifier.
Having said that, the school isn't working as a school but many companies that are related to creating are accommodated.
I've been the school several times when the school was holding an event.
Having said that, the school isn't working as a school but many companies that are related to creating are accommodated.
Secondly the speeding time has made pressure on them.
New Years means that children is moving to the splendid period of their life.
One development we hear much is '' automation of transport''.
Recently the automated train prototype have succeeded to travel for hundreds kilometers without human intervention and some expect automated transportation will be commonplace in the future.
For now, maglev is the fastest transport all over the world,so for time being it has played important roles.
campus life
I majored in business admiration.
Entering university,I met many interesting classes.
especialy I love class student discuss each other.
Enjyoed to meeting a lot of different people.
I have decided to cut my long hair
I have been using long hair about five years and in the past days, I decided to cut it.
So today, at afternoon I went the barbershop where I used to go.
But it was full of people, I supposed that today, Tuesday, it might be empty, but I was wrong.
The hairdresser told that if I want to stay I must wait for more than an hour, it was a long time and I decided to come back tomorrow.
I hope tomorrow will not be so many people like today.
I am used to using long hair, even when I was a kid.
In high school, using long hair was forbidden by the authorities and teachers.
But when I was in college I returned to using it long.
Now begins to happen the opposite, how ironic.
I have noticed that I have begun to lose hair, I don't know why maybe because of my father's heritage.
My males relatives by my father began to lose hair when even they were young as well.
I will shift long hair by a bald head.
It actually doesn't like me.
The hairdresser told that if I want to stay I must wait for more than an hour, it was a long time and I decided to come back tomorrow.
I hope tomorrow will not be so many people like today.
I am used to using long hair, even when I was a kid.
But when I was in college I returned to using it long.
Now begins to happen the opposite, how ironic.
I have noticed that I have begun to lose hair, I don't know why maybe because of my father's heritage.
I will shift long hair by a bald head.
A free time
How long I don't write something here.
How's it going community.
I am working alone in my job because my coworker leaved 
and I'd been staying responsible for three hundread computers until
When I read a story of Sherlock Holmes series written by Aurther Conan Doyle in the past, I expected to have trouble understanding the writing style in the 19th century English.
However, I was able to read it without much trouble regardless of unfamiliar expressions here and there.
There may not be big differences between the19th century English and the present day English.
On the other hand, Japanese language has changed dramatically in the early 20th century, especially in the literal language.
Traditionally, the colloquial language and the literal language were world apart in Japanese.
In this movement, they tried to integrate the hard-to-understand literal language to the plainer colloquial one.
It took some time, but after the WW2, almost all literal works came to use the writing style easy to to understand for everyone.
In the present time, ordinary Japanese mightn't understand the literal works written during the Meiji period.
When I read a story of Sherlock Holmes series written by Aurther Conan Doyle in the past, I expected to have trouble understanding the writing style in the 19th century English.
On the other hand, Japanese language has changed dramatically in the early 20th century, especially in the literal language.
Traditionally, the colloquial language and the literal language were world apart in Japanese.
In this movement, they tried to integrate the hard-to-understand literal language to the plainer colloquial one.
It took some time, but after the WW2, almost all literal works came to use the writing style easy to to understand for everyone.
In the present time, ordinary Japanese mightn't understand the literal works written during the Meiji period.
I hope many scientists develop new medicines and vaccines.
We have to do own best, because we'll play a gig next month.
I asked her, "What is the civil wedding?"
Some couples only register their marriage.
He was seeing crying at the front door, but reassured his mom, "I've done."
He was seeing crying at the front door, but reassured his mom, "I've done."
I'm her to learn English language my native language is Arabic, I'm from Algeria 
I'm now on a trip in Tokyo.
Yesterday, I had nothing to do in particular, so I decided to spend the evening seeing 'The Shape of Water' at a theatre, which is very famous for winning a lot of movie prizes.
Sally Hawkins, as the main character, did a great performance, and I thought no actress but she could attract audiences like this.
After finishing the show, I wonder that the last word of the title 'water' could be replaced by another one 'love'.
After finishing the show, I wonder that the last word of the title 'water' could be replaced by another one 'love'.
In this movie, I think water is not only an obstacle but a catalyst to get a true love.
I'm now on a trip in Tokyo.
Sally Hawkins, as the main character, did a great performance, and I thought no actress but she could attract audiences like this.
In this movie, I think water is not only an obstacle but a catalyst to get a true love.
The woman dancing was his girlfriend.
Is anisong loved by many people?
I have brought clothes false start yesterday.
I have been filled with satisfaction from buying a trench-coart and denim jacket!
I can play only 3or4 chain but I want to watch the professional games!
Is anisong loved by many people?
Is anisong loved by many people?
I saw my dream about visiting zoo last night..
I always see my dream about work.
last weekend, I went to the used book store, the Half Price Book.
I wanted the DVD of Ghibli, but there was nothing in the store.
I bought the one of Harry potter series instead.
He gets thinner day by day because of having a less apatite when the fever lasts for a while.
He must be drained out now by fighting against the virus inside him.
Hoping that he gets full recovered from illness and get right back in swing.
Apart from that, I am getting worn out by doing parenting, housework and my job.
I lessen the amount of drinking alcohol.
Originally I like to drink not only beer also sake, wine and wiskey.
Once I start to drink, I feel like to keep it until I am satisfied.
I think it is not good for my health and life so I make up my mind to lessen the frequency of drinking.
After that I get up at 5 AM and go to a cafe to work my job on my laptop.
I feel that I use my time effectively.
Today, It hold on a party with only company's women's.
It's first time from I work in this company.
I'm looking forward this.
A talent and efforts.
If you are interested in the baseball, you must have heard of Ichiro.
He is a Japanese baseball player and belongs to Seattle mariners in Major league baseball.
Several days ago, every news program and news paper reported on him because he moved to Seattle mariners from Miami.
Until several years ago, he was belonging to mariners, then he moved to New York Yankees for some reasons.
So, this is a coming back.
He achieved so many records in both Japanese baseball and Major league baseball.
I don't think that we should consider this is merely thanks to his talent.
He must have made efforts greater than other players.
The man who has a talent and makes great efforts can achieve an extraordinary feat.
However, first of all, he likes baseball.
He likes the best out of all player.
That's why he still keeps being an active player despite his age over 40.
A talent and efforts.
He is a Japanese baseball player and belongs to Seattle mariners in Major league baseball.
Several days ago, every news program and news paper reported on him because he moved to Seattle mariners from Miami.
Until several years ago, he was belonging to mariners, then he moved to New York Yankees for some reasons.
So, this is a coming back.
I don't think that we should consider this is merely thanks to his talent.
The man who has a talent and makes great efforts can achieve an extraordinary feat.
He likes the best out of all player.
That's why he still keeps being an active player despite his age over 40.
I felt my face feel colder, and tear drops along my cheeks.
After a few seconds, he rised his shoulder.
When I attended a lesson at a school, One of my class mates asked me "what are you up to tomorrow?
"I said nothing to do tomorrow" He invited me to go to the club with his friends.
Actually, I seldom go to the night club therefore I respond vaguely LOL I was so happy that he invited me.
Any way, I finally found who I study with prior to the school.
I just want to study with someone who teach me.
I want to know more specific what my weakness points.
If I corporate with studying,
I would be get more score than before.
Recently,I've changed to how to answer on the TOEIC test there reason why is I didn't have enough time to answer.
Deswegen lud ich meine amerikanische Freundin zum Essen mit mir ein.
Es war so interessant..
Deswegen lud ich meine amerikanische Freundin zum Essen mit mir ein.
Some houses including the protagonist's one still remain in spite of the bomb dropping about 200 years ago.
In my game, Sanctuary Hills is a place where all companions stay except for Preston Garvey, so it's a really homey place.
Some settlers wearing a power armor are walking around the area.
There are two dead bodies of unique NPCs, and they were Decon and Carla.
However she still kept roaming around in my settlement, so I got annoyed and killed her.
Some settlers wearing a power armor are walking around the area.
If you trust neoprene which is made of cloth with your arm, how do you feel?
How hard you thrust it, you cannot have a real feeling of thrusting.
If you trust neoprene which is made of cloth with your arm, how do you feel?
It's sunny this morning, but Japanese cedar pollen is scattered this morning.
I'm pain because cause it.
I tired prepare to move, but I'll keep working on it today.
If not hay fever, then it's easy.
One her life is her own.
Two, her dream is great to document as history, But I would advise her to imagine her parents and her friends being in tear.
it was not so crowded when I started crimbing, but it was heavily crowded at 9 o'clock.
I was satisfied because I was able to clear all 4th grade routes in one day.
Next time I will try 3rd grades.
It will take time to clear all 3rd grades.
The conscious consumption is a rational way of shopping.
It is responsibility for ecology and ethic.
Behind every thing there are industry, damage to environment and works by many people.
The responsibility for excess production rests not only with producers, but with each of us.
Everyone can be eco-friendly and carefully selected shopping, recycle unnessesary and buy less.
It's easy than it seems.
I think that idea of conscious consumption is very popular now.
For example, the swap-parties are widespread, especcialy among young people.
This is a meeting, where participants exchange their clothes which is valued, but it does no longer used by them, for clothes which they will wear.
It is responsibility for ecology and ethic.
Behind every thing there are industry, damage to environment and works by many people.
There is the rule of 3 "R": reduce, reuse and recycle.
Everyone can be eco-friendly and carefully selected shopping, recycle unnessesary and buy less.
It's easy than it seems.
Searching A New Home
I am searching a new home because I will commute to the new workplace.
However, it is moving within Tokyo.
I would like to get a new home more near place to my new jobsite.
How does it take to your jobsite and how would you go to your workplace?
I will go to my workplace by a train, and I would like to get a home which is possible to go to my workplace as soon as possible.
Searching A New Home
I am searching a new home because I will commute to the new workplace.
However, it is moving within Tokyo.
I would like to get a new home more near place to my new jobsite.
How does it take to your jobsite and how would you go to your workplace?
I will go to my workplace by a train, and I would like to get a home which is possible to go to my workplace as soon as possible.
I am searching a new home because I will commute to the new workplace.
However, it is moving within Tokyo.
I would like to get a new home more near place to my new jobsite.
How does it take to your jobsite and how would you go to your workplace?
I will go to my workplace by a train, and I would like to get a home which is possible to go to my workplace as soon as possible.
right now, I'm stil working on my natural voice.
I know I have a lot more to go to master singing with my natural voice, but this time, I tried singing the same song in a bit higher key in comparison.
It'd make me happy if you could listen to my singing!!
The Life In Oversea
There are youtuber who living in foreign countries.
Fortunately, their way of life and their new settlements fit.
The ideal society was created for a long time by different people.
Q: For what purpose study English?
A: Eventually I would like to use it for business communication.
Now I am able to do just reading English messages.
I wake up early today, at around 8:30.
Now I had forgotten what I spent the one hour to do.
After washing my face and brushing my teeth, I started to read Zizhi Tongjian, just finished two pages.
Then I spend 30 minutes on modifying my diary on Lang-8 and around 40 minutes on New Concept English.
The funds I bought were down around 1.0% today.
I was going to redemption from my funds.
In the afternoon, I learned some knowledge about computer algorithm which was boring for me.
Last week I entered a interview.
This means nothing worthy of debating.
So in that interview, I always thought the con side was saying nothing incorrect.
But I had to refute.
The HR must think I was a foolish.
The day after tomorrow I'm gonna have an interview with debate again.
Some strange manner
I was born in the rural areas of China, and there are a lot of strange manner.
For examples:
First, you can't eat with the guests.
Second, children are not supposed to sit on back direction of  the table.
Thrid, you are not supposed to get a gift with one hand.
You must use two hands.
I didn't write any diary since I couldn't log in Lang-8 a few days ago.
Shit like this happened in China as the website always runs on oversea servers.
I'd like to list some other wired things about bad luck today.
The process of the Python course got stucked so that I had to leave the office early.
Two of my favorite games are needed to updated.
It would be a long time before they are downloaded because the total data is nearly 10 GB.
Another game platform, Origin, which is a product of EA couldn't work neither.
I think tomorrow will be fine, because today is a little of bad.
According to experts, Nickel is typical case of lagging index, whose demand has been left behind for past years.
Therefore, mining companies have reduced their investment, which as a result, failed to meet the current increasing needs for it.
In addition, the recovery of the global economy and the automation of industry are also accommodating the rise.
The mining industry pointed out that it is highly challenging to increase the production because of the long weak demand for Nickel and the shortage of investment from mining companies, which causing short supply of Nickel, and it drove up the price.
My friends find these essays and stories very ___enjoyful???_______________.
ENJOY
ENJOY
Then I wonder what is the difference between them.
I really don't understand that...
What is "like"?
Then I wonder what is the difference between them.
I really don't understand that...
When I watch a movie, a father often says "I love you" to his kids and the kids say "I love you, too".
They never say "I like you" or "I like you, too".
Today was a long day with me.
I started from 7a.
m to 12 p.m. It was my effective day.
And tomorrow will a working hard day too.
It is already at 2:00 before I knew it.
I have played "PES 2018" too much to sleep well!
Tomorrow I should go job.
I will go to TAIWAN for the business trip in this weekend.
For the first time in a month to go there.
I will go to TAIWAN for the business trip in this weekend.
Anna is good at working and communicating within a team to achieve shared goals and always ready to receivenew information.
She has the following personal qualities: the ability to learn quickly, sociability, responsibility,concentration on team work, industrious and purposefulness.
it's my first contribute.
tomorrow, I'll move to a new house.
I live in a city which is north of Japan.
so it's cold in March.
but my new house is located in southern city!!
it is hard to pack my household goods for moving...
but I feel good to see my "cleaning" room!
How to evaluate the trusty in realtionship 
Trusty is one of vital elements in every relationship.
But how should we measure it and how much to satisfy with the measured results?
C still keep silent in his salary amount, his family, and our plan in the future.
I am not interested in money but I just want to know how much he cares me than money, how important I am compare to his assets.
I work on the local government.
It is said that the public employees in rural area are winners.
Lest of the people, who has been living in a country side, get married when young because it's difficult to live alone.
Kids may be imprinted on mind to get a formal job.
If I had more information about jobs, I must have chosen another job.
I do not agree that we should pay more for things which we are pleased to do.
It does not make sense for me.
And I have some points with examples to support it.
In the first place, we must think about poor people.
If leisure activities will become too expensive, these people simply cannot afford entertainment.
As an example, families that have some problems with money will not be able to support the tradition of going to an amusement park.
Lately, we do not have enough time for pleasure things today, because we are so busy.
For example, if I finally found time to go to the cafe with my friends, I would not like my plans to collapse because of the money problem.
I would like to conclude with words that good mood and pleasant memories make our lives better.
The power of the internet to help other people
That is because the photo called everyone attention for showing the teacher teaching how to use the text editor Microsoft Word for his students in the classroom.
However, he was using the blackboard instead of a computer and he could accurately draw the editor screen on the blackboard with just chalk since the school has no computers since 2011.
After a businesswoman seen the photo, she decided to tweet for Microsoft in Africa and the giant company decided to help the school by providing a computer and access to the Microsoft Certified Educator program, and free professional development resources.
To my right I saw the lady who helped me last year.
She approached me and asked me I have ever been there before and who helped me with my filling the taxes.
She asked me as many questions as when we first did business.
But either way i still had to pay federal taxes.
Although he knew he shoud to cry.
But his older sister Jasmin cried, his mother cried and father cried too.
But he must not to cry because he was a cat, the most coolest cat in the world.
People talked that everything will be alright, life will be normal and everithing will be forgotten.
But cursed time go and go and nothing changed.
Every day life going to be even worse.
Father drinks.
Jasmin had point her hair to pink colour, but her mood like black cloud.
She has dissapeared.
But Jamy hope that soon will come a day when they will be happy again, even his second sister Rose, who lived at the stone shelf.
When I was young I used to go to work driving my car through th city centre but in the last few years I usually drive on a new large highway to go to work, because it's faster.
This evening I had to go to the city and I had to go through the same way of the past.
I think because there is the new highway around the city and there also is a new subway so the people use the first one if they have to go from one end to the other or they use the second one if they had to go to the downtown.
A command set that the same conformities to law appear even in this very simplified version of the real world.
Results testify that general rules together with the amount of speakers influence on that, how a language grows and develops.
For example English and Chinese, have simple grammatical structures.
However, languages that speak only in one mountain valley or in one village have very difficult and tangled grammar often.
What connection between the amount of native speakers of language and its grammar and dictionary?
Than more people talk a certain language, then its grammar is simpler and a vocabulary increases.
When we study a new language, a study of words is not the most intricate problem.
Study by grammar, in turn, is not a simple task.
Appeared, that in the large groups of "word" really spread quicker.
Nevertheless, grammatical innovations spread slowly, as "people" during great while did not have the opportunity to meet again and to pass to each other of innovation.
Nevertheless, in small groups there were opposite conformities to law: individuals often met, therefore if someone invented some grammatical innovation, a group caught her considerably quicker.
However, new words in such groups gave birth rarer it is originates from a simple fact, that they were created by less of "people".
At the end of the eigthteen century Rusia started to colonice the Alaska.
According with the Papal Bull "inter caetera", signed by the Pope Alejandro VI in 1493, Spain had the right to colonice all the territory of the New World except Brazil.
During 250 years any Spaniard explored North America until the news of the Russian colonitation of Alaska arrived to Mexico.
When they arrived to nowadays city of San Francisco, Juan de Ayala, saw an island full of gannets.
Over time this island have become in one of the most famous places in the world.
According with the Papal Bull "inter caetera", signed by the Pope Alejandro VI in 1493, Spain had the right to colonice all the territory of the New World except Brazil.
During 250 years any Spaniard explored North America until the news of the Russian colonitation of Alaska arrived to Mexico.
Over time this island have become in one of the most famous places in the world.
It seems like there's a rule but with so much exception.
Wish this is able to help me burn more fuel of learning Spanish.
Do the previous two sentences mean the same thing?
When I left my room, two in three elevators of my condo stopped and my room is on 24th floor in 36 floors, so I waited for long time until I took it.
On top of that, I had to attend many meetings at various venues, so I could not do desk work I had to do ASAP and I had to do it until finished them.
Finally, it took very long time and I also arrived at home very late.
This morning I woke up very late because I had a drink with my former teammates until late.
When I left my room, two in three elevators of my condo stopped and my room is on 24th floor in 36 floors, so I waited for long time until I took it.
On top of that, I had to attend many meetings at various venues, so I could not do desk work I had to do ASAP and I had to do it until finished them.
Anna ist gut in die Arbeit und die Kommunikation innerhalb des Teams.
2nd Level Support in der Materialwirtschaft:
Nobody wants to hang out with him because he's a showoff.
That dictionary can kiss my ass because I'm not going to trust it anymore.
That dictionary can kiss my ass because I'm not going to trust it no more.
That dictionary can kiss my ass because I'm not going to trust it no more.
She passed them to him and then he tasted again and said, "Much better!
She rushed into her chicken yard and soon came back with a freshly slaughtered fowl.
it's 1.
am in my country, i cant sleep because i have sleeped in this afternoon.
i learning two languges are japanese and english.
i learn english to greduate, japanese to work.
i attended a english grammar course and today was the first day to class
When evening approached, he thought that her husband would return soon and said, "Thanks for the use of your pot and your stove."
Thought she was suspicious of him at first, she yielded to her desire to cook easily and opened the door for him.
He replied, "I need nothing special because I have my soup stone" and pulled out his stone from his pocket, and showed it to her.
So, looking back, say, ten years ago, I can see how much progress I have made since then.
My selected destinations were Spain and Portugal, to where I traveled last august, so that means in summer.
At first, I had struggled with my deep-rooted fear of making major decisions, such as taking up this journey, with no prior experience of traveling by myself and such.
From the day one when I sat on that bus seat, I already started feeling different.
And so my trip began: from Croatia, through Italy, France, Spain, and finally Portugal, our last destination.
The first day was definitely one of the most tiring ones, because most of our daytime was filled with mere bus travel through Italy, where we enjoyed in plentifulness of its fields and hills.
The next day we traveled to Arles, an attractive, but scorching hot little town in France, with lots of streets and turns that look alike, and where you might get lost if you don't pay attention, just like I almost did.
It has an amazing hill called Montjuic, from where you can see the panorama of the whole city, its harbor, the cool red cable cars, and of course, its splendid sea.
One day of sightseeing couldn't possibly cover this gigantic city, to taste a wide variety of foods it can offer, all the souvenirs you could buy, and all museums and cathedrals you could visit.
And that's why I am thankful that we were there twice.
This was like a world of its own.
After that was Granada, where we visited Alhambra, a mysterious but pleasant citadel, with lots of flowers, fountains, bushes, and entrances.
This was very likely my second favorite destination on my trip, which I hope will visit again sometimes.
Somewhere around the day six, we finally entered Portugal, with Faro being the first town we visited.
And at last, we came to Lisbon.
My only regret about this city is that we spent only around 2-3 hours there, which no way was enough for us to see as much as we wanted to.
The same day we went to Fatima where we said our prayers and visited plenty of interesting gift shops, and finally Porto, which blew me away with it's steep streets, many cool shops, and breathtaking seaside.
Of course, I saw the 'grand' red carpet where many celebrities take pictures, but unfortunately I haven't got any of myself since I had no one close to me there who I might've wanted to take a picture with.
But looking on that whole journey from a different perspective, I realize I took my time really well, got some new insights, found some amazing new places I relished, and that...
this journey was a comfort, as much as an eye-opener that I much needed.
Sunrize will be at 5:51 and sunset will be at 17:43 today.
Recently, sunrise is getting faster by 1 minute every day, and sunset is getting later by 1 minute.
Before 25 and after 50, are the ages that make high risk for bringing a child.
Because in these ages the variety of diseases can born with baby, same as Autism, seclusion, low self confidence and so on.
So, it's better parents pay attention to all of these important elements till have a healthy baby.
Recently, I have roon in my heart because I decided resign my current job and will join new company.
I'm taking over my job to successor.
I have to work for only three days at my current company, so I've done all I can.
That's why I have time more than ever and I do something I like to do, for example running, to write English on Lang-8.
I already run over 60km this month.
It release my stress and It is good for my health.
My goal of running this month is to run over 150km and to run within 45 minutes for 10km.
I will report I achieve my goal or not this month at the end of month on Lang-8.
Taiwan is a quite place with a slow pace of life.
Taiwan has great natural view and with nice people.
When I travel around Taiwan, I didn't feel the atmosphere of greedy for money.
Instead, I experience hospitality and warm heart.
I will be staying here with a open mindset and I will live an economical life in order to achieve financial stability.
However, as the time went by, university-going rate of women has been increasing, and these women became career women.
Since then, the other types of family styles has emerged.
Things that I love to do in Seoul
Picnic in Han River: Going to han river park and having chicken or takeaway pizza with friends after riding bike.
Han river is one of the most beloved places by Seoulites.
It is just really great to have a stoll in the park on the weekend.
Just like fashion in Seoul, people here always crave for good new stuff in terms of food.
Consequently many food spots come and go.
Not only just franchise coffee shops or restaurants but there are good local bakery and cafes to check out.
Japanese, Chinese, French, Italian, Mexican..
you name it!
I am studying english to write a long english sentences.
But,I cannot easily write english.
I wrote in Lang-8 for the first time on a while.
I think I'm going to post on here little by little.
Our clients asked us to be at work before 9:30 am, so I have to get up early.
By the way, I sit in my cubicle all the day in bad posture, I think I look like have a hump when I walk.
"We lost these two games for episodes but we have to start from the episodes and the heart that we put in these 2 games."
I guess the reason is that the parents could easily raise their child, because an elder sister would mostly take care of her brother.
That gives them better access to public transportion.
My boss is a rare person who never asks his subbordinates to work overtime, so I expected to leave school at 6 p.m. on the dot.
Before I was hired, he had been the only one Japanese teacher there.
He showed me how to do the jobs in our subject.
Since his workplace is far from from here, it was kind of a business trip for him.
I have many things to learn newly.
It was interesting to learn them, not too difficult.
I usually prepare to leave at this time, but in front of my supervisor, it was impossible.
And visitors were still in the same room.
I tried to find a topic, and got one.
I said to the vice principal that I will be again playing music at the entrance ceremony in April.
His eyes shone strongly.
Of course he hadn't forgotten my mistake, playing the national anthem before his declaration at the graduate ceremony.
It was almost 5:55.
He began to explain about music for that ceremony next month.
I pretended to check it too, but I just wanted to know when it was.
I wanted to shout "Let me leave right now!" but I did only in my head.
I had to take the train at 6:23, if not, I would be late for my promise.
It might have been a bit rude, too direct.
You can leave soon." I dashed to the train station and got the train in time.
I cursed myself, for being careless.
I was worried that I had to stay a room at a hotel, but fortunately my land lady was still awake and answered my phone call.
Today was a big day, but I think I enjoyed it!
My boss is a rare person who never asks his subbordinates to work overtime, so I expected to leave school at 6 p.m. on the dot.
Our school has three vice principals and one of them came over to Sanda to meet me this afternoon.
He showed me how to do the jobs in our subject.
I have experiences teaching at full-time schools, but here, in a correspondence school, they bring things differently.
I have many things to learn newly.
It was interesting to learn them, not too difficult.
My boss was still talking with a family which wanted advise for their child's diploma.
I usually prepare to leave at this time, but in front of my supervisor, it was impossible.
And visitors were still in the same room.
I tried to find a topic, and got one.
I said to the vice principal that I will be again playing music at the entrance ceremony in April.
His eyes shone strongly.
He asked me for my USB stick and put it on his small laptop.
He made a folder in my USB and drag copies in it from his laptop.
He began to explain about music for that ceremony next month.
He said, "You should play this song right 5 minutes before the beginning of the ceremony.
He continued his lecture, telling playing music properly is an essential part of ceremonies and he expects me to listen to the tracks and learn them well beforehand.
I had to take the train at 6:23, if not, I would be late for my promise.
When the visitors left, I stood up and put my jacket and scarf.
My boss looked at me dubiously, but soon he said, "Oh sorry, I didn't realise how late it is now.
You can leave soon." I dashed to the train station and got the train in time.
I put all my keys on it, so I couldn't enter my school if I went there.
I cursed myself, for being careless.
I was worried that I had to stay a room at a hotel, but fortunately my land lady was still awake and answered my phone call.
Today was a big day, but I think I enjoyed it!
I had written something different than this, but I did something wrong and I fucked this up.
The girl in green was the only who laughed, whereas the rest of the people were all like, "What the fuck are you talking about, man?"
The girl in green was the only who laughed, whereas the rest of people were all like, "What the fuck are you talking about, bro?"
On the mourning, I went to dentist to test the tooth but, I had nothing to bad.
I had surprise fare well party today!
Really appreciated it if you would correct my English!
"Contribute to the community in information utilization"
He was like, "What do you call a guy who never farts on public?" 
There is the largest lake in here.
The lake is called Lake Biwa.
And the lake provides a lot of water to Kinki.
Crucian Carp Sushi is famous food in here.
The food smells awful but tastes terrific!
If you ever come to here, I want you to try it.
My cat likes cat grasses.
When the cat grasses grow to fifteen cm, i will give it to my cat.
I always plant a cat grasses in hallway of apartment, so my cat want to go out the door for eating them.
But if your cat eat so many cat grasses, the cat can vomit it.
So give it moderate amount to your cat.
My wife and my two sons are playing mah-jongg now because my sons have finished their entrance exams.
They like playing mah-jongg.
I am correcting my friend's journals on Lang-8, so I don't play mah-jongg now.
I am correcting my friend's journals on Lang-8, so I don't play mah-jongg now.
Saying so, we're not going to somewhere different.
We're just going to bring our picnic mats and lunch to the same park we usually go, but I'm really excited.
I first remained at my watchpoint on the wall, but when he spun around to check on me, I finally jumped down as well and followed after him.
The staff sergeant, seemed sanguine, though, as he pointed ahead.
I am on my lunch break and my coworker is outside for lunch.
Eating in Hong Kong is very expensive so I bought a sandwich from a convenient store in the morning.
A sandwich cost around 3 USD but a meal in a restaurant costs 6 USD.
I need to think about how to make coffee myself and get at least two bottles of coffee prepared for work everyday.
I am thinking of making some coffee with the grounded coffee beans or instant coffee powder one day in advance.
This will help me to save at least 2 USD everyday.
I would like to put them in my backpacker before I go to work.
I need to develop some sustainable routines to live a economical life, then, I am able to achieve financial stability.
If I am able to save around 3000 HKD a month, I am able to generate 36,000 HKD a year.
Then, I am able to give my parents 10,000 HKD during the Chinese new year.
I really hope that my parents will be happy when they see my financial stability.
I consulted some method via the internet before I make.
My kids like to ear it.
2011.3.11
When the tsunami happened, I was in Ikebukuro, Tokyo with friends.
All of trains were stopped, so We were going to stay in the station.
But it was too cold to stay there, so we went to Rikkyo university.
On the way to the university, some guys tried to hit on us because we were in a school uniform.
I thought "they should release their workers.
Japan is crazy."lol
We came to the bus station at 7 pm.
I love to send emails, writing reports and meeting people.
I have a hay fever.
Today, I noticed that my son has a hay fever too.
I took part in demonstration near the Prime Minister's Office to call on Abe to resign.
Usually many bicycles are already parked at the parking space by the time I arrive there.
After work, sometimes I found that my bicycle was knocked over by accident or strong wind.
However, it really irritates me when I found that my bicycle was broken by knocking over on the ground.
Today, I heard a clatter of chains when I started pedalling.
It seemed that the chains touched the frame of the bicycle.
I know that nothing last forever, but I like my bicycle very much and want to ride it as long as I can.
Yeah, she knows that I cried a lot when my ex-boyfriend and I broke up, also when my ex ex boyfriend and I broke up...
I guess in any languages, there are words that will cause you a big problem if you use it the wrong way.
Of corse, there are some in Japanese.
By the way, I've lately had a lot of topics I want to talk about.
Actually, I was actually going to write about percentage of fault in bike accidents or dog commands, but I'm not up for them today.
This is what I thought, but some English words are confusing and they will cause problems if I use the wrong way.
Well, I have to say sorry in advance, because today's post is kind of dirty minded.
If I say, I love cream pie by mistake, I'll be a pervert, right?
Of corse, I mean a pastry filled with freash cream, cream puff.
There's another more risky word.
The Japanese title is "Pocket Monster".
Recently, I learned it's a nasty word.
In Japane, we never associate "Pocket Monster" with that thing.
When we hear "Pocket Monster", we picture pocket-sized small creatures.
Picachu in a Poke ball is pocket-sized, right?
So please don't dislike Japanese people saying, "I love playing Pocket Monster!".
Also, I thought the phrase, "have a ball" is a dirty expression until recently.
I find some English words risky to use.
Like for example cream puff and cream pie.
Well, I have to say sorry in advance, because today's post is kind of dirty minded.
If I say, I love cream pie by mistake, I'll be a pervert, right?
Beware of perverts.
I find some English words risky to use.
I guess in any languages, there are words that will cause you a big problem if you use it the wrong way.
Of corse, there are some in Japanese.
Actually, I was actually going to write about percentage of fault in bike accidents or dog commands, but I'm not up for them today.
Recently, I've read some English articles about slang.
Like for example cream puff and cream pie.
If I say, I love cream pie by mistake, I'll be a pervert, right?
I enjoy using this site, it's not only making a correction each other, but also communication.
I hoped that it might help them for studying Japanese, and actually I have been lazy to write in English at the same time.
I changed my habit, but I hope it will not bother you.
I hoped that it might help them for studying Japanese, and actually I have been lazy to write in English at the same time.
What do you think about information collection way?
Newspaper, TV, new app?
I think twitter is still good tool even it takes over 10 years than emerged it.
But, I every day confuse about the number of followers.
Because if too much, I completely catcheed frowed in information.
The men who have been presented chocolates from women return chocolates or cakes or something sweets to them on White Day.
It's Japanese traditional habit.
But I wonder that is the same as in other countries.
Something sweet
However I am hold up on it,because It is time for me to go to bed.
A big fire occurring at a commerical center in A city forced many people escape confusedly
At noon in March 10th when many people were playing and shopping for a weekend relaxing at a commerical center on B street in A city, an amount fires impertuously spreaded out at the sides of the center.
At this time, alarm bells rang loud together with ocurring burnt smell and black smokes, as a result many people hurrily escaped.
The root burning place was the big advertisment table hang at the front side of the center.
The fireman-force of the building and surrounding people removed the fire but no success.
After that, the local police deliverd many specialized cars and tens of oficers to the scene and finally everything was no longer un-burnt
I watched The Shape of Water last weekend because of the fame and honors it gain in the 90th Oscar.
It is a great choice if you want to watch a beautiful love movie in a cozy Sunday afternoon.
The retro music and quite, dark tone of the color of the scenes appealed to me a lot.
But to be honest, the Best Motion Picture of the Year is an overpraise for it.
I agree that Sally Hawkins has put a wonderful performance on the screen, but other parameters are just, good - not good enough to defeat its competitive opponents.
By the way, I always love non-human being characters but the so-called God creature in the film doesn't have the non-human characteristics in his personality.
The other thing I am concerned about these days is that I found it very hard to get in a word in my group discussion.
They are all very nice guys, though, I could not follow the rhythm of the conversation.
Usually, they just continue on the topic and I end up without saying anything.
It is so frustrating when the same story happens again and again and I am becoming the taciturn person being left out.
Especially when they are making jokes or talking in a witty way, I cannot understand a single word though I know they are making fun of something.
Unit 2 titled "A day at the beach?" is set in the first term of the course.
I 'm a prevailing reader of english section in our company.
I have become an indespensable part of our company.
I 'm a prevailing reader of english section in our company.
I'm vibrant,vigorous and my effort is commendable.
Instead of that I can't go out with a book I borrow.
Arrowed only reading in the library.
I need a experience of sales because I am a independent business person.
But I don't have enough skill so I always am curious what other people do for sales.
It's a manga so I could read it very easily.
The author wrote the book from her experience so it was really good book.
My work will end in a day.
If I will have finished my work I want to sleep much at the first.
In addition I will go shopping and buy shoes.
And I will talk with my friends and sleep again.
I have a favor to read books, eat delicious food, listen to music.
I cannot do anything any more.
I had a hard hay fever symptom when I stayed in Kyoto two days ago.
Probably I think that I didn't have a lot of water as usual on the day.
The Person Who Let Others Worry About Him
There is a person who always tries to let others worry about him.
He may surely something, but I think that his arrogant behavior just degrades himself.
I think that the person who brags about his position has only capacity all that much.
Such person is always annoying me and I got mentally exhausted.
Also restaurants have so many seats to pack people.
It sit heavy on households.
It sit heavy on households.
Social comparison in view of school motivation
there are no significant changes regarding the downward comparison scale in the memory task among low-scorers, by the impact of the recognition of the group data.
On the basis of these results we can say, that if the follower motivational style characterizes someone more likely, that person will rather apply upward comparison and he or she will avoid the strategy of downward comparison.
I explain the results of this study along the basic theories of school motivation and social comparison, and I also take into account the results of some former researches.
There is an attic in my house, which serves as a storage room.
As a boy, I don't like being in the attic because it's gloomy and there are lots of spiderwebs, and what is worse, I could come across rats.
When I reluctantly arrived in the dark room called the attic, I started to search for the book at once, wishing ghosts would not emerge.
Unable to get the book easily, my frustration was mounting little by little with time passing.
It was then an old box which was unfamiliar to me entered my vision.
I took it out of the box and put it into my pocket for now.
Soon after, the book I was looking for came out, too.
After rushing back to my room, I tried to find out what on earth the paper was, forgetting my first purpose.
He is good at operating a computer soft like Word,Excel and Power Point.
He pursues to work efficiently and I think it's one of his advantages.
But I sometimes have my doubts about that.
He try to have other person or department make workpaper he makes now.
Someone have to work instead of him.
But I sometimes have my doubts about that.
One day I had a huge yawn and my jaw completely got dislocated.
I rode my motor scooter to the hospital where opened on Sunday, with my mouth open widely.
At the time, I was living alone at the apartment away from my home and it was Sunday.
One day I had a huge yawn and my jaw completely got dislocated.
The drivers on the another direction stared at my face in wonder, so I was very embarrassed.
In heaven There Is No Beer!
Today, I just finished reading "Black House" co-authored by Stephen King and Peter Straub.
It is a sequel to "The Talisman" which was also co-authored by them.
In "The Talisman", Jack Sawyer, a 12 years old protagonist, saves his cancer-stricken mother by acquiring "the talisman" flipping into and exploring a parallel world he named "the Territories".
Several years passes and there appears a serial killer named Fisherman in a little town of Wisconsin.
"The Talisman" was a dark fantasy, but this is the darkest fantasy I ever read, filled with a lot of brutal descriptions.
Their exploration from the entrance into the innards of this vast world is narrated in a terse style unlike usual Stephen King's style, evoking a more darker version of "Alice in Wonderland".
There are a few engaging sidekicks and I like the members of Thunder Five, which is a group of bikers who love Harley-Davidsons, are intelligent as well as terribly rough.
One of Thunder Five members, Mouse, is bitten by a dog like the Baskervilles, poisoned and mutters something interesting in his delirium:
In heaven there is no beer.
That's why we drink it here and when we're gone from here, our friends will be drinking all the beer!
I guessed this is a lyrics of some song, googled and found this:
The best of all, the price is much cheaper than what shows on a popular online shopping site.
is it gramatically correct?
You can learn Korean tea culture and taste green tea with tea expert watching tea plantation and Mt.
In the open forest, you can walk the trail with falling leaves.
Here, you can experience natural ecology of Jeju.
I returned Tokyo station and ate an ice cream.
Sort excerpts from the teachings going on in Sarnth.
" the enemy can harm you only in this life time bit the negative inflictions have be harming us for countless aeons and are the cause of our being born in the Lower realms inflicting inescapable suffering".
" As long as we are not diligent and have consistency in the battle of negative emotions, we can't never be able to get ride of them easily".
I want you not to be a war photojournalist.
Second, if you were dead in war zone, your parents, your friend and so on would be sad.
In conclusion, I want you to be other profession.
question: What's the difference between "from then on" and "since then"?
Same?
I don't eat chicken after that.
I want to go Taiwan someday.
My friends have visited there but I haven't yet.
There are many delicious foods and cultural building.
First of all, I think that people personal connection is getting weaker and weaker.
For example, 50years ago, my grandfather told me that everybody took care and they knew each other with their neighbors.
When the neighbor got sick, he made tomato soup and sending flowers.
However, I live in small town but, I don't know about next neighbors and I never talked with them since I moved this place.
As this example demonstrates, I think that people personal connection is getting weaker and weaker.
It that I had a civil service examination was just a year ago.
It's a kind of turnabout to me.
On the other hand, I am confident that people life is getting more convenient year after year thanks to the online shopping.
For instance, 50years ago, the bookstore and the shopping mole located in the downtown area.
Therefore, if you want to buy new items, such as new clothes or the new book, you had to go there, according to my grandparent's story.
By contrast, nowadays, you can use the online shopping service.
This is very convenient for everybody because we bought new items through the online shopping.
We don't have to go out and another great thing about the online shopping is that you can specify delivery time by yourself.
As a result, you are able to spend more time at home and families.
As this example illustrates, I am confident that people life is getting more convenient year after year thanks to the online shopping.
I'm very easy to get nervous in the situations, and my mind is always blank, so I need some preparations.
What I'm interested the most is Sumo, because I work at a sumo arena only when the tournament takes place in Tokyo.
My assignments are showing seats or giving basic information to foreign guests, because every sign in the venue is written in Japanese.
Apart from that, I should help with them when they are in troubles, like losing their belongings.
Sometimes young guests don't follow the rule or some tourists try to enter the arena with fake tickets.
When I face an unexpedted situation, I think my English would improve.
I feel fulfilled when the guests say gratitude to me.
I'm very easy to get nervous in the situations, and my mind is always blank, so I need some preparations.
What I'm interested the most is Sumo, because I work at a sumo arena only when the tournament takes place in Tokyo.
I'm in the information desk.
My assignments are showing seats or giving basic information to foreign guests, because every sign in the venue is written in Japanese.
Apart from that, I should help with them when they are in troubles, like losing their belongings.
Sometimes young guests don't follow the rule or some tourists try to enter the arena with fake tickets.
When I face an unexpedted situation, I think my English would improve.
I'm required to have flexibility and attentiveness.
I feel fulfilled when the guests say gratitude to me.
Moreover, I also think that you are able to get about global information by internet.
For example, 50 years ago, only a few people used the internet service.
When I asked my grandfather about how you obtained American news while you lived in Japan.
He told me that only downtown bookshop was dealing with American newspaper.
Unfortunately, most information was too behind the week.
However, nowadays, I am able to read American newspaper while I live in Japan by the internet.
Most American newspapers cost are free to read.
For this reason, If I want new item when not sell in Japan, I am able to get a new item.
As this example shows, I also think that you are able to get about global information by internet.
I went to Kuala Lumpur for the first time in the two months.
This is 10th times I go to KL.
I want to live in KL in the future because the foods are good and the commodity prices are low.
My name is Naomi and I'm a Japanese teacher in Preply.
In my Lesson, you can learn Japanese through talking about some topics,reading articles and using materials.
When I was a university student, I had been to Australia for 5 weeks for studying abroad.
That's why I can speak English as you know.
I was working as a systengineer unti December 2017.
After that I started teaching Japanese, so I'm really beginner Japanese teacher, but I'd love to teach you Japanese.
I know learning language is not easy, but it's definitely spread your life.
Let's challenge with me.
How does Turkish sound to you.
Turkish sounds nice and pleasant to me.
As others said, it is an agglutinative language and has a harmony or rhythm on its words.
It seems that the singing style has also been influenced by other Middle Eastern languages including Persian, and this makes it again more familiar to my ears.
I'm a fan of the folklore and classical music and singing style of Persian and the Middle East in general.
These days I fell in love with the following song and has listened to it for many times:
Is it really a good thing speaking English to my kids every time?
It's quite challenging for me, but anyway I did it.
When I heard this, I didn't fully understand enough to explain what the Bitcoin was.
Even now, I don't think I have enough knowledge about it, so recent news about cryptocurrency makes me feel more dangerous and scary.
Investing in Bitcoin sounds like a gamble for me.
It might be okay when you have extra money to buy, but still it doesn't look stable and safe.
Even the technology is advanced, and crypto-currency becomes more stable, I don't think the day will come when cryptocurrencies will replace real cash.
I don't think people will give up using the joy of physical money, at least it is absolutely true for me.
Well, I was planning to read books yesterday 8.
It cost me half an hour as time go on.
I start to hate it!
But it's really funny.
Then I fell nervious, I opened the steam and play Civlization 6 for 1.5 hours, but did nothing there.
At last, the laptop getting hot, I closed the game.
Luckily, I watched a documentary named The World at War, an amazing!
I don't want to waste any time of mine!
I myself borrowed many copies of his works from a school library those days.
Edogawa Ranpo was a Japanese mystery writer who wrote mainly between the 1920s and 1950s.
Most of his works were for adults and had old style of writing with scads of grotesque descriptions.
However, some of them were written for kids and even now they are popular among elementary school children.
Ranpo loved the works of western mastery writers of the time and his pseudonym "Edogawa" had been borrowed from Edgar Allan Poe, his most loved author.
Most of his works were for adults and had old style of writing with scads of grotesque descriptions.
Ranpo loved the works of western mastery writers of the time and his pseudonym "Edogawa" had been borrowed from Edgar Allan Poe, his most loved author.
A lot of people believed the reason was because she had changed her political line with the pro-American forces.
When I did that, I was like "What the hell I have done!
I spoiled it!!" It was too late to regret what I did, so I'm going to write about the movie that I watched on last week.
I wrote about it in previous article, but I just want to write it again as I'm big fun of it.
I have not known her until I watched the movie.
I'm sure the song made her well-known in the world.
First time I listened her song, I was resonated.
I think her song is kind of an anthem to those on the fringes of society who feel actually like hopeless in their life.
I also watched her performance in You Tube.
The sun rise time is earlier and sunset time is later than winter season.
Neighbor gave me a lot of horsetails last week.
I like spring season best.
You would know the horrors of war.
War photojournalists take photos which describe the scene of a single moment in time but they take a risk!
I think you think about it again.
If you want to be a war photojournalist when you think again, I encourage you in my all power.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
I have two reasons.
Second, if you were dead in war zone, your parents, your friend and so on would be sad.
In conclusion, I want you to be other profession.
Several hours ago, I joined in voice chat there.
I was glad to hear that because I'm Japanese and can't afford to consider a grammatical matter, let alone my accent.
I knew what he meant but I just said: "Thank you".
Although other native guys told me that he didn't praise you for it.
How wonderful voice chat is!
I noticed that I received a birthday message from my old friend on Facebook yesterday.
He and I used to do the same part-time-job at a bar over a decade ago in Tokyo.
Since we were in about the same age, we discussed various things which included favorite soccer players, favorite musicians and so on.
We also used to went for drinks after work.
The memories make me feel nostalgic.
Thanks to my custom which I write some English journal everyday, I thought that I could write the message naturally.
I replied the message in English, promising that we meet up when he comes to Japan next time.
The only thing I saw before me were the devouring fire and my book...
My body moved by itself and was about to insert my arms into the fire as I felt my feet gradually leaving the ground.
I also felt a tight itch around my neck's back.
The air around me started filling with furious shouting, rain splatter and rattle.
The world's colors and shapes started fading back in, and so did the weight on my shoulder and my father's furious eyes.
The agony I had been feeling before left my body as horror took it's place.
"WHAT DID I TELL YOU ABOUT STAYING IN YOUR ROOM, ORIEL?!" he shouted, as he spattered my face with warm saliva.
He kept applying more and more strength into his grasp with each syllable he pronounced.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
I have two reasons for it.
First, a war photojournalist is very dangerous.
I think you cannot live longer than others.
Second, I want to be with at any time.
If you go to a war zone, you have to stay there for a long time.
I feel lonely.
I have been itchy nose and eyes today, so I'm fed up it.
Anyway, I have moving to my house from weekend, so I'll preparation moving this week.
I'll keep trying hard so moving this week.
I'll keep trying hard so moving this week.
The 13th of Murch
The sun is shinning brightly here this motning.
Yesterday it finished the general exam to enter public high schools here.
A lot of sutudents is waiting their results each other.
Anyway they did their best and they had studied for it for three years, so they should have fun in the sun shinning brightly.
I hadn't drunk alcohol for a long time, so I eagered to drink and eat with them.
I hadn't drunk alcohol for a long time, so I eagered to drink and eat with them.
I am back Lang-8
Last time I wrote something in there that should be a year ago.
I appreciate that Lang-8 still keep my account not cancelling it.
I will be back here to write something for anyone to rectify my article.
I could not place the order last month due to delay in the approval.
Now that I have received the approval, could you process it as of March 1st?
We got the tickets for the game between Hiroshima Toyo Carp and Hokkaido Nippon Ham Fighters in Hiroshima.
Nowadays it's tough to get the ticket for any games at the home stadium of Carp in Hiroshima because Carp is a very popular team.
"Will you open this bottle?"
Well, it cannot be opened."
"Oh, you turn the lid the other way around."
"Will you open this bottle?"
Well, it cannot be opened."
Well, it cannot be opened."
"Oh, you turn the lid the other way around."
Even if we have nothing, we will love life.
If criminal read this and answer me the question he might answer that "crimes give him true happiness", for instance "killing someone".
But a normal descent person find that evil but not the criminal.
Here, I am trying to say, every individual finds the true happiness according to his personalality.
Or you are the one who has already die inside and dish you die soon and ask for nothing.
Try to understand their pain and lesser it.
Then you will be satisfy with your life.
The topic was, "what is true happiness".
In this entry I'm going to answer the question.
If criminal read this and answer me the question he might answer that "crimes give him true happiness", for instance "killing someone".
But a normal descent person find that evil but not the criminal.
Here, I am trying to say, every individual finds the true happiness according to his personalality.
How you know, you might ask!
The answer is think of the last day of your life and ask yourself what will you miss after you die?
Or you are the one who has already die inside and dish you die soon and ask for nothing.
If you are one of them then dedicate your life to others.
It is only when you can no longer tell which way to go that you really should begin your journey.
"Translate software doesn't translate different value into other languages".
It was bad day, today.
It was snowing outside from this morning.
But, I wanted to go to the "crying babies clinic" so, me and my baby went to outside.
Acutually, it was too much work to go there for me.
Cause, when we go to that clinic, we should take three buses.
But, my baby usually crying so hard so, I need to get some advices and counterplan from specialist.
I don't want to get stress anymore.
It was fine until took of the second bus.
But I couldn't find the third bus stop, because of a lot of construction on the road.
I had no choice but to go nearest subway station on foot and took the subway until nearest station from clinic.
This station doesn't have any elevator!
To make matters worse,just elderly peoples we're there so I couldn't get help from them.
I was pushing the stroller, I couldn't go outside from platform.
Finally, I was stayed the same platform and took the same way subway until station that have elevator and took opposite way subway and buck to home.
That clinic open only every Monday, we can go there one week after.
I decided to use the Uber on next time.
I object you to be a war photojournalist.
If you go to a battle field to take picture, you may take a risk.
Recently some Japanese photojournalist got caught in war.
If you think your life top priority you shouldn't be a war photo journalist.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
But it is very dangerous than any other thing.
The Ideal Husband, The Best Marriage
The reason why few single women can't get married is because they have high expectations for their partners which are that he is good looking, stalwart, smart, genteel family, and has an abundant salary.
There are no perfect human in the world.
Also, if women wish that they dependent on future marriage partners in every aspect, they will be to divorce easily.
Wife "Please always make me happy.
I want to big house, gorgeous car, two golden retrievers, and want to childbirth 2 girl and 1 boy.
I want to spend perfect life." 
Husband "You will find good partner, not than me.
Good bye"
There's a thing which kind of annoys me when I am watching variety shows.
It's about the narration.
Several years ago, I heard that the narrator was saying something like bebasing the reporters or the show hosts to make it fun in a popular show just make it funnier.
At first, it was OK, because it sounded new, but then many shows started doing that and add unpleasant extra words about the reporters or their show hosts like routine.
So it started being annoying at the same time with I'm feeling I'm getting old.
I like the contents so I think it's a shame.
They think it's funny, but do you think this kinds of jokes are funny?
Do you have this kind of things?
Several years ago, I heard that the narrator was saying something like bebasing the reporters or the show hosts to make it fun in a popular show just make it funnier.
At first, it was OK, because it sounded new, but then many shows started doing that and add unpleasant extra words about the reporters or their show hosts like routine.
So it started being annoying at the same time with I'm feeling I'm getting old.
Do you have this kind of things?
There's a thing which kind of annoys me when I am watching variety shows.
Several years ago, I heard that the narrator was saying something like bebasing the reporters or the show hosts to make it fun in a popular show just make it funnier.
At first, it was OK, because it sounded new, but then many shows started doing that and add unpleasant extra words about the reporters or their show hosts like routine.
So it started being annoying at the same time with I'm feeling I'm getting old.
They think it's funny, but do you think this kinds of jokes are funny?
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
A doctor is safer than a photojournalist.
Being a photojournalist will give you a lot of risk in a war zone.
However a doctor is a difficult job to become.
I hope that you will find a good job and get your happy life.
I encourage you because a war photojournalist is a good job.
And it is necessary to find a job that suits you.
But you are a happy girl.
Because of that, I feel like having meals is like "duty" and most importantly, I look unhealthy.
To improve that, I'm going to massage my belly every day and try not have cold drinks since I heard my stomach is very stiff.
I hope it will works!
My first preference is about vegetarian food.
My first preference is about vegetarian food.
In addition to that I like to say about joint family and respect towards each other.
My examples and reasons will explain below which will strengthen my point of view.
To begin with, people from other countries should adopt food tradition from my country.
So there is very less chances of obesity and heart diseases.
As we all know most of the people are obese, who prefer to eat non vegetarian food which is not good for health.
Most of the people in the world have reason of death due to obesity.
Being vegetarian, helpful for person to build a good health and maintain our body.
It not only limited to family but also society.
Due to respect towards each other bond between the two people make stronger and help them to build good relationship.
Try to observe their parents behavior and try to behave like them.
If parents behave respectfully with every one and respect others point of view which will be helpful for children.
Due to this custom, it built a good society.
In addition to, joint family is another custom should adopt other countries.
In my country, many people stay in joint family.
Celebrate festivals and any other function together.
Children are very happy while talking with their grandpa and granny.
Before sleeping they listen different spiritual stories from granny, which help them in future and make good attitude towards life.
The examinees must take the national center test for university admission, which is performed in January among all Japanese examinees, and the peculiar tests to the each university later in February or March.
The Japanese government intended to add another English test to the national center test in 2020, which is TOEIC, TOEFL, English proficiency test or IELTS.
Who can compare the results of IELTS 6.0 with TOEIC 750?
I wonder why the other teachers or executives had never noticed such an easy problem.
Tokyo University has the biggest authority in Japan, so I expect the other universities will follow it.
How will this new trial be concluded to?
This woman said,"I didn't give it to anyone imprudently.
True heart was sufficient."
I paid electronic-fee late.
Maybe it will be add more tax later.
I'm going to go to English class today.
I want to improve my English ability.
It's really tough to find theme.
More theme has more dialogue.
Last week, I and foreign friend left at hallway.
Other people goes to toilet.
So I have to say something.
But it was not easy to find dialogue theme.
How can I improve my language?
If I have native friend closer than now that I can have more chance to speak English.
"Our foods have passed a very strict radioactivity inspections."
This was what one of the staff member told me.
This store have many branches in Japan, and many people use them.
if someone told the same thing on TV, it would backfire.
Avoiding food from the area is supposed to be bad thing in public.
If I said, "I'm enjoying tasty seaweed in the area!" People would approve at least on the surface.
"Our foods have passed a very strict radioactivity inspections."
This was what one of the staff member told me.
I always feel like it's a little weird, because...
if someone told the same thing on TV, it would backfire.
Avoiding food from the area is supposed to be bad thing in public.
This was what one of the staff member told me.
This store have many branches in Japan, and many people use them.
I was in the organic store.
This was what one of the staff member told me.
I just inquired my TOEIC score, my score was lower than I expected.
I think I need to do more and variety practice after I knew this.
I am going to put in eye drops, but I did't reduce the itch.
I don't know what to do...
I do't like this season.
My husband tells me his chest has been pain.
He always has pain sometwhere his body and I didn't worry much about it
No matter how much it hurts, I can not do anything.
That's because I can't feel pain what he felt.
I always recommend him to go see a doctor but he almost didn't.
In case, he has experienced in the past once, he wouldn't go to a doctor but always endure until the pain disappears.
It is painful for me to see such him.
He always has pain sometwhere his body and I didn't worry much about it
My husband tells me his chest has been pain.
He always has pain sometwhere his body and I didn't worry much about it
I feel demotivated to work every Monday morning because I alway have many tasks to do ASAP and wish the weekend continue forever...
This evening, my previous teammate came to Singapore to greet some staff of my company.
He had lived in Singapore 4years ago, and went back to Japan and then will move to Thailand next month.
Before moving there, he planned to go around South East Asia countries he worked previously.
I've been focused on reading mostly for five or more years, and my effort is paid off only to understand plain English.
He'll be retired.
He is not very old, but he began to work when he was very young, so now he can be retired.
In one hand I'm little bit sad, in the other I'm happy for him, because he'll spend time with his family and friends, and he'll be able to practise his hobbies.
Liam shrugged and began to destroy the chains of her wrists.
He couldn't tell her his reazons beacuse if she found out he was sure that she wouldn't hestiate to kill him, even if by doing so she lost her chance to be free.
So, he changed the cubject.
"There are about then guards guarding each floor, however, once the alarms go on they will all came for you.
If you can't fight against them then hide in the forest until you have the chance yo escape.
Once you leave the facilities touch the center of the crystal three times" He said pointing toward the other necklace that he gave her, " it'll guide you to Crystalia.
No one of the high authorities are here but I don't know how much it'll take for the notice of your scape to reach them."
Keira have to admit it.
It was the perfect oportunity to leave that place.
Slowly she streched her arms trying her ability to move and took a few wary steps toward the door.
Her back screamed in pain just like her ribs but the pain was bearable.
Staring at Liam again she drank the amarantium he gave her before hissing him softly and rushing out to the door.
"There are about then guards guarding each floor, however, once the alarms go on they will all came for you.
Once you leave the facilities touch the center of the crystal three times" He said pointing toward the other necklace that he gave her, " it'll guide you to Crystalia.
It sloped down into the valley, and every here and there, shadows of trees and bushes loomed above the ground.
I have three children,one is son,others douter.
They plays basketball.
I have three children,one is son,others douter.
In some situations, I do assignments with my friends because sometimes studying in a group is more useful than studying alone.
For example, when I was a university student, I studied economics.
At first, we split and allocated our assignments and materials, like textbooks and case books, to each individual, and we read those materials at home.
In a study group meeting, we explained what we learned by studying by themselves to others, and if others asked questions they came up with, we tried to answer them.
If it was hard for me to explain something to others, it meant that I got a clue to identify where I did not understand.
In this way, I found out easily what I had to focus on, studying in a group.
At first, we split and allocated our assignments and materials, like textbooks and case books, to each individual, and we read those materials at home.
In a study group meeting, we explained what we learned by studying by themselves to others, and if others asked questions they came up with, we tried to answer them.
If it was hard for me to explain something to others, it meant that I got a clue to identify where I did not understand.
In this way, I found out easily what I had to focus on, studying in a group.
Short conclusion, any grammar mistake? 
Though Wendy Alexander anchors her argument in a universal context, her political affiliation is clearly reflected in her argument.
This is demonstrated by the fact that she appeals to Scottishness in a Scottish nationalist newspaper.
The rhetoric of the argument is quite interesting, as the author starts by mentioning her own children in order to appeal to Scottish people feeling of nationhood, in order to make them consider the importance of the Union, in order to solve the universal stakes.
Her argument is indirectly aimed at inviting Scottish people to vote for the Scottish Labour party to the third Scottish Parliament election of May.
Wendy Alexander's argument relies on the promise that the Labour party would make Scotland rise among other countries, in order to solve what the author identifies as universal stakes, namely globalisation, poverty and climate change.
As a conclusion to her article, Wendy Alexander specifies that Scottish independence would be a waste of time and energy, and that the Union is necessary to help Scotland rise among other nations and bloom economically speaking.
A few months later, on the third of May 2007, a major change took place in Scottish politically history, as for the first time since 1995, the Labour party did not come first in Scotland.
It reflects a change in Scottish mindsets...
The rhetoric of the argument is quite interesting, as the author starts by mentioning her own children in order to appeal to Scottish people feeling of nationhood, in order to make them consider the importance of the Union, in order to solve the universal stakes.
Her argument is indirectly aimed at inviting Scottish people to vote for the Scottish Labour party to the third Scottish Parliament election of May.
Wendy Alexander's argument relies on the promise that the Labour party would make Scotland rise among other countries, in order to solve what the author identifies as universal stakes, namely globalisation, poverty and climate change.
The rhetoric of the argument is quite interesting, as the author starts by mentioning her own children in order to appeal to Scottish people feeling of nationhood, in order to make them consider the importance of the Union, in order to solve the universal stakes.
Her argument is indirectly aimed at inviting Scottish people to vote for the Scottish Labour party to the third Scottish Parliament election of May.
Wendy Alexander's argument relies on the promise that the Labour party would make Scotland rise among other countries, in order to solve what the author identifies as universal stakes, namely globalisation, poverty and climate change.
As a conclusion to her article, Wendy Alexander specifies that Scottish independence would be a waste of time and energy, and that the Union is necessary to help Scotland rise among other nations and bloom economically speaking.
Though Wendy Alexander anchors her argument in a universal context, her political affiliation is clearly reflected in her argument.
This is demonstrated by the fact that she appeals to Scottishness in a Scottish nationalist newspaper.
The rhetoric of the argument is quite interesting, as the author starts by mentioning her own children in order to appeal to Scottish people feeling of nationhood, in order to make them consider the importance of the Union, in order to solve the universal stakes.
Her argument is indirectly aimed at inviting Scottish people to vote for the Scottish Labour party to the third Scottish Parliament election of May.
Wendy Alexander's argument relies on the promise that the Labour party would make Scotland rise among other countries, in order to solve what the author identifies as universal stakes, namely globalisation, poverty and climate change.
As a conclusion to her article, Wendy Alexander specifies that Scottish independence would be a waste of time and energy, and that the Union is necessary to help Scotland rise among other nations and bloom economically speaking.
A few months later, on the third of May 2007, a major change took place in Scottish politically history, as for the first time since 1995, the Labour party did not come first in Scotland.
It reflects a change in Scottish mindsets...
Traditional norenwake was that the owner of a shop helps their long-working and reliable employees to be independent and gives them a noren with the same shop name.
I looked norenwake up online and found out that there was no contractual relationship between the boss and their employees unlike franchise.
I found it quite funny that the very old Japanese business custom, norenwake, which looked similar to a franchise but was totally different, dawned on me when I saw the Westerner's photo who had worked for the other Western man.
The following link shows a town called Katsuyama in Okayam Prefecture, which displays many noren to attract tourists.
the Russian president election campaign
Here I will try to explain in a very simple way how the Russian president election campaign looks like this year.
Five Putin's sock puppets do their best pretending to be his political opponents.
One pretend to be a communist.
Another pretend to be a liberal and so on.
Each program last for fifty minutes and each of opponents has about seven minutes divided into three parts to explain who he is and why people should vote for him.
Usually their speech consist of stupid slogans mixed with random political bullshit and looks like this: "vote for me because I am better then the rest.
He don't need this.
the Russian president election campaign
Here I will try to explain in a very simple way how the Russian president election campaign looks like this year.
Five Putin's sock puppets do their best pretending to be his political opponents.
Once a week all these "opponents" get together for "debates" on the Russian national television.
Each program last for fifty minutes and each of opponents has about seven minutes to explain who he is and why people should vote for him.
Usually their speech consist of stupid slogans mixed with random political bullshit and looks like this: "vote for me because I am better then the rest.
What else can you explain to people in 7 minutes?
He don't need this.
The janitor keeps on talking rubbish stuff.
The labourer pierced the wall and made a hole throughout we could look at the neighbour.
We felt it as if the baby done a piercing cry.
I love typical food, specially Gazpacho, Salmorejo and Paella.
And I like a lot cinema too, of course, and go out with friends.
Here we are used to stay out, usually, really late, cause Seville has very good weather, mostly sunny, with warm winters and too much hotter summers.
The old photos that I took in 2010 - 2015 in my hometown, Kamakura, and Narita, Japan.
I've been crazy about Japanese temples and nature since I got a new camera.
Especially, I like the pathway to the shrine and temple still now.
We got on the tandem motorcycle.
I released him.
I bury you.
I inhale sand smokes in a ruined land.
This wine is a heady wine for me.
Fevered dogs might bites.
We got on the tandem motorcycle.
I can eat star fragments.
I bury you.
I inhale sand smokes in a ruined land.
I heard a muffled voice from opposite the door.
Who has saved up money - gives them to grandsons 
But my savings is count of my sounds
Is this correct and did i save rhyme?
It's because I saw teachers were served tea and my favorite sweets when they visited my home.
Unfortunately, I realized I didn't have a talent for drawing and gave up it.
After that, I got interested in Japanese language teachers in my high school days.
However, because my hometown was too small, I'd never met them.
I put my dream away and did other work because I didn't have so much passion.
Now I'm thinking to try it again.
I love it!
It's so beautiful and heartwarming.
The land of the dead in this film and people there are described even more lively than I expected.
I enjoyed both their musics and appearance.
- I got up so late that it is time to have lunch.
After wash completed, I immediately made lunch.
- I spent an afternoon to calculate how much I will have after one year.
Maybe 100,000 yuan.
I told my girl friend the result.
Of course one of the reason is I worked until late in the evening but the major reason is that I was unsuccessful in my job.
Yesterday's game, Ajax won!
After this game, Ajax close the gap between PSV!
I don't give up yet!
Young Italian teacher,I was posted to the Ajaccio high school.
But now it was different!
I was then among comrades and there was no barrier between us!
Some familiarities, out of school, did me harm.
As I left the school I used to chat familiarly with my students.
It was the last thing I had to do.
I learned it to my cost.
Once back to my school desk, I had lost the respect necessary to assert myself.
I had to mend my way.
Then I resorted to punishments, which only made matters worse!
How could my pupils admit that, after so much familiarity, I could become so hard with them?
It took me all the school year to regain, one way or another, the authority necessary for the normal running of my lessons.
The punished students were angry with me and set their parents against me: One evening a mother came and insulted me at the restaurant where I had my dinner!
I could not go out to town in the evening to go to the movies, without being booed by some guys, from some window of whichever building.
I had to explain myself Fortunately they gave up their spooky plans.
However the school year ended happily with a very good inspection, which allowed me to ask for my transfer.
In October1950 I set off on new bases!
I cheated because I need to make.
Anyone comes to you with any threat at all, you come to me.
Today I knew the arrangement of this semester.
On first April we should hand in the first version of our paper of graduation, then we will correct it three times.
On May we shall write the final version.
I don't know when to do this.
I was afraid that I might not have chance to do it, because my internship starts at June.
I planned to have a graduation trip for two days.
I once asked a friend, if you have a child, what is the most important trait you think your child must have, he asked envisage.
His answer was different from mine, I thought I must teach him to act decently wherever he is.
Raising a kid is such an art.
I wouldn't want my child to hate me nor would I want to impose on him bad influence.
The greatst showman
Last week,I watched the movie The greatst showman!
It was the best movie.
I was moved and cried many times.
I want to watch it!
My friend's dad sets a role model for me.
I will let him be accessed to different kinds of animation, and let him choose by himself.
Now, I am afraid that my kid doesn't like me.
I will let him be accessed to different kinds of animation, and let him choose by himself.
sentences
How do you eat lemon?
Slice it first and soak the slices in drinking water or beverages 
Don't tell me u eat it neat
I always eat lemon with water and honey.
Lemon are ate with procession, not like other fruits, which we grab and eat.
Lemon has its personality..
my need for lemonade in summer time is massive.
usually there are two bottles of lemonade in refrigerator, I make new lemonade if I one bottle finished.
First time is difficult 
I started a translation work three days ago.
That was difficult than I thought but also I was interesting to learn new things.
Today seems to be the sunniest day of the summer.
Obviously, he is the hungrier than anyone of us.
May I help you to care one of these bags?
Metal gear
Do you remember that best world game of stealth game genre?
Player is controlling the snake and you should be silent moving forward to the mission objects.
I lived in a shared apartment in Shenzhen with two flatmates, one young guy who likes cooking but doesn't know how to cook, an easy going girl who used to study in Britain and travel around Europe.
I moved into the flat in May 20th.
Things turn out to be not that bad.
I invited him to eat together and he is very happy.
Then, I shared with him my living experience and funny stories.
He has passion on food so I didn't mad at me anymore.
You know my room is very small and without sun shine, but later he found that you are a great person.
Die In The Comfort Zone or Preparing In The Comfort Zone
I had a very normal day as these days.
One thing should be mentioned it that Koji asked me to do a task with a bad attitude.
Suddenly, I realized that I am still the old me who has a high pride and glass heart.
I can't understand people say bad words or speak to me with an arrogant attitude.
I have been trying to get used to it or changing my way of thinking, however turnout I didn't change too much.
Due to I have been working with excel spreadsheets without talking with people.
I am kind of liking this situation so that I don't want to change it, somehow I am lost in studying CPA.
I never should stay in a comfortable zone not to change.
I have to work harder and remember why I start my CPA learning!
I know it is very hard to me but if I quit now I would be very regret in the future!
You will talk about the country music tonight.
Then the host introduce you to the audience.
we invite Miss sun to our programmer.
I had an chinese lesson tonight since last month.
But as the lesson proceeded, I started to remember chinese words and grammar.
The price in Tokyo is high.
And it's intereting that I need to film a form at first.
In the form, there are many questions for example what kind of hairdo do you want, how do you dry your hair.
After cutting my hair, the hair cutter gave me a massage.
I really like to hang out with my friends and talking with them, however sometimes I want to be alone and I want to have a time for myself.
Is that called "solitude" or "loneliness"?
Do those words sound negative in English?
I really like to hang out with my friends and talking with them, however sometimes I want to be alone and I want to have a time for myself.
I interviewed at work today.
I was nervous because the interview was a long time ago.
I considered what the best food for me.
The first food that comes to mind is grilled eels but I don't like it.
I don't know myself why I don't like it.
It maybe looks unappetising.
I wrote that I resgined my job and join next job on April.
I have to work for only four days current company.
Also, I'm going out near next company next week.
It takes about a hour from my current home to the current office on train.
However, it takes about five miuntes to the next office.
It is a little hard to prepare moving out, but I believe we will be happier to live next home.
Also, I'm going out near next company next week.
It takes about a hour from my current home to the current office on train.
However, it takes about five miuntes to the next office.
Thank you so much for reading!
As I was very tired, I decided to absent from welfare facility tomorrow.
I have to finish window-shopping until I go to the hospital tomorrow.
However, I have learned some ways at the welfare facility how to just sit back and relax!
The continuative to lead dependent clause1&2
It is second English sentence.
I wonder what japanese food foreigner like.
It is important for me to practice dance every day.
It is second English sentence.
I was excited and remenber my childhood because I have watched this movie today too.
I wonder what japanese food foreigner like.
When I used to study in school, I had a lot of other classmate from other nationalities.
The nation of the North is a bit dangerous feeling.
I worked until ten pm today.
I run every morning when I was a junior high school student.
What make me so?
So, I decide to challenge one thing 7 days each week.
It must be a burden on me.
This week, I challenge to write an essay everyday on this Lang-8.
It has been so inconvenient for these two months after I changed my cellphone to new smartphone.
I used the cellphone for the alarm clock every morning.
So I decided to use my old galapagos type cellphone as an alarm clock again.
In order to charge, I connected it to the battery charger and turned my on my cellphone.
Its screen was changed and began to charge with no problem.
Then I set the date and time of it and was relieved.
I hope it works properly again.
On the one hand, it's not gonna be that hard: I've already had it once.
On the other hand, now this time nervous and I don't know why.
The weather is awful too: I used to like grayish sky, but now it surprisingly suffocates me.
I have a terrible headache to.
I'm not good enough for expressing my emotions.
It is much easier for me to express my deeper thoughts and feelings through the pen.
I would like to master my second language, but everyone have the same thought I think.
It's just because I have another thing that I have to study.
I mean writing to publish or share with another people.
If you try to do it, you will understand that your unconscious section in a delicate fashion, will omit those things that you don't like others know about them.
The interesting point is that, even this unconscious section will add somethings that were not in your former life, but they can positively influence on readers in an artistic way.
I don't have any white shirt in my closet because your discolored my last one.
They're calling you out since day one, so keep your excuses to yourself.
They wrote a whole page on that subject and, if you don't believe me, you can go online and check it by yourself.
She is very smart girl.
I think that I had to study hard..
The last year, she got engaged with a young businessman, Mr.
However, his mother's money scandal broke in the last December.
Media tell us his father committed suicide ten years ago.
As a result, Princess Mako's mother, Kiko, try to delete this engagement.
It seemed that the pollen caused the allergic reaction in my throat and I coughed so hard especially I was at work.
Fortunately, I have no allergic problem so far this year.
I usually wear masks to cover my nose and mouth to prevent breathing pollen in the air unnecessarily, so I think that I should still keep wearing them until the pollen season will be over just in case.
Every day we take in a lot of information through internet.
While most of us may not be familiar with those different types of informations, they are actually connected to our life in ways we never knew.
This is one of my current favorite on Netflix.
You mustn't have known what to do with your gigantic ego or zero self-esteem.
The gist of this show is to look back on those "embarrassing period of yourself" together with audiences and laugh yourself at the time off.
They bravely stand up on the stage in front of audiences and read their diary out loud, and they are even bold enough to get a laugh.
The gist of this show is to look back on those "embarrassing period of yourself" together with audiences and laugh yourself at the time off.
everybody must have gone through the awkwardness of puberty.
The gist of this show is to look back on those "embarrassing period of yourself" together with audiences and laugh yourself at the time off.
This is one of my current favorite on Netflix.
I don't know how to explain this show.
everybody must have gone through the awkwardness of puberty.
You mustn't have known what to do with your gigantic ego or zero self-esteem.
I am amazed by these "ordinary American people."
These pictures in the middle and on the right show a boy training there.
I went to a walk to the nearby elementary school to jog after several months I visited.
Hmm, it is hard to believe.
The other day he told me.
"There's the Mandarin app that competes English words competence in school units.
Now, my school is third in the prefecture, so my friends are doing your best to be No1."
Of course, I will join with his school.
I'm No1 in his school, right now.
The Mandarin Orange App is a smartphone's App that learning English word.
"There's the Mandarin Orange app that competes English words competence in school units.
Now, my school is third in the prefecture, so my friends are doing your best to be No1."
he doesn't have a smartphone so he seems to be jealous.
I registered as a user soon.
Of course, I will join with his school.
I'm No1 in his school, right now.
Nothing that happened today to share but some thinking.
I want to improve my English ability for reading documents, papers and communicating, maybe more.
Language learning usually contains four method of hearing, talking, reading and writing.
I'm remember vocabularies every day.
Watching TV shows is also my hobby.
Writing entry every day is becoming my target.
Pronunciation is my shortcoming which need to practice.
I can read and write with google's help.
But once talk appears, I just go blank.
There has a problem that I must translation sentences with Chinese before understanding.
A very simple factor accounts for these sudden stops: whatever their brand, smartphones are not designed for an optimal use with negative or very high temperatures.
Outside that range, their good functioning is no longer guaranteed and a black screen can appear all of a sudden on your phone.
For instance, you can put it in an inner pocket where it will be in contact with the human body, rather than in a purse, which does not offer much protection.
A very simple factor accounts for these sudden stops: whatever their brand, smartphones are not designed for an optimal use with negative or very high temperatures.
The phone rang in Harry's flat fourth day after Martha's funeral.
Harry felt nervous and put back the phone.
Martha was visited only by doctor.
Maybe was the cleaning woman?
Harry was standing surprisedly Wilson police commisioner's room at the police station.
OMG - he thought - it is the end.
The lawyer was ordered the necrotomy by Martha's letter.
The purpose of this report is to evaluate a new mobile device called BMB, a new generation of mobile devices.
According to a recent survey, this report will summarize the pros and cons of the new products and it will conclude with recommendations for improvements.
By and large,  the market price of the BMB devices seems to be a little more expensive than their other competitors does, more advanced features and higher quality is expected by the average user.
There are several competitors that have really good products in the market behind the BMB mobile.
Another weak point is the screen, a better definition of colors is expected.
The screen provider, NT Tech is launching a new version of the screen so it would be reasonable that BMB incorporates the latest features shortly.
Even it is said by the survey the battery life, WAP service and voice recorder are considered as satisfactory, a product of this range of prices could not fail in such critical areas.
This kind of products are deeply examined by tech gurus in specialized magazines and internet forums, and this factor will be determinant when you are getting information on the internet in order to purchase a mobile.
Digital camera and text messages seem to be the top features of BMB.
In order to become more competitive and attractive to the public, BMB should focus on provided with better components their BMB product, changing their screen, lengthier the life expectancy of the battery in order to maintain their sales price.
I would strongly recommend them to appear in well-known magazines and tech blogs with the new version of the device come to the stores.
Finally, I consider if the price is fair, bearing in mind all the new products of the competency and take action according to that.
We were sitting at a cafe after the movie show.
That was very interesting for me, and I asked the teacher lots of question.
I didn't have days off a whole month.
I was shooting 4 project but all project were car commercials by chance.
So, I had a lot of to do things but they were similar.
Convulsions of eyes do not stop these days.
It doesn't seem to be difficult to study as it's not that far from the programming languages I already know in terms of syntax.
Since it is said that Python tends to be used when creating AI like machine learning, this new knowledge would be going to be useful.
What's the difference between "These" and "Those"?
How dose it like for a foreigner living in a small town in Japan 1
One of my friend is a French guy who has been lived in my town for 7 years.
We've met in a volunteer job after tsunami.
He has been working at the NPO, which makes a playground equipment in the devastated area.
It has been 7 years since we had Tunami and the Tohoku district has recovered gradually.
His income from the NPO reduced and he needed another job for living.
I offered him to work my father's company last year.
He was willing to accept it.
He can communicate with colleagues even though he's not good at speaking Japanese.
The government impose anyone who work in Japan a tax and a pension fee.
He has to pay a lot money to the government.
Foreigners have to pay a pension fee but they can't accept any money after their retirement.
According to the law, a pension will be paid only for Japanese.
The government seems to welcome foreign tourists but refuse foreigner living in Japan permanently.
I was surprised at my deposit balance.
I am spending so much money on foods because I started to new dietary habit.
I have to have a second thoughts about my spending for foods.
One of my goals for this year is storing my wealth.
I was borned on the outskirts of Kyoto,and growing up with the smell of wood,wildlife around of my life and the time going by slowly.
My future I hoped was in as small happiness as my hometown.
After some stories,I chose the job in the city to leave home and get on my feet.
Everything is fresh exciting for me.
But sometimes I miss my fomer future.
I bought yarn for my snood, and then I started knitting last winter.
I've been knitting on and off, so I've finished it yet.
I think I could put it on next winter.
I think I could put it on next winter.
Last night, you saw three objects in the shape of triangle flying in the sky.
If she had sung using that word, no one would've understood.
On Friday, Puigdemont said that it would not be a drama if a new election has to be held over the next few months, arguing that if the pro-independence political parties were not able to comply with the mandate of their voters then it was better to give them the word again through a new election.
According to the latest polls, pro-independence parties could get better results than in the latest election.
While polls suggest that they could be the most voted party, internal polls suggest that they could lose an important number of seats in Parliament, which would land to JxCat, which would win a new eventual election with extraordinary results.
On behalf of David, I would like to schedule the review call with you.
Hope that it works for you.
According to numerous jurists and the Catalan Parliament speaker himself, Judge Llarena has prevaricated by adopting such a decision.
Nevertheless, the ECHR is unlikely to make any decision anytime soon.
I went to a hair cut.
My trouble is that my hair grow faster.
I want to be able to have my haircut short.
My wish
I want to go abroad for study this summer vacation.
But my english score which is needed for pass is low.
I every time have determined to study hard english.
But now is different from the before.
I am will really really really studying hard now on and helped from Lang-8.
I watched this film three years ago, when they were running on theaters.
Not a many theaters run this and the cinema complex near my resident didn't either.
So when I had to go to Hibiya to renew my passport nearing the expire time, I watch it there.
This film is about Cheryl Strayed, a woman who are drug-stricken, lost her loved mother of cancer, divorced her husband, and had abortion resolves to endeavour a long trail hike.
Shery is an actual person and this movie is based on her own memoir titled "Wild: From Lost to Found on the Pacific Crest Trail" which too I read later.
In the memoir book, it takes three or four pages to explicate the inventory of the pack and the process she finally succeeds to stagger to her feet.
The visual effects on abrupt zapping between the trekking and the flashback to her pasts are radically effective.
This week will be Saint Patrick's Day.
The celebrations of this day remind me "he wizard of Oz".
All people there wore a green clothse.
Judge Llarena is currently leading the case against pro-independence leaders.
If the European Court of Human Rights rules that he has prevaricated, then the whole case against pro-independence leaders could be suspended, leading to the immediate released of all Catalan political prisoners.
He made such a decision after two months of long negotiations with the other pro-independence parties in Parliament.
On Friday, Puigdemont said that it would not be a drama if a new election has to be held over the next few months, arguing that if the pro-independence political parties were not able to comply with the mandate of their voters then it was better to give them the word again through a new election.
CUP would double its seats in Parliament and would become more decisive on the formation of a new government.
While polls suggest that they could be the most voted party, internal polls suggest that they could lose an important number of seats in Parliament, which would land to JxCat, which would win a new eventual election with extraordinary results.
I was surprised to know that Lily passed our meeting yesterday
I had decided to write more this year, but I haven't done what I had expected so far.
I should cherish the good time when I can still use this fantastic website.
Writing really helps me a lot, I have found my listenning improved as well.
I love this website, I like and cherish people I meet here!
I gave in sometimes so the barbers could play freely.
Ah, I really hated me who said "okay" at the time.
I will eat more "black" foods.
A pharmaceutical industry, PILLS, Inc., became one of the major partners of INDIKO through an agreement, which now is considered to be pioneering, as it has become the first of its type in 1999.
If yes, do they have the same meaning?
Repeat the movement for three times.
Then how about the sentences below:
I have to reasons.
That job is very dangerous and if she was killed by someone in the war.
I will be very sad.
I did a gig last Saturday.
It was really good!
My playing a bass guitar has improved a little.
If you become a war photojournalist, you will not live longer.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
What would you say?
If you become a war photojournalist, you will not live longer.
I worry about my friend
We often exchange message on the internet.
In our conversation, he said that he had tough day so he didn't want to talk what he experienced today.
We normally don't say "Good bye" the end of the message.
I will go shoping tomorrow.
We will play tenis tomorrow, if weather be good.
I played the gitare every week.
I go to the shoping every Monday.
I am not good at drinking cold milk because my stomach isn't strong.
I drink the hot soy milk with roasted soybean flour and brown sugar syrup.
I have been having rice porridge and that drink.
It is warmed my body surprisingly.
I noticed that my feeling was good whenever my body was warm nowadays.
I don't know why, but my weight doesn't increase.
I have been continuing to drink corn tea because my friend introduced it for me.
The corn tea is roasting aroma, and good for my stomach.
The ingredients are the most basic item for living in my life.
I am not good at drinking cold milk because my stomach isn't strong.
It is warmed my body surprisingly.
I have been continuing to drink corn tea because my friend introduced it for me.
In Russia there was a holidays from the Thursday.
I spent them with my girlfriend.
There were several rooms, where we had to solve the puzzle in an hour, moving from one room to another.
There were a few actors who frighten us.
The quest called Obsession, and it look like a horror film.
But it was horror!
There wasn't light, but were actors in a terrible make-up, horrible sound around.
Escaping from the daily grind, I was enjoing on vacation for a day.
Therefore, I could read a book in the bookstore peacefully and I colud walk aside the river while I feel river breeze and I could meet my friend that I did not meet a long time at the lunch time.
Today was monday, so they are a few person in My village.
So, I felt good while I was walking down the street in my village.
Weather was good, the air was crisp and clear and the sky was blue, the temperatures were warm.
So, I was happy while I was walking aside the river.
When I realized the fact, I have to go back to work at tomorrow.
It came to my mind that I read on the page in the book.
The book, "Praise for Laziness", Bertrand Russell said, If we can do that, work only 4 hours a day and spend the rest of our time doing arts, service, and travel, The problems can be solved, the people's problem of mental and physical, poverty, unemployment, and the issue of productivity.
Escaping from the daily grind, I was enjoing on vacation for a day.
Therefore, I could read a book in the bookstore peacefully and I colud walk aside the river while I feel river breeze and I could meet my friend that I did not meet a long time at the lunch time.
Today was monday, so they are a few person in My village.
I really don't like crowds.
When I realized the fact, I have to go back to work at tomorrow.
It came to my mind that I read on the page in the book.
Why We can't do that, Work only 4 hours for a day?
Escaping from the daily grind, I was enjoing on vacation for a day.
I really don't like crowds.
Weather was good, the air was crisp and clear and the sky was blue, the temperatures were warm.
When I realized the fact, I have to go back to work at tomorrow.
It came to my mind that I read on the page in the book.
The book, "Praise for Laziness", Bertrand Russell said, If we can do that, work only 4 hours a day and spend the rest of our time doing arts, service, and travel, The problems can be solved, the people's problem of mental and physical, poverty, unemployment, and the issue of productivity.
- Today is the first day of my holiday.
I got up at around 10:00.
Then I go to the supermarket across the house I rent for some vegetables.
When I got back, she still did not get out of bed yet.
She was playing with her iPhone.
After I cooked lunch, she got up to wash face and brush teeth.
After that, she wanted to take a nap again, and I went to the toilet on the supermarket.
We got in a fight tonight.
I hope he will pass the exam.
The result will be released on the 20th March.
I hope he will pass the exam.
The result will be released on the 20th March.
Because my coin purse is too small to put banknotes without folding them."
So we went buy a wallet to the nearby shopping mall, but we didn't find anything good there.
While we were looking for a wallet on the Internet, I recommended her a white one with a cat pattern, but she turned it down and found more stylish one in navy.
I ordered her favorite last night.
We are looking forward to its arriving.
Personally, I prefer to use a long wallet than a billfold.
If you usually shove your wallet in your pocket, a long wallet might stick out from your pocket, so it wouldn't be convenient though.
What kind of wallet do you like?
Because my coin purse is too small to put banknotes without folding them."
We decided to buy it online after we got back home.
While we were looking for a wallet on the Internet, I recommended her a white one with a cat pattern, but she turned it down and found more stylish one in navy.
A long wallet or a billfold?
I ordered her favorite last night.
A long wallet or a billfold?
Yesterday, my daughter said, "Could you buy a long wallet for me?
While we were looking for a wallet on the Internet, I recommended her a white one with a cat pattern, but she turned it down and found more stylish one in navy.
We are looking forward to its arriving.
If you usually shove your wallet in your pocket, a long wallet might stick out from your pocket, so it wouldn't be convenient though.
I ordered her favorite last night.
I went to a cafe where a dog welcome his costumers.
When I entered the cafe, an old mature dog came to me and stopped in front of me nicely.
I was impressed by his behavior and told him my appreciation for it.
He was well-trained, so he had stayed for a while beside my seat.
When I entered the cafe, an old mature dog came to me and stopped in front of me nicely.
I went to a cafe where a dog welcome his costumers.
When I entered the cafe, an old mature dog came to me and stopped in front of me nicely.
She says this sentence must be "I visited it." or "I went there." Is it true?
I think "I visited there." sounds natural.
Could anyone native English speaker tell me it is true or not?
Do you never say,"I visited there."?
My favorite aroma has to be that of citrus.
When I want to release my stress and concentrate I sprinkle the perfume something.
it's better to promote your appetite.
A reputable academic institution, Richmond school, is going to close its laten class this September.
This is because they don't have money to keep on teaching the dead language any more.
Although laten language is a dead language, it has a lot of merits to conserve this language.
Unlike other languages, the dead language is not incluenced by speakers.
A reputable academic institution, Richmond school, is going to close its laten class this September.
This is because they don't have money to keep on teaching the dead language any more.
This is a by far bigger news than it seems.
Although laten language is a dead language, it has a lot of merits to conserve this language.
For instance, it is still used in science fields on the ground of its unchangeable characteristic.
Unlike other languages, the dead language is not incluenced by speakers.
In the cementery 1.
Harry came from the cementery.
Mrs Hudson kept a letter in her hand and she looked the car for a long time.
Then she started to the police station.
When Harry arrived home he wanted to phone call immediately.
I miss Rosie - he thought - but we shouldn't meet each other a few week.
I asked me what kind of company which I want to?
Big, good salary or make progress.
I will go to the company which meet one of their requirement.
Today there is a little different with usually.
I meet a foreign guys who wants to see a movie, but he can not find the place, he asked me in Chinese, but he forgot how to say movie in Chinese.
I asked him in English and told them the cinema in the four flours of the building.
I hope he can find the cinema.
Translating 21
Martha feels badly herself.
Mrs Hudson does to the cementery.
Harry is cited to the police station.
I knew that I can get a ticket of Keyakizaka46 2nd anniversary live.
Translating 22
Then he got back the phone and poured a glass of drink.
Harry is a thirty-old-years nice man.
Firstly, Harry liked the new and light life.
He looks after less her wife and he think about his wife's die.
Harry met Rosie at this time who was secretary of lawyer of Martha.
Rosie and Harry made a friends with each other.
Rosie invented a brilliant plan but Harry have to do it.
Martha's testament is basis for their plan.
I've heard that there are a lot of job-openings recently.
However, job-seekers are less than that and I've heard there is battles for talents among corporations.
I wonder a good economy is like that.
Translating 20
What did the familydoctor want to do with Martha?
Why does Martha die?
Why is important her testament?
How does Harry look after his wife?
Why is Martha off from outside world?
What Mrs Hudson will do if she get Martha's letter?
Who is who and what do you know about they?
She have a headache.
She writes a letter.
She afraid of something.
Dr Jones: doctor.
I still remember what I stayed in Dalian.
At the beginning of my life in China, I couldn't understand everyone's talking at all.
But after 3 months just passed, I can suddenly be getting to understand their Chinese.
About music
Just now my English teacher asked my classmates and I to have a favorite song on our phones when we go to his class tomorrow.
I think a lot and decide on the following song which called I Get Off On It, by Tony Joe White.
Part of its lyrics is:
I choose this song because in my mind, it will be a unique one that stand out from those love songs or top songs.
The lyrics has something to talk, too.
I will write down my class's respond to this song and what I think about the lyrics after lesson.
This morning, I started a day on 6:30 am.
I had the class in this morning.
I didn't go the elevator because I wanted to exercise a bit.
In morning class, the teacher had said about tattoo.
He didn't like tattoo.
So he said who had the tattoo wasn't nice person.
I really didn't like about this thinking.
He said with a bad attitude.
The promises of Napoleon III made to Cavour were the exact opposite of the letters which the French King was sending to Pope to calm him.
In fact the French lanted to Civitavecchia, near Rome, and put a garrison to protect of the Papal State.
Treaty between Italy and French: Italy untertook to not occupy Rome.
French declared war on Prussia.
At that moment Italy felt free of deal witht French and decided to occupy Papal State.
The General of Italian army, after useless negotations with the Pope, ordered to occupy the Papal State.
In September 1870 the riflemen, a formation of Italian Army, opened the Gap of Porta Pia and entered Rome.
The Pope withdrew in the Vatican and, after much diplomatic skill, accepted the new situation.
The present Vatican State coincides with that defined after the surrender of Pope.
Garibaldi dead at the age of 75 by pronouncing on his deathbed ' I'm dying with pain of not seeing free Trent and Trieste'.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
I was surprised.
That is great news and thanks for all your help.
I am able to start working on tomorrow.
If you require anything from me prior to starting the job please let me know.
In case of breaking the rules:
We all are responsible for safety, peace, hygiene and appropriate conditions for having a rest in the dormitory.
Do not use lang-8 as a Tinder.
We visited some waste treatment plants and a Japanese company which is quite famous in China.
I learned a lot, and I was so suprised by younger students from my university and my former university that they are so excellent.
I have given up language learning for almost a year, but stimulated by young students, I want to continue it now.
Maybe it will be much easier to learn foreign language with a foreign friend, but I am just too shy to make friends with others.
I try to be nice to everyone, but it really exhaust me too much.
This trip, I also heard something quite unpleasable, and it's about me, the rumor.
I rejected the suggestion of going abroad just for relax proposed by the secerotary in our lab because i don't think it should be told from her, and I just had too many things to do then.
But it seems that she told my professor that I want to go to Ireland and told others I wanted to go there but it wasn't approved by my professor.
I am not that kind of people who explain, but this time it really went far beyond my bottom.
How could she do such thing to me?
I just want to be concentrated on my own work, but it seems not easy.
I think I will find the chance to explain to my professor, and won't let her interfere anything about 
If nothing changes, today will be the last day I stay in NOVA.
Last year, April 10th, was the first day I startd work here.
I still have several days left before I started my new work in another company.
I am considering to go somewhere.
Go some place alone?
Is this sentence out?
And it is useful for everyone to know the truth of the Earth we live in.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
I never forgive you!
Do you know it is full of risk?
Even so you go to war zones, I cut off the relationships with you.
When I was young my hero was my father.
My father wasn't famous but for my was and actually is my hero.
My father is teacher and always taught me good things.
My father never says me nothing just continue teach me and support me.
Now I have a store online, no win much but already have a bit money for help my family.
I'm taking comfort in warm weather of spring today because it was very cold this winter.
It seems that it'll be nice weather this week, I'm spring cleaning the house this week!
Finally my ski season coming.
I enjoyed skiing there for a first time in the long time.
Snow will melt but I will go skiing next week.
As you know, Trump strongly is hung up on immigration.
This news made us Japanese funny and laugh so much.
Trump is the defendant from Germany and it's not an old story, which means Trump himself is also an immigrant.
WASP?, I wonder what their ancestors did, and who are them 2500 years ago, totally different from us Japanese people.
I understand, by our family tree, where are written about my ancesters, the names, and what they did, some of them had the power to change the world history.
It was unimaginable for westerners.
Because who are their ancesters, where they were, and what they did 2500 years ago?
My question is why mongrels and immigrants in westerners, especially white people, assume an air of superiority.
It's nothing but a high-impact story for us straight Japanese, plus it's so weird why Americans have some foundless confidences including Trump.
As a matter of fact, why today's Americans intend not to touch the massacre of native Americans, and the atomic bomb dropped Hiroshima and Nagasaki.
It carred out all over Japan.
Even the tohoku-area, you killed only children just walking a narrow way of rice puddy.
Someday the defendant is to be a different Japanese thanks to PM Abe's crazy policy.
A lot of foreigner turists increased.
And the crimes of non-Japanese people increased They are sort or murder.
UN and people say Japan ought to receive immigrant.
You don't know Japan accepts Chinese and Korean over 1 million.
Althogh watching the film, Japan needs to accept strangers from middle east and Asian people??
It caused my flight to Florida to be cancelled and I had to call off the vacation plan.
Keira's first impulse was to strech out her claws and tear his throat, but seh managed to control it long enough to think.
If she kill him, someone would find the body soon, and that would mean another punishment for her.
But if he had said the truth she'd lost her only chance to escape.
Getting exasperated she quickly assess all the pros and cons.
Finally she clos her eyes, making her decision.
Relieved Liam didn't hestiate to began moving.
Keira listened carefully for Liam's slow movements, trying not to growl as his cold fingers grazed the skin ofher left ankle.
However, a menacing hiss left her lips when the shackle squeezed lightly on her foot, increading the burning of her cut.
Suspicious she opened her eyes just in time to see a black hexagon spreading out along the entire chain, Every few seconds Liam touched one of the golden points and made sure that Keira's skin wasn't touching the anlyzer.
The chain grated slighty seconds before that the anlyzer returned to its original form after having turned the metal into a thin glass.
Curious Keira watch how bit by bit her leash began to crack and finally exploded in a thin layer of white dust.
But if he had said the truth she'd lost her only chance to escape.
Finally she clos her eyes, making her decision.
Finally, when the chain was completely coverd by the anlyzer he slided his finger over another end and waited.
The chain grated slighty seconds before that the anlyzer returned to its original form after having turned the metal into a thin glass.
Curious Keira watch how bit by bit her leash began to crack and finally exploded in a thin layer of white dust.
The famous tulip garden there is opening soon, but the admittion fee is expensive.
I recommend going to tulip farms that is for free.
You can enjoy the tulip's carpet.
I guarantee that it would be your most memorable sight.
I saw lifetime's worth of tulips while I was living in Holland for five years.
I recommend going to tulip farms that is for free.
You can enjoy the tulip's carpet.
what's the situation here.
An interesting ideal occured to me just now.
By doing so, we can practice speaking or writing in English every day and we can also bond our friendship tighter.
Hello again Mario.
I am pretty good Rachel.
What I mean when I say that something is fragile?
Now, give me some examples of this word in a sentence, please.
If one man cries it is the sweat of his heart sprouting from his eyes.
Early Roses are very fragile.
I will love you both when we were young and when we were old and fragile.
It sounded as if a fragile piece of the engine would have broken.
Yesterday, I had drunk with friend in a bar.
I am not good at drinking.
I was always afraid of getting drunk.
Yesterday,I had some drinks with friend in a bar.
Friend told me that it helps relax our tense.
I was afraid that I might puke, but finally I got over with that terrible feeling.
I don't like the word tough girl, because whenever I hear it, a image of a muscle woman would appear in my head.
but those girls are very easy to get along well with, their inside match their outside, so you don't have to guess what she is really thinking
Beautiful girls all have high standards of choosing boyfriends or even friends.
Why are they so picky.
On the other hand Liam frowned when he saw Keira's wound.
It was deep enough to leave a scar and, because of its lack of bleed he could see the multiple withe scarse around her injury.
"Finish, alredy!" she growled with annoyance.
Liam roll his eyes, placed the anlyzer on the chain around her other ankle and did again the same process.
When he finished, he stood up and took off the two necklaces he was wearing, reaching them out to Keira.
Cautious the young woman grabbed them and without looking away form Liam opened the tiny bottle that hung from one of the silver chains.
"What do you want for it?" she asked coldly unable to contain her dobouts anymore.
"Everyone has a price" Keira growled hitting the mtal wall with her long tail.
It is believed that Asian people really admire westerners'face.
Why so many Asian people admire western people's appearance?
I was talking this topic with my International friends' while we were having lunch yesterday.
one of my friends' asked me told me that one of her friends has been living in Shanghai for a couple of months and one of her friends has never paid money for drinks since she started living there, the reason why she's face looks as if babies doll which means typical westerner's face.
Japanese people standards of beauty are always westerner's face or looking.
why people always don't think about oriental eyes are good?
In my opinion, people don't have confidence in themselves.
it's also Japanese media built up what is the standard of beauty for women.
I have a lot of complects on my face but is that something wrong?
and people can't become completely westerner's face.
I don't say, people shouldn't wear makeup but people shouldn't have one opinion of beauty in perspective.
we should more think about bring out the best in everyone and they have more confidence in yourself, I understand it is hard to do it but if people have self-confidence or don't worry about what other people think, they'll enjoy more them life.
A weather is hot on march.
I work at studio everyday.
Nowadays we are not strange with job-hunting, but what kind of job is greatest every one has various opinions.
Thus a heated discussion has aroused: When people have the opportunity to get a secure job, they should take it right away rather than wait for a job that would be more satisfying.
Really want to make people to go outside.
No idea now.
Should I do some places alone?
Better no, I guess.
Maybe I will try all of my possible friends first.
Haha~ I guessed I might more probably go home and do nothing.
But I do really want to go somewhere.
Who I can go out with?
Today's sunshine is extremely warm.
Really want to make people to go outside.
The only problem is, who I will go with?
No idea now.
Should I do some places alone?
Maybe I will try all of my possible friends first.
English teach me that language and life is not easy.
We are going to go on a trip in Singapore at the end of March.
The problem is about who will take care of our dog.
My mother is a dog lover, but she declined to take care of our dog when we asked her to do before.
I want to go to my sister and stay at her house at the weekend.
Today, I called my mother to ask her to take care of our dog while we go on a trip.
She might have looked for a part time job, though she is still a career woman.
I agree with her.
You can make it true.
It is certainly dangerous, you may be able to think better.
But I also want you to remember that time, your dream is wonderful.
You believe in yourself and your own way.
There being only 51 graduates, every one of the students made a short speech on the stage using a microphone.
Most girls were crying.
He told about the next school he goes to, and expressed his gratitude to his friends and teachers.
He stepped off the podium, when he remembered something.
I'm not the author of the song, so I really don't know what she really wanted to say.
The Musical in The Theater
I went to the theater which is near from the new national stadium on 10th March.
The theater is very beautiful and such as a new building and I sat down at second flour seat.
The play is a musical and the players are attractive and beautiful, I enjoyed it very much.
What kind of play do you like?
I like a musical by I saw this attractive performance this time.
I went to the theater which is near from the new national stadium on 10th March.
The theater is very beautiful and such as a new building and I sat down at second flour seat.
The play is a musical and the players are attractive and beautiful, I enjoyed it very much.
I like a musical by I saw this attractive performance this time.
I'd like to read a lot of books, which make me intelligent.
The persistence of gun-related murders despite the country's restrictive laws on possession of firearms leads some to question the efficiency of said laws.
Others go as far as to suggest the legalization of the possession of firearms as a solution, as it would supposedly allow citizens to defend themselves against threats and make criminals more insecure about their success.
However, given the examples that there are across the globe, which work both in favor and against such suggestion, it is clear that the issue is not as black-and-white as many imagine it to be.
I then sneaked back to the first stairstep, worried about my backpack's rocking with each step.
I crouched and started stepping down the stairs, without taking my eyes off the shadow.
My heart skipped a bit when I saw it crouching and standing up after a few seconds.
I heard a subtle snapping and popping echo grow louder the closer I would get to the entrance door.
I followed the footsteps with my eyes, and noticed a dim orange light emanating from the dining-room.
I slightly leaned to the left, just enough to peak from far away, and saw a familiar robust man with a bare back, facing the fireplace while holding a long fire iron in his right hand.
and THEN, ALL OF SUDDEN, I saw him stand up, sight and stretch both of his hands.
My body trembled and that translated into an unsteady step, and a lose in balance.
I fell sideways, and obviously, my backpack did as well, making the loudest noise ever that night.
Dude, I tried to download that fucking file four times and all I got was an error that didn't make any sense.
One of them said that he saw the movie "xxx" ten years ago in the movies.
One of them said he went to see the movie "xxx" ten years ago in the movies.
One of them said he went to the movies to see the movie "xxx" ten years ago.
the temperature gets wamer this week.
To what extent of voting population evaluate the government performance and vote accordingly?
Your neighbor was swimming in his pool with his dog and because he didn't invite you over, you threw a bunch of eggs at him from your roof.
I don't have any hobbies because I'm a pretty boring dude, so fuck off.
It's funny for you how some people can't say away from their phones.
The cause is hay fever, so I'm not worry.
There is one and a half month left finish to hay fever.
I get a through it.
How we understand that this movie is good and another is not at all?
Sometimes the main idea can be sayed by the film characters.
For example, the main idea of the film "Three Billboards Outside Ebbing" that hatred breeds hatred was sayed by young foolish girlfriend of Mildred's ex-husband.
The truth by the mouth of a foolish, oh, how ironic!
Does this movie original or you've already watched many movies of these kind of things?
For example, the originality of the movie "Dogville" by Lars von Trier is the minimum of decoration.
Despite the abscence of decorations this movie is interesting and so exciting.
A good movie contains cultural code, references to others pieces of art.
It seems multilayered which makes a cult film.
You can read film criticism articles, reviews or top lists, but do it after the watching of the movie, because your opinion shouldn't be preconceived.
For example, the main idea of the film "Three Billboards Outside Ebbing" that hatred breeds hatred was sayed by young foolish girlfriend of Mildred's ex-husband.
For example, the originality of the movie "Dogville" by Lars von Trier is the minimum of decoration.
A good movie contains cultural code, references to others pieces of art.
You can watch a good movie again and again, and everytime you will find something new.
If the film was really good, autoritative sources would write about it.
I found a group on TwitCasring, a live streaming service, about a half year ago.
In the group, almost all people are learning one or more foreign languages.
And I joined them.
The group has Taiwanese people learning Japanese and Japanese people some of which are learning Chinese.
The most Taiwanese people in it have very high Japanese skills.
They speak and write in almost correct Japanese and almost correctly read and listen to Japanese
Some of the Japanese people also have very high Chinese skills.
The most topics we are talking about are silly things.
They are really ordinary people except their high foreign language skills.
Do I need a pronoun between the 'be' and 'when'?
I thought it might be when I saw the picture, but I'm surprised it's really you!
I thought it might be when I saw your picture, but I'm surprised it really is!
The bar chart illustrates the estimated percentage of car trips by eight different purposes and by male and female drivers in 2005.
Overall, both gender took car trips significantly for work purpose.
The least purpose for women drivers was visiting town while for men drivers was bank purpose.
The other aims mentioned in the chart are courses, running errands, visiting friends, recreation and shopping.
Moreover, about 11% of women driven to courses compared to less than 10% of men.
For bank, running errands and visiting friends purposes, women were more likely using cars than men, which were accounted for about 9%, 10%, and 8% of females and about 2%, 2%, and 3% of males respectively.
I realized that he was an English teacher K who taught us when I went to an English conversation school almost 10 years ago.
It originally indicated the nature of the business and longstanding history of the shop.
I realized that he was an English teacher K who taught us when I went to an English conversation school almost 10 years ago.
The school I went to was close to another station on the same line and was run by a Canadian teacher J.
The jobs to help someone in trouble.
The company who makes the biggest earnings will win the competitions.
Such people are usually hungry and self-confident and have a clear vision and a strong leadership.
They are excited at getting promotions and high praise.
I can't motivate myself by getting bigger money or winning the competitions.
When I look back my life, I think I have always been satisfied with everything.
Thanks to my parents who have a strong sense of responsibility, I've never been bothered by a luck of money.
Also, I have had an equality.
Today, I went to the gym and I found a bill saying "The shower doesn't work, thus there is no running hot water now.
You can only use cold water!" I couldn't believe my eyes, but I decided to run on treadmill as usual because I couldn't run yesterday.
I got a cold shower in winter for the first time in a long time.
Cold Shower In Winter
Today, I went to the gym and I found a bill saying "The shower doesn't work, thus there is no running hot water now.
I thought I was gonna die.
The manager was an old stingy hag, and she always turned off the gas while I was taking a shower in the winter because she was stingy about the gas bill.
Thank you for massaging me.
The Republic was proclaimed because the Spaniards were desagree with support that King Alfonso XIII, the great grandfather of the nowadays King Felipe VI, gave to the Captain General Primo de Rivera.
His dictatorship finished at the end of the twentieth decade, when he went into exile because of the little political and military support that he was receiving.
At that time, the politicians and militaries with a conservative ideology were afraid that the communist used the Republic proclamation as an opportunity to stablish in Spain a Comuninst Regimen.
I would like to congratulate you with 8 March.
In Russia is it named International Day of Womans
She is broken from his last relationship so she worries about getting rejected again.
I met with him for beer.
Our conversation was great and we felt this famous chemistry.
He texted me next day and asked how I feel.
He asked me to date next Sunday.
I agreed on meeting evening, but I didn't hear from him again.
I got hurt in dating as always.
Two months ago it turned out that he lost his phone and he didn't know my last name to find me on Facebook.
Sometimes, she is well and some other times she feels bad.
I came here to prevent you from doing a big mistake.
Someone pushed me and I lost my balance.
A few years ago I went to Galapagos Islands.
Since I was a child I had always dreamed to go there.
I like travel and nature, and my favoryte book is "On the Origin of Species", that's why this trip was so special for me.
I had been saving money for two years when finally, I could make the trip.
One day we took a trip for snorkeling, the instructor said to us that we would swim with sharks.
They were hammerhead sharks, one of the least dangerous of the sharks.
They took us by boat to a place named sleeping lion, where we got into the water.
We swimed whit several kinds of animals, like sea lions that were very friendly and they liked play with us, stingray, sea turtles, and of course hammerhead sharks.
They didn't look agresives, but, just in case, I didn't approach to them.
Nobody got hurt, I had took out a travel insurance, but fortunately, it wasn't necesary.
After the snorkeling we went back to the port and we saw the sunset drinking a beer.
If you like nature, definetly you should go to the Galapagos Islands, you wouldn't regret.
I have 3 weeks left to go school in Toronto.
I'm leaving for New Zealand 3rd of April.
Approximately 24 hours to take getting my destination.
I have't search for house to live and work.
If you have some informations please let me know.
Which district is the best place to live and comfortable places.
Actually, I dan't have any preferences.
I have 3 weeks left to go school in Toronto.
I'm leaving for New Zealand 3rd of April.
Approximately 24 hours to take getting my destination.
I have't search for house to live and work.
If you have some informations please let me know.
Which district is the best place to live and comfortable places.
Actually, I dan't have any preferences.
I have a card I could get a free ticket when I have watched movies more than 5 times for a year.
That way, you can save your energy.
That way, you can save your energy.
Due to completely my work!
I mean I always take my holiday on Monday.
Also, I'm a waitress at hotel.
As usual, weekend is such a long day.
So,I've waited to coming a holiday sincerely.
I love weekend when I was a student.
Now turn to jusy reverse.
Today, I would like to focus on media topic.
I was just reading a breaking news before I ate my breakfast.
I though that many editorial police have not seen good views.
Therefore, they have been falling circulation which they sold each day.
Maybe, they need a celebrity endorsement for their journal, news and advertising.
I realized that they focused on sensational journalism too much which did not help building brand on top.
About two weeks later, my son and I will take in part of a Robot Scavenger tournament in Tokyo.
It must be too difficult for him so I decided to finish it myself last week.
I did it last weekend, and then some of its problems have fixed and one left.
About two weeks later, my son and I will take in part of a Robot Scavenger tournament in Tokyo.
About two weeks later, my son and I will take in part of a Robot Scavenger tournament in Tokyo.
Additionally, we have to go to practice gathering at Ueda Cable Television one week later.
I had him to make some of the parts of his robot, but he did not do it enthusiastically.
I did it last weekend, and then some of its problems have fixed and one left.
Unfortunately, technology, education, progress and so on can't stop silliness of the human, even nowadays!
Therefore, where is the root of this problem?
Ignorance is the base of superstitions.
#1470 A Different Viewpoint
You can see different things by altering your viewpoint.
"Just imagine this.
I went snowboarding at Kandatsu ski resort in Niigata prefecture Today.
The temperature was a bit high and the snow was wet and sticky, so it felt like a snowboarding in Spring.
Having said that, I thought Kandatsu has nice slopes and views, I want to go there again.
It is Sunday, so I have a rest.
Getting up late, watch shows and play computer games.
Also take some exercise at night.
Well, normal but meaningful.
I watched TV program, today.
It was amazing that she is the first woman who named principal in this 20 years.
I was so moved because, I watched her progress while I read some magazines and online news.
In the TC program, her dance was so attracted that I felt facinated even in next day.
I watched TV program, today.
It told the story of the woman in the Royal Opera Ballet.
It was amazing that she is the first woman who named principal in this 20 years.
I was so moved because, I watched her progress while I read some magazines and online news.
In the TC program, her dance was so attracted that I felt facinated even in next day.
Someday, I want to watch her stage directly.
Many people insist that a great many talented people have high IQ because they have good genes.
I deemed that before when I was before 20 years old.
Reading books definitely the only way that you get more outputs than your input.
I am always thinking that as soon as I finished my CPA studying, I will read a lot of books which I long to read for a long time.
Nowadays, I am read American history on Sunday.
I occasionally to read it while checking the map at the same time to make me understood the growth of American.
I went to the earthquake experience this saturday.
There is a room in the truck car that you can know what it is like when the great east japan earthquake happened.
The long time shaking was over my imaging and I was scared.
By the way,my friend entered the room without wearing socks.
he firstly hide under the desk once it started shaking.
His feet were toward to me and very very stink.
The Nagoya Marathon Fetival was held today.
Thanks for all the people involved in the festival.
Today was also the 7th memorial day of the Great East Japan Earthquake, in which a lot of people became victims.
I felt good today, because it was sunny and warm.
I went to outside with children.
We had the snacks after we played outside.
She slept immediately, because my daughter was tired playing.
I'm going to change my work from next April, so I can spend little time in now office.
I will miss some colleagues.
I love him very much.
Although language is the carrier of culture, in terms of the reverse thinking, students should know their own history and culture first in order to know the purpose of learning Taiwanese languages or other ethnic group languages.
Then several localization strategies of Multinational Corporations are going to be presented with some specific cases.
It can contribute to make and prefect corresponding laws and policies about Multinational Corporations by analyzing these strategies,which regulate investments from Multinational Corporations better;In the meantime, Chinese Enterprises learn from the methods when it comes to implementing transnational operation,what is more,the firms are easier to make the right decision if they competed with Multinational Corporations.
However,some Multinational Corporations undoubtedly encounter some barriers while they put into practice,hence during this thesis,i am going to state some common issues of localization,hopefully which can be enlightenment and reference for Multinational Corporations in China.
As I posted the customer survey last month, I was given a free drink ticket at a cafe.
Last week, I drunk maccha-cream-frappuccino for the first time.
Since it was free, I changed milk to almond milk and its syrup to chai syrup.
Not only maccha-cream-frappuccino, but also both almond milk and chai syrup are first experience for me.
Today, I went to IKEA, which is a Swedish-founded furniture retailer to buy a bed and a lighting for the main room that I've been saying for a long time.
This was the first time to go to IKEA, and I really surprised how big this was.
It was just hard to find a selling area where I should go, and I got lost a lot.
To come to the point, I couldn't find the bed and the lighting that I was looking for, but I bought some items for cooking.
Since I had drunk too much at previous night with my colleges, I was a little tired and sleepy in the morning.
When we arrived there, it was over 2:00 p.m.
My mother was cooking a lot of dumplings, vegetable templa, and curry as usual.
We cleaned the graveyard and devoted some flowers and pray in front of the grave.
I drank only coffee because I was satisfied with late lunch.
pancake
We ate late lunch.
After visiting it, we went to a cafe to have a rest.
It was soft and was digested quickly in my mouth.
Multiculturalism plays a significant role in Taiwan, especially in the educational field.
Within the context of Taiwanese multiculturalism, this proposed study will target when the trend of multiculturalism has prevailed over Taiwan since the 2000s, how it affects the Taiwanese multi- language education policy as well as explore the dilemma that has formed in applying it to Taiwanese public primary schools.
I m in london now actually, I feel like I m living in a tv show.
Because everything is so different and exctiaing and there are pretty guys everywhere.
London is like a magical busy Paradise full of hot cute guys.
A guy way out of my leagh kissed me last time.
He is so cute and never says bad stuff.
Am I dream I m asking to myself pretty much everyday.
Chinese love the monk named san zang very much.
The chinese monk's name is san zang.
The san zang is a great translator, translated books about India, Chinese respect him very much.
But in fact, there was a greater translator before san zang, his name was Jiu mo ruo shi, he was an indian.
At the moment, he heard a crush like a thunder and found a huge monster looking down on him, which had two tusks, fiery eyes, and horns spread over from head to back.
The merchant replied in fear for his life, "I promised a brunch of rose to my daughter and forgot about it until the last moment.
I guessed a single rose would be no problem."
The beast said, "I will grant your life on one condition: Bring your youngest daughter here within seven days, for whom you have stolen my rose.
Otherwise, you must come back here and die"
When he arrived and gave the presents to his daughters, they thanked him.
He revealed what had happened in the garden.
Next day the merchant took his daughter to the dwelling of the beast.
When they arrived, the doors opened but there was nobody but them.
There they saw a table, on which were beautiful glasses and fine dishes full of food.
In the past, parents were supposed to perform clearly differentiated roles in the upbringing of their offspring.
Firstly, a flawed argument is that mothers are better at parenting in comparison to fathers, because of their being the ones who carry the pregnancy to term.
i went to mitake for bouldering.
but i really enjoyed bouldering outside.
i could find another new rout.
As they talked about their yard and whatever else, she was no longer afraid of him and come to like him.
At last, she came to the bush from which her father had picked up the rose and found the beast lying without moving.
She was sorry indeed and laid herself beside him.
I was getting to love you."
No sooner had she said this than the hides of the beast split into two and the most handsome young prince came before her.
He told that he had been changed by an evil magician.
I wanted to charge my IC card, PASMO, at the station.
Just so you know, when you charge your IC card, you first insert it into the slot and then select the amount of the money you want to charge.
There's also an English voice-guidance.
It's just to press "English" button on the screen.
When the charging is done, the announce, "Don't forget to pick your IC card up before you leave", starts.
When I finished charging, I was doing something else and I was late to pick it up.
I guess it was only thirty seconds or one minutes.
My IC card was sucked into the slot and I could operate the machine.
I was like, "Oh shoot!
Why?".
It was just a harassment, right?
Fortunately, there was the call bottom, so I pushed it and called stuff.
Finally he gave it back.
Even now I don't understand at all.
Actually, the station is for monorails called Nippori Toneri Liner, which's autonomous driving.
During rush hours, it becomes too crowded.
When I finished charging, I was doing something else and I was late to pick it up.
My IC card was sucked into the slot and I could operate the machine.
It was just a harassment, right?
The eldest sister wished for a necklace and the second sister did a gold chain.
But the youngest sister replied, "May you return home safe and sound.
That's I wish the most."
She said, "Then, bring me back a branch of rose, father."
But it was no use getting a branch of rose because it would wither before he got home.
So he decided to procure it later, but he totally forgot about it until he was near his house.
He suddenly remembered it and looked around believing there might be a rose bush.
Then he came across a great garden, where he wandered about till he found a fantastic rose bush, from which he picked up the most beautiful flower.
It has taken just 1year since I moved to Singapore.
It was very quickly for me.
Before moving to Singapore I felt nervous, but there has not been no problem so far because I am with my family and made some good friends in Singapore and feel lucky be in a great team.
Sometimes I felt hard to work, but It was totally enjoyable life in Singapore.
The bar charts illustrates the comparison between the number of deaths caused by six diseases and the amount of medical research funding on them in someland in 1990.
Overall, it is apparently that the most serious diseases that caused death were the least ones that the medical researches were funded on.
These diseases are AIDS, leprosy, tropical disease, diarrhoea, malaria and TB.
In 1990, TB was the most significant disease causing death with approximately 1.8 deaths while only 20 million dollars were funded on its medical research.
In contrast, about 180 million dollars were spent on AIDS, which caused death to only about 0.2 million of people.
Furthermore, leprosy recorded about 0.1 million of deaths, and its medical research was funded by almost 80 million dollars.
Moreover, tropical disease and diarrhoea scored about 0.3 and 0.5 million deaths respectively whereas their medical research were funded by almost 80 and 60 million dollars respectively.
Malaria's medical research funding was 50 million dollars and caused about well under 0.5 million of deaths.
Environmental pollution is one of the major global issues in the 21st century.
If governments force all the oil companies to build robust tankers and to adopt more stringent safety procedures on their oil rigs, accidents and leaks will less likely happen.
In conclusion, it seems to me that environmental problem is the worrying concern and individuals have a crucial role in joining hands with the government in reducing the harm caused to the environment.
My first class in italki.
Iltaki is a platform when you can find a native teacher and shedule a lesson with him in skype.
My teahcer was Wensei, she is a english native teacher.
She gives me a feedback about my english.
She recomends me to extend my vocabulary, the way for do this is write 8 to 10 words per day in a stycky notes and paste those in a visible place in order to practice that words during the day.
This point is very important, practice the words, only write it isn't enough otherwise, I will lose the words.
Another recommendation is write as much as possible, write is a form to improve my writing, my vocabulary and my reading.
The last recommendation and the most important is interact with english.
She recomends me watch tv series without subtitles in english.
I am commited to learn english, but I don't have enough time to practice, for this reason I will try to join this activities in once.
First I will try to see an episode in a serie that I like without subtitles and them write a summary about the episode writing 10 new words that I have been found in the episode and finally practice this words in my next lesson in italki, and clarify doubts about the new vocabulary.
Yesterday was my first lesson in Italki.
Iltaki is a platform when you can find a native teacher and shedule a lesson with him in skype.
My teahcer was Wensei, she is a english native teacher.
She gives me a feedback about my english.
She recomends me to extend my vocabulary, the way for do this is write 8 to 10 words per day in a stycky notes and paste those in a visible place in order to practice that words during the day.
This point is very important, practice the words, only write it isn't enough otherwise, I will lose the words.
Another recommendation is write as much as possible, write is a form to improve my writing, my vocabulary and my reading.
The last recommendation and the most important is interact with english.
She recomends me watch tv series without subtitles in english.
I am commited to learn english, but I don't have enough time to practice, for this reason I will try to join this activities in once.
First I will try to see an episode in a serie that I like without subtitles and them write a summary about the episode writing 10 new words that I have been found in the episode and finally practice this words in my next lesson in italki, and clarify doubts about the new vocabulary.
I am afraid to make only a bit of work in these days.
I hope this will not happen!
Four years ago, I was just an ordinal ESL student, who planned to go back to Japan within the year until I met my friend's father, who owns a mining company.
Throughout our conversation, I have grasped that investment banking played the pivotal role to raise funds and ensure a smooth operation of his business.
Yet, I gave up for once since I was afraid of losing this very high competition.
For 90 seconds, I conveyed my thought about how trying my best would lead me to the best outcome based on my experience to get into this school.
Throughout my career exploration from corporate FP&A to corporate finance, nothing more than the investment banking industry excites, challenges and makes me be a better version of myself.
I have been fascinated to see how much I progressed since last year and see my further personal growth among dedicated and committed peers.
We are a group of 4 students from a Business School.
We are a group of 4 students from a Business School.
We are conducting a project about natural energy drink, in order to launch this product in France.
More precisely, we provide fruit juices in different bottles, with different prices with a complete transparency about where the fruits come from.
But if you can all complete them, it would be very useful for us.
Only your personal opinion interests us, there are no right or wrong answers.
Here are the links
I--I just feel like I would look at--at, specially in math.
I felt like I--I would look around and everybody is getting at it.
Umm, you know, I struggle as everybody does, you know, in elementary school "where do I fit in?" 
maybe he is tough outside and tender inside.
maybe he just needs to come back to the real me once in a while, like riding pink motorcycles or even put on lipstick 
maybe every man does something not so manly sometimes.
When we talk about tough girls.
What does "how to grow the fuck up" mean?
I went to the Neighborhood prefecture today.
My son who was studying for examination tests at home.
He said happily while eating his favorite crab.
I didn't understand what he says.
The Internet said, "It is a symptom due to shellfish allergy".
I have never known that he is crab allergy.
I shouldn't have been to Osaka this weekend.
If I had known everything which my friend thought, I wouldn't have said yes to go there.
I shouldn't have been to Osaka this weekend.
If I had known everything which my friend thought, I wouldn't have said yes to go there.
My first the English conversation lesson.
All of that calls graffiti.
I called it in that way first time when I saw on an old, destroyed gate a sentence with an important date: 1918.
Above it was a picture which shows that Poland in that year regained Independence.
One day when I was coming to my house, young woman with her child was sitting behind me.
That picture on one gate learnt young human our history.
Graffiti is art because it is something that is shown to other people and it might also tell them something they might not know.
I studying English now.
I want Native English friend...
A boring day.
Today is Sunday then i went to the church and i prayed.
After church time, i called my friend and i said "hey, let's hang out together"
but he said he can't do that.
but i came home..
Today is like boring mood.
It was very strange that I found a very nice smartphone case at a three hundred yen store last Friday.
When I got in the store, I found many types of smartphone cases on the wall.
It said that it costed 3,600 yen.
It costed 3,600 yen at the store.
I change my job again.
It has been long time to my last entry.
I changed my job this January to chace a dream.
I wanted to use Englsih in the business situation and work at global situation.
However, I got that chance two or three times for a year.
In addition, my salary decrease a little than previous company, so my familiy dissatisfied that.
That's why I resign my job this March and join next company.
I believe that my decision is best and I use English in the business situation next time for sure.
I hardly use Englsih, so my English skill is getting rusty.
Thank you so much for your reading!
I was a beginner-contestant, I also watched the contest itself for the first time.
The contestants of English session were exciting.
The vioice was loud and the performance was good.
There were two foreign contestants and there were a large foreign audiences.
I was a beginner-contestant, I also watched the contest itself for the first time.
The contestants of English session were exciting.
The vioice was loud and the performance was good.
There were two foreign contestants and there were a large foreign audiences.
I was encouraged with them.
Today, I received the result of the daycare.
My daughter was lost.
She couldn't go to the daycare.
I felt some disappointed.
I am very anxious, because if I don't work for along time, Perhaps I couldn't find a job later.
In order to entertain single person and solitary, Karaoke booths gradually appear in many downtown areas.
Unlike Karaoke bar where customers have to rent a room for hours, this Karaoke booth allows a single user to sing in a booth.
Compared to traditional karaoke bar, it's not cost-efficient, and the equipment is kind of unhygienic.
Still, I think people still can give it a try out of a whim.
I can't do hard training usually but I can do very hard with the friend.
Because if someone watch what I do, I can do than usual.
After that, I drunk a protein.
I'm not so muscle person but only with him, I want to drink it!
I love Guinness which is Irish traditional beer.
I love Guinness which is Irish traditional beer.
Clocks aromatically went ahead one hour.
The mishap I did was I went to a bed very late last night, resulting in leaving less sleeping time.
Long time no see in a year.
My TOEIC score goal is over 800.
However I am still far from score 800.
To shake myself up, I usually apply the exam even without studying.
I'm not working today. So I did housework. Then I was watching a movie.
Robin Williams is starring actor.
I'm not working today.
Then I was watching a movie.
It's "Bicentennial Man".
Robin Williams is starring actor.
That was really touchng.
There's has to be a reason why aliens haven't invaded us yet.
There's any point in listening to him anymore.
It is a common phenomenon that hiring managers make the biased decision about an applicant.
Especially, it can be quite successful in IT area, where amount of men prevail women.
One more advantage is that, implementing of gender-blind hiring may change how people treat men and women.
Seif introduce
so i love my major.
I am fascinate by the advanced technology products.
But i am not easily satisfied with useage,so i wish i can have ability to design new tools to help people do something difficulty.
Generally speaking,i am a hardworking student in study, a homorous and easygoing boy in after school life.
as a member of student union and class committee,i strive to finish any assignment perfectly,gain good comments from teacher and classmates.
In my spare time i like reading books,Chinese chess,communicating with friends and some ball games and so on.
Usually,i take part in competitions, from these match, not only increased my team cooperation ability and problem solving skills,but also let i have a better understanding of professional knowledge.
All in all,if luckily i got the chance to learn mechanical engineering in HFUT,i will concentrate on the study and in this filed in my postgraduate study.
Thank you for you attention.
This week, I went to a city that is located in the east of Germany to support some customer.
I live in west of Germany, so I had to drive a car more than 300km.
I was born in Japan, and I had lived in Japan for 32 years.
Therefore I have never driven such a high speed in my life.
I had started to study English grammar while commuting since last week.
Thanks to studying English words,I became able to understand English senteces to some extent.
But it seems that it will take much time to make English sentences perfectly.
You can check the context bellow.
Someone said, "Can you take a left?" and the Uber driver went, "Nope, but I can hit a u-ie up here."
I don't need to accumulate material oppossitions but also I need tp memorable meaningful experiences.
I don't need to accumulate material oppossitions but also I need tp memorable meaningful experiences.
Today, we went to shopping mall.
I spent time at the toy area with my son.
I spent time at home with my home.
I'm not teenage.
I became an adult so I should change my style of clothing.
I loved cute clothing but it like childlike.
I search other kinds of clothing now.
However, is it possible for youngsters having such a way of thinking to become successful in our society?
However, is it possible for youngsters having such a way of thinking to become successful in our society?
The face of my art school teacher looks like a thumb.
Look at your thumb.
I met him in my art school graduation show yesterday, so somehow I felt like writing about my great thumb professor.
3- I'm learning English because English is the global language and also, learning English is my hobby
4- I will go to Japan with my two college friends on April 8th.
I lived in Beijing along time ago
7- You have two Korean friends, and you met them at Church, right?
One of your Korean friends is 39years old this year.
Is it right?
And what is the difference of these two words?
They bloom every year and tell me the beginning of spring.
I saw small white flowers bloom at the corner  
Wild boars dag my ground and every flower was spoiled six years ago but their bulbs were alive under the ground.
They bloom every year and tell me the beginning of spring.
106-1  The man who criminal condemned to death is spending the life for 25 years in prison.
106-3 Time flies like an arrow.
March 14th is called white day.
In Japan, a man gives some presents to a woman in return for Valentine's Day gift.
I don't like this custom because it seems like coporate strategy of confectionery company.
on Valentine's day, so that I made sweets for them.
Crash biscuits into pieces and add melted butter.
Pour it on black chocolate.
I dicided to make this because I can make it without using oven.
I don't have a oven.
I am doubtful wheher I should give a failed sweets or buy some ready-made sweets.
One lucky thing happened last night while reading Harry Potter in English.
When I referred to my dictionary, I exactly opened the page I wanted.
It was a little thing but was still pleasant experience for me to refer its defines.
4- I will go to Japan with my two college friends on Aprail 8th.
I lived in Beijing long tiem ago.
One of your Korean friends is 39years old this year. Is it right?
The White Day is Coming.
The fourteen of March, the White Day, is coming soon.
I'll reserve nice chocolates for my wife and daughter tomorrow.
I'm afraid it'll take a long time to get my chocolates because many men will also come to the cake shop. But I think all of them buy chocolates or something of sweets for women.
On the Valentine's Day, I know that some of the women buy chocolates for themselves.
I must say that I am so happy and excited but at the same time I am so worried about my future career path.
It reminds me the day I was first entered to college and I know nothing and was a lonely person back then.
Everything is happening to fast or the time I had spent or maybe I should say wasted, are four years.
I am so regretful for not paying much effort during my secondary school.
I shall apply for local university than applying on private college instead.
The spring is my favourite season.
Everything is too green and fresh.
Start to write jornals on this website
I Started learn English when I was a grade one student in junior middle school and I found the English letters' pronunciation is totally different from the chinese pinyin at my first English class.
and I felt it is not easy for me to get high score in this language subject.
when I was a university student, to pass the CET4 and CET6 has indeed been a headache for me, although I pass the both examinations, just aquired low score.
now I have been working for several years and rarely use this languge in my formal work-use, and I feel my English worse and worse.
so I really want to improve my English especially writting and listening ability, I hope the English good-at or English native help me to correct my articles and 
I will furthet appreciate If you can give other sentence expressions even though my sentence is no problem,so that I can learn more.
and the same I can help you If you want to learn Chinese.
Crubnling the clouds to pieces, 
Ichiro Suzuki is a Japanese baseball player and has played at MLB for 18 years and more.
He is quite smart in Japanese people and of course can speak English fluently.
However he never speak English at interviews.
Needless to say, there are some American fans who complain that he doesn't speak English intentionally.
Such people tend to be blamed as racists.
There are an old temple and Tokyo Tower next to the hotel where I worked.
The picture shows the unique contrast of modern and traditionl in Tokyo.
There are an old temple and Tokyo Tower next to the hotel where I worked.
The picture shows the unique contrast of modern and traditionl in Tokyo.
I don't know how to change the picture's angle.
There are an old temple and Tokyo Tower next to the hotel where I worked.
I think the both buildings can blend into the cityscape.
There are an old temple and Tokyo Tower next to the hotel where I worked.
The picture shows the unique contrast of modern and traditionl in Tokyo.
I think the both buildings can blend into the cityscape.
In recent years with the booming of the economy, It is not a severe problem for the general population to increasingly attend college and attain the quality of education.
As far as I am concerned, this statement is too arbitrary and unilateral before under that circumstance parents and children are both win-win.
I am going to elaborate my point in the following paragraphs.
But for your help, I couldn't have finished it.
But for water, no living thing could exist.
But for you, our project wouldn't have succeeded.
We call it the Great East Japan Earthquake.
And Tsunami happened after the earthquake, then nuclear power plants in the Fukushima Prefecture were destroyed by the tsunami.
Over 15,000 people died in this earthquake, most people have passed away by the tsunami.
As far as I remember, more than 2,500 people still missing.
An earthquake of 7 intensity, magnitude 9 was observed.
It was a final day that my training at the cooking school.
There is a great place to go to Japan other than Tokyo.
Please try to move another area.
Came back after fou years
I have not been caming back to this website since four years ago.
I can not help but reflect: How time flies!
What makes me sad is the level of my english seems not to improve in practice, even retreated.
Any way, I wanna restart from today and practice my written English every weeks.
I hope that my English can improve rapidly before I finish my graduate periods.
Meanwhile,I also wanna make more friends from all of the world.
A boy who lives in the house opposite took the entrance exam for Kyoto University last year.
This year, he passed the entrance exam.
A boy who lives in the house opposite took the entrance exam for Kyoto University last year.
This year, he passed the entrance exam.
The final week in Osaka just has begun.
About 70% of preparation for moving has been finished.
I found some good and bad points about Osaka.
By the way, this "Small World" was a grade-B Sci-Fi and the story was about a geek who invented a gadget which can make any objects small in size.
The thing is that until much later I didn't realize that Tabitha King was the wife of Stephen King whose works I love.
This means that I read his wife's work unawares prior to Stephen King's works.
I asked a plumber for the problem.
But he can change a new faucet.
I live in a small town which was hit by tsunami seven years ago.
Because of its uniqueness of city design and quickness of decision making, it has been received public attention.
I accepted it easily, but it turned up to be harsh after that.
We talked in English, because I can no more speak French than she can speak Japanese.
I tried to understand her English but could only a few words.
I suppose neither she did, because my English is low level.
We had spend an hour with irritating each other.
After the interview, I asked her what kind of Japanese culture was she interested in.
I was interviewed by French university student
I live in a small town which was hit by tsunami seven years ago.
Because of its uniqueness of city design and quickness of decision making, it has been received public attention.
She's a pretty smart French girl who major in politics at Akita university.
She asked me to have an interview about my thoughts of this town.
I accepted it easily, but it turned up to be harsh after that.
We talked in English, because I can no more speak French than she can speak Japanese.
I tried to understand her English but could only a few words.
We had spend an hour with irritating each other.
I should have asked her interests at first.
There is a small yakuza office near mu house.
Several of the members are often talking in front of their office, but they have never tried to hurt me at all.
The tattoos comprise symbolic patterns.
These two mummies were unearthed in a small city Gebelein in Egypt, which is located in the south of current Luxor and about 40 kilometers far.
They are estimated to date to 3315 to 3117 BC, the Predynastic period before the first pharaoh ruling the whole Egypt.
On the other hand, the tattoos on the male one might represent his masculinity and power.
The oldest tattoo ever found is geometrical designs on a mummy called Otzi and roughly 5300 years old.
It was discovered in 1991 in Alps in Italy.
Having been frozen up, its conditions are very well-preserved and completed.
Hi, my name is Luiz, I'm brasilian and study software develop.
I hope to inprove my english and french to visit others countryes like Canada, England, France, Irish and EUA.
Thanks to help me and have a nice day.
I know the perfection won't be necessary on my speech but please correct my sentences which don't make sense or make them confused.
I hope anyone of the students who will be at the reception won't read this:p
I guess busy cities like Tokyo and histrical cities like Kyoto will come to your minds when you hear Japan and not so many guide books have introduced countryside towns like here.
I'd like you to enjoy this opportunities to experience another side of Japan which general tourists rarely can.
I looked up about your college and the city this time to welcome you.
I know all the host families here for years and all of them are really warm and welcoming.
I wish I could add a little joke but I don't want to leave them cold, so I decided not to.
Here are some parts of the speech I'm thinking.
I know my English don't have to be perfect on this speech, but please correct the sentences which don't make sense or make them confused.
I hope anyone of the students who will be at the reception won't read this.
I guess busy cities like Tokyo and histrical cities like Kyoto will come to your minds when you hear Japan, and I'm afraid that you've never seen countryside like here on guide books or TV shows before.
I looked up about your college and the city this time to welcome you.
Here are some parts of the speech I'm thinking.
I know my English don't have to be perfect on this speech, but please correct the sentences which don't make sense or make them confused.
I guess busy cities like Tokyo and histrical cities like Kyoto will come to your minds when you hear Japan, and I'm afraid that you've never seen countryside like here on guide books or TV shows before.
I'd like you to enjoy this opportunities to experience another side of Japan which general tourists rarely can.
I looked up about your college and the city this time to welcome you.
I know all the host families here for years and all of them are really warm and welcoming.
Try to check out your one week leaning English state.
Try to check out your leaning English state for one week.
Have you ever had a crisis because you did something too much?
Maybe, you worked 10-hour days for a month.
Or perhaps, you exercised for two hours without taking a break halfway through.
When you get burnt out, you work or play too hard,it is important to have balance in your life.
I went a little overboard, so I will go shopping or sailing to have a change of pace and soften the blow.
Researching and knowing about other planets are important for us, but living there is a not good idea.
First, It costs too much to live apart from Earth.
we need to board a space ship when moving.
That requires much energy and money.
Also, when we communicate with people who remain on Earth, or buy something that we can't get in the planet we live in, we have to pay too much money.
We can't even breathe in other planets so masks and suits are essential.
Also, there might be harmful substances or creatures we've never knew.
Two swans where the river in front of my house have gone this year.
They also disappeared at this time of last year.
I was very sad but I wondered that they have been living together somewhere.
They have been living on the moats near the castle recently."
They seem to get a lot of feeds because many tourists gather there.
Two swans where the river in front of my house have gone this year.
I was very sad but I wondered that they have been living together somewhere.
They have been living on the moats near the castle recently."
They seem to get a lot of feeds because many tourists gather there.
I am silly because I cried for their journey last year.
I didn't have any accident at my office.
On top of that, there was a free time for me because of the absence of trainees who I had to look after.
I spent the time for maintenance of my equipments, and took the rest time to finishing desk works.
I have gone home at AM2:00 the day even I was in Tokyo.
By the way, do you konw japanese comedianes who are Egashira-2:50 and Sandwich-man?
Egashira have soon rushed to the Touhoku area by track when the earthquake happened.
Sandwich-man have donated 0.4billion to the Touhoku area.
I want to do what I can to assist the victim of the earthpuake!
Cheer Up Japan!
Egashira have soon rushed to the Touhoku area by track when the earthquake happened.
Cheer Up Japan!
I have gone home at AM2:00 the day even I was in Tokyo.
Sandwich-man have donated 0.4billion to the Touhoku area.
I want to do what I can to assist the victim of the earthpuake!
Sandwich-man have donated 0.4billion to the Touhoku area.
Cheer Up Japan!
a lower age.
ironically, human relations is weakening.
My friend, Wang is Chinese international student.
He was broken heart last summer.
He was dispressed as can't drive him car.
I was worryed him.
But,after he returned China soon,he said that I'm going marry!!!!!!!
We were surprised and think who marry him??
He said that saw ex-girlfriend in hometown and she was giving pressure to him into marrying her.
He will marry next winter.
I went to a movie theater alone today.
I was kind of hesitat to do that actually before I got in the theater, so that was my first time watching a movie at a theater.
In general, people don't come to watch a theater alone in Japan, some people might think that I'm kind of wired people.
I was afraid of being thought like that.
However, in hindsight, that was not a big deal at all.
They didn't care about me, and some people were alone.
By the way, the movie that I watched was called "The Greatest Showman." Is there anyone who has watched the movie?.
I wanna talk about it.
The was the best movie I've seen in a recent few years.
The movie was about a love story with musical.
The main actor was a Hugh Jackman.
I've seen him in some movies.
But that movie was differet from the movies he acted.
He was born and raised with a poor family, but he succeeded when got old as he found something that he could want to do.
That was also something that other people never imagined, which intrigued people to be interested in what he does.
I especially loved the theme song, that I'm listening even now.
I starting to making friends.
Try to opened my heart.
But it's difficulty.
I live in Sapporo where is a northern part of Japan.
I moved here from Tokyo last year because my husband was transferd.
There are a lot of delicious food.
But it is a very comfortable climate in Summer.
I could relax all of today.
It was normal day.
It is sunny day!
I am very nervous and physical..
Cause I have no job till now..
I speak Mandarin, and I could teach your child how to speak Chinese.
Mail:lone0220@yahoo.
If you have interesting.
Please call me, thank you very much.
But I think I should go to work at farm first.
Writing schedule on my notebook, transcribing interesting recipes on my notebook.
My friend Irina studies at univercity in Germany, She lives in Marburg.
Marburg is small but very beautiful town.
I think Irina was very scared because she went alone to a foreign country for her.
At first she had problems with language and studies.
When she finishes her studies, Irina will to find job in Gemany.
Do You Have Recommendation Spots and Foods in Frankfurt?
I'll go to Frankfurt next week.
I could not meet my friend living Germany unexpectedly, so I'll do it.
Anyway, please tell me about your recommendation things if you have it.
All of them were on the verge of starvation.
He was arrested in prison.
At first, he had to be in prison for five years for theft.
Afterwards, he tried to break out of prison, and he failed to it.
His prison term extended to 19 years in total.
It seemed that he was wondering why his punishment was so heavy.
Afterwards, he tried to break out of prison, and he failed to it.
He wounded up falling into poverty.
All of them were on the verge of starvation.
One day, he robbed a loaf of bread from a bakery.
At first, he had to be in prison for five years for theft.
I graduating at vocation school.
I love techniques very much although there are lot of space I need to learn.
Today is very impotant day for Japanese people.
Seven years ago, Japan was received a so big earthquake.
Over fifteen thousand people were killed by it.
We must not forget the tragedy.
And, I want to say to people all over the world that thank you so much for praying for Japan.
I've got to know the word "tangram" for the first time.
Tangram is consisting of seven pieces of wood and they fit snugly in a square case.
We can shape animals, airplane, ships and so fourth with the seven pieces.
I've got to know the word "tangram" for the first time.
The content use tangram.
I've got to know the word "tangram" for the first time.
Tangram is consisting of seven pieces of wood and they fit snugly in a square case.
Now I'm creating an installation for children.
The content use tangram.
Tangram is consisting of seven pieces of wood and they fit snugly in a square case.
From the morning to the night every TV channel broadcasts the news and reports about the Eastern Japanese earthquakes.
The day, March 11, became special not only for me but also all Japanese.
We got to count years from March 11 in 2011.
Maybe the special days for Japanese are few.
The other days are August 15 in 1945, when we Japanese lost in Second World War, August 6 and 9, when atomic bombs fell in Japan.
When I was only a child, Second World War was already an old story, though not so many years passed yet.
We were hardly able to find foreign tourists then.
I spent a really happy time yesterday.
My wife bought me new jogging shoes and socks at a sporting goods store in a shopping moll near Kyoto station.
First, I received a diagnosis of my legs and clarified my physical characteristic including the size, the circumference and the balance.
I consulted with a staff about the result and we selected the best one for my legs.
My wife had selected an undershirts for my jogging in advance and we were planning to buy the one at the store, but it was sold out.
We gave up buying the one and decided to buy on Internet.
Expressions relating to job is very characteristic.
We will say "I sent my resume to a company." in literal Japanese to say "I applied for a job." Also, "I was adopted the company." in literal Japanese to say "I got a job."
I am still confused why Donald Trump, a liar and a pervert, had been elected as president of The United States.
In my eyes, Christians value things like moral,self-discipline and so on, which is quite obviously unrelated to that man.
Is there anyone who can shed light on this self-contradiction?
Please forgive me if any of the viewers were offended.
I would more than glad to hear different perspective 
Lang-8 was too slow for me and I can't write on it or correct others' articles.
And when I open the lang-8 again, the request disappeared and no friend was added.
It didn't go unnoticed to keira the tension that her words generated in Liam, and not for the first time she wondered the reasons behind his presence ther.
She would do almost anything to get out of there, but time had taught her that actions have consecuences.
However, a spark of hop stired up in her heart.
She can feel it the same way her animal instincts always feel the danger.
But also she sense that it was something more.
Her wild part couldn't completely understood it, and she really didn't want to explore the reason.
As if he sense her inner doubt, Liam closed the distance between them.
He put himself within her hand's reach and stood there challenging her with his eyes.
It didn't go unnoticed to keira the tension that her words generated in Liam, and not for the first time she wondered the reasons behind his presence ther.
She can feel it the same way her animal instincts always feel the danger.
But also she sense that it was something more.
I was moved by the movie.
I hope what I am going to say is not spoil.
In the movie there were minority people who are rejected by the society.
when I hold my puppy in my laps watching him slowly fall asleep.
when I hold my puppy in my laps watching him slowly fall asleep.
when I hold my puppy in my laps watching him slowly fall asleep.
These days, there is a hidden impulsion in my chest that urges me shout out: Stand Up Girls!
Perhaps it has a close relationship with the past Women's Day.
In many social networking websites, people discussed about the topic of feminist and gender equality.
The concerned phenomenon I want to mention is that many people deliberately avoid the word "Fu Nv" in Chinese, which means "women".
You can see many alternatives of "Women's Day" such as "Queen Festival" and "Goddess Festival", which reflects people's reluctance to "Fu Nv".
In dictionaries, "Fu Nv" is defined as adult women, but in ancient Chinese, this word often refers to married women.
It seems absurd to deem the word "women" or "married women" as something with a derogative sense, but it is exactly the fact, at least here in China.
As a result, businessmen are willing to provide special discounts on this "Queen Festival" so that a large number of young ladies are attracted to purchase clothes and cosmetics to keep their beauty.
But date back to the origin of Women's Day, this day is never established to serve the businessmen to earn money.
The working and living environment is still severe to women, despite years' effort of all the brilliant women workers.
The negative stereotype is rather strong and even girls themselves have accepted the bias on them.
It's cheaper than asking price.
I met my nice friend and go to see a live with her.
I take train for shinjuku now.
A lot of Scottish and Irish people on typical clothes marched in file while playing traditional songs on bagpipes and other instruments.
We were walking beside the parade and decided to stop at a place where there wasn't too many people and we could have a better sight.
He was wearing a kilt and holding a sword in his arms.
A lot of Scottish and Irish people on typical clothes marched in file while playing traditional songs on bagpipes and other instruments.
We were walking beside the parade and decided to stop at a place where there wasn't too many people and we could have a better sight.
I was telling my cousin that I have a teacher at university who is from Scotland, and that it could be possible that we see him there, when suddenly I saw my teacher marching on the parade and getting nearer and nearer until he stopped right in front of us!
I always get so nervous and anxious when it comes to talk in English to a native speaker.
It sounds easy about directions.
I don't use running water for drink.
My repertoires are about 20 songs!
My repertoires are about 20 songs!
My parents and my grandmother are landlord.
My parents are very kind tn me.
Have you notice the mysterious papers on the roofs of each house?
The next day, the wooden papers are thrown away on the roof of each household by the group of neighbors.
It associates with knock on wood.
One of students of my English class gave a speech.
Because Kunsiran is going to grow every year, you have to divide the root once every three years.
If you leave it as it is, the pot which planted them may crack in case of a plastic pot since the growth of the roots is too good.
But even if you don't take care of them too much, they bloom beautifully and make you really happy each year.
Q: I know there is lemon yellow. color.
Do you have lemon yellow one?
I staying in a inn.
I thought to brought in some supplements but actually, I realise to didn't had a supplements.
I feel uncomfortable because I couldn't daily routine.
There is no effect even if it does not do for only one day.
An overwhelming sadness overcome him when for a brief moment Keira's eyes shone with a storm of emotions so dark and deep that he wondered how she could bear it.
To see her chained ther was horrible an frightening but at the same time it was surprisingly.
He knew that he was running out of time but he didn't rush the things.
He need her to trust him enough to let him approach her without biting his hand or scratching him.
If something went wrong he wasn't going to have another chance for this.
"I am going to get you out of here" Liam started softly, "but I need you to trust me."
Without looking away from the golden eyes of the young woman, Liam continued slowly getting close to her.
To see her chained ther was horrible an frightening but at the same time it was surprisingly.
She was standing in front of him with her back straight, chin raised in defiance and her upper lip were bent backward showing her sharp fangs.
"I am going to get you out of here" Liam started softly, "but I need you to trust me."
Liam grimaced, knowing that the girl's mistrust was well-grounded.
"True, but I have not given you any reason not to do it."
I'm not that kind of person who will make an advantage of it.
That is why my friends can rely on me always.
So, It seems to me that my sense of humor is my strong side.
I'd rather stayed at home and spent time with my family than would go to a party to meet new people.
This area need more sidewalk.
Some of my friends lives in studio apartment.
I quite interested in condominium.
To increase my income
In Japan, March is the season for a graduation, which might make me feel somewhat sentimental.
After a short period of spring holidays, a new school year begins in April.
I will continue taking online English conversation course this year.
Since then, I have taken a 25 minute lesson with a teacher from Philippines every morning, talking over daily news articles.
About a month ago, I changed my weekly course to the every day course.
I wish I could learn English when I was an infant.
I am a a earthling.
We are waiting for your visit without knowing whether the earth is global warming or the ice age.
You probably understand the main language of the Earth.
They are English, Spanish, Chinese, Arabian, French, Portugess, Russian, and any languages.
There are several kinds of aliens in the universe, and many of them may be disappointed to us, because we have low intellect and always fight.
Anyway, we should use science and technology for our development of civilization in order to move the distant universe in short time to meet aliens.
By the way, if you visit to Earth, please give me message.
I don't want afraid like the scene of Independence day, when you came by big mothership.
I've just started to read book on autism.
it begins with a story how the book's author came across the theme of autism.
he interviewed two person in silicon valley in mid nineteens.
by chance both of them ad autistic child.
I'm stay in Switzerland now and I'm studying the physics.
Today, I have helped my boss move.
It had been raining until this morning.
There were some containers and we threw these things in that.
I was surprised the culture because in Japan it costs us to get rid of unnecessary things.
I thought the throwing the garbages makes me get rid of stress haha.
After finishing, we are given a dinner.
I'm stay in Switzerland now and I'm studying the physics.
My friends and I went to my boss's house by car.
We loaded unnecessary things into the vehicles, and went to a garbage dump.
There were some containers and we threw these things in that.
I was surprised the culture because in Japan it costs us to get rid of unnecessary things.
I thought the throwing the garbages makes me get rid of stress haha.
I breathed twice, and stepped on the ground, away from the cold window and the warm sheets.
I headed towards my room's bookshelf and finally, a small backpack.
I picked it up and nearly losed my balance because of how much it weighted.
I swung it to the left right before hearing the things it helt crinckle.
I then inserted my left hand in it, and then my right one.
Next, I walked toward the door and gently placed my left ear on it.
I felt it's harsh finishing, and focused on the opposite side.
I could barely focus because of the heavy weight on my shoulders, but around thirty seconds of noticing next to thing beside a few rain drops hitting the window behind me, I slowly pulled the door, revealing my own shadow extending through the corridor.
There are spams accounts mailing everyone with viral content.
Usually, in this type of attack viruses are hidden as an attachment in the mail or as a link.
But one thing is sure, they want to install a trojan virus in the computer.
In this way, criminals can spy and sniff your movements on the net, your personal data including files, programs and pictures recorded on your hard disk.
As a new regulatory law arise due to control money movements, it is harder to spend money on the net or transferring from one bank to another using false identities.
After that, they forced you to pay them in order to unencrypting those files.
Security in the Internet
In my humble opinion Internet is safe.
Activities like buying by the internet, transferring money or surfing on the net, should not be a risk in normal circunstances.
For example, I remember one time I bought a huge television with an incredible price in a low reliable shop.
I went to the police to put a denounce.
I will never forget its "Caja de Andorra".
Only three days later they put my money back.
But little by little it is being changed.
In these days and in the latest century with the advancement of sciences and technology, there are a lot of changes that happen to the world and the people who live in.
Consequently, there are a bit difficulty to interact between the two lifestyles.
Older persons can teach teenagers about the experiences and challenges that had faces in their lives, what they have learned from all the years that they lived, how the person can save his time and spend it in a good things.
On the other hand, there are a lot of experiences that young persons can teach to old persons like; using the internet, smart phones, laptops and a lot of things that spread via the technology in this world.
Young people can teach the elder how the time has changed, how we must manage ourselves to live with different people from various cultures, attitudes, learning levels, and different thinking about major things like love, living alone, working in the night, etc.
Concluding, we need each other, we learn from children, teenagers, adults, and old people.
We learn from sellers, doctors, teachers, engineers, drives, etc.
We realized that there are no any adult-oriented cartoons in Russian TV.
Only sitcoms or music, dance shows and similar like that.
But American cartoons very popular in Russia.
Why nobody makes such cartoons?
They like to spacegoat others for their mistakes.
What we concern first is if the accident involves in Japanese people same with us.
Japan is an island nation, actually it has been enriching our unique culture and virtues.
Our world is changing rapidly, nevertheless, the Japanese cabinet keeps having a discussion endlessly about whether or not mere documents exists.
I hate myself sometimes because I was born as Japanese.
What I can say is our world is complicated enough to get us wrong.
What we concern first is if the accident involves in Japanese people same with us.
We Japanese really like our homogeneous and small world.
I hate myself sometimes because I was born as Japanese.
What I can say is our world is complicated enough to get us wrong.
Does anyone can hook me up with her?
My mother wouldn't allowed me to wear those.
But she would allow me to be like a witch or anything.
My study in university is development of rooftop greening block.
This moss is used as greening plant for this block and enhance water holding capacity of block.
Because the water containing block evaporates by sunlight.
This effect will solve heat island problem.
This block is environment harmony block because is used industrial waste for raw materials.
- I tried my best to write an English document of my scripts which were created by AutoHotKey.
I send it to my team by email.
- In the afternoon, about 6:00, I went to view the house.
The owner is a girl who wore few clothes.
The house is small, so I just learned about the house simply and then step out of the house.
I've been making an Android app since the start of the year.
I released it this week.
There are still bugs so I will fix it.
But I was very happy to be released it.
The word "fertilizer" unexpectedly sounds cool to some Japanese including me.
It's probably because the ending of the word, "-zer" makes the word itself sound awesome.
Returning to the subject, the word of "fertilizer", even though the meaning of the word means chemical or organic substances to help plants grow up, I like the cool sound of the word.
I ask her how to improve English, she answer that I go to abroad.
I have not gone to study abroad, but I hope it.
I will quit a job next year, I decide to study abroad.
I think where to go to country.
He likes running and he sometimes goes to even 
other prefectures to participate in marathon competitions.
I and my kids participated in a competition and ran the 2km course last year but they got to the goal earlier than me.
He lives in the place far from here, so we can't see so many times.
I feel that the older I'm getting, the less time to see friends I have because every friend lives every place far from here and that they are also getting busier.
We don't have any ties binding us to our job, so, I hope that I'll be able to enjoy taking with him.
I'll see my old friend this evening.
One year has passed since I saw him the last time.
He lives in the place far from here, so we can't see so many times.
I feel that the older I'm getting, the less time to see friends I have because every friend lives every place far from here and that they are also getting busier.
We don't have any ties binding us to our job, so, I hope that I'll be able to enjoy taking with him.
To Say Is To My Dream Come True
I often wrote what I would like to do on Lang-8.
To chat with Chinese customers and coworkers in English is very enjoyable time for me, but I would like to work with native English speakers because their English are perfect.
Furthermore I will be able to get a lot of profit from them.
Probably many people don't envy the hospitality industry, but I like to recommend Washoku and Shochu to foreign customers.
To Say Is To My Dream Come True
Probably many people don't envy the hospitality industry, but I like to recommend Washoku and Shochu to foreign customers.
To Say Is To My Dream Come True
To chat with Chinese customers and coworkers in English is very enjoyable time for me, but I would like to work with native English speakers because their English are perfect.
I often wrote what I would like to do on Lang-8.
Probably many people don't envy the hospitality industry, but I like to recommend Washoku and Shochu to foreign customers.
I'm writing to apply about that Department will do some cleaning work on the clearing next to my house.
As you know last weekend there was the traditional annual fair at that point, and now the area is a mess.
The contest
In contemporary society, the working pressure is getting heavier on almost everyone, so we must work hard on earning a living, which may take a lots of our time.
It's impossible for us to quit our job.
so, when parents get old, they may lost their ability to live by their own and need caring almost anytime.
It's unrealistic that we could stay around them every day, so sending them to nursing home would be a good choice
Besides, when parents get old, they could get very illed, it's necessary for them to be available to professional care.
I think nursing homes are equipped with medical equipment and professional doctors
But I usually use online shopping and bought a protein powder and books these days.
The E-commerce website which I often use is Amazon and Rakuten occasionally.
I lately purchased iPhone6 and Mac when I was in Bangkok,Thailand.
MBK seems like Akihabara where there are myriad of electronic devices.
However, the problem is my iPhone6 something wrong.
My writing skill is not as bad as speaking skill.
I can not catch up speaking in English in my brain.
Maybe I need to make an opportunity to use English a lot.
Dear Mrs Rugby, 
I am writing regarding the 6-month internship within your company.
Indeed, I learned with great joy that I was accepted into your company to do my internship of engineer student of a period of 6 months.
I am currently on a humanitarian mission to Bangladesh in order to help the Rohingya, driven out of their country.
Indeed, the equality of men is a subject that is particularly close to my heart and I could not stay here doing anything.
I sincerely apologize for this slight concern and hope that it will not affect your decision to accept me in your company.
Would it be possible to shift the start date and end of a week to perform the initial period of training despite this unavailability during the first week.
If this is not possible, I will undertake to work overtime in order to make up for my lost time.
Once again, I apologize for the inconvenient I may have caused you.
I am looking forward to heaving from youu soon.
Best regards.
Last Thursday, I changed my old phone into a new iPhone X.
It is the model change for the first time in seven years.
In addition to those, I had to charge twice a day because my phone's battery had degraded with age.
I knew it was time to change it into new one, but I had been delaying change.
I am planning to shoot various photos and videos of my hometown when I go home next week, so I decided to buy a new phone this time at last.
I think only a few people keep using the same smartphone for seven years.
You might say "Oh!
You take good care of things", but the truth is that I am just lazy.
It seems annoying for me to adjust a lot of phone's settings to suit my needs.
Even now I am getting tired with them.
I need to refresh my english, would you be so kind to help me?
thanks, Dominic
I used to only buy shoes for schools such as white sneakers in a shopping street close to my home when I was a teenager.
After school days, my older brother bought leather shoes to me when I entered a university.
It was my first leather shoes which is the impetus for liking leather shoes.
I was buying different types of leather shoes by part-time payment in newly opened shopping malls in my town in those days when I was a university student.
In the past, I had possessed at most seven leather shoes at the same time.
How can I lean English?
I've been leaning English since April last year.
first,I went to study abroad in Cebu.
at that time my English skill was really bad.
For example I totally couldn't understand what the teacher was asking me, even the easy question.
So I was frustrating it and disappointed my self, that's why I tried study head as possible as can.
Please don"t forget of corse I like them.
After 2 months later my teacher said for me that your English skills is really improve then before.
and then next I went to Australia and then also I went to Language school just 1 months in there.
But I was notice I couldn't improve my English skills in this school so why?
I know because of me.
I couldn't understand when I talk with Native-English-speaker.
The key difference between they and me is a my English skills not enough
grammar and vocabulary and receptive about English.
So how can I lean English?
I am not good everything especially grammar and listing.
A lot of acquaintance say that your pronounce is perfect.
Please give me a advice...
if you have this kind of situation how do you lean English?
thank you for leading my page.
The biggining was an email.
They said " We stopped anyone using that email address for sending.
You will be able to send an email from the address in a day or two." I immidiately canged the password because I use this address mainly for the internet shopping.
I got be able to use the address a few hours later.
"There is a parson who tried to login your account with your password.
Please veryfy." thety said.
I checked the places these pc were.
One was Setagaya and another was Taiwan.
It was clear that unknown people tried to use my address and knew my password.
I immediately changed the password longer one.
After that day, I tried to login my amazon account to buy someting.
An error massage appeared "There is not the account with this mail address." I didn't change email address for amazon.
I wondered what had happen.
I found there were some people whoes amazon accounts disappeared.
I knew one of them called amazon and got it taken care of.
I called amazon soon and explained the situation.
They said amazon never change your address and password without letting you know and will inform you if the modification is done by yourself.
But I didin't get a such notification.
They asked my latest order number and bigun to investigate.
Accoding to them, my address and password were changed last Desember.
Amazon said "we will investigate it precisely and email you the consequence.
it maight take a few hours."
3 hours later, I got a massage from amazon, They said "It seemed that unknown people changed your address and password illegally.
We don't know how they get your ID.
Illegal modification and orders were canceled.
Five hours later from now, you change the password and set your credit card.
So you will be able to use your account again." I did that as they said.
I also changed Facebook and Line passwords.
I realized that all passwords were the same.
I will be more careful how to use the Internet.
I watched British drama, the "Miranda".
The Miranda is so funny.
Miranda is a main character.
She is six feet tall and she runs a toy shop with friend Stevie.
Her hobby is play with vegetables made by her.
The vegetables have a humen face.
Actually I watched Miranda a third time.
I hope to be released The Miranda season 4.
There is a lot of cartoons in English not for children.
For example, family guy or briklberry.
And there are many jokes about politics or American president Obama.
I think if somebody in Russia makes such cartoons with jokes about, for example, Putin he would have problems.
I want to learn writing in English.
Now my skill is very poor.
It's my diary.
Am I Right?
I want improve my English.
My adventure on ica.
We hospeded in a hostel at huacachina`s oases.
the dessert and the oases are amazing places.
we did sandboarding and can saw the sunset.
Ica is a nice place to know, you should go there.
Cleaning Teeth
I went to dental clinic today.
I had my teeth clean.
My teeth had some plaque so I had my teeth remove.
Confliction is everywhere.
I didn't hesitate to against majority opinions.
Everyone says their opinion out loud almost like screaming or shouting so that they can't hear the opposite opinion.
I rather be away from conflictions.
Today was the worst day I never had.
I thought "I can't handle this!",so I drunk too much.
It wouldn't go well such as I wanted to do well, wouldn't it?
I thought "I can't handle this!",so I drunk too much.
We need it to improve our new section and make our store look fresh and visually good in the following week.
We would like to order some models of clothes which are blocked for our store.
She sing a song and use English word at home.
I looking forward to move up to D class. But she want to be together you more.
You are great teacher!
I really appreciate you.
Sue planed Maud, Maud planed Sue, and aunt Sucksby planed them both.
But even if the most best plan, also hard to advoid failure.
Espeacially, love caused accident which was most dangerous and hard to be faced.
And this TV play shows the evil love-----love to end all cheat.
Put the lover to madhouse, the more love, the more hate.
This world was crazy!
EC is a little like Ziyi Zhang, but her acting is much better.
After seeing the movie, I am very interesting to read the original English novel again.
The novel have been staying in my mobile phone for a long time.
I had tried to read it a serveal times but still stayed in page 1.
And I also want to watch other BBC plays, such as Price & Prejudice, Atonement.
I have finished reading a book regarding a programming language.
It introduced new ideas and their implementations.
To speak English is fun but to communicate many people is also fun!
I think the most important thing to study English is to communicate people.
There are not much opportunity to use English in Japan so I use English to make opportunity to have a conversation.
At night I want to take a stroll at streets, it's getting warmer these days, maybe I will start jogging recently
I put on 5kg last winter, need to lose that in one month
I will graduate from my uni in June, after that, I think the pace of becoming old will accelerate
I know it sounds weird, but I started worrying about my age since I was ten.
I was always being tortured by those thoughts
Today I went to the 1911 revolution memorial and I staied there for about three hours.
There are many good posthumous work in the world.
I plan to take EIKEN exam this year.
EIKEN is the exam like TOEFL and IELTS in Japan.
So, I'd like someone to check my sentences whether there are mistakes in grammer.
Please give me advises if you find out the point I have to improve.
In my opinion, online courses are as effective as traditional casses.
Since smart phones and tablets were released, the number of users has been increasing around the world.
To use these appliances, speed of Internet has been getting faster.
So, unless students go to class rooms, they can listen and look the courses by their own smart phones and tablets anywhere.
These appliances make it easier to learn even if there are many distances between students and teachers.
They can save money and time to go to class rooms.
I think that thanks to technical progresses, online courses are sufficiently effective these days.
The most important discovery is the opening of America.
It is very exciting and we must remember it.
I'd like to tell you about how people can change their character.
Last night I textchatted with one of my old painting friends whom I haven't met more than ten years on Facebook.
We settled up the date when we would meet.
I am excited to see her in person for the first time more than ten years.
Lest of the procedure for baking bread was really burdensome and taking a lot of time.
We just looked and smiled at each other when we bit our works.
Im glad to meet you again.
Little tragedy in my bag
When I opened my bag in a locker room, I noticed almost of the lemon water in my bottle spilt over inside it.
Since the lesson is about to start, I dashed to buy some plastic bags and another bottle of water, put my soaked bag into a bag, push it into a locker, and then managed to make it for the lesson.
Luckly I had been putting my yoga wears under my cloths, so I could join it.
I found a rubber seal of the bottle in the kitchen sink when I came back home.
When I opened my bag in a locker room, I noticed almost of the lemon water in my bottle spilt over inside it.
Luckly I had been putting my yoga wears under my cloths, so I could join it.
I found a rubber seal of the bottle in the kitchen sink when I came back home.
Blue little parakeet!
He is new born, so I have to feed him three times a day and keep him warm around 30 degrees.
I had a yellow one that could imitate human words well before.
Today is my birthday and got a surprise present from my family.
He is new born, so I have to feed him three times a day and keep him warm around 30 degrees.
Today is my birthday and got a surprise present from my family.
Blue little parakeet!
He is new born, so I have to feed him three times a day and keep him warm around 30 degrees.
I had a yellow one that could imitate human words well before.
I was passing by, and I couldn't help popping the kid's balloon.
She was passing by and, all of a sudden, I decided to throw at her a water balloon.
You were so pissed off when you saw how the mean guy popped the kid's balloon.
She was passing by and, all of a sudden, I decided to throw at her a water balloon.
These pictures above show a bento box counter on the left, and bento boxes in the middle and right.
One deep-fried breaded cutlet of pork bento contained the pork, potatoes salad and lettuce.
While my wife and daughter were buying ingredients, I walked around the food department by myself and saw a bento box counter.
There were many kinds of bento boxes: a deep-fried breaded cutlet of pork salmon, chicken, Chinese style and so on.
One deep-fried breaded cutlet of pork bento contained the pork, potatoes salad and lettuce.
They were small portions, but contained many different kinds of ingredients.
There are a Youtube channel which is hilarious as Gamer Poop.
Once you watch these videos, you can't help remembering them every time you see Jeff Kaplan's face.
Jeff Kaplan himself have mentioned about these videos.
We want to report a mistake with our "report of sales" which you send us this morning.
Two days ago, at 8th of March, we ended our sales day with differences in cash and cash up wasnt correct.
Yesterday we contacted with IT department and together we did and print right cash up.
In attachment Im sending photos of right cash up.
Thank you for you help and waiting for solving the problem.
If you don't know how to fix it, don't even try it because you're going to fuck this up.
I and my boyfriend have been lived together.
Today, I have been dancing for more than one hour.
Today, we went my parents home by train.
My parents made the bag for their grand children.
I went to berber.
Nagging headache
I didn't feel well in day time today because of headache.
By the time it was evening, I had an indigestion, and headache came along.
Headache is worse thing which I can't endure than indigestion because It lasts longer than an indigestion despite of medicines.
Now, I got over an indigestion, but I still have nagging headache.
One of my recomend youtube movie is...
I'm going to write about one of my recomend youtube movie.
It is "73 Question" that a questioner asking in English Question of 73 for some actor, singer.
It is good for knowing to hear and how native English speaker express English.
I often listening 73 Question during going work place and ride in a train.
That's why I want to recomend who learn English.
18 0310
I back to home yesterday so, I didn't write this diary because of tired, sorry!
I had graduation ceremony today!
I was were straight skirt suits,it was very tight for me,
But I relieved that I was graduated safely.
A store I went shopping was having a raffle draw today.
They said that we would get to draw for every 5,000yen purchase.
I bought more than 5,000 yen, so I could draw it and got a discount ticket.
On the other hand, more than 80% of the electronic information stored around the planet is in English and two thirds of the earth's scientists read in that language.
In addition, English is present in the cultural, social, political and economic life of the most of the countries of the world.
English is the tool that allows communication with people from other countries, within the globalized world in which we live.
It can also be considered that English is not a difficult language to learn compared to others, English grammar has a logical and much simplified sequence to the grammar to which we are accustomed.
For all these reasons, I consider that English is essential, and even more in the field of education, since it allows us to access information and be in contact with the rest of the world.
It is unthinkable today to train in this globalized world without knowledge of English.
i'd like to have some tips about academic writting and e-mail writting.
- We are looking for high skilled craftsmen.
- His skill has improved before I knew.
Work, play and break
There are only three things in the life.
Do you make a balance?
I never seen avalanche.
We are searching a new office now because our staffs increased.
We want to use a new office as a laboratory, so it is the best to rend a room from an university.
We will go to see some proposed offices next week.
It is important to see if there are enough spaces for experimental devices, 5desks and sofa.
Also, it is crucial when we can rend a room and how long we can use.
This is my third diary after picking up write English diary.
I have done a stupid thing which got up at 6 am for study drive in this morning.
To be honest, get up at 6 am is really a kind of torture for me who work at 10 am.
All right, let's call is a day.
Today, our company is holiday, but I could not finish my work, yesterday, and I went to the office.
After I went back my house, I got a long nap.
According to BBC, a pub and restaurant in North Wales have started a campaign, which is getting popular among people.
The campaign is that customers who ask the shop clerk to keep their electronics such as smartphone, mobile phone and laptop can get a 25 percent discounts of the cost of their meal.
According to BBC, a pub and restaurant in North Wales have started a campaign, which is getting popular among people.
The campaign is that customers who ask the shop clerk to keep their electronics such as smartphone, mobile phone and laptop can get a 25 percent discounts of the cost of their meal.
This service is offered only on Monday night.
I want to improve cooking skill.
I live alone, so I make cook for myself.
I didn't cook when I live at home with my family.
Cooking skill is very helpful after marriage.
Today, I made curry rice for my supper.
I grilled many onoons for that curry.
Onions add curry delicious sweetness.
And Iusually eat curry rice with deep-fried food.
This combination is my favorite.
I continually changed my jobs because of different reasons like salary, working environment and other things.
I complained and felt that this way of life will never end.
The old saying goes that all work and no play makes Jack a dull boy.
Focus on studying, I almost had no interest in any career.
I had a rest all day.
I had a rest all day.
Lunch was a bali rice.
Workplace environments really affect workers' mood, if it is good, their morale would increase.
In order to save the electricity, there was a sensor with the lighing that can turn on and off according to the humans' movement.
Workplace environments really affect workers' mood, if it is good, their morale would increase.
The only one downside was that the lighting was so dim in the corridor.
I felt comforable because everything was organized, and hotel staff were efficient.
Workplace environments really affect workers' mood, if it is good, their morale would increase.
According to the local police, 200,000 strikers marched across the city in the evening; 600,000, according to the organizers.
This agreement includes the implementation of social measures to help the working class, a universal basic income, and a constituent process which would have to be validated through a binding referendum by the end of the legislature.
CUP said that they were open to reach a new agreement if the constituent process was carried out by the government and led by grassroots organizations.
They also said that they would never accept it to be led by the ruling elite, as an important sector of the PDeCAT wants.
ANC to hold a massive protest in Barcelona tomorrow to call for the immediate implementation of the Catalan Republic.
Today, I have read a news about North Korea.
If this news be true, so this meeting will be an important session which can affect to whole world, especially North Korea.
I hope it will be a right news and the result of it will be good too.
This way, probably the livelihood of North Korea society will change in better way too, because most of them are living in poverty and misery.
As for my exams,I have chosen English and social studies.
Besides that,I want to go to rock-climbing 5.
I usually eat out about 2times a week,I think that it is normal amount of eatings-out amd isn't big money.
Besides that,I want to go to rock-climbing 5.
I usually eat out about 2times a week,I think that it is normal amount of eatings-out amd isn't big money.
For A language Partner.
I would like to find an English partner in Beijing, so we can learning face on face.
There are many things I need to do, so I took up my study time.
Unforuntately my Englsih level is so lamentable. So I need a teacher to give me guidence!
I would like to find an English partner in Beijing, so we can learning face on face.
There are many things I need to do, so I took up my study time.
I want to prepare my IELTS exam from this year.
I am now able to make good tomato sauce stably.
Until recently, every time I made tomato sauce, the taste varies.
I think my cooking skill has been improved a little.
Martha's letter to house-mother of her childhood, Mrs Hudson.
I hope you are very well and your legs haven't pain.
He bring breakfast into my bed for me sometimes.
He doesn't let me go to kitchen.
Perhaps, our matter will put to right.
I wasn't better of late.
I lost my apetite in turn Harry sits next to me and encourages me I must eat something.
The truth is that I am afraid and I have bad feeling.
My familydoctor visits me since three days but he doesn't able to help me.
I don't leave my room, Harry says I have to rest.
My friends wouldn't visit me and if I want make a phone call, never have phone line.
Emilia, if you can visit me, please.
If I have something happended, you go to the police immediately.
I finish my letter but Helen finished vacuuming and she starts to post office.
I don't want Harry notices my letter.
I hate to admit it, I know next nothing about that computer.
However, my father thought me and I would need a computer skill when I work.
From a few days ago, I'm thinking I had better take a walk around my house.
However, I didn't feel going outside.
Even though it was a nice weather.
I stayed all day at my home today.
I felt a little guilty while I didn't do anything.
So I thought to do something in English at least.
All in English, watch the videos, read the books and play the apps.
Actually, it was do nothing but made me feel better.
The warm spring sunshine streamed into the room and it felt good.
However, I didn't feel going outside.
I didn't want to do anything.
So I thought to do something in English at least.
All in English, watch the videos, read the books and play the apps.
Actually, it was do nothing but made me feel better.
The renal shops
I usually go to the rental shop which offers many CDs and DVDs at reasonable price,
but going to that shop is only when I need to rent some DVDs for my daughter.
when I want to watch the move for me,I'm tend to download from the online shop.
So I rent the DVDs from the rental shop when I rent at first time.
but it used for many people and there are many the rental shops.
To use the rental shop is relatively troublesome for tourists, because the user have to register for the membership.
If in case of living Japan.
the rental shops is useful for many people,
because in general the shops offers more reasonable price than the online shop.
She was arrested for sitting in the withes-only section of the cinema.
How many people was involved in the issue?
From the first moron that raised a complain, to the cops that arrested her, the fiscal that lead the prosecution, the judge that had to hear the case...
She was the protagonist of an incident to challenge segregation in Canada ten years before the famous case of Rosa Park.
She was arrested for sitting in the withes-only section of the cinema.
From the first moron that raised a complain, to the cops that arrested her, the fiscal that lead the prosecution, the judge that had to hear the case...
You need a lot of energy to hate people.
Reading that, I couldn't avoid thinking how petty and wasteful the whole issue was.
You need a lot of energy to hate people.
She was the protagonist of an incident to challenge segregation in Canada ten years before the famous case of Rosa Park.
Reading that, I couldn't avoid thinking how petty and wasteful the whole issue was.
From the first moron that raised a complain, to the cops that arrested her, the fiscal that lead the prosecution, the judge that had to hear the case...
She was the protagonist of an incident to challenge segregation in Canada ten years before the famous case of Rosa Park.
How many people was involved in the issue?
From the first moron that raised a complain, to the cops that arrested her, the fiscal that lead the prosecution, the judge that had to hear the case...
You need a lot of energy to hate people.
In recent years with the booming of the economy, University is no longer as a luxury thing for the general, so most people decide to attend in the college not only because of the piece of paper of diploma but also for the quality of education.
Under this view, some people claim that only one way to improve the quality of education is universities which should spend more money on salaries for the university professors.
As far as I a concerned, This statement is too arbitrary and unilateral, because wages increased for the professors do not directly represent that the quality of education will be improved.
I'm now on the voyage to Kyushu, where I was born and brought up.
I think driving a car for yourself on the comfortable road with your favourite songs is like a meditation, because I often feel like both my car and body are mixed and harmonized together.
Only unlucky guys are caught sight of and assigned some fines by the police as human sacrifices.
In this sense, driving on the highway can be compared to an adventure of the dungeon full of killer monsters.
I'm now on the voyage to Kyushu, where I was born and brought up.
I think driving a car for yourself on the comfortable road with your favourite songs is like a meditation, because I often feel like both my car and body are mixed and harmonized together.
Only unlucky guys are caught sight of and assigned some fines by the police as human sacrifices.
In this sense, driving on the highway can be compared to an adventure of the dungeon full of killer monsters.
Pinkey's age of reason and decision making would be frozen in place.
This halting of her growth and development was as if the sun itself, having ever so slightly peeked over the horizon to spread its radiance into the thick, wild darkness of the land, was suddenly imprisoned in the sky before it could ascend any higher so that only a tiny fragment of its light could pierce through the shadow that was imprisoning the land.
An obsession controlled my mind, and I wondered why I was so caged by society and unable to live according to my own reasons and decisions.
However, Pinkey had now reached grade 8, which meant that our elders would soon halt her formal education.
Pinkey's age of reason and decision making would be frozen in place.
This halting of her growth and development was as if the sun itself, having ever so slightly peeked over the horizon to spread its radiance into the thick, wild darkness of the land, was suddenly imprisoned in the sky before it could ascend any higher so that only a tiny fragment of its light could pierce through the shadow that was imprisoning the land.
To the contrary, they were even more traditional and narrow-minded, and their limited view that could only imagine so much was swiftly becoming a chain wrapped around our legs chaining us to a tiny, little destiny.
Pinkey was forced to stop going to school as I was.
She willingly accepted the cage of prevailing belief that girls over age 14 were supposed to stay at home and help with household chores.
My fiery indignation at such traditions and beliefs still simmered, and as if it had its own life, it refused to die down, to diminish.
Every day I thought about my education and the restrictions on my life.
An obsession controlled my mind, and I wondered why I was so caged by society and unable to live according to my own reasons and decisions.
I became silent as he talked about my education.
For example, I have decided that I will do my intermediate studies in commerce, not in medicine or engineering.
How dared he say such a thing!
I felt embarrassed and quickly took the soap out of water, and closed the tap.
Today, the result was released today.
Today, the result was released today.
Today, the result was released today.
I guess she catches words that she knows or she thinks important and understand the contents.
A few days ago, a Lang-8 wrote that we need to practice English for one million hours to become as fluent as native English speakers.
Do you think if we need such many hours?
Once you understand what others are saying, you would communicate with people much better.
As you know, you have to take two tests to pass the level, a paper test and an interview.
The paper test includes the listening section; my granddaughter seems very good at listening.
That's why she got almost perfect on the listening section.
She passed the paper test at the last Eiken test, but she failed the interview test.
This time, she didn't have to take the paper test.
I suppose she practiced a lot for the interview, so she believed she passed the test before she got the result.
She doesn't use English every day.
I guess she catches words that she knows or she thinks important and understand the contents.
I think this is the way that we should listen to English.
When I talk with my friends, my brain catches only certain important words.
Even though I don't hear all of their words clearly, I understand what they are talking about.
That's why I immediately reply to their words.
A few days ago, a Lang-8 wrote that we need to practice English for one million hours to become as fluent as native English speakers.
I joked back to him, "We can't live such a long time," and then, he replied that he should have said "10,000 hours." 
Do you think if we need such many hours?
Once you understand what others are saying, you would communicate with people much better.
The paper test includes the listening section; my granddaughter seems very good at listening.
That's why she got almost perfect on the listening section.
I will show you a thing which is currently popular in Japan.
There are several shops in Tokyo where you can experience smashing roof tiles, which is just like Karate practice.
You don't have to worry about your hand being injured.
That's why there is a slit in the middle beforehand, and you can relatively easily break them.
There are several shops in Tokyo where you can experience smashing roof tiles, which is just like Karate practice.
I will show you a thing which is currently popular in Japan.
You don't have to worry about your hand being injured.
Kawarawari looks very attractive to me.
My boyfriend who was off first said he was going to use car-sharing service, so we ride it together.
When we were heading, I saw a lot of people waiting for a bus so I was so lucky he picked me up for me!
I cooked a salad just now.
Seasonings are vinegar, olive oil, sea salt, cumin, and basil.
I cook everyday.
Now, I improved my cooking skill.
Nextly, I have to develop my time managing skill.
Anyway, you can get on even Shinkansen with IC card here in Japan.
You can use this deposit card even a vending machine, convenience store or so.
I saw this IC card in Hong Kong, called Octopus and according to Bonyari, in the UK there is either.
your world is oyster some thing like that...
do you have this kind of card where you are?
There is a saying, "Seasons come, and seasons go," which originally meant that the winter cold lasts until the Spring Equinox Day, while the summer lasts until the Autumn Equinox Day.
Now it has come to mean,"Time will solve your problems." 
However, it is enough to warm these days, now I will take off.
I would be grateful if there are any unnatural expression in the following: 
I don't mind if you do that later.
It doesn't matter when you do that.
If your busy now, it can wait till later.
It can be done when your finished.
There's no hurry - in your own time!
Our sales in a current term is not as good as the last tarm.
We have to be really serious about that.
My direct boss got a little emotional and made us think how to make our sales better.
We are aiming to surpass the last sales, but we can't carry it out as the current tarm is only left a few weeks.
"We' have to do something for the next tarm to get a more seles.",my boss gave us a pep talk.
Having said that, our clients budgets will be lessened in the next tarm, so we'll face the difficulty making more sales.
One of the solutions that I mentioned was to focus on getting a new client by making a cold-calling to many companies.
Some of coworkers were against my idea because we currently lack of stuffs.
We didn't come to conclusion in the meeting.
I still think the cold- calling is one of the best solutions.
When people touch the sensor on the trunk, lights with correspond symbols will flicker.
The interactive way is too direct, such as pressing the button then the light will be turned on.
People cannot reflect anything through the interactive process.
We got inspiration from the alchemy.
We chose the symbol of philosophers stone which is a mystical substance that can turn basic metal into gold.
When people move their hands they will find the light change and have different effects
Then, we made a plastic model at CSM, however, the largest radius the machine can make is about 15 cm...
So, 50 cm radius is impossible...
And if we change the meteral into glass, it will be too expensive...
Also, this 3D sculpt is too direct, not so much design elements in it - too similar with the original Alchemy symbol.
Since a long time ago, Japanese school English teachers have been criticized for their own English skills.
They may have some problems but when it comes to learning, I believe that all responsibility in learning lies on the learners themselves after all
The reason why Japanese students do not improve their English skills is that they do not prepare fields where they use English on their own.
Forgetting their own laziness, they start to blame their schools, the quality of their class, and their teachers.
But wait and think for a while.
So many boogers keeping making complaints are not aware of their foolishness.
If you keep wasting your time using the method in fashion, you should have your students learn by more practical words, phrases, and grammar.
Only school teachers are satisfied with using different ways from the classical method and they feel happy with their evaluations that they obtain because they use a method in fashion.
Even after reflecting on grammar translation method, in which the teacher translates each sentence in the language of his students, the method is still used for teaching in present days.
I want them to teach in a stress-free style.
To improve your English skills effectively, you need to absorb a numerous number of knowledge and information.
Depending on how much knowledge the learners have and how many chances to use it they have, they will enhance their English skills.
Japanese English learners must know a lot of English words and learn even old-fashioned grammar before they pass their university entrance exams.
They only input.
They have no chances to output what they absorbed.
They should have a lot of chances in which they make errors and are corrected so that they can use it better.
Back to the first topic, are Japanese English teachers really poor in their own English skills?
That will be more helpful when you become English teachers in Japan.
The sience makes it possilbe to improve the standard of our life.
I'm considering to buy a new one.
One of the very Boston-specific stuff is the Boston accent.
Car Talk guys have really heavy Boston accents.
I don't really see a person from MA.
Then one random person talked to me with heavy Boston accent, "Cute huh?
He belong to this cafe and loves human." It was a pretty heavy accent, so I had to ask my significant other to translate to me without the Boston accent.
Boston native speak not only with specific accent, but also they speak very fast.
That makes me even hard to understand it.
I don't know there will be a day I can follow the Boston accent.
Once a week, we often roam in the book store or go to try some food in a new eatery that we have just found out.
My friend also get me into playing volleyball.
We play togerther on every Thursday afternoon in the park near my house.
I assume playing sport is good way to release energy and it's funny too.
You get a point by rewriting someones post.
Your post will be appeared on top of the feed depending on how many points you have.
Visitors came from parent company yesterday.
First of all, I should say about my story of islam.
Honestly, my first impression about islam is not good.
I thought Islam is so annoying religion.
How many rules it is!
But I had an opportunity to give a presence.
I choiced the theme of Islam.
I didnt have a clearly reason.
And I learned Islam is a little funny.
However it happened 9.11 and Islamic State.
I didnt go to Islamic countries as many people for a long time.
Both countrys people very welcomed me.
I guess Egyptian who live in Japan is tired.
Of course, one of their is bad.
However I enjoyed it at last.
Thanks for giving me a great trip, awesome Islam.
I am a Japanese and I study English everyday.
Sometimes I think that Line reply is troublesome.
The input by hand is boring.
I leaving my friends message sometimes as it is.
I think that is not good.
I want to know how to do well those thing.
Sometimes I think that Line reply is troublesome.
The input by hand is boring.
I leaving my friends message sometimes as it is.
I think that is not good.
I want to know how to do well those thing.
The house we can see its roof from here was built 5 years ago.
My friend talked about a boy who didn't go to school and only stays at home.
As far as she heard and shared with me, the boy didn't get a diploma from a junior high school, so his family lost hope to his future.
Before entering a senior high school, you need a diploma of a junior high school.
As long as they are registered as a resident, they receive the request which tells that they are expected to attend the nearest public junior high school.
My friend told me that the boy didn't have a diploma of a junior high school.
In such a case too, they can get the document to give a senior high school by the enrollment.
If they ask the junior high school which they were registered, the school give the document, but just with the fact: zero attendance, the lowest grade to all subjects.
I am just afraid of a case that the boy was omitted from the list.
If only they had once attended a school in Japan before they turned 16, even for a month, they could have gotten the certificate.
It is an authorised examination to give those people the certificate to entry an entrance exam for a senior high school.
JLPT N1 passers are recognised to have as good Japanese proficiency as a graduate of a junior high school.
Almost every day, I get phone calls from people who want to know what to do to get a diploma from a senior high school.
This system is applied to all the residents, including children who don't have Japanese nationality.
In such a case too, they can get the document to give a senior high school by the enrollment.
Some of my former students in the Philippines suffered the problem.
If only they had once attended a school in Japan before they turned 16, even for a month, they could have gotten the certificate.
It is an authorised examination to give those people the certificate to entry an entrance exam for a senior high school.
JLPT N1 passers are recognised to have as good Japanese proficiency as a graduate of a junior high school.
In Japan,we will take a job after graduated high school or college.
Japanese say "This is common."
I think so,but I try various experiences.
Now I am a college student. So,I have a time.
During college student,I think about "Finding employment" or "Starting business" or others.
For the long time in a year
I posted lang8 for the first time in a year.
I was busy my private.
I kept study English other ways.
It is hard to get use to study English...
I think Japanese people do not like self confidence people especially in our generation.
Japanese people prefer moderate and humble personality, so we are expected humble comments even though they are the Olympic winners or succeeded persons.
If People from Western countries have confidence, it is ok because we easily accept the fact that they are different from us.
I think Japanese people do not like self confidence people especially in our generation.
Japanese people prefer moderate and humble personality, so we are expected humble comments even though they are the Olympic winners or succeeded persons.
However, Pinkey had now reached grade 8, which meant that our elders would soon halt her formal education.
This halting of her growth and development was as if the sun itself, having ever so slightly peeked over the horizon to spread its radiance into the thick, wild darkness of the land, was suddenly imprisoned in the sky before it could ascend any higher so that only a tiny fragment of its light could pierce through the shadow that was imprisoning the land.
To the contrary, they were even more traditional and narrow-minded, and their limited view that could only imagine so much was swiftly becoming a chain wrapped around our legs chaining us to a tiny, little destiny.
Pinkey was forced to stop going to school as I was.
She willingly accepted the cage of prevailing belief that girls over age 14 were supposed to stay at home and help with household chores.
I felt embarrassed and quickly took the soap out of water, and closed the tap.
I remembered sometimes Azeem and I used to race at the bank of the river Indus when Father used to take us out.
I had never felt that happy since I was grounded.
The cold, wet sand on the bank was like dew on the grass.
I thought that he became positive person than before.
He was surprised that a new shopping center will be built in this countryside even though I told him before.
The most shocking thing was the train that they were 1 or 2 train cars.
He said that, "My hometown is a remote village, right?" 
I was laughed it because he said such a thing even though it was common for him for a long time.
I wanted to spend more time with him, but he came back to Tokyo yesterday.
Could you correct my self-presentation? I wrote this text for self-presntation video.
And I'm from a small town in Russia, which name you probably don't know.
So let's just move to my educational background.
Last summer I finished the Udmurt State University and got bachelor's degree in linguistics.
While studying at the University in order to improve my English skills, I took part in the Camp America program.
I spent three months in a summer camp and it was such an amazing experience, so it turned me to be a teacher.
Though, my real major in the University was practice and theory of translation.
As for my hobbies, it is singing and translating movies or TV series.
But I think it is good rather than bad.
I'm currently living and working in Thailand, but I'd like to get back not only to work that corresponds to my qualifications, but also to that I enjoy doing.
I'd really love to work with kids in China and teach them English.
So I think that is all I wanted to tell about myself for now and I hope to see you soon in China.
A Wolf Robot keeping security at rice fields in Japan
Hokkaido Wolfs are used to existed in Japan but were exticted by a wolf eliminating campaign at the beginning of 19th century.
Because they are usually used to eat rices and chesnuts of farmers.
After a successful trial, wolf robots will be bring into mass-production next month.
The robots can efficiently work within an about-one-kilometer radius, more efficiently than electrical barriers, Japanese specialist Chihiko Umezawa said.
A Wolf Robot keeping security at rice fields in Japan
There are many farms beside Kisazaru City, Chiba province, Japan protected by wolfs robot with awful appearance during 8 months early, Futurism published on March 8th.
These robots, named "super-monster wolf", were outputed for the mission of keeping crops from other animals' attack.
Hokkaido Wolfs are used to existed in Japan but were exticted by a wolf eliminating campaign at the beginning of 19th century.
This caused increasing the amount of stags and forestry pigs with no control in several localities.
Because they are usually used to eat rices and chesnuts of farmers.
After a successful trial, wolf robots will be bring into mass-production next month.
The robots can efficiently work within an about-one-kilometer radius, more efficiently than electrical barriers, Japanese specialist Chihiko Umezawa said.
A couple of days ago, I corrected an entry.
A native English speaker corrected some of them the same as me, and then, he said "thank you." 
I can't recall the exact sentence, but it's like the following.
I've never used "the present perfect clause" with "when" when I refer to the future.
I started to wonder whether the present perfect tense work well with all the conjunctions, when, after, before, and until when you refer to the future.
I'll help you after my children have gone out.
I'll help you when my children have gone out.
I'll help you before my children have gone out.
I'll help you until my children have gone out.
I'll help you after my children have gone out.
I'll help you before my children have gone out.
I'll help you until my children have gone out.
After they finish some trainings to teach children English, they set each school.
We have to support the new teacher who sets in our area.
Who told him such a thing!!!
And I majored in English...
I had studied abroad before...
I have started learn Engish conversation lessond since last October...
I have forgot a lot of English words because I have not used it for a long time!!!!
BUT I have just decided to think positive.
Why,yes!
What had I studied abroad for??
What have I learned English for??
How do we decide seating arrangement?"
"Well, Mari sits in the middle of this row, as today is her day, right?"
"Then, Ken, take a seat to Mari's right."
"And, Kana, sit that row, facing Mari's row, in front of her."
"And you, Saori is diagonally left in front Mari."
There are two rows of 3 seats facing each other across the table.
"Then, Ken, take a seat to Mari's right."
How hard it is?
I'm worried about studying abroad from September because of such my character...
Robots also can help seniors who live alone feel less isolated by being companions for them.
When I talk with people who only try to sticks to rule, I would like to tell them that I want to talk about the way how to solve the problem we are facing to now.
I think that rule exists in order to protect people.
I know we should follow rules, but if the rules only restrict our action, I think that these are just useless.
When I talk with people who only try to sticks to rule, I would like to tell them that I want to talk about the way how to solve the problem we are facing to now.
I have started to running like 3 months ago.
At the start, was so hard for us because the body wasn't prepaired yet.
I ran like 500 meters and I felt very tired, with no air in the lungs and my legs pain.
Now, we run around 5 kilometer per day, we're used to run every other day.
In my case, the running helped me a lot.
Before start to running I got tired really fast doing anything.
Now I'm feeling better, I felt the difference, I felt the advantages related to the sport practice.
However, In the 19th century of Japan, katakana weren't used as much as nowadays.
Therefore, they expressed the name of foreign countries by kanji characters back then.
There's a lot of pollen in the air today my nose feels itchy
The question about Tolstoy and Dostoevsky party is a way to determine which life view is more closer for you.
Also if you want to know more about somebody it is a good way to ask this question.
These two giant Russian classic writers have such polararizing life view.
That's why they are always opposited to each others.
He didn't explore the depths of the soul of his characters as Dostoevsky, but he focused on the finding of the life meaning, faith and ethic.
Tolstoy was interested in the question about God and he thought that a particle of God is in everyman.
However, Dostoevsky is a great psychologist and he focused on the edges of human nature.
Dostoevsky, also as Tolstoy, was interested in the finding of God.
His characters discovered God through the suffering, being on the edge of a nervous breakdown, hysteria or madness.
I think that I'm Tolstoy party, because I find him more hearted and humane.
Are You Tolstoy or Dostoevsky Party?
The question about Tolstoy and Dostoevsky party is a way to determine which life view is more closer for you.
Also if you want to know more about somebody it is a good way to ask this question.
These two giant Russian classic writers have such polararizing life view.
That's why they are always opposited to each others.
Tolstoy is a brilliant master of the everyday life.
He didn't explore the depths of the soul of his characters as Dostoevsky, but he focused on the finding of the life meaning, faith and ethic.
Tolstoy was interested in the question about God and he thought that a particle of God is in everyman.
Dostoevsky, also as Tolstoy, was interested in the finding of God.
I think that I'm Tolstoy party, because I find him more hearted and humane.
Also, during 7 days including each Equinox Day, Japanese people a visit to a grave.
Many other curiosities are also linked to his experience in Los Alamos.
He loved to break into military safes, where the plans of the atomic bomb were contained, only to show that the security measures taken were far from adequate to protect the bomb from the wrong hands.
Even the military censorship, which for security reasons screened the correspondence of every individual in the base, had its hands full dealing with Feynman.
At 5:30 am on July 16, 1945, the Trinity test was held.
It seems difficult to believe that Feynman was discarded by the US Army because he was considered "psychically deficient" and that, at the same time, at the age of only 25, he contributed to one of the most demanding military projects of all time, "harnessing" nuclear energy.
On the other hand, it is also strange to think that he risked not being admitted to a doctorate in Princeton because of his votes were anything but excellent in English literature and general culture.
It seems difficult to believe that Feynman was discarded by the US Army because he was considered "psychically deficient" and that, at the same time, at the age of only 25, he contributed to one of the most demanding military projects of all time, "harnessing" nuclear energy.
He loved to break into military safes, where the plans of the atomic bomb were contained, only to show that the security measures taken were far from adequate to protect the bomb from the wrong hands.
Then, after about a minute and a half, you suddenly hear a tremendous roar like a thunder."
She says that she was hardly able to speak English when she met her husband at Harajuku.
One is a familiar piece "Peter and the Wolf".
I am always fascinated by the music composed of the right rhythm, melody, and harmony, with the right tones!
The record was with a picture book and he liked the story.
He claimed to play this piece when he was in the university orchestra, but his request was rejected.
Prokofiev is popular also in America, partly because he left Russia, and after around two-month stay in Japan, defected to America.
A player is really excited, saying his several decade-long dream came true.
The narrator at our concert is supposed to be performed by an ordinary person, who won this important role at the fund-raising auction for the orchestra operation.
Those natures, I believe, are essential for an artist.
And it's also good for me loving his music..., and sharing those natures!
Is there anyone who have ever tried invisalign after becoming adult?
I doubt on if it works because it looks just a normal mouthpiece.
The reasons why I am considering it is people in US think much of a row of teeth.
Because Japanese people pay little attention to it I have left it as it is until now...
"AND YOU WILL STAY HERE UNTIL I COME BACK" he said right before pushing me onto my bed with his left palm, turning around, walking and violently closing the door behind.
I still heard the door-slamming echo through my room a few minutes later, even after he had left the house.
My body was trembling, and tears dropping out of my eyes as I felt a cold shiver traveling along my spine and heard the rain splatter behind me, on the window.
Shortly after, I heard a door open, and my father's cursing fading in as he shut it close.
Brutally honest.
Unremedied fatigue in spite of enough sleep, stiff shoulders and back due to taking the same posture for long hours, I always realize my aging.
It always comes with pain, hurt somewhere.
Or qualification exam.
These are all simple.
We often use the phrase when we recommend someone to do something, but we are not sure they will be happy to do so.
How cold and windy it is, I never feel cold on the part where the down jacket covers.
I sometimes enjoy to drink alcohol.
Actually, I'm not competent person so I need making an effort.
There is diligent person in my class is my opponent.
I want to get the high score TOEIC point in my class.
There is diligent person in my class is my opponent.
The result was bad because the it score was decreased.
I was too shocked by them.
I usually not enough time to answer on test.
The listening was relatively easier than reading therefore I was studying the reading part thoroughly this week.
I thought should I change how to study?
I'm always thinking of study method.
I want to create more efficient for improve dramatically.
I can't satisfied with my score spot far.
I just need more than 900 score satisfaction for applying for job.
It will take seven years tomorrow since the devastating earthquake hit Japan.
First, I express my sympathy for the victims and their family.
Fortunately, all of my family weren't damaged and they are fine now.
They can't predict exactly when it occurs, but they say it definitely occurs.
I often keep eary hours, then read the newspaper issued that morning slowly.
However, because I had stay up late last night, it was no time to read it on this morning.
There were a lot of things, so I decided to go not by air but by ship.
I often keep eary hours, then read the newspaper issued that morning slowly.
However, because I had stay up late last night, it was no time to read it on this morning.
Japanese people tend to change their attitudes or what they say for those who they talk with, so you need to know their society status.
There were a lot of things, so I decided to go not by air but by ship.
Higashine city in Japan where I live is famous for production of cherries.
My city welcome a lot of tourists from not only outside the prefecture but also all over the country during that season.
You can pick cherries from a tree and eat immediately there.
When we own it, we can't understand completely.
However when we are able to understand,
Yesterday, I drunk with friends of mine at Shinjuku.
Foods and drinks were a bit expensive, but I think it was a good bar overall.
They would like to see Shangshan, the giantpanda baby in Ueno-zoo.
Until last month viewers have to apply for lottery, but now anyone can see him in order of arrival.
Former ocarina member in a unique university for elderly people in Nagoya sometimes sends me his mail.
He is 81 years old and still good in shape.
Could anyone tell me the differences in nuance among the words slaver, slobber, drool, dribble, drivel and salivate, in the meaning of secreting saliva, if any.
I always listened to client's story carefully and I thought about what they want and what they need.
I explained it in an easy-to-understand manner according to the customer's level, and always kept in mind a careful customer service.
I would like to work as housekeeping at the Sakura hotel, taking advantage of the experience of communication skills and customer service in call centre and travel industry.
I would like to work as housekeeping at the Sakura hotel, taking advantage of the experience of communication skills and customer service in call centre and travel industry.
These words are encouraging for me and stimulate me to a better work.
Last week I wanted to turn on the air conditioner but couldn't find the remote control.
And I remember that it seems that there is smart remote control function in my phone, and I never used it.
So I try to conect to the air conditioner with my phone, and it really worked.
Maybe in near future, we can use our phones to control every home appliance.
You make up those sentences by yourself or you're using some,online translator?
what's weather like in your city
it's sunny here, like the summer has already came
It's beautiful sentence.
it can be used to encourage someone who gets caught up in an adversity.
it's kind of rule here that sentences like that are being shared in this group every day?
Maybe it is not enough to sleep last night.
Maybe it's based on tiredness.
That's why, I want to playing tennis next Sunday.
She did cosmetic surgery again and again, so I didn't understand who she is.
I remember that we were talking about anything, but I couldn't understand what she said.
I thought that she complained why I couldn't understand what she said.
She still gets angry with me even though it occurs in very old time.
What a stupid woman, she is!
Entering his cottage, he shouted, "Prepare a feast tonight!" We will be rich forever!
All we have to do is to make three wishes!" 
She imagined thousands of plans in her mind.
But realizing the importance, she thought they should sleep on it.
drinking wine."
The Greatst Showman
It is the biology movie based on the life of P.
TBarnam.
He started the base of show business, such as circus and live tour.
It was filled with songs and dances, because it created by famous broadway' staffs.
I was satisfied at the first time.
However It' so amazing that I will watch it again next Sunday.
He was angry that even though he had made wishes for years none of them had come true.
One day, while he was speaking ill of gods for his unfortunate life, Jupiter, the king of them, appeared before him.
It would be difficult to picture the terror of the poor man.
And he said that he would give up his dream if the god didn't use thunderbolt.
I am not mean to hurt you.
I will promise you to realize whatever you wish, up to three.
fortune depends on them, so think carefully before you make wishes."
The god left to the heaven.
He became increasingly angry and almost wished she was dead.
Instead, he said, "A curse on all sausages.
This wish was heard at once in the heaven and the sausage was hung down.
She used to be beautiful but this ornament was not pleasing.
Hung down over her face, it interfered whenever she talked.
This was such an advantage for him that he did not regret making the wish.
But then he thought about his queen and unhappiness of her.
She must be seated on the throne with a link of sausage over her face.
She would fail to get gold and diamonds she had dreamed of, but she would be herself again.
He made his final wish to return his wife to the original state.
When the winter ends and the spring comes closer, three days out of a week would be a cold day and the other four days would be a warm day.
In the season, the temperature difference is larger, so we need to be careful not to catch a cold.
It must be the day out of the three.
I hope that the spring comes soon.
I arrived at my first stay safely!
I will help brewing from tomorrow.
I will be in charge of cooking at my place of residence.
I'd like to make a Kisimen brought with souvenirs for the time being.
I will introduce myself at the winery tomorrow and practice.
My heart throbs.
Nice to meet everyone.
I came from the place called Nagano prefecture in Japan.
I experienced wine making five times in Japan.
I am very much looking forward to it.
Today when I was walking, I saw a thing.
A man was picturing with chalks on the ground.
He was drawing a famous chinese singer, but at first I didn't get it what he was drawing.
Beside him sat a girl who is eating fries.
They both wear sloppy clothes.
In front of them has a plastic box, in which are money that people threw in.
I didn't konw was it a beg, but I always like seeing how people attentively work on their art.
I threw in the box two yuans.
I threw in the box two yuans.
Hey, I've just finished "Doki-doki Literature club" if you know what it is.
But there is a girl in the game window who are sitting on the desk and watching to me.
And she talk about interesting things but she's not going to stop.
And you have no other chose but quit the game.
So should I quit now or read her replicas for the eternity?
I didn't go outside today, because it was cold and strong wind.
I wanted to actually go outside.
I always cook, therefore my father cooked the dinner today.
He went to shopping and he bought a favorite things.
I was saved.
It was rainy and cold all day yesterday even though it was sunny and hot today.
I don't want to as cold as yesterday tomorrow.
It was rainy and cold all day yesterday even though it was sunny and hot today.
I don't want to as cold as yesterday tomorrow.
Stay up late every day. 
I'm thinking I have to go to bed earlier but I have a lot of things I want to do during night.
I'm doing the washing and studing at night every day.
I know I'm spending much time to write these short sentenses but it's difficult for me to make sentenses quickly.
Ehrlich hat meine Currywurst sehr gut geschmeckt, aber es wurde zwischen den Aromen von beiden Vietnam und Deutschland gemischt.
My life in the UK: How to speak Japanese very well. 
I'm not professional Japanese teacher for foreigners, but I will give you some kind of tips through my life experience.
Tip-1; To find a better role model who has a good communication skill.
Tip-2; You should spend hanging abound with people who are more motivated.
Tip-3; To learn and use it and enjoy it.
"You are the average of the 5 people you spend the most time with.
" I like this quote because it works everything in life you are having or trying to achieve something.
If you are spend people who are motivated or very good at something, you will became more motivated and they will naturally pull you up to their level.
I just came back from a party which is hold by our costomers and is not free.
And it was extremely boring.
There is no pretty girl, I have to listen to 30-year-old complaining about their lives.
And don't get me start with the food.
It's like the resturant tortured me and charge me 50 dollars.
Forturately, beer there is delious.
Last night, I prepared for a loaf of bread for breakfast using a bakery machine.
I have never failed to bake breads since I started baking them for the past few months.
I found a dough which was way too much, so I took it out and I put proper amount of ingredients into the machine.
Impressions of Kariyushi notebook
Kariyushi notebook which ordered at Amazon arrived today.
Picture of this cover is sagaribana which is in bloom at subtropical zone.
This is very beautiful.
It's easy to write my plan, because it's simple and its space is large.
It repose on information of monorails, buses,hospitals, police offices, events, sightseeing facilities in Okinawa and so on.
I want to use it in Okinawa early becauseI think that it will be convenient when I go to Okinawa.
- Grim Reaper comes.
- Plagued with this fear and paralysed.
- Rejoice cause no one cares for you.
- Countdown is at an end 
- Plagued with this fear and paralysed.
- Rejoice cause no one cares for you.
Now their injected death 
Each family has a lot of traditions, but the most common is having a dinner or a lunch together becomes less popular.
More than that, there are a lot of opportunities to eat out, and people actually prefer fast food or go to the restaurant instead of preparing their own meal.
Firstly, people nowadays have a lot of things to do, have often business trips and other cases.
The whole pace of life has increased dramatically and people have to be mobile, they should not have an addiction to home.
Secondly, there is a myriad of opportunities to eat out like bars, restaurants, cafes fast food restaurants and other venues.
I think it happens because of two main reasons: the pace of life and a lot of options to it out.
I am inclined to believe that this does not have any bad consequences because even family members spend less time together, they are still a family and have others connections among themselves.
As think about this, I am very happy today!
Is there a red book about her laptop?
There are many butterfly about new garden.
There was too much trash about this street yesterday.
We're going to aboard the bus to city at 5:00 a.m.
It was always about special personality Naruto that I always loved.
There were many trees above all mountains.
This test is it above your result?
According to our records, you have the better results of this year.
If you're going to study over there you have to be according to its norms.
If you're going to travel to Japan, you have to abide by its norm for don't bother anybody with loud noises on train.
She act on like victim with her boss.
This event will act out in September.
You have to act on more water.
It is adding up more victims to the list of deceased.
He is added up to boss.
My grandma is a lovely lady, she has short curly hair.
The language she speaks is Taiwanese which is common spoken by Taiwanese, she can only understand a bit Chinese.
She's a good cook, she can make lots of Taiwan dishes like soy fish and raddish pork soup.
I do enjoy her dishes, however, her legs become worse now, so she rarely cook.
I grew up in grandma's home untill kindergarten.
I remember when I was little, I was always happy to go to grandma's home, untill now I still go to visit her often, we are still close.
It seems to be quite difficult and complicated to me to understand the overall meaning of the passage.
I can search Google for the meaning of " survival of the fittest " but "part twisted take on humanity's origins " I don't know what exactly this phrase means, and " take on" in the above phrase was used as an adjective or a phrase verb???
I had a party with this people all the night.
I ate entire kind of sushi in this restaurant.
I restore the car whole.
On the 4th of May I took part in a very special sports event.
This year 333 Polish cities and a few foreign ones organised this event.
For the first time in the history it was organised in my city.
There was a distance of 1963 metres and 10 km to choose.
In the beginng, I hadn't been positive about my participation in the run but I signed up for the shorter distance after all.
The event took place in a park where a famous health resort used to function.
In the competition office I collected my start number and a white cotton t-shirt with a face of a soldier printed on it.
The thermometer showed -4 Celcius, so I put on my t-shirt onto my sports blouse.
After a short speech, a group of about 20 runners shot off from the starting line a few minutes after 12.00.
It was a very interesting route for me.
I was running quite fast for the first kilometer, then I slowed down significantly as I wasn't in a good shape after the winter.
For the first time in my life during an organised run I stopped running and started to march.
There was no electronic time measurement or a list of places, so the pace didn't really matter.
After I broke through the hill I walked a bit, too but I noticed that the finishing line was close, so I continued running although I felt already worn out.
As I got to the finishing line I got a beautiful, large medal and a bag with some reading material.
I had to sit down as my lungs hurt badly after the run and I had a cough.
After the race, I drank a hot tea, ate pea soup with lost of smoked meat and potatoes, and I tucked in a piece of cake.
In my opinion it was worth running this race.
I enjoyed the run and I had a nice Sunday.
I wish I could be more naturedly to it, but I just can't help, it drives me crazy.
The Red One seems to be rapist: he's intrusive, forceful, strong, powerful and self-confident.
This is going to be boring, but do you have a choice, the poor one?
I was to weak, to feeble to argue.
If only my company she was, not these two morons...
He shouted at me like he was my master or parent, he blamed me for all the bad things I've made and haven't made yet.
Ooh, that was surely terrible, I thought I'd die.
My hands still shake like I had a nightmare, but that was much more than a nightmare.
Lindsey came, Lindsey cried, Lindsey tried to encourage me, but that was vain.
Maybe it was when in university because it's totally
different study in a school or in another place than in the public university.
In my situation it was very difficult because in the class
was teaching a lot of information but we did not learn all the information
because we had little time to learn and also we have pressure of if you lost three many times a one class your student enrollment was closed but finally we win all the courses with energy and effort.
Free time has decreased since I got married.
And it has decreased more dramatically since children were born.
I can't have enough time to read books or study.
How is the outlook of planting this year?
Has your planting area been increasing more than last season?
Has the quantity of exporting to Japan been increasing?
This is the very first time for us to meet with agribusiness company.
#03 Wrong Estimation About Me?
Now, I write a lot of poems, not a piece of novel.
Am I wrong estimated myself?
Hmmmm,maybe I am wrong.
Coincidentally, I went to a party in the same dress as my best friend.
In Europe, individuals pay a personal income tax and enterprises are liable to a company income tax.
When you are a businessman, you must report your income to the Inland Revenue.
I forgot about making a declaration so I get a fine.
The majority of my clothes comes from my older sister.
Most my friends are in a relationship.
In my field, you should have an analytical ability.
I revised only one topic before an exam but I passed it.
Your career boots me to develop myself.
Although I learned the same way as you, I fail this exam.
My accountant said that I have so high income that I am not able to avoid taxes.
A high tax burden exists in whole Europe.
When you cheat me, this will bring about the end of our relationship.
Do you happen to know about Pancake day in February?My friend told me that English people eat Pancake in that day.
But recently, some people give up something they pick up.
I found lots of ingredients of it at a grocery store and made it.
It was thin like crape.
What is your favorite sweets in your own country?
Recently, I've been in Netflix.
I like movies, especially action movie.
The main character is ex-marine fighter and good at sniping with rifle.
Recently, I've been in Netflix.
It's pretty difficult to change the first impression that'a bad.
I turned 22 and live in Tokyo.
There are also a lot of good restaurants from different countries, and good sights for cherry blossoms.
Because it's the capital city, you can enjoy shopping.
What's more, the public translation is efficient so that it's always on time.
Well, I'm currently working at a dry cleaner.
In my free time, I like cycling, shopping, serfing Net, watching anime abd thing like that.
I have two brothers.
Now they both moved out but I live in my parents house.
While riding along the riverside or I feel kind of freedom.
Oh, I talked too much.
Now, tell me yourself.
There are also a lot of good restaurants from different countries, and good sights for cherry blossoms.
Because it's the capital city, you can enjoy shopping.
What's more, the public translation is efficient so that it's always on time.
They have lovely faces and the way they act is so cute.
Oh, yeah, my sport-type bike can go fast, so I like the wind when I go down a slope.
I guess it's a good way to help refresh your mind.
I need to break the bad habit of "drinking while doing something else."
A favorite pastime of mine is browse Wikipedia articles while drinking before bed.
I have been suffering from runny nose because of hay fever.
I'm going to take a TOEIC tomorrow.
My two year daughter has been a high fever since last night.
She has also been a runny nose and sore throat.
Her face is slight red with fever.
I hope I won't have a fever tomorrow because I'm going to take a TOEIC tomorrow!
I am going to practice English through here again!
I heard funny phrases about greediness.
"So, if you fly anywhere one time in the year you don't need five airplanes." "The walth it is when "Metallica" plays at your birthday party." 
And anothre not about money: "The doctors fighted for men's life long time, nevertheless he survived on." 
I heard funny phrases about greediness.
"So, if you fly anywhere one time in the year you don't need five airplanes." "The walth it is when "Metallica" plays at your birthday party." 
And anothre not about money: "The doctors fighted for men's life long time, nevertheless he survived on." 
I went DAISO.
DAISO's products are cheap and variety.
Because a soap bar is unsanitary because of used all familly.
She use a soap bar to now from when she was born.
So she is accustomed to use a soap bar.
My youngest son is going to graduate his junior high school next week.
He brought to home some works that he made at school.
He brought to home some works that he made at school.
In addition, he received the perfect attendance award.
They lived in a gloomy castle, she didn't get along with her mother-in-law, so she visited her brother as soon as she could.
They had a daughter, Jeanne of Albret whom was the last queen of Navarre and also the mother of the futur king of France, Henry the forth.
There were several dessrets using strawberries that were on sale for a limited time.
If I had room for dessert in my stomach,I would have eaten it.
Fourteenth of May is "White Day".
on the day.
I know many men form long lines at the entrance of cake shops.
I'll also go buy nice chocolates on the day for my wife and daughter.
Japanese White Day.
I know many men form long lines at the entrance of cake shops.
I'll also go buy nice chocolates on the day for my wife and daughter.
I feel so glad to be here for this interview and introduce myself.
I was born in February 1996 and 22 years old this year.
I am a native of SiChuan Province, my hometown is YingShan, a beautiful county in NanChong.
I have graduated from the SouthWest University in ChongQing last year, and My undergraduate major is computer science and technology.
After my graduation,I began to work in ChongQing CISDI Engineering Corporation as C++ programer, so I have some practical project experience.
I apply for computer academical master, not only because I have great interest in computer science, but also for the reason that I want to make some achievements in my 
So I taking the national entrance examination for postgraduate.
Besides study, I like playing pingpong and basketball in daily life.
and I like watch movies about the Second World War.
I don't think I am a talented person, But I am conscientious and diligent, and I am good at study independently, I can also collaborate well and harmoniously get along with my classmates.
and I can expertly program with C++,as for other program language,like java,php,python.
I can write softwares with Qt library, and I have beening learning some knowledges about machine learning but what I had learned is still superficial.
So I hope I can pass the re examination, then study these knowledge further and make some achievements.
When I face with a adversity, I get feared at it.
It might be an obstacle that I can't overcome, but it might be a trivial one.
I usually feel fear about everything I have not experienced before.
Yes, I'm chicken.
If I could conquer this personality.
On the other hand, some people like challenging.
They seem to really enjoy their life.
I have no idea how I can become such people.
It's difficult for me to use those properly.
When watching an American TV show, I found the following line:
The scene goes like this:
The main character finds that his daughter has posted the videos of her private life on her blog.
Would the other words be strange?
When watching an American TV show, I found the following line:
The main character finds that his daughter has posted the videos of her private life on her blog.
I finally passed an admission at university where I studied mathematics for 3 years.
I am addicted to the American drama "Big Bang Theory".
My colleague recommended it to me one month ago when I asked her what american drama was the best to learn fresh English.
This drama describes 4 funny scientists's dairy life.
Especially "Sheldon Cooper" is amazing person and I love him.
Also, I feel much closer them because I am an engineer.
Besides, this drama gives me the energy to go on my engineer life.
Next winter I want a cool trench coat, whose color is khaki.
Even though it is expense, I want it.
Today in my mail post there was a notice that a sewer construction would be held near my apartment.
After she graduated her university, she joined an ICT company thinking that a telecommunication company was better fit for someone like her who was interested in connecting people each other and making the world united.
This was because the company has a great capacity to build information network such as VPN and leased line across countries.
And I did my tax returns at tax office today.
A few days ago, I bought a new PC on an online auction, and it delivered to my home yesterday.
The PC has a description.
It always read a description whenever things I buy so that I can avoid getting defective things.
I push a button to switch on over and over again, but it.
I was about to become angry, but I'm always 30, so my age should control an emotion.
I contacted the owner of PC and said "Can I return this PC and I'd like to have a cash refund if possible, I think there is a problemwith this, I can't turn this on." then, the owner said " I'm sorry to say that you can not return, I wrote the description online that I don't accept any returns." I said back with a little anger that " You didn't mention that something wrong with this, you should've made sure to chack if it's ok to use before it was made the bid.
He gave me an apology and said " I'm ok with the cash refund." I said " Why didn't you say that earlier?, you just thought about yourself to get money aren't you?." He was obviously an asshole, but I forgave him.
I got a news that oldest message in a bottle found on remote Australian beach.
It's a funtastic story.
Every life has a different feel and they have a different approach to the way they make you happy.
For example, they're certain lives that focus on spiritual much more than material.
You're got to really figure out based on your own wants.
which one is the best fit for you, not just "which one looks like the rich".
Because sometimes, when you force yourself to buy a lot of luxury good, and you can't pay for them. they are not going to make you happy as much as you hoped they would.
So just keep that in mind when it comes to choose your life.
Although we temporarily had much rain last night, it changed to rain slightly this morning.
Then the rain stopped around ten am.
The Japanese hydrangea has its new small buds and started to break out.
They are willing to wake and start their activity.
They eagerly look forward to spring as same as we wait.
Although we temporarily had much rain last night, it changed to rain slightly this morning.
I said we should sell ramen because it was popular, but one of my classmates opposed to it because it costed too much.
On the other hand, group work sometimes do you harm.
When I was a high school student, I prepared for a school festival with my classmates.
Group work generally takes a lot of time.
I think if you want to make the most of group work, you have to think carefully about whether your situation is suitable for it.
I said we should sell ramen because it was popular, but one of my classmates opposed to it because it costed too much.
My classmates and I discussed the food we should sell, and we spent too much time on it to offer a great service.
I have more than ## years of professional experience in the ## field and five years of experience working in ####.
I responded to each maintenance issue and if necessary sent a technician or subcontractor.
I have strong knowledge of the general functioning of the ####### through these experiences and also through my private life as my partner worked for the ##### and I was involved with few of lobbying association & think tank.
When I was a freelancer and during my time at the #####, I developed strong knowledge about ### data privacy laws and cybersecurity.
Selling, developing and implementing software for my customers as freelancer, I gained expertise in identifying the need of customers and training staff at how to use the developed software and use the general IT tools and how to practice physical security and security awareness.
Additionally my experience handling sensitive information has given me an appropriate sense of discretion.
I am a perfectionist by nature and I have developed a strength in customer service and customer relations.
Combining two activities as an employee and entrepreneur gave me an ability to multitask, quickly adapt myself to new challenges.
I have family living in ###### in consequence moving to ##### will not be a problem, on the contrary.
At those years, most of TV quiz shows were about asking and answering questions.
The more right answers contestants got the more money they won.
At the end of this game, everybody, regardless of whether they were contesters, the audience or presenters, ended up stained with whichever had been used for the occasion.
Every Friday evening, people gathered in front of their TV sets willing to see the TV programme they loved the most.
The secret of this quiz show was that, unlikely to what happens nowadays, in this TV programme presenters did not laugh at contesters but with them.
If so, they returned home empty-handed.
The competitors who were able to win several programmes became recognised by the people in the streets, the unknown artists performing in the quiz show became famous and the presenters, who were already well-known, became celebrities.
This quiz show is the perfect example of how a TV programme can become the most watched without any need to resort to make fun of politicians, people from other countries and gays.
The more right answers contestants got the more money they won.
At the end of this game, everybody, regardless of whether they were contesters, the audience or presenters, ended up stained with whichever had been used for the occasion.
The winners took part in the last round in which they could win either one million pesetas or a car or an apartment by the sea or a huge pumpkin.
If so, they returned home empty-handed.
Every Friday evening, people gathered in front of their TV sets willing to see the TV programme they loved the most.
The competitors who were able to win several programmes became recognised by the people in the streets, the unknown artists performing in the quiz show became famous and the presenters, who were already well-known, became celebrities.
The secret of this quiz show was that, unlikely to what happens nowadays, in this TV programme presenters did not laugh at contesters but with them.
This quiz show is the perfect example of how a TV programme can become the most watched without any need to resort to make fun of politicians, people from other countries and gays.
It could be seen by children and adults alike.
Although this quiz show is no longer on the air, I highly recommend you look for it on the internet.
Back in the 1970s, not only were there only two channels in Spain but they could not be seen throughout the day.
It goes without saying TV sets were still in black and white.
The more right answers contestants got the more money they won.
Instead of only asking questions to the competitors, he also started testing their abilities and skilfulness in a funny way.
The competitors who were able to win several programmes became recognised by the people in the streets, the unknown artists performing in the quiz show became famous and the presenters, who were already well-known, became celebrities.
Women's Day is a memorial day which to celebrate the women's rights movement for gender equality.
But in China today, it has been change to "Queens' Day" or "Goddesses' Day".
have been advocating women consumers to buy their goods.
So in that day, almost everyone's phone will be bombarded by their annoying adverts message.
What Does a tv serie need to impress me in someway?
Something that makes you think about a thing or an idea which it can impress you.
It can be something basis on real facts or maybe just an adventure story, an action one and so on.
Besides a great story,when it shot,need to have the appropriate rhythm.
The story needs to be told changing gears up and down in some points of it.
A the beginning of the footage, they use to hit you with some amazing thing, some incredible situation or action that it blows your head, ir order to try to engage you with them.
But most of the times, after a few episodes the level in the story decrease and you lost interest about it.
If I have to think about tv series that astonished me in the past and they could keep the rhythm during all episodes I would say Breaking Bad, Lost, Oz, Six feet under and the better ones to me The wire and The Sopranos.
What Does a tv serie need to impress me in someway?
It can be something basis on real facts or maybe just an adventure story, an action one and so on.
The story needs to be told changing gears up and down in some points of it.
A the beginning of the footage, they use to hit you with some amazing thing, some incredible situation or action that it blows your head, ir order to try to engage you with them.
If I have to think about tv series that astonished me in the past and they could keep the rhythm during all episodes I would say Breaking Bad, Lost, Oz, Six feet under and the better ones to me The wire and The Sopranos.
He's not proposing a complete ban of prostitution.
He's not proposing a complete ban of prostitution.
He's not proposing a complete ban of prostitution.
"Have you checked the e-mail that I sent you yesterday, yet?"
"Your e-mail, yesterday?"
Oh, I overlooked e-mail from you.
Many apologies."
"Have you checked the e-mail that I sent you yesterday, yet?"
Oh, I overlooked e-mail from you.
"Let's see.
-Last year I finished the secondary school at Pio IX.
Are those phrases right?
Huge discount on chocolates sparked riot in France.
Discount on famous chocolates caused people to storm into the stores and scuffled to get the products.
It was quite unusual for French to behave badly.
I always get surprised at some people's enthusiastic to certain products.
They do not hesitate to wait in long queues to buy Apple's new iPhon.
Life in the 21st century is better compared to the previous century. To what extant do you agree or disagree?
Some people may argue that modern life is better than it was couple decades ago, while others think that life has changed dramatically but in a bad way.
I am inclined to believe that modern life is simpler and easier than it was a century ago because we cannot imagine our lives without goods of humankind which we use every day.
More than that, the way of understanding that life was better can be just a psychological feature.
Firstly, modern life has introduced a myriad of advances in technologies like the internet, smart gadgets.
With the internet people can spend less time on everyday activities like the getting movie tickets, paying bills and so on.
Moreover, through the Interner users can communicate, work or search for information very fast.
For instance, students can learn very fast and from home in order to not spend time on a road.
Gadgets or domestic appliances make our lives easier too because people should not wash clothes or dishes by hands.
Actually, there are many innovations in the medicine.
People can get the very high level of healthcare because technologies allow conducting very difficult operations.
In response, scientists have proved that people tend to think in this way, and subsequently, future generations will think that our century was better than their.
Well, maybe it happens because of global problems which affect all population and people have to be aware of them.
However, a century ago they were puzzled by only their concerns.
Whereas people argue that early life was saturated with big and very important discoveries, I can say that nowadays we still can see many leaps forward like ways to treat cancer or even space flights.
To sum up, despite people thinking that life was better a century ago, others cannot agree with it this opinion for a number of reasons.
I believe that de facto life is really better than it was a couple decades ago because our century combines all achievements of the past and people will further improve these things.
I was practicing everyday in a car.
It takes twenty minutes by car to my work place.
I was pretty busy in this period.
I feel a short of practice but I will do my best.
The contestans are three and one participates from our club.
His speech has a strong impact and he has experiences.
I will go to the speech contest tomorrow by train.
I was practicing everyday in a car.
It takes twenty minutes by car to my work place.
I was pretty busy in this period.
The contestans are three and one participates from our club.
Against him, I am beginner.
I am looking forward to attend the contest in Tokyo.
Don't you feel strange why the paper no one correct it after I post it in this website?
This song is my recent favorite one!
However, somehow I feel much better of this warming song.
This song is my recent favorite one!
However, somehow I feel much better of this warming song.
These days I am feeing down because of a new coworker.
At the counter I was in line and thinking about what to order looking at a showcase.
Then suddenly a middle-aged man stood just behind a customer who was at the counter, a different angle from me.
The staff took order from him, not me.
I could not believe it because the staff should have known that I was in line.
I got very mad at her, I was so furious inside.
Probably someone might hear my crying voice, but I could not stop crying.
After crying for a few minutes, I got out the women's room and got in the train.
How should I do to keep calm when I get irritated or furious about such things?
Am I being in the depression?
The alarm of your car went off at 3 a.m. because of the snow.
The kid said that he didn't like LA just because Kardashian live there.
The kid said that he didn't like LA just because the Kardashian live there.
These concubines were the woman who only gives birth to his child "successor" who becomes the next general.
When that child became a general, the woman could grasp authority and power in the Ooku as the general's mother.
Women hold a battle full of jealousy for getting that position.
It's take one and half hour from Tokyo to Fukushima.
I'm now studying English by using my Mac.
But its battery will run down.
However I knew his twitter account coincidentally last year and I promised to follow him on twitter.
After following him, some messages delivered to my google account and I knew all his tweets.
After weeks, I read his message and replied as follows.
I love sunshine!What does dynamesh mean?
It's getting warmer and warmer day by day in Japan, and sakura season is just around the corner!
I expect many tourists to come to Japan in this season.
I expect many tourists to come to Japan in this season.
I have come back to school for a week.
My mental will be less stress than the last fall semester.
My social account is still close which I mentioned in last entry.
Calling to the insurance home.
A couple of days ago, in the morning whereas I was making coffee in the kitchen, I saw a wall wich one had four tiles about to fell down.
I called to insurance home and reported the issue.
Yesterday the insurance home send a technician in order to see the problem.
When the technician saw the tiles said that the problem was the bulding moves and a deficient paste.
The technician concluded saying that this problem isn't covered for the insurance home and add, if the problem would have been because of the damp then the insurance home would have covered it.
If someone does one thing one hundred times, he will surely be good at it.
If he can keep doing it one thousand times, he will master it.
He can tell easily the way to do it to others and he has no hesitation to do it, if only he does review his mistake.
I think that considering our mistakes is the best way to improve our ability.
If someone does one thing one hundred times, he will surely be good at it.
If he can keep doing it one thousand times, he will master it.
I captured the following dialog sentences and put it on here.
Everybody, have a good day!
You gotta listen to your heart what does it say?
We are interesting in work with your PrintStudio.
We should to know the differents qualities and products wich you have.
Can we receive an order of differents examples of boxes or packaging?
What is the minimum order quantity of a packaging?
Thank very much.
Best Regards!
The cars set back and then started rolling across the parking lot towards the gateway.
The leaves that had been dancing like a whirlwind around the centre of the car park were now moving erratically across the floor, and the leaves that had been flying up and down above the tree tops pelted down to the ground, as if somebody had turned off the wind and turned up gravity to maximum level.
I turned around to face the staff sergeant, but he had entered the car park to go looking for the bag.
1 day,we went to Daiba in Tokyo,there my friend bought cosmetics.
That night, we went for Nagano by bus.
Fixing a flat tyre.
When I was about ten kilometers my bicycle had a flat tyre and I had to stop.
The problem was a nailed thorn in the front tyre.
So I had to fix the problem in the middle of the country.
Firtst I had to disassemble the the tyre from the rest of the bicycle.
Second I had to located the prick and cleaned the zone.
Third I had to cover the zone with a patch and stick it with some special glue.
I Waited for a while and had to assemble the tyre again, and finally I pump up the tyre.
To fix the flat tyre took me about fifteen minutes.
I drink coffee at ABC cafe.
Today's coffee is MMM beans buying at ABC cafe.
I drink coffee at ABC cafe.
Today's coffee is MMM beans buying at ABC cafe.
Although I don't know if there is an opportunity using Spanish in the future, it's fun to study a new language.
My friend often laughs in a vulgar manner.
The way of laugh is hyperpnoea syndrome.
It seems that he doesn't perceive the way of his laugh is crazy.
When he hyperventilates, I may ignore him.
I felt recently was farm.
I'm very very looking what forward spring comes.
I felt recently was farm.
However, it was vey cold today.
I'm very very looking what forward spring comes.
Schools in Japan have a spring vacation, and begin in April.
The spring vacation has about two week.
I am going to go shopping with my friends march 30.
We will play for a long time.
We change our seats in classroom once a month.
We did this morning.
I was happy to get the seat in the back of classroom.
However one of my friends got one in the front of classroom.
I want her to have the class seriously for a months there.
Could you plese correct my sentences?
Tere is old saying,an dumplings rather than flowers in Japan.
Which do you like better,rice dumpling or cheery blossom?
My young sister is 11 years old.
She learns golf to her coach every week.
But she had injured left foot in basketball day before yesterday.
There was a crack in the side of the foot.
So she lives with crutches.
I had injured the forefinger of the left hand in basketball 3months ago.
I want to be careful not to get injured from my daily life.
There was school trip a month ago.
When I came back my house, I was full of happy feelings.
But I got high fever two days ago.
So I had been absent from school for a week.
It was serious.
Last week I have forgot my rule at home, I have been shocked, but I have noticed that there has been a rule in the box of lost articl in my class.
I have used it instead of mine.
I took it by a mistake.
My favorite novel was animated in this season.
What's more my favorite voice actor was appear on this anime.
The beauty drawn landscape fascinated me.
I saw a man when I went to a ramen shop.
He wore glasses and his hair was thin.
Further, he was a little fat.
He ate ramen happily, so I was happy too.
It will be long before I become examinee.
While I have a time, I read many books.
I'm going to study for a test next fiscal year.
These days, my mother and father often fight by mouth.
So listening to it, it is not so much awed as interesting.
It is also interesting that they have reconciled while I don't know.
3rd grader graduated from high school last week.
There are university entrance exams, and some still attend school.
I have to grow as a person more.
I want to get up early on holiday.
These are the goals of the next fiscal year.
Of course it also passed the university entrance exams.
The purpose of this new law is preventing people from breathing smoke from cigarettes in public.
I attended graduation ceremony of my school.
However,I didn't graduate but see off.
I'm guilty for forgot write diary yesterday.
I supposed to share a few things, like I started to read The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes.
Well, I don't konw what to write this moment.
By the way, thanks 'laid' corrected my entry!
My brother will graduate from junior high school.
He is going to get a room in a dormitory when he is a high school student.
I am lonely because I can't really see him.
He scarcely started a conversation with others, though, I regarded him as a good guy.
He always helped the representative of our Japanese class hand out the worksheets.
The most words I've ever said to him were "Thank you!" I was stunned at his death.
The world baffles most of us, he was one of those who had enough of it and made their mind to get rid of all the sufferings in a hopeless way.
All of my classmates who happened to be in Chongqing said goodbye to his body.
I watched Nintendo Direct in today.
First few second, I was disappointed it, because I thought it's Splatoon another DLC.
However I still watch it, I realised it that was wrong.
The symbol of game suddenly appeared, so I was very excited.
I watched Nintendo Direct in today.
I thought that presentation is end, but The president said 'well actually we have one more announcement, please take a look at our last video for the day.'
First few second, I was disappointed it, because I thought it's Splatoon another DLC.
However I still watch it, I realised it that was wrong.
My mind has changed.
I'd like to introduce my favorite music band.
There are two reason I like them.
First, their songs are good lyrics.
I sympathize with those lyrics very much.
Second, their songs are fun to listen to at an up tempo.
I often listen to their songs when I want to raise the tension.
He is going to go to high school from April.
We'll move to new house because our house which we live in is so far.
We must finish during this mounth.
Once I start to read it, I can't help finishing reading it.
I feel sorry to stage my resignation from my current job as an editor for the Magazine Design & Fashion.
It was a fortune for me two months ago to get the opportunity to work here.
I had been dreaming of being an editor before I realized that what I want to dedicate in most is computer programming.
Nowadays, people increasingly attend to college or university than the older generations.
They will spend 4 years or more to gain knowledge, meet a lot of friends, to imagine the future they will have.
There are several reasons can explain why people go to college or university.
Firstly, people want to have a better job, and get a better salary.
In real life, if someone have a college degree, they will have more opportunity than people graduating from high school.
When my grandparents were teenagers, they could not have a bad job after graduating from high school.
However, today is totally different from the past.
In recent years, as the economy and technology develops, more and more companies require they employee have special abilities which only can learn in college or university.
They will have more opportunity to get a better job than other who do not have college degree.
This truth made us if we want to get a job we like, we need attend college or university to gain knowledge.
Some people did not attend college or university because several reasons of outside.
Like do not had money to paid tuition.
When this kind of people became rich or other reasons are gone, they will want to get a college degree to prove themselves.
Just like a friend of my father, he got a college degree in middle-age.
This is so hard for him, because he has a regular job in day time, which mean he only can learned in the night.
And just like a normal college student, try to do everything to pass exam.
And now he became more confident at work.
Thirdly, the most important reason I think is people are pursued their individual interest.
Especially, in science distinction, like chemistry, physical, biology and other else.
Science is very important in our life.
Take chemistry for example, chemistry is a very difficult subject in science.
But chemistry made our life become more easily.
The reason I choose chemistry as my major is because I like to synthesize new thing.
Personal interest pushes me attend university.
People attend college or university because different reasons.
Like to have a better job, get a better salary, or just want to get a degree.
The most important reason is people are pursued their individual interest.
this will promote social development in the future.
Based on the above reason, people attend college and university.
I don't join opinion poll recently.
I had the term-end exam last week.
I was returned the test this mornig.
The results is the better than my regular results.
It sounds difficult to do survey.
If there is no clearance, replace the clutch pipe with a new one and check the bulkhead harness for damage.
Where to Check
Sounds a little bit abnormal.
Would you please checkt it?
We were going to Kobe for three days starting from today for leisure, but my daughter caught a cold a few days ago, so we canceled it.
My daughter should have been looking forward to going to Anpanman museum which her most favorite animation character.
Think about my mom.
Once I didn't think my mom as a WOMAN.
I, but also family didn't care about mom as a woman.
However, it's too hard for her catching up normal daily life.
I think everything change so fast that she can't understand.
So she wants me to be a companion, every move, which I can't be for my job or other things belong to MY life.
I always feel guilty for that.
I would appreciate it if you could help me to improve my writing skills.
It is true that there is still room for improvement about robot pets, but I agree with the use of them.
Firstly, they can be useful in a medical field.
Many researchers say they can heal mentally ill children.
Secondly, they are very easy to take care of.
Elderly people or parents both of whom are working may have difficulty in caring for living pets.
Today, the number of children who are abused or mentally disabled is increasing, so robot pets can be helpful.
Elderly people or parents both of whom are working may have difficulty in caring for living pets.
For these reasons, I think using robot pets has a positive impact on our society.
Hotel serving diverse guests, so working as housekeeping is good opportunity to meet people from different countries for me.
I think that understanding other cultures to help me to lead to higher satisfaction for hotel guests.
Also, I think it is important that I will greet hotel guests with a smile and a friendly hello.
It makes guests feel like at home.
I will do my best that each guest can make a memorable stay.
This is the expression that I learned in the lessons today.
Could you rewrite the phrases?
He is famous directer in the English play industry.
The audience separated love and hate.
It won the oscar last week.
Is it organized from the technology of your view?
The rule is strict, so I do the report again.
The sequence of bomb attacks has virtually destroyed the city.
The cost of the advertisement doesn't match our revenue.
Thanks to the development of medical technics, the average of human's lifespan has been expanding.
If you want to master a language, you need to study it comprehensively at first.
When you make a contract, it's important to make sure if it includes comprehensive insurance on products.
What is this line?
A lot of women make a long line.
Maybe they are waiting the open of this store.
I read a fun article in Chinese and I'd like to translate it to English.
Socrates asked Plato to go into a wheat field and pluck the biggest, goldennest ear of wheat for him.
The only rule was that he could only pluck one and could never go back on his way, only move on.
Plato did what Socrates told him, but came back without any wheatears in his hand.
I kept on going, but found nothing bigger.
The rule was the same.
He could only chop one and could never go back on his way.
It was not too shabby, so I chopped it down unless missing every thing like last time again.
Socrates asked Plato to pluck the most beautiful flower in the field.
He could only pluck one and could never go back on his way.
I insisted to believe the flower in my hand is the most beautiful one.
The only rule was that he could only pluck one and could never go back on his way, only move on.
Plato did what Socrates told him, but came back without any wheatears in his hand.
It was not too shabby, so I chopped it down unless missing every thing like last time again.
I insisted to believe the flower in my hand is the most beautiful one.
Plato did what Socrates told him, but came back without any wheatears in his hand.
It was not too shabby, so I chopped it down unless missing every thing like last time again.
Plato did what Socrates told him, but came back without any wheatears in his hand.
I have been living in apartment after wedding.
It is calm living only me and my wife.
Now, It is easy to live without local communication and no relayshionship of neighberhood.
But I decide to think of future.
In the beginning, when the market haven't reached saturation.
Things are like the more you invest in, the more you will gain.
So at that time two brands, OFO and MOBIKE arised.
There were very cruel competition between each other, a little like Uber and Didi before.
There were so various kinds of these that everything that you can't imagine can be found there for you to think of.
I particularly loved to walk around accessories counters as long as I went to fabric market.
Unfortunately, it was hard to find out something useful there except some basic materials like beads and threads.
However, it seemed that they didn't fit into our works and they even looked like more awkward and cheaper with those buttons.
No matter these accessories that are produced by machine looked like how delicate but it's interesting that the handmade work always has a stronger visual appeal than industrial products.
That's why we rarely use those ready-made accessories into our work.
Once you try to strive for excellence and you will find out that the excellence is just composed of countless details.
Certainly, industrialization can greatly increase the productivity but it would never produce WARM products.
Whatever how precise the machines may be, they couldn't express emotions after all.
Another characteristic point in Boston is that there are seasons.
Because I am from Japan, I used to have seasons, but I had forgotten it after I lived in California for a while.
It is always sunny and nice.
Now in Boston, I already had two snow storms by just three month of living, and more than ten snow days.
Definitely I have to check with google for temperature.
I enjoy snowy view in the city and mountains in New Hampshire.
I moved in just a few days before, so there are many things that haven't settled down yet.
It seems to take a little while to adopt to a new environment.
Yesterday, I found a park just around the corner, they have many lovely birds in the pond.
I moved in just a few days before, so there are many things that haven't settled down yet.
Yesterday, I found a park just around the corner, they have many lovely birds in the pond.
It was a really good move.
I already start liking this place.
I moved in just a few days before, so there are many things that haven't settled down yet.
Language learning is like kids want to play with toys used by other children.
If you have foreign languages that you want to imitate, you will be absorbed in that new toy, and then you will change your life amuse way.
If you have foreign languages that you want to imitate, you will be absorbed in that new toy, and then you will change your life amuse way.
I believe or have confident that my English makes sense to them, but it's just my thought.
Actually, they sometimes ask me what I say or to repeat certain words.
Such times, I realize they make a lot of effort to understand my English.
Sometimes, even though I explain something in different ways, I can't make myself understand, and they say "Sorry I can't understand." 
I'm a little sad at such times, but I convince myself that the issue is too difficult to explain, so it's not because of my poor English.
You would be upset if the analysis weren't as good as you expected, but it might be good for you to listen to such analysis to realize the weak points of your English.
Since I've been reading many Japanese people's English entries on Lang-8, somehow I can find a certain tendency of people.
There are some people who have never correct others entries.
Most of them also don't try to with correctors.
Actually, they've been keeping making the same mistakes as they made several years ago.
Of course, I'm sure I make the same mistakes on and on, so I should be careful about them too.
One of them has posted more than 1,000 entries, but he's never said "thank you" to correctors.
I don't remember the exact number, but it's only less than 300.
Some kind people correct once, but he's never showed his appreciation to them, so they never come back to correct his entries.
I don't know when he could realize his own problem.
It's not easy to analyze your own English by yourself. 
Such times, I realize they make a lot of effort to understand my English.
Sometimes, even though I explain something in different ways, I can't make myself understand, and they say "Sorry I can't understand." 
Well, I really wonder if any of you want to get your English analyzed by others.
There are some people who have never correct others entries.
Most of them also don't try to communicate with correctors.
They have kept clicking star marks.
I don't know when he could realize his own problem.
It's not easy to analyze your own English by yourself. 
I also wonder how my English sounds to my friends.
I believe or have confident that my English makes sense to them, but it's just my thought.
Actually, they sometimes ask me what I say or to repeat certain words.
I'm a little sad at such times, but I convince myself that the issue is too difficult to explain, so it's not because of my poor English.
You would be upset if the analysis weren't as good as you expected, but it might be good for you to listen to such analysis to realize the weak points of your English.
Since I've been reading many Japanese people's English entries on Lang-8, somehow I can find a certain tendency of people.
Most of them also don't try to communicate with correctors.
They have kept clicking star marks.
For me, it seems that they never check their mistakes even after they have their entries corrected.
Actually, they've been keeping making the same mistakes as they made several years ago.
Of course, I'm sure I make the same mistakes on and on, so I should be careful about them too.
One of them has posted more than 1,000 entries, but he's never said "thank you" to correctors.
I don't remember the exact number, but it's only less than 300.
Some kind people correct once, but he's never showed his appreciation to them, so they never come back to correct his entries.
I don't know when he could realize his own problem.
I should be careful about myself too!!
I'm gonna head to the north part of Osaka tomorrow first time in almost six months.
My friend expected me to cook takoyaki at his home party.
To be honest, I don't feel like going there this time for some reason, but I'll be there, so, if you stay around there and have free time, let's meet up while I stay there.
My nearest station was renovated last month and there are many groceries.
Because I work overtime, I often take out some food at groceries.
My husband seems to want me to be a good cooker during maternity leave, but I will be more depending on retort or frozen foods after child is born.
He already got married and he lives in Sapporo now, also he has three kids!!
I wanted to tell this to him.
It seemed that he was happy to hear that.
Our situation has changed a lot, but I 
The e-books become more and more popular in nowadays.
There are a lot of argues about what kind of the book is the best.
Some people think that e-books are death of paper books, but others think that paper books will never dead.
I think that it's obviously that e-books became popular because of compactness.
You can take it anywhere and it doesn't take so much space in your bag.
Instead of a few books you can take only the one e-book and that is perfect.
However, I've heard that American researches revealed that the reading of e-books has a bad influence to rememebering of information because of standard fonts.
I agree with this research, because when you read print book you pay attention to book's layout design, fonts and colour of a cover.
Also the e-books are the less esthetic that paper books.
You can't expirience that tactile sence as with a paper book.
For many people the paper books are still the best gift.
I'm doubt.
The good books capable to adorn your home.
When I come to someone I always pay attention on books, because it can tell many things about the owner.
In my opinion, paper books have more advantages and I think that e-books can't cancel them.
Even if the technology will be learned to simulate the sensations as from a paper book, it will still be completely wrong.
I drink coffee or tea in every morning.
I selected a apple tea today.
The life with a dog
I've recently come to want a dog as a family member.
My friend's advise makes me hesitated to have a dog.
But I imagine how wonderful the life with a dog is.
My friend who had dogs told me that if I accept a dog to my family, I will have responsibility on it, for example, I have to take a walk for a dog every morning and evening, spend a lot of money to care and I can't leave a dog alone home because of my travel.
My friend's advise makes me hesitated to have a dog.
This TV show was aired in 90's when I was a kid.
In that time I could not watch the whole sitcom but I liked actually.
Well, I could not watch the whole show because if I am not wrong only the fourth firsts seasons were aired in Peru.
For example, I never watched that Will was about to marry, that happened in the penultimate season, the fifth.
I have read some facts about the series on the Internet and I learned out that Will Smith was a rap singer before he performed as a fictionalized version of himself as a teenager in this show.
The Fresh Prince of Bel Air.
This TV show was aired in 90's when I was a kid.
I have read some facts about the series on the Internet and I learned out that Will Smith was a rap singer before he performed as a fictionalized version of himself as a teenager in this show.
I supposed that he began to sing after finishing this sitcom.
I buy plastic umbrellas every time sudden rain, there are a lot of them at home.
Nonetheless, every time we pass in front of a umbrella store, my wife ask me "Don't you have to buy an umbrella?"
This week, I have came earlier than the usual.
One if the reasons is that there isn't any emergency cases in my office this week.
Then, I took the time at my home to cooking.
Let's start study English again.
For a while, I quit writing English in lang-8.
Because I have a free time these days, I start over study English.
By this lang-8 homepage.
I need you guys a help.
Japanese language has imported a lot of vocabulary from very early times.
Although words from Indo-European languages like Portuguese, Dutch, German and English flowed into Japanese language since around the 16th century, Chinese kanji has made the foundation of Japanese vocabulary.
I think it's very cool because it primitively denotes the pictures of the objects representing the beauty of simplicity.
There are over 2000 kanji characters and some of them were originally made in Japan.
Although I'm a middle-aged guy, I don't have got married so far, so I don't feel like getting consulted about this issue even though they want to talk something to me.
I can't and don't want to say anything about the issue which I don't have any experience before.
All I can do is listen to it.
I just realized that cheating is not the only reason to get divorced husbands and wives.
One thing is clear.
My friend hasn't gotten over from his depression of losing his wife even though he has tried to act strong.
Although I'm a middle-aged guy, I don't have got married so far, so I don't feel like getting consulted about this issue even though they want to talk something to me.
I can't and don't want to say anything about the issue which I don't have any experience before.
I just realized that cheating is not the only reason to get divorced husbands and wives.
My friend hasn't gotten over from his depression of losing his wife even though he has tried to act strong.
When I go to beauty salon, I always think what kind of hair style I should have.
In the special box for foreign travel, I came across my old passport.
Disorderly pressed stamps may ruin your good memories during your trip overseas.
The problem is that people are likely to depend on the Internet.
I have indulged in surfing the Net for many hours 
It was heavy rain from last night, but the rain has stopped now.
I get out of I haven't carry an umbrella today.
I hope stopped rain today, because I hate carry an umbrella.
"I advanced and asked him, " What was your story, bro?"
"He said," I had an astonishing story." " listen, one day I saw that a poor fisherman had caught a big fish and I liked it a lot." "I asked him to give it to me, but he refused saying that he sells it and buys food for his children." "I hit him, and took the fish out of his will and went."
"While I was walking carying the fish, she was still a bit alive that she bited my finger a strong bite."
"My hand pained that I couldn't sleep that night." " I went to the docoter the next day complaing my pain." "He said that I needed to cut my finger otherwise the pain would spread to the rest of my hand." "I did." "Then my hand was in pain again that I couldn't rest or sleep."
" I went to the doctor and he prescribed to cut my hand.
I did so." 
"After that the pain returened that I finally cut my arm."
"People asked me what was the reason of my amputed arm.
I thought then it was the story of the fish, so I recounted it to them." 
"They said if I returned to the fisherman the first time I was in pain and asked him his forgiveness, my arm hadn't been cut." "Go to him and ask him to forgive you before the pain spread to the whole of your bodey," they orderd.
" I searched for the fisherman everywhere in the town till I found him, and I kneeld seeking for his forgiveness."
"He asked who I was." I said, "I was the person who took the fish out of your will."
"I recounted the story to him and showed him my amputed arm." He cried when he saw it and forgave me."
"I asked him If he asked God something against me when I took the fish."
"He said yes he did." "I said, "Oh, God he showed me, a week person, his strength.
Oh lord show him your strength!"
It was a great pleasure to meet you.
Thank you for the help you have done for me.
Let me tell you about a little bit of myself.
So many years it took me to learn English only within the country.
I have never been abroad to study.
I have no experience to work with people from other countries.
I studied hard in order just to pass one of the most difficult English exams held in Japan and did it, but after that, I burnt myself out.
I still had some difficulties in speaking English, which discouraged me to learn it anymore and made me feel blue for a long time.
Soon this site captivated my heart by the favor of you who corrected my posts kindly every time.
I am so grateful for your help to have gotten me out of my petit depression.
It is thanks to your smile and help.
Thanks again to you.
It was a great pleasure to meet you.
Let me tell you about a little bit of myself.
So many years it took me to learn English only within the country.
I studied hard in order just to pass one of the most difficult English exams held in Japan and made it, but after that, I burnt myself out.
I still had some difficulties in speaking English, which discouraged me to learn it anymore and made me feel blue for a long time.
Soon this site captivated my heart by the favor of you who corrected my posts kindly every time.
I get a joy from this wellspring of pleasure and kindness.
I am so grateful for your help to have gotten me out of my petit depression.
Hello, I'm back to Lang-8.
I got a chance to visit Germany in this April with my friends but the hotel price is too expensive because of the big BtoB exhibition, Hannover Messe.
The hotel price is over 500 euro at one night.
I'm trying to book apartment in stead of hotel however I don't know what's the difference between hotel and apartment...
I used an execute option of incompatible problem so I install it as a Windows 8 Program.
I found that there were big different from previous version when I run it.
I had to day off today, and it's sunny day!!
I still sleepy right now, so I'll go to a bed little.
I must watch TV this morning!!
Ah, I thought a good, I'll go to fishing today!!
Anyway, I'll go to exiting day today too!!
I Talked American Friend An Hour On Line
I was norvous, but friend is kindly.
Happy.
It often rains these days.
I am a ashore.
He is real ashore!
I went to MIto by car last Sunday.
I encountered in a traffic jam on my way there.
That's because the plum blossom festival was held in Kairakuen.
The moment, I remembered it.
I just passed by car.
I could see the blooming plum from my car since it was heavy traffic jam.
A: Then, why did you go to MIto?
B: I had alumni association of police in Mito.
Actually, I used to work police office.
A: Where was held the meeting?
B:  The hotel nearby Mito station.
I encountered in a traffic jam on my way there.
That's because the plum blossom festival was held in Kairakuen.
The moment, I remembered it.
I could see the blooming plum from my car since it was heavy traffic jam.
B: I had alumni association of police in Mito.
Actually, I used to work police office.
B:  The hotel nearby Mito station.
I just watched "The Star Wars 8".
I liked this film, so I even forgot about The Game of Throes, but I am disappointed.
I will never like new heroes like old ones.
I just watched "The Star Wars 8".
I liked this film, so I even forgot about The Game of Throes, but I am disappointed.
I will go to America tomorrow to see SXSW festival.
With my new conformation 
Open up my mouth to let it out
May no change, may no feelings
I won't loose one fine day
Writing English should be my habit, even though I'm too lazy.
However, I just realised English is more important than any other languages.
If I want to come back to China to work, English is inevitable.
I'm a little bit upset but still believe everything will be better and better.
I appreciate a lot.
When I looked out of the window I saw a bucket collecting rain drops in the yard.
Yesterday was the last ocarina lesson day of 2017 fiscal year at a unique university for elderly people in Nagoya.
The second grade students will graduate on March 26th.
After the lesson, I attended the farewell party for the second grade students.
I saw the different expression of them than usual.
When they joined the ocarina club activity two years ago, almost students were beginners.
The weather forecast informs pollen information every day.
Many people suffer because there is no silver bullet for this allergy symptom.
I hope that the medicine will be developed for this disease early.
Some Japanese people don't want to communicate foreigners.
Perhaps, have you been ignored in train or shop?
In fact, they don't want to communicate other country people.
But, I think foreigners want to communicate more Japanese people, right?
We should create "Language Learns" community.
As I previously posted a few times, I go jogging for about an hour every weekend.
Until the last year, I was jogging while listening to music on iPod shuffle in which I put my favorite music in advance.
I selected songs which made me jog comfortably.
Several months ago, I bought a portable radio player and I introduced it into my jogging.
Since then, I am jogging while listening to the radio.
It's enjoyable for me because I can hear DJ talking and encounter songs I've never heard before.
Tomorrow, I will introduce a new item.
My wife is planning to buy me a high-functioning undershirts as my birthday present.
She said that she heard of the shirts from one of her coworkers who also has a habit of jogging.
He has participated in marathons several times before.
I'm looking forward to go jogging with the shirts.
Could you introduce your favorite items if you like jogging.
Until the last year, I was jogging while listening to music on iPod shuffle in which I put my favorite music in advance.
He has participated in marathons several times before.
I have been watching police videos lately on youtube.
Cops protect the people, not harm them.
I understand that dealing with other people is a very tough job but they need to bide by the laws of the state.
Sometimes I wonder whether the cops patrolling the streets are looking for some trouble because they get bored driving in their patrol car looking for some action.
For centuries, important parts of education have remained such as reading, writing and maths. With the advent of computers, some people think that computer skills be made as a fourth skill to be added to the list. To what extent do you agree?
First, I have an experience of working as a systems engineer and I could acquire computer skills on-the-job training.
Secondly, it is more important to nurture creativeness.
For centuries, important parts of education have remained such as reading, writing and maths. With the advent of computers, some people think that computer skills be made as a fourth skill to be added to the list. To what extent do you agree?
It is a trend to teach computer skills at school.
There are pros and cons on this matter.
Personally, I do not believe that computer skills should be made as a fourth skill to be added to the list of important parts of education such as reading, writing and maths for three reasons.
Even though you become computer savvy at an early stage, computers can be totally different things when you are ready to start a job.
In conclusion, I do not believe that computer skills should be made as a fourth skill to be added to the list of important parts of education as I mentioned above.
Does the word "obnoxious" sound too formal, or is it an okay word to use in any context?
I can never guess what are going to be the words that you're going to pick.
I can never guess what are going to be the words that you're going to go for.
A: Someone who doesn't drink, who doesn't smoke, who doesn't drink coffee is possibly a psychopath.
A: I can't wait to go to Luna Sea concert next month in Japan.
B: I've heart that they will check the identification thoroughly.
A: Someone who doesn't drink, who doesn't smoke, who doesn't drink coffee is possibly a psychopath.
A: Hitler was such a person.
But you shouldn't expect that learning Korean would be easy as well.
What is written on drugstores' billboards in the US?
I haven't wore a necktie before I come to Japan.
Because usually we can wear anything we want at work in China.
And then I tried to tie it myself but I couldn't tie a triange-shape knot as well as other workmates.
Everyday I take off the necktie without loose the knot and just tight it in the morning, so I forgot how to tie.
My teamleader and I talked about necktie today by chance, so I asked him to teach me the way tieing a good knot.
As the saying,Use it or lose it, I decided to tie the necktie everyday in order to really remember it.
I haven't wore a necktie before I come to Japan.
It is just an infinity of "boxes", each of them, full of zeros and ones.
It is just an infinity of "boxes", each of them, full of zeros and ones.
It is just an infinity of "boxes", each of them, full of zeros and ones.
The movie focuses on drug wars happening at around border between America and Mexico and includes some violent and brutal scenes.
Although a lot of people just copy it from the internet, it still takes time and applicants have to pass the interview to become the probationary CPC member.
why people want to join anyway?
But the party membership means more than just an advantage to get a job especially for the previous generation, people born in 40s or 50s.
One day, one of his colleagues was severely injured at work and it was the death sentence to his career, so the leader asked him:
Japanese Manner
I sent email yesterday and felt stress because many Japanese people, especially women, care about way of writing.
Japanese people mind nuance, so in SNS that people correspond messages trouble often happen.
We should talk to directly, but this is the evidence of aging because over 50 years old people prefer to use phone.
I sent email yesterday and felt stress because many Japanese people, especially women, care about way of writing.
Japanese people mind nuance, so in SNS that people correspond messages trouble often happen.
We should talk to directly, but this is the evidence of aging because over 50 years old people prefer to use phone.
I went to welfare center this morning, because there was my daughter's medical test.
We went to buy the bread of lunch after that finished.
My son loves the sandwich, however, he chose different bread and ate the panini after all.
In the second year at my first school, I was assigned to the International Education Department and I first went abroad for my assignment.
At that time we worked together.
We call our annual reunion "the Perth Reunion" related to the city where we visited.
A short story which one of them shared impressed me.
He told,
"I had talked with my friend in my home town once a month or two months by phone call.
He is taking care of his wife who is in a serious illness.
She needs to suppress her symptoms by medicament, but in a result she has lost her spontaneous feelings and all of her social functions.
You know, au users can call without any fee under our contracts.
At first, I thought that I was helping him, but it was not the fact.
Since he didn't have anyone to talk with, he couldn't even speak articulately.
However, a while after that, I realised that it was me who was encouraged by the conversations.
I am also the one who believes the power of conversation.
In the second year at my first school, I was assigned to the International Education Department and I first went abroad for my assignment.
At that time we worked together.
We call our annual reunion "the Perth Reunion" related to the city where we visited.
I want to write it here.
He told,
"I had talked with my friend in my home town once a month or two months by phone call.
She needs to suppress her symptoms by medicament, but in a result she has lost her spontaneous feelings and all of her social functions.
You know, au users can call without any fee under our contracts.
At first, I thought that I was helping him, but it was not the fact.
Since he didn't have anyone to talk with, he couldn't even speak articulately.
However, a while after that, I realised that it was me who was encouraged by the conversations.
Good conversations can help our lives!"
I am also the one who believes the power of conversation.
We talked about many things whilst eating and drinking.
She needs to suppress her symptoms by medicament, but in a result she has lost her spontaneous feelings and all of her social functions.
You know, au users can call without any fee under our contracts.
Good conversations can help our lives!"
I am also the one who believes the power of conversation.
Just a typical chilling day
I unconsciously fell asleep last early night because I slept very little the day before.
In the daytime, I sat around and watched TV.
Seeing many students studying hard, I thought I had to study hard, too.
I had 1-to-1 English lesson twice.
He undergraduate university and he is planning to go back to US today, 8th, March, 2018.
A few days after, I mailed the teacher and asked a question.
A friend of mine wrote me that he and I are indebted to twitter.
I wondered what INDEBTED meant.
Soon after, I received a message from the teacher.
Phil Keaggy
How Can I Thank You
nicki minaj
Can Anybody Hear Me?
dog on wheels
You're True
Eddie Vedder
My project will finish by end of this month
I have been dedicated my project for 8-years.
And this project will finish by end of this month with a big achievement.
What role my company would like me to do, what role I should do, What role I can do and what role I would like to do.
Lately, everyone in my family has different plan to go out, it makes us difficult to remember all of them.
Today, I downloaded the app called "TimeTree" and recommended my family to use it.
It looks easy to share our schedule, I was glad to find this app.
However, I realized this calendar shows clearly how often I go out for myself.
I wonder if it's always good idea to show them everything I do,
Lately, everyone in my family has different plan to go out, it makes us difficult to remember all of them.
Today, I downloaded the app called "TimeTree" and recommended my family to use it.
It looks easy to share our schedule, I was glad to find this app.
However, I realized this calendar shows clearly how often I go out for myself.
I wonder if it's always good idea to show them everything I do,
It looks easy to share our schedule, I was glad to find this app.
What we can do to help people with dementia
My dream is becoming a doctor who can diagnose the whole body of patients and listen to them in order to understand the situation where they are, such as their families, their occupations, and what they prefer.
About 30 years ago, people with dementia used to be said as stupid, inferior to others.
This assumption that dementia was embarrassing prevented them from seeing doctors earlier.
Symptoms which appear in the brain of patients differ from person to person.
Damaged cells in their brains make it difficult for them to memorize, realize, and judging things.
However, the cause of dementia is not only in their brain cells: their personalities, surroundings, and states of mind are also important.
When you communicate with them, keep your mind that there must be some "reason" why they act in such a way.
People around them may think they walk around without any reasons or just because they have dementia.
Try to understand these actual reasons for their behaviors.
sympathize with them and respect them
communicate with a smile
I hope both people with dementia and their family will live smiley.
Can you write characters beautifully?
Writing beautiful characters is a valued ability in Japan.
So many Japanese children learns calligraphy to improve their skills.
I am envious of a person who can write beautiful characters.
My friend Xe wanted to come to my city today, but on the road happened an ancient, which resulted in a block.
Her bus didn't get off for a long time.
Even at 6 pm the bus didn't get off.
From her city to my city on bus costs 2 hours
My friend Xe wanted to come to my city today, but on the road happened an ancient, which resulted in a block.
Her bus didn't get off for a long time.
Even at 6 pm the bus didn't get off.
I want to do something myself something big but what I have to do, This thing always wander all over my head whenever I am thinking about something.
What I have known, What would i loved to do, what is my passion but when I will get answered is nothing.
Question about English syllable
I haven't studied English that much these days ^^;
In Japanese, a syllable is usually made with a vowel and a consonant, so the rhythm of the Japanese language is kind of monotone.
I'm sure that when Japanese people speak Japanese, we unconsciously recognize each syllable.
Also, liaison often happens in English.
I guess except for linguists, where to separate syllables is not very important.
The important thing when you speak English would not be which sounds each syllable has but would be how fluent you speak the whole sentence.
What do you think about it?
I want to sleep well everyday.
However I want to study English.
I listen a voice recorder before sleeping.
I sleep immediately.
My voice recorder is always sounds by itself.
However I want to study English.
I sleep immediately.
My voice recorder is always sounds by itself.
When he died, his son John of Orleans inherited of this earldom.
If what you were taugth became reversed
I read some books which were written by authors of about 80 years old.
They experienced the same thing.
They were taught by their teachers during the war that Japanese emperor was a god and they must fight against the U.
S with their lives for him.
However they were taught by their teachers after the war was over that Japanese emperor was just a human and the U.
S was a friend who would teach us democracy, human rights and free.
They say that they clearly remembered that immediately after the war was over, the considerable parts of school textbooks used during the war were painted in black with charcoal and their teachers taught them the opposite of what they taught during the war.
They say that they can't trust nations and that they knew thought of people changes instantly from the experience.
They worked hard and became a driving force for economic development of Japan.
However they had the intensive experience like that when they were children.
Can you guess if what you were taught became reversed.
The pure nature of our mind is covered by the inflicted emotions.
I felt strange sensation when I looked at a selfy photo of my dad he sent me yesterday.
What I felt at the moment is hard to describe.
He looked a totally different person from the man I know.
First, I attribute this with the fact that I have rarely gaze at his face though we lived together for very long time.
Therefore, my brain got confused when trying to recognize him as my father because what I have imaged as his face in my brain was far away from his real face.
Second, brain has innate ability to overlook unnecessary information on purpose.
In my case, the information of my father's face were recognized as unnecessary information and slipped from my brain because I though I knew his face already and no need to update the information.
I keep thinking about adding "away," but I have a feeling that I could take it out in the previous sentence.
The robber got beat up in the backyard of the owner where he stole the TV.
The robber got beat up in the backyard where he stole the TV.
As the world becomes technologically advanced, computers are replacing people at more and more jobs.
For instance, several decades ago, people had to say in a queue in order to buy movie tickets.
However, nowadays, in cinemas, we cannot find ticket boxes, instead, there are a lot of terminals where we can easily buy them.
Another example is banks.
We should no longer go to a branch of a bank in order to do these things and wait until our payment reach the addressee.
More than that, all transactions are fulfilled by computers, not people as it was several decades ago.
There are many situations when a client needs help or he cannot understand the interface of a computer, only customer services can help him.
Another example from the movie "Passengers" where the whole spaceship is breaking down because of one asteroid and only passengers can fix up it because even the very smart systems cannot deal with it.
In spite of the fact that computers are quite successful, they cannot fully replace people because they often have some problems, work only as the programmed and cannot think.
Rainy Day.
I slept 12 hour Today.
I woke up and ate ramen. And I read news.
Today is International Woman's Day.
Commemorative events and demonstrations were held in Korea.
Some women emigrate to abroad because of misogyny.
Politicians have negative attitude to amend of laws about sexual abuse.
I think "Metoo movement" can amend the laws about sexual abuse.
The European Union began exporting around 16 million tons of wheat in 1985, by 1986 fell below Australia, having 14 million tons of wheat exported.
Surprisingly, the exports showed a vertiginous increase, finishing the period being the biggest wheat exporter with 21 million tons.
Finally, Canada started being the leader of the group with 19 million tons, then it experienced a slight decrease in 1986 with 16 million tons.
In 1988 reached a high point with 25 million tons of wheat, the highest exports of the period among the group.
However, about 15 years ago, it began to be called Women's day.
On Women's day, working women can have a half day off and get gifts from their companies.
Diary March 8
Today I finished my homework from our customer.
The customer requested us cost reduction.
I think, the customer will send me an email with angry tomorrow.
I have been getting up between 04:30 and 05:30 this week.
I am preparing an exam which I must pass at June.
Since workers spend most of the day at their work place, bosses should procure that work environment is as healthy as possible.
Respect is an important quality for a boss to have.
Of course the boss can and must draw attention to whatever that should be done, but always with the best manners.
Bosses must know that yelling at people or using inappropriate language will not inspire any respect, quite the opposite, it would produce a barrier that would hinder them from good communication.
Another important feature that every boss should have is exemplar conduct, meaning, to behave coherently.
The boss must seek for fair conditions such as a good wage and health insurance.
A good boss should look for generating the best conditions for the workers.
Employees who feel their needs are taken into account and feel appreciated will perform much better than those who feel they are disregarded.
Since workers spend most of the day at their work place, bosses should procure that work environment is as healthy as possible.
Bosses must know that yelling at people or using inappropriate language will not inspire any respect, quite the opposite, it would produce a barrier that would hinder them from good communication.
When employees see their bosses behaving according with what they demand from their subordinates, it inspires the staff to perform well too.
I made up my mind to stay here in next few years.
I don't have courage or vitality to change my current life.
I'm thinking I'd better think everything positive.
Barcelona has a big demonstration.
While my Spanish class was on, the people of demonstration on the street shouted for something.
While my Spanish class was on, the people of demonstration on the street shouted for something.
I suddenly found that I've never been suffered by the unfair due to gender in Taiwan.
Today is the first time I realized that Taiwan is standing on a very good level of gender equality.
My final exam finished this afternoon, but all I have in my mind is a bad feeling.
For a change of air, I went fishing to a nearby port for the first time in six months.
However, no sooner had I started to cast a fishing rod, a torrential rain bucketed down.
I felt like the weather was predicting my exam results.
The stormy weather lasted for hours until the midnight, but I kept fishing.
This fish is sometimes thought to be a messenger which tells us that spring comes.
My final exam finished this afternoon, but all I have in my mind is a bad feeling.
For a change of air, I went fishing to a nearby port for the first time in six months.
However, no sooner had I started to cast a fishing rod, a torrential rain bucketed down.
The stormy weather lasted for hours until the midnight, but I kept fishing.
After all, today's game was a good sized rockfishm, called 'mebaru' in Japan.
However, no sooner had I started to cast a fishing rod, a torrential rain bucketed down.
I felt like the weather was predicting my exam results.
After all, today's game was a good sized rockfishm, called 'mebaru' in Japan.
This fish is sometimes thought to be a messenger which tells us that spring comes.
This is why I felt relieved a little.
Take off in an hour and a half
I do not want to bother as much as possible at my destination.
The first place I stay is a Japanese couple and they are making wine.
I am not so close to being honest.
If I were,it would be greatly helpful if a person who helps in the brewing period comes.
The first opportunity to speak English is to buy a sim card at the local airport.
I could buy a used sim free smafo at 5000 yen.
I hope I can do well at my destination.
I have a lot of appointment on this week, so I'm busy.
It's not only a job but include a play, so I've excite.
I'm having a great time!I wish I have two body.
I'm carefully maintenance my health, because I will ruin it if I come down with an illness.
I'm going to do a gig Saturday.
I hope it will be exciting gig.
I am learning English from last year.
Every students in English class sing a song in front of the audience this month.
That song is Doreme.
Doe,a deer,a female deer.
That will brink us back to Doe.
I thought easy to sing but difficult for me.
HAPPYNIESS!
I finished academy.
when I finish academy, I eat ice-cream
But so cold
So I don't eat ice-cream
I went to Convenience store, I bought stawberry milk.
The blance is 200won.
just in time!
But I don't have monny.
but Today is happy~!!
Now I'm go to the bed
korea's time is P.
About Animal
I used to love to go to the zoo, but whenever I go, I feel sorry of them in the cages.
So, I stopped to go.
Now I love to like wild animals on YouTube.
I want to observe animals, flowers and river like any nature things.
The most scary animal for me is human beings.
Why will you watch movie?
Why do you watch movie?
Why did you watch movie?
Translating 17
Jones, Martha's family doctor told his wife a story what happened.
"Before three days I cured a patient.
She had a headache and nausea, so I though about indigestion.
I put her a strict diet.
She didn't better, so I wanted to take her to the hospital for a check-up.
This morning, when I arrived to their house Martha was death.
Suddenly, her husband - who incidentaly kept his wife very carefully - came and give me an envelop with full money.
He asked me I write heart attack reason of death into the death certificate.
The envelop was very fat, so I wrote it what he asked of me.
Did I it well?"
I bought a bunch of chrysanthemum for my mother.
I really feel that keeping a good condition of human relationship is quite difficult.
I really feel that keeping a good condition of human relationship is quite difficult.
There are too many troubles in my workplace to cope with.
I feel that some of my co-workers have their own way.
I'll be the head of my department next fiscal year.
I really feel that keeping a good condition of human relationship is quite difficult.
People usually go to college or university in early 20 years old.
They will spend 4 years or more to get knowledge, to meet a lot of friend, to image the future they will have.
Compare to the elder generation, recent years, people increasingly go to university or college.
I think there have several reasons to explant this phenomenon.
Frist, they want to have a better job, get a better salary.
Back to the time when my grandparent were still teenage, they could have a not bad job after graduate from high school.
But, as economy and technology develops, more and more companies need someone have special ability which only can learned in college or university.
This request us if we want to do a job we like, we need to attend college or university to gain knowledge.
Second, they want a degree.
Just like a friend of my father, he got a job after graduated from high school.
When the time past, a voice in his heart start yelling, I want to have a degree from college.
Get a degree in college is very hard thing for a middle-age man who have a regular job.
But, my farther did it.
And this make my father more confidence.
Third, they want to promote social development.
Some subjects, like chemistry, physical, biology and other science subjects is very important in our life.
Just like chemistry, everyday a lot of new thing are synthesis in the world, maybe many of they are useless, but something in there will change our life in many years later.
To gain knowledge about chemistry need to go to a college or university.
When I synthesis something new, maybe do not better than the thing extant, they will make me to be better, and in one day, I will synthesis something new and useful.
The hot cake of the shop seems like so fluffy.
HI
Do you believe a miracle?
Sometime when you need something or want something too much, and in an instant the miracle is happen what you want become a reality.
I thought the miracle not happen unless in movies or drama or dream.
Although I always was saying " i hope if i get miracle in my life ".
But new I wait more miracles will happen in my life.
last thing i need someone contact me to check my "cv" i wrote it in English just i want sure if my sentence correct or not.
please 
Sometime when you need something or want something too much, and in an instant the miracle is happen what you want become a reality.
last thing i need someone contact me to check my "cv" i wrote it in English just i want sure if my sentence correct or not.
Since I started living alone again, I thought I'm going to be lazy to fill the bath every day, but hopefully I've been keeping up.
For me, this is one of the ways to relax.
When I was in the UK and living with some other people in a flat, there was no bath and the quality of shower was not good.
I've been used this site for many years.
There is no site like Lang-8.
I would like to improve my English skills through writing sentences at this site.
To achieve my goals, I would like to repeat writing sentences many times, and to correct them by native speaker.
I could not find out the site like this.
I accessed it but I could not go through last week.
I could not reply immediately to persons who commented my update.
To achieve my goals, I would like to repeat writing sentences many times, and to correct them by native speaker.
I prefer reading the papers to know about what is going on in the world.
In fact, I tried to read a few books to enjoy, learn something new and expand my knowledge.
As you know, reading books leads to improvement in my reading skills.
He told me that there was a lady who got a huge nugget of diamond in South Africa.
When he finished telling me this story, he wanted me to tell him whether or not there were similar things happened in Japan.
Actually, I don't have any lectures tomorrow but maybe I have to go out for a meeting about my club.
These days are a little hard to me because my university starts again.
I can't decide that I go out or not tomorrow because actually, tomorrow's meeting is a thing that if I go there that's good but if I don't go there that's okay anyway.
Maybe I think, first, I will sleep today and will decide that I go or not when waking up on tomorrow
I continue to stretch before bed as a habit from last month.
I have never stuck to anything since I was a child,so I think I am going to try best keep up with this.
There seems to definitely beautiful like Greek flag,blue and white.
It tastes refreshing and rich.
I am writing to inquire about STEM measurements and whether it's possible to conduct them during next three weeks.
Ruhl scientific group during next month againg and it's the deal of great interest for me to work with STEM a few times, becaurse now I have more than 15 sample in which morphology investigation i'm engaged.
Could you tell me whether it's possible or not to book the time with STEM twice on the next week?
This is a new gadget for translation without the internet connection, but it works for only English, Korean and Chinese.
I can handle conversational English pretty well, but I am struggling with Italian.
I have planned studying abroad in Italy every year, and I wish we could have that one for my Italian.
I guess in near future, we will have one.
However, this means I won't need to study Italian very seriously.
I belong to volunteer circle and I became a leader of this circle.
Today, I held meeting and I had to speak in front of other members.
Thus, the brief research plan in enclosed to this letter to inform you.
As can be seen from the plan, we were thinking to conduct experiments with drug release kinetics, and I would like to clarify whether there is access to high resolution chromotography in your lab to determine the unencapsulated concentration of dexamethasone and calculate the amount of encapsulated drug.
Thus, the brief research plan in enclosed to this letter to inform you.
As can be seen from the plan, we were thinking to conduct experiments with drug release kinetics, and I would like to clarify whether there is access to high resolution chromotography in your lab to determine the unencapsulated concentration of dexamethasone and calculate the amount of encapsulated drug.
The windows don't have double glazing.
#twinglish
Jay Chou, the hottest pop singer in Chinese-speaking countries, launched his 4th album"Jay Chou's Bedtime Stories" in June, 2016.
One of the songs in this album called "love confession" soon rocketed in popularity.
"Love confession" is a Chinese song that reached 100 million views fastest on Youtube.
Lots of armature singers cover this song so it now has Japanese, Korean and English versions.
I think a good song doesn't have to be creative or fantasy.
Any song that strike a chord with you is a good song.
"On occasion my death all my assets, all my money and all my belongings will get my husband, Harry Bromwell.
My funeral have to be simple and calm.
Without my family nobody can be me pallnear.
If I die I ban my body's dissecting."
Let's share your strange story with me.
I watched some videos on Youtube about conspiracy theories and city legend that the youtuber who is quarter Japanese and American posted on the video.
He has a great talking skill and quotes interesting story from all over the world.
I was impressed by his talk.
Then,I am totally into it.
The best story is Cecil hotel incident.
When I was painting work,I often asked me from client can I drawing American style Illustration 
so,It is necessary to lean English,and studying about American Degital Painting
I often go on a trip to Hong Kong
I have been studying only Cantonese until now
But now,I decided to learn English,too 
"Do you take medicine that was prescribed last time?"
However, it does not effect well."
"Let's change medicine, then."
"Hey fever began around 2 weeks ago."
However, it does not effect well."
"Do you take medicine that was prescribed last time?"
"Let's change medicine, then."
Don't you dare to shoot me off.
I'd like to say how you make us stop it.
3, Fix horizontal spacing according to divided scale  
5, Set up current parameter, alarm system will be triggered if current goes below the set valule when neon damaged during bending test  
All people had already heard of the new suit and they were very interested in it.
They also afraid of admitting that they couldn't see it.
But then, on the street, a small child said, "why is the emperor naked?".
In the end, everyone on the street shouted that the emperor wore nothing.
The two swindlers realized that what they had committed was known to everyone, escaping during the parade.
Drinking a cup of coffee with a cheese toast at DOUTOR.
Almost of the buds were not bloom.
I bought the carnation for my birthday and it also had a bud.
So,I had told to the bud of the carnation everyday,then it finally bloomed.
Hey, Everyone.
I was working at today.
My joc is system engineer.
That job is android application development.
So busy evertime,
There are some opinions for this idea that mobile phones has some negative aspects.
These days, the number of accidents which are responsible for it has been increasing.
Second, seeing your screen of it very long is bad for your eyes.
My sight is low since I began to use it.
I am concerned that what become of those who have been using it since they are child?
Although mobile phones are very useful, I think the time to use it should be restricted.
I love pen.
Actually I have some reason that I love pen.
When my mom and dad were dating, dad gave mom mechanical pencil.
I still remember when I was young my dad writing something with fountain pen.
Contemporary artists try to make artworks by different ways.
One of these artists who works in abnormal way is "Spazuk".
He is a Canadian artist that has known as a fire painter.
During this time, every time it rains, it gets warmer and warmer.
It was the second time this week.
During this time, every time it rains, it gets warmer and warmer.
It was the second time this week.
During this time, every time it rains, it gets warmer and warmer.
We are now offering only what is known as typical Japanese cuisine.
Today, more and more international tourists are coming to Japan many times, and they might be bored if the food variety is limited.
Secondly, we have to improve traffic systems.
They may be too tired from being stuffed in trains to enjoy sightseeing at their destinations.
What international tourists want to experience in Japan varies from person to person, but I think the following things will make all of them more amused.
Secondly, we have to improve traffic systems.
Many people from foreign countries complain that Japanese trains are too packed.
Then I just remembered that MH370 has been missing for 4 years.
I still I remember that morning 4 years ago, I read the news on my mobile phone when I was lying on my bed.
What the meaning of "boots-in-the-mud"?
This phrase is in here.
The stained glass of the blue mosque were beautiful and also ceiling painting great.
In the evening the place is lit up in the night.
However, when we went there it was day time, so we couldn't see it.
We went to next places, it was places called "Basilica Cistern".
That palace there were underground, the place inside was very cool.
I went to the Turkey at the end of June, it was very hot and there were sunlight was strong.
I'm relieved because I was freed from outside heat.
"Well then after one place."
As for my friend, I guess that was she wanted more to entertain a guest to came from afar.
I followed her, because there were no choice but to do so.
I don't know if it's true, probably, there are that much.
"I'm tired" I so saying with this, but I interested.
I bought some souvenir to my family.
and I looked for something for myself, to memories of my trip.
When we entered silver products shop, I found small spoon.
this is good.
This is no bulky, and written as "Turkey".
This fits perfectly for me!".
After this, if I get a chance to go to another country, souvenir is spoon nice.
Such spoon is selling everywhere, and price also suitable.
When someone go to the trip, I can ask other person.
When I count it, now, I had 36 spoons, it is not 36 country.
Some spoon is same country, but different city.
My spoons is not increased recently, but last month my older brother bought for me, at his business trip destination.
I asked him, "Are you not business trip again?" He said, "I'm sick of it ".
He raised his chin with a frown, his gaze asking whether everything was alright.
I read a report written about experiences that the Nepalese had in Japan.
I will share with you that.
She gave up getting her doctor's degree while living in Japan and thought if he had moved to Europe, she also could have gotten a degree because of the equality of the sexes.
It refers that wives must serve their husband and family and stay home.
The idea sometimes annoyed even Japanese wives and much more foreign wives.
Some Japanese-specific customs would be obstacles for foreign people when Japanese society is changing to the international.
I read a report written about experiences that the Nepalese had in Japan.
Her husband moved to Japan to get a doctor's degree.
A followed him and she also wanted a doctor's degree in Japan, so she discussed getting her doctoral degree with a professor who teaches her husband.
The professor told her that getting a doctor's degree was very difficult.
If both of she and her husband went to graduate school, she would bother him, so she had to support his study as a wife.
She gave up getting her doctor's degree while living in Japan and thought if he had moved to Europe, she also could have gotten a degree because of the equality of the sexes.
It refers that wives must serve their husband and family and stay home.
The idea sometimes annoyed even Japanese wives and much more foreign wives.
Some Japanese-specific customs would be obstacles for foreign people when Japanese society is changing to the international.
I will share with you that.
The professor told her that getting a doctor's degree was very difficult.
I will share with you that.
Her husband moved to Japan to get a doctor's degree.
If both of she and her husband went to graduate school, she would bother him, so she had to support his study as a wife.
It refers that wives must serve their husband and family and stay home.
I read a report written about experiences that the Nepalese had in Japan.
She gave up getting her doctor's degree while living in Japan and thought if he had moved to Europe, she also could have gotten a degree because of the equality of the sexes.
The idea sometimes annoyed even Japanese wives and much more foreign wives.
A man who has just released from prison
In the part I was reading the other day, a miserable man wearing worn-out clothes who looks very miserable has just passed by the church.
Even though, the man told the priest that he was an ex-prisoner, the priest didn't mind about that at all.
This is a continuation of my previous entry in English.
He had been in a prison for 19 years, and he was just released from prison.
Hello, I'm dolce.
But he had an exception: he cared his clothes so much that he would spend most of his money on it to be well dressed.
Surprisingly, he would change his coat every hour!
The great city he ruled was very gay, to which a lot of visitors from all over the world would come every day.
The emperor heard about very beautiful cloth.
They told him that they could make a supreme suit.
They also told him that it had a unique point: it would be invisible to those who were stupid or not qualified for their positions.
The emperor first had his honest, aged ministers go to see the cloth because he was a little bit nervous whether he could see it.
They returned and said to the emperor, "the cloth couldn't have been more beautiful.
He was pleased, ordering the swindlers to make a nice suit.
Now I am in the bus to Haneda airport.
Outside is unfortunate rain.
I am worried that my suitcase on the canvas will get wet.
I have looked it up on the net now.
There seems to be a way to cover an ordinary super bag.
Is there a sim card only for data?
I am mainly in charge of brewing in the present winery.
I have experienced wine making for 5 years.
It is my first experience of brewing overseas, I am looking forward to it.
Because the sweet Niagara was cloudy, I returned it to the tank and refilled it.
I packed it in the winter without cooling process, so I think that tauter stone came out.
What do you use in case of supplemental acid?
How many years have you aged in barrels?
If you do not mind, please come to our wineries this autumn.
Urbain winery is also popular recently.
I agree with this statement that daily homework is important for students.
For example, when I was in junior high school, mathematics was one of the most challenging subjects because theories and formula were too complex.
Tanaka, I was able to understand this subject smoothly.
He gave his students a few questions as his daily assignments which were highlighted every class.
Therefore, these enabled me to make sure what to do and grasp both my strengths and my weaknesses on each topic through his feedback.
In the end, I was able to keep up with his classes and received higher scores than other subjects.
Secondly, daily homework enables students to obtain specific skills.
Yamaguchi, imposed his students to a variety kind of group assignments every day.
This was heavy burden for me, in particular, short presentations about daily news after discussions with my classmates.
Therefore, I was required to prepare for the speeches perfectly for his questions after my performances.
However, although his course was too tough, I was able to improve my communication skills.
That is because in order to make great impressions to him and get high scores, I had to consider everything related to public speaking, such as proper gestures, facial expressions and the contents of stories.
In the end, I was able to learn the tips on communication, and made full use of them in admission interviews when applying for universities.
I agree with this statement that it is more important to work quickly and risk making mistakes than to work slowly and make sure everything is correct.
First of all, quick work considering risk making allows business to be efficient.
For example, I own my trading company and decided to start up business in Southeast Asia ten years ago because of shrinkage of local market, although it was risky due to little knowledge about foreign business and few foreign friends.
In general, I seriously examine it after coming back to Japan, but I contracted with a local agent then.
This was correct to do foreign business because there were countless competitors in the world.
As a matter of fact, some business persons investigated the estate next day.
Secondly, working slowly and making sure everything is correct is not a good idea to do tasks.
For instance, when I was a freshman as a sales person, I always conduct assignments quickly although they are not perfect.
That is because seriously thinking was a waste of time, and I was able to get lots of feedbacks from my bosses.
When I was required to make a presentation material in a board meeting in two weeks, I submitted it after two days first, even though I completed it by only 60%.
In the end, I was able to complete the final document with his satisfaction on time because I had enough time to brush up.
If I would have not submitted it until completion, I would not have gotten any feedbacks and made the low-leveled product.
As this example mentions, you should not aim for perfection, doing tasks in business.
In conclusion, I strongly believe that working quickly and risk making mistakes in more important than to work slowly and make sure everything is correct because of success of business and effectivity of tasks.
I ordered it as soon as I found it at Amazon because the introduction said it deals with an issue I have been thinking for a long time.
However, I was disappointed to find that it was a vertical writing book.
Vertical writing books for science or technology in Japan are generally regarded as for non-professional people.
If you are not familiar with the Japanese custom in publishing, you might be surprised to see that equations are written vertically in the books.
I cannot understand the custom.
It features very obscure baseball topics such as sacrifice fly or home steal every time.
They really think how they can do better and practice over and over again.
Usually, ordinary people tend to overlook the things the show feature, but professional people think of them differently.
They really think how they can do better and practice over and over again.
I think that makes them so successful.
It is rainy and cold today.
I told her we didn't go out because it was rainy but she didn't understand.
I wonder if she was a dog she could understand what I say.
It is rainy and cold today.
I wonder if she was a dog she could understand what I say.
Recently I've been into watching Big Bang Theory, American sitcom provided by Netflix.
I'm pretty sure watching it repeatedly helps me improve my listening skill, so will keep watching.
It was like any other day in the Alice academy and the classes go by without problems in all the campus.
The students of the classroom 3-B were talking freely without care about that the noise they were doing can be heard in the hall.
It was the study hour for them and like since they were in the elemental levels, the students of the 3-B classroom only do what they want to do.
Despite of them being in the senior year and that the teachers have taught them for many years, only a few could teach a whole class without interruptions, forget about maintaining the classroom in order during the free hours.
The nineteen students were divided in their group of friends.
You could say that if the classroon respect someone that would be Natsume.
The students of the classroom 3-B were talking freely without care about that the noise they were doing can be heard in the hall.
It was the study hour for them and like since they were in the elemental levels, the students of the 3-B classroom only do what they want to do.
The nineteen students were divided in their group of friends.
You could say that if the classroon respect someone that would be Natsume.
In Japan, April is the beginning of the first semester and March is a month for the preparation of the new semester.
I have to say goodbye to many surgeons, which lets me feel sad.
I intended to enjoy my day-off and wondered what I would do, but this morning my son complained of his headache and sore throat and he was absent from his school.
As I was doing such chores, I felt happy.
I'll introduce you the coffee beans I drink
Women are happy to receive presents and compliments in this day, while men are happy to pay extra attention to their loved ones.
None of them is left without a present or special attention on March the 8th.
Probably, it is difficult for men to congratulate many close women in one day.
However it is always pleasant, to receive gifts and congratulations.
I get a feeling for Pakistani country culture.
Timkey, the main character, desperately wants her basic rights, but the family, especially, Aman Wadi, her grandmother who is very orthodox, stands in the her way.
I was especially moved when I read the part about her not being able to go to school any further.
I understand the culture is different than what I am accustomed to, however it infuriated me that everyone cowered to the elder mother.
That makes me sad and curious to read further to know if she gets them or not and what happens to her next.
The author has already pulled at my emotions with certain scenes in the story- the reader is pulled in further in the story when complex philosophies and religious concepts are discussed between Timkey and her cousin, Azeem.
I feel I'm in the room and feel like I belong there.
I get a feeling for Pakistani country culture.
I was especially moved when I read the part about her not being able to go to school any further.
I understand the culture is different than what I am accustomed to, however it infuriated me that everyone cowered to the elder mother.
I feel I'm in the room and feel like I belong there.
Shortly after I read some chapters the story, I realized that people here in the US take freedom and liberty for granted.
I knew a new word today.
I knew a new word today.
When I first read this word, I imagined a dog that has a dog with wings.
Today I went to China Embassy for updating my passport.
My passport will be expired this month.
It was very crowded in embassy.
I took a reservation via internet in advance.
So, it was very fast to deal with my formalities.
But, I took a long time to wait for my number.
Today I will have a mock exam.
My glance is nervous and this exam give me the creeps!
help.
How to be not stressed at difficult position?
My teacher always gets us in akward situation.
I want to forward my knowledge...
He lived alone there for four years, and came back home several times per year, but I've never been to his apartment.
Therefore, I was worried if he kept the apartment clean.
The day before his move, I packed a lot of different cleaning tools in my luggage, took a bullet train for about five hours, and arrived at his apartment.
I was also happy to see him, but his room was really messed up.
I know that it tends to be messed up during a preparation for move, but it was too much dust and dirt!
I thought that he hardly had ever cleaned the apartment.
I asked him why the living room was still this dirty.
He said that he was cleaning the kitchen and the bathroom an entire day, before I arrived here.
Those places might have been the dirtiest.
That seemed to be his way of showing his caring because it's too tough to clean a sink or a basin area.
Next day, we was completely done the packing, and then the moving company carried out them.
After that, we swept the vacant room again, and left the apartment.
I thought that I need to tell him that keeping all things clean is essential for a healthy lifestyle.
A person we've known each other was looking for a family who can let them stay over a night and ask me.
All my family is shy and we aren't talkative, either, so I hesitated to accept it for a while.
But it sounds fun and also will be a good experience, so we decided to accept it.
One of them has been studying Japanese for a few years but the other people don't.
If I get nervous, they will also get.
When I homestayed at my host family's house, they were acting just they were.
I wish we could be more frank to others, but we are usually too polite.
I think I'll prepare some games that we can enjoy together.
If you homestay at Japanese house for just a day, what would you expect or what how would you like to spend?
A person we've known each other was looking for a family who can let them stay over a night and asked me.
But it sounds fun and also will be a good experience, so we decided to accept it.
I'm excited to have them but also I'm worrying how to interact with them.
If I get nervous, they will also get.
When I homestayed at my host family's house, they were acting just they were.
I wish we could be more frank to others, but we are usually too polite.
My friend is so good at making foreign friends who even speak different languages and I envy his skill!
A person we've known each other was looking for a family who can let them stay over a night and asked me.
All my family is shy and we aren't talkative, either, so I hesitated to accept it for a while.
But it sounds fun and also will be a good experience, so we decided to accept it.
I'm excited to have them but also I'm worrying how to interact with them.
When I homestayed at my host family's house, they were acting just they were.
If you homestay at Japanese house for just a day, what would you expect or what how would you like to spend?
I think this phrase means someone working like a bee and simply rush in and out.
However, this phrase appeared in Guardian interview and I cannot find an official explanation for it.
Buy second hand
Different ways exist in Switzerland to buy such items.
We have second hand shops that are open all year round.
They get a lot of their offer from clearing out flats from elderly persons who died or had to go in a rest home.
In addition, we have flea markets in the streets mostly from spring to autumn.
Another form is a sale organized by volunteers that offer to sell your objects in a given period.
You get your money or your objects back at the end of the selling period.
These sales help to find clothes and sport equipment for children within a reasonable price.
For me, money is...
In 20's I wanted to stand up on my feet based on earning money by my self.
After marriage, money became my everything because my husband had a huge debt, which I didn't know before marriage to him.
After that, I have needed money for 'A normal life', which my parents gave me for my liberty.
Now, 40's, money is something valuable for my elegant senior life.
In the gallery, there is one young girl photograph, and young girl in the photograph attracts people's attention because her eyes and face expression.
She does not smile; her face is very serious, but she does not upset or angry.
And the big, sparkling her eyes with her serious face give the impression of penetrating into people's minds.
Sometimes, people would think young girl are talking her story to the audience, 
A lively and vivid girl's eyes caught the attention of the audience and the photo interact and communicate with audience.
Today, I have an appointment with my girlfriend for dinner at 6 p.m. She wants to introduce me to her friends, so I will have dinner with her and one of them tonight.
I know her because I saw pictures of her, but I have never seen her in person, and so does she.
The system of Lang-8 seems to become way more stable than a few days ago.
The system of Lang-8 seems to become way more stable than a few days ago.
I'm planning to change from side business to main one after making higher money than wages now.
I'm planning to change from side business to main one after making higher money than wages now.
I usually do as a writer after work.
My mom asked if the kids wanted ice cream, but they already had sweets before I pick them up.
I dont mind them having sweets because their bodies need sugar for energy.
but too much of it can make them go bunkers.
He spent 6 days there with one of his co-worker.
One day, they went to a department store for lunch near the hotel they stayed.
They looked around to found that all restaurants there were hamburger shops.
This is true story.
This is about what my brother experienced in America.
He went to America on business.
He spent 6 days there with one of his co-worker.
One day, they went to a department store for lunch near the hotel they stayed.
They arrived there on the third floor.
They looked around to found that all restaurants there were hamburger shops.
This is true story.
It has heavy rain every week latterly.
I just think why I don't like people who work for the network business.
They ask me anything with unnatural way.
We just agreed to play sports and dinner after playing it.
But they take me to their house so I was surrounded by their fellows.
The most important thing is that they didn't explain it.
I think their behavior is really weird but I guess they don't think they are weird.
I am hearing a conference presentation in English by Japanese person.
Very poor English.
What's that they are having over there?
I think the reason there are many badly structured books in Japan is that there are no writing training in school.
So,I need to study hard to remove English level.
I'd like to post sentenses as much as possible to get English.
I wish you are happy all day and more beautiful in proportion to time.
Hope you receive much flowers and gifts, especially hope single girls will have boyfriends soon.
To give you a sweet congratulation on March 8.
I wish you are happy all day and more beautiful in proportion to time.
Sometimes i really am not confidence with my broken English.
The last time i met a native, i barely able to say something.
he was asking for direction.
glad that my friend was there to help.
It is the best to hide under a durable table as soon as possible.
Closing
So, what should we do?
The most important thing to do in an earthquake is to be safe, so we should immediately take cover and protect our heads in an earthquake.
If outdoors, to prevent ourselves from being hurt by falling signs, we should also take cover as fast as possible and stay low until it ends.
During driving, we just need to slow the car and park it beside the road, turn off the engine, and wait until the end of the earthquake.
When an earthquake hits, the frame of a door might be deformed making people trapped indoors. Therefore.
If not, find a place to hide under as the first priority to save ourselves, and then open the door after the earthquake.
I smoked at the age of 20 since I was a college student.
I began smoking because my friends was smoking.
I quit to have a cigarette when I worked for trading company as second year.
So my smoking experience was almost 6 years.
Smoking is waste my money and makes me unhealthy. But I failed to do it many times.
The opportunity of graduation from smoking was my ex-boss.
He was also wanted to quit smoking.
So we decided to work on stop smoking together.
Setting up the rules of fine, reward and report each other, it worked so well.
This was the first time I experienced the moment when someone who have worked with me is going to retire.
And I found out, for some reason, that I've never worked at the same department when retirement day is waiting for someone who is supposed to retire.
It looks so sad whoever someone is.
Please help me 
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future." What would you say?
I want to say to you "give up your dream" but I wanm not your mother.
If you think about the dream earnestly.
I disagree with your dream.
But I want you to say "don't die early.
Don't forget many people who feel sad with your die when you die." I think you should think again.
If you want to be a war photographer when you think again. I encourage you with my all power.
You can make ti true.
It is certainly a dangerous job with risks, and you may regret it.
But I also want you to remember that time, your work is wonderful.
you can record the past and you can even change the future.
But you don't lose your dream because of that.
You believe in yourself, and go your own way.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
Indeed; war photojournalist is wonderful occupation.
But war photojournalist is very dangerous than any other things.
It will make many people sad.
If you die in the battlefield, everyone will be sad.
And your life is mot important of all things, so you must not be waste it.
You shoudl think again about your dream.
There are many good jobs than we thought.
If you find other dream, please tell me about it.
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future."
What would you say?
I would say "I don't want you to be a war photojournalist in the future.
Indeed; war photojournalist is wonderful occupation.
It can show the truth and draw people's attention to the problem.
But war photojournalist is very dangerous than any other things.
In the worst case, you may lose your life.
It will make many people sad.
Therefore, I don't agree with your dream of the future." 
What a special day,huh?
Today is a very special day for every single woman.
They are able to be so different and so similar at the same time.
They are able to be strong and weak simultaneously.
I disagree with it.
They are so beautiful and amazing that deserve having such a nice holiday every day of their lives.
I hope you can enjoy this day the fullest.
She made a decision to jump off her third-floor apartment behind her retirement.
I could not understand what it means precisely.
The following is a statement regarding application of a graduate school in U.
One of my favorite actresses was the now-retired American actress, Kristy McNichol.
And my favorite film on which she acted was the 1981 film titled "The night the light went out in Georgia", which was translated into "Good-by Georgia" in Japanese.
And intriguingly, Mark Hamill aka Luke Skywalker acted as a local cop.
The movie was filmed around the time the first series of Star Wars were being made, I suppose.
As for Star Wars, I heard that the new Marvel film "Black Panther" has been succeeding more than the latest Start Wars film "The Last Jedi" and so I think I'm going to watch it this weekend.
And intriguingly, Mark Hamill aka Luke Skywalker acted as a local cop.
Today is 8th March, Women's Day in China.
This morning, when I get out of gate of my living community, someone gave me a rose.
That rose freshes my morning and even now.
And when I came to the office, someone were talking about days off.
In other company, they might have half day off.
All the women staff in my company is given one bottle of shampoo yesterday.
Kindda like Women's Day's present.
Now really get the impulsion to learn something new now.
A lot of interesting things can do.
Usually twice, sometimes third times.
Good morning, my frineds.
This may sound crazy, but you should not waste any resource in post-apocalypse.
Do you want to have a job offer from this company?
Look at this picture, the trainee is cleaning a toilet with his bare hand.
I disagree from the two points of view.
We usually say 'It is repeating that it gets worm after the rain' each other as a greeting here in March.
The other day I saw it at a nearby supermarket.
If eldely people feel anxious or scary,a geverment recomends them to return their car's licenses by themselves to the police.
Also they can take some kinds of coupons because a goverment gives out them as one of services.
It's very convenient to drive cars, but I rcomended my father to return his car's license.
Also I think it's necessary for elderly people to have them in unconvenient places.
We usually say 'It is repeating that it gets worm after the rain' each other as a greeting here in March.
Recentry, on TV I have sometimes watched a news report that an elderly person mistakenly steps on the brake the gas pedal and finaly crash into a supermarket.
I found something about British people.
For example, first of all, they are proud of own country very much.
I guess they believe to lead the world for a long time although they are in the small island.
However, now that the US is leading the world and China is top of Asia.
winter is getting over, and the spring is about to begin.
I've been waiting for the season to come.
Speaking of the spring, it signifies a significant season for graduated students to start off a member of society.
They become a new employee, and have to adjust to a society, which is completely different from when they are a student.
I remember the first company I joined in as a new employee.
The company was a retail company.
I was in a hands-on training a few weeks with another new employees.
They were fast learners than me, so I was in a frustrating situation where I asked myself why am I so slow to learn whatever things I learned.
However, the things changed, once I got over it.
I asked someone that I looked up to, and they gave me advice,which was to keep four words in always my mind.
It was a "being helpful, quick, friendly and knowledgeable." Since I've kept that in my mind.
A boy held and shake her backpack while she was carrying it, saying to her that she cried so easily.
I made him come and say sorry to her, and asked him why he does to others what they don't want him to do and why he kicks his friends so easily.
He told me that his mother forced him to have his hair dyed so he doesn't want to be abused due to the blond hair.
I was very sorry to hear what he said and reflected not to realize how he is feeling.
A boy held and shake her backpack while she was carrying it, saying to her that she cried so easily.
I made him come and say sorry to her, and asked him why he does to others what they don't want him to do and why he kicks his friends so easily.
He told me that his mother forced him to have his hair dyed so he doesn't want to be abused due to the blond hair.
Yesterday, my daughter was crying when she got back from school.
A boy held and shake her backpack while she was carrying it, saying to her that she cried so easily.
A boy held and shake her backpack while she was carrying it, saying to her that she cried so easily.
I made him come and say sorry to her, and asked him why he does to others what they don't want him to do and why he kicks his friends so easily.
He told me that his mother forced him to have his hair dyed so he doesn't want to be abused due to the blond hair.
Even though he begged his mother not to do it, she wouldn't listen to him.
I was very sorry to hear what he said and reflected not to realize how he is feeling.
If you do miscellaneous too much, you cannot do your own important job.
I may be tired much these days.
Probably I should take a holiday.
Exhausted weekend
Hello I'm Tak.
I started to live in germany at the beginning of March.
In germany, there is no furniture in the apartment.
So I had to buy all of furniture that I need.
In the last weekend, I went to ikea.
I bought two beds, one double deck bed, two closets and one kitchen counter.
My car is too small to bring all these items.
So I had to go to ikea four times to bring them.
It was exhausted.
To make matters worth, only eleveter in my apartment is broken.
I had to take them from underground parking to my room that is in third floor.
Total of the items are 250 kg.
It was very exhausted.
Recently, there are many rainy days.
It is forecast that it will rain today as well.
It changes from snow to rain because of rising temperature.
After finishing today, I'll have day off tomorrow, so I'm happy.
I'll do my best to my work today.
It'll sunny tomorrow, so where should I go to place tomorrow?
I want to take a picture, because I can't take a picture these days.
Anyway, I'll go to have fun today too!!
These past three weeks, I've continued watching American movies, Sitcom and TV shows with English subtitles.
It has been kind of making me crazy because, suddenly, my only hobby which is watching movies turned into practicing matters.
Nevertheless, I don't regret this experience because I realized some pronunciation stuff.
I don't know how to say it but thanks to english_questions channel and my Jedi masters I enjoyed to practice it.
You know what I am saying?
These past three weeks, I've continued watching American movies, Sitcom and TV shows with English subtitles.
It has been kind of making me crazy because, suddenly, my only hobby which is watching movies turned into practicing matters.
Nevertheless, I don't regret this experience because I realized some pronunciation stuff.
I rushed toward a bookshelf I had right beside my bed as the footsteps kept growing stronger and stronger.
I took my favorite book, teared off it's leather cover and placed it on the tome, completely hiding it's blue color.
I turned toward it, to only find my father's furious gaze hitting me.
"Oriel, I asked you, and will not ask you again, where your mother is" he furiously said.
I still remember how a huge drop of sweat was traveling through my forehead, gently tickling my skin.
He swiftly stepped toward me and extended his thick skinned hand toward mine, pulling it up.
I followed the tome with my eyes while it was dropping, and saw how easily he caught it midair.
A while ago he was all over the news, because he accounted for the greatest leak of secrets in the history of U.
The question I would like to answer: is he a hero or simply a traitor?
Soon after, he landed at a job with the C.
but he quitted after being suspected of attempting to break into classified files.
A., he first discovered corruption in the Government.
intelligence gather, process and distribute the information.
Revealing information will have a short-term effect, but revealing the process is going to have a really harmful effect on the American intelligence for a very long time.
Compare this with a baker.
If I gave the whole town his famous apple pie for free, he will see a little decline in sales.
But if I put the recipe of his famous apple pie online, this would have a long lasting effect.
I have to regist my photograph to take part in SXSW.
He was only passionate about grimoires and of those horrible old books, there was nothing to get out of him.
"I would never have imagined that foxglove leaves mixed with a dish could cause death.
Mac Arthur had sent some bulbs to Mrs.
Toomie who forgot about it, took them for onions and prepared them in sauce.
"At least, answer the second part of your question.
The clouds broke, the sun came through, and a beam of sunlight illuminated the spot at which I was standing.
No sooner had I opened another window for the tit than it swiftly flew out.
The clouds broke, the sun came through, and a beam of sunlight illuminated the spot at which I was standing.
No sooner had I opened another window for the tit than it swiftly flew out.
I can't catch what the Video below says around 1:20, could you help me understand xxx part in the sentence?
Leaving Task to Others
They think that they would rather finish their task by themselves that teach others how to handle the tasks because it's faster.
If we can't others our tasks to others, we can't do something because what only one person can do is limited.
In fact, it may be true, but I think these people may lack the ability to grasp what the others can do and can't do.
Being afraid the sick house syndrome of my wife, I arrived home earlier yesterday again.
It was lucky that the chemical condence in the air wasn't as strong as we had been afraid.
However, it was still harmful for her that she got a headache.
I hope that some good medicines for these diseases will be invented in the near future.
I decided to sell two of my cars, because I was told by my company to go back to Japan permanently after five-year-stay in the US.
I didn't want to waste my precious time by negotiating a lot of dealerships.
I learned how to sell a car at maximum price when I sold my car last time.
After inspecting the cars, the salesperson tried to ask at what price I wanted to sell them.
I told him that Kelly tended to give a lower range of evaluations.
When I told him that I would go to the CarMax tomorrow, he gave me the higher price than I expected.
I went to Guam a few years ago, which was a last trip abroad I took.
I went to that trip with my wife and enjoyed it.
However, many people speak Japanese in Guam and I saw a lot of Japanese there, for example, on signboards, on map and so on.
If I go to a foreign country next time, I want to go to one where I can never see Japanese anywhere because I could feel that I would be away from Japan and surely be in a foreign country.
Also, I could check my English skill there.
I expect I could experience various fun things there.
I want to go to a country warmer than Japan since I can become cheerful in warm climate.
Which country are you want to go?
Last week I had a history class for Japanese who lives in London.
There were lots of historical items and documents about London from BC on display.
We can learn how the city was born and expand.
Especially I liked the London Wall.
This was the defensive wall built by the Romans in AD 200.
Seeing this wall walking on the street made me wonder.
London is so attractive city isn't it?
Hey everyone I'm kazooie.
That came for no reason, I have just felt like it.
Nobody reads me, so it doesn't matter though...
I never give it up anymore, I swear.
While these 5 years, a lot of things happened to me.
I wish car technology make progress, and make my car hot by timer.
Coca-Cola Company announced that they were going to sell canned vodka and soda here in Japan.
Although it is limited only in Japan, for Coca-Cola known as a soft drink company, selling alcohol drink is very unusual.
I think they want a new revenue source and choose Japan as a testbed market.
"This is much, much more question asking than you will hear when adults talk to adults."
I think the 'question asking' is used as a noun phrase, and there should have been 'something' between 'than' and 'you'.
My Friend Wrote About Dialect
The mean lost local language and dialect, it is forget valuable culture.
If there are only normal language, it is boring.
For getting fit, swimming is a great activity.
These day, I have studied English watching the movie "The Intern"
But, I don't know what it mean "Which brings me to today"
Can you tell me what it means?
and Can you cite the example using it?
In the lyrics, I read the following lines.
So, what should we take from those lines?
Things can change through time.
Situations can change through time.
There are people who are producing them, spreading them, and those who are willing to use them, but there are also people who are trying to resist the tide.
It will take time, but I think the writer is telling us that we will overcome.
This is what I thought the writer wanted to express by those lines.
What kind of being do you think we really are?
If your friend said 6 
Your friend: "I want to be a war photo jounalist in the future." What would you say?
Do you know it will be full of risk?
Even so you want to go to the front, I will cut off the relationships with you. Then I will support your dream.
Instead, please promise never die.
I was talking with a friend of mine an Lang8, and the topic was what cartoons you would recommend.
I was talking with a friend of mine an Lang8, and the topic was what cartoons you would recommend.
I was trying to buy a campaign period lipstick I had really wanted.
On the next day of releasing, I went to some shops. But, all the lipsticks on the shops have been sold out.
I checked on the internet why this thing have happened.
It said that the item is very popular among a lot of girls in Japan right now, and everyone rushed to the shops for it on the first releasing day.
There was a long line in front of the shops before shop open.
I was trying to buy a campaign period lipstick I had really wanted.
On the next day of releasing, I went to some shops.
It said that the item is very popular among a lot of girls in Japan right now, and everyone rushed to the shops for it on the first releasing day.
There was a long line in front of the shops before shop open.
Yestweday I waited for seconds before I respnd when I feel anniyed yesterday.
So I have done an action according to this kind of tips.
I will translate a related tip that was e-mailed this morning.
One of the most important skills to build a good relationships with neighbors is 
might be a prudent attitude rhat you stop speaking out immediately when you feel something to them.
You sould help yourself if you remember a dicsiplin that you wait 10 seconds when you speak.
if you wait for a moment and think of an annoying attitude from someone you ciuld change your mind and change words for them.
For example, even when you need to tell someone something it might help you that you have gentle words for them.
That's because they would not make you feel annoying.
Translation of one of the useful tips for not worrying.
Yestweday I waited for seconds before I respnd when I feel anniyed yesterday.
So I have done an action according to this kind of tips.
One of the most important skills to build a good relationships with neighbors is 
If you often feel regret soon after you say something to someone with any anger and you calm down to know it.
You sould help yourself if you remember a dicsiplin that you wait 10 seconds when you speak.
The secret meeting between Catherine of Medicis and Henry of Navarre took place in the castle of Saint Brice during the Religion Wars.
My ex-boyfriend was cheated on me and we broke up, I met someone new, but these relationships also ended badly.
I say everyone, that everything is fine, but it is not true.
The true is that everything is falling from the hands, nothing works and I do not want to do anything.
How to love yourself and return the desire to live?
My ex-boyfriend was cheated on me and we broke up, I met someone new, but these relationships also ended badly.
How to love yourself and return the desire to live?
For those who don't know me I'd like to say that thanks to Arrotino and some other people, I past with distinction the B1 exam last year.
Attending this course not only opened my doors through a new career, but it helped me a lot with the fluency.
I live alone at a old apartment in Tokyo.
The place is bit far from downtown and few cars and motorcycles run on the street.
So, it is relatively quiet and good to live.
My room is the very one where I sit reading book.
However, a bit old it is, and sometimes there is grating noise from somewhere in the room.
I wondered where the noise came from, and I looked around and saw what could make a grating noise.
I found that a window has badly fitting and it could make a grating noise by the wind.
Can I have, like, you know, like, it's there, like, I don't know like a sandwich?
Can I have the salted?
Uh, a salted and a side salted, please?
With a half of an avocado?
Where's my surf bird?
Hey, you, ma'am.
Do you wanna get some pizza over there?
I'm--yo, Tony, can I get the extra cheese, please?
Oh, yeah, yeah.
- She likes boyish hairstyle.
- Don't talk childish like that.
- He speaks English like a native speaker, but the grammar is terrible.
It's also used to describe a hearsay.
- The weather news said that a big typhoon is coming.
- It's a very American-like restaurant.
Though I'm an adult,I think like a teenage.
I don't share happiness at this moment.
I watch many movies,but when others ask about which is my favorite,I can't think of any movies at the moment.
Final meeting was finished over 9PM.
My coworker is an good idea-man, he create a lot of things with talking.
So, our meeting time to be longer every time.
6 You should think over before you buy a new underwear so that you will have no regrets later on.
7 I finally could understand the meaning of the title of the movie after I watched over the movie.
I've been saying that I need a bed, but I've been lazy to go buy that.
It's not necessary, but the quality of life is going to be better if there's one.
My room is going to be tidy, and I'm sure that I can feel happier.
It's now in my Todo list!
I've been saying that I need a bed, but I've been lazy to go buy that.
It's not necessary, but the quality of life is going to be better if there's one.
My room is going to be tidy, and I'm sure that I can feel happier.
I went to the cinema to watch "The Great Showman" with my mom.
At first, we wanted to watch another movie but its running time was not good for us.
So we changed plan.
Eventually, we did well to change because we were so moved!
Since then, I've lisntened the songs of "The Great Showman."
Our peak periods are going to start soon, and the workplace is strained these days.
I've never experienced the hectic periods, but my trainig officer says, "During the hectic periods, it's 8 times busier than usual".
I'm working at a factory with a store so even now there are so much work.
I have to do both work for the store and the factory.
We call companies that illegally force their employees to work long hours without paying for overtime, black companies.
Now, we're having special promotion.
If you bring three or four items, the total will be 10 % off.
If five to six items, 15% off and if more than seven items, 20 % off.
Clothes stuffed with down will be 50 % off untill May.
Do you have promotion tickets?
There's another good complimentary service, we store your laundry for half a year.
Our depositary shield the lights with 24 hour ventilation.
We'll give you a phone call when the returning date is closer.
Winter clothes take up much space, don't they?
I'm working at a factory with a store so even now there are so much work.
I have to do both work for the store and the factory.
We call companies that illegally force their employees to work long hours without paying for overtime, black companies.
If you bring three or four items, the total will be 10 % off.
Clothes stuffed with down will be 50 % off untill May.
Here, I'll put them in this plastic bag.
Our depositary shield the lights with 24 hour ventilation.
I'm working at a factory with a store so even now there are so much work.
I don't think our company is a "black company".
We call companies that illegally force their employees to work long hours without paying for overtime, black companies.
Now, we're having special promotion.
We'll give you a phone call when the returning date is closer.
We rather have a lake of determination and strong will to insist and resist different issues in life that take us astray and make us lose our concentration or focus.
Actually, I am that person - don't follow any special diet but try to avoid certain things.
It seems like it works for me to eat these things in reduced quantaties
My only and gentle coworker told me that there will be one or two crews join our team in the future.
I feel nice, because we only have two people in this team--he and me. That's great.
New member can help us when we feel worried and annoyed.
I made improved myself today, I read articles about interpersonal relationship.
Since it's getting warmer, I want to visit some art museums to get inspiration to my art.
I saw advertisement of Kyoto national museum, and it seems to be a very interesting art show there.
I did a drinking party with ex-coworkers.
I met them for a long time.
They changed a little,however they were ever.
I think to become conscious to change more.
I go on a one-day business trip to Kansai region two or three times a week recently.
Kansai region lies in the southern-central region of Japan's main land.
However, I reckon that traveling time is too long.
It takes more than six hours to the Kansai branch and back.
The point is that I spend quarter of each day in traveling.
I do not want to waste time so I usually check e-mails and prepare materials for meetings in it.
The spread of laptop, smartphone and Wi-Fi enables us to work at any time and any place with ease.
I know that Shinkansen is a means of transportation and is not a place of work, but I sometimes want to complain about it.
Some group of tourists are chattering and some babies are bawling their head off.
In addition, when I call someone I have to go to the end sections near the doors in each time.
I hope that a maglev train starts to be operated as soon as possible because it can dramatically shorten raveling time.
I heard it is approximately two times faster than Shinkansen.
She had hardly gone to bed when she began to sleep.
After this game,Ajax leave PSV by 10 points.
It's mean that Ajax become hard to win the Eredivisie.
Thought these are last 8 game for this term, I wont to don't give up.
Hello everyone
I have a two sister and parents but my father live in a separate house.
I fund of English and other languages, learning, textbooks shopping, Transformers, Sonic the hedgehog, Batman and parkour.
I want to be Translator in the future, thank you for reading my post.
Real name, Bruce wayne.
When he was young, he had lost his parents by criminal gun bullet.
Two important thing lost from Bruce.
He decided to perfectly crime eradication and he became the Batman.
I was started English learning two years ago, I think My English improved by compare to when I was beginner.
However, not good enough my English.
According to the some report, people who going to be professional level, it needs more take a one million hours.
This incident have a positive influence on Ric's life because he realised he doesn't longer want to postpone anything in his life.
This incident helps him to rewiev his life values and change his life.
The major turning point in my life was happend before Christmas a few years ago.
I worked as designer in one newspaper and the chief editor asked me to work on one big project in after-work time.
I worked overtime and I was pissed off about this situation, but after first day of the working on this project I was hit by a car.
Instead of working I was in a hospital with the concussion of the brain.
This incident learned me never do that I really don't want to do, because it will not be benifit for me anyway.
This incident have a positive influence on Ric's life because he realised he doesn't longer want to postpone anything in his life.
This incident helps him to rewiev his life values and change his life.
He understood that he regret about his wasted time for arguing about things which doesn't matter with people who matter.
The major turning point in my life was happend before Christmas a few years ago.
I worked as a designer in one newspaper and the chief editor asked me to work on one big project in after-work time.
I refused her, because I really didn't want to spent my free time for project which doesn't interesting for me.
After her persuasions I had to do this project.
This incident learned me never do that I really don't want to do, because it will not be benifit for me anyway.
After, I have computer classes at ten o'clock.
So in afternoon I have literature at four o'clock.
I haven't posted for a few days because the Lang-8 system didn't work well from Saturday to yesterday.
While it didn't work, as I wrote in my last entry, I expected that the administration was preparing for opening Lang-8 for new members, but unfortunately, it seems that the system was only down.
By the way, has someone found that the Lang-8 administration announced about this system down?
When it started not working well, I checked their Twitter and Facebook, but I couldn't find any comments about it from them.
Now, it's working well, but if I were a member of the administration, I would apologize to the members that they had to go through the difficult time.
I'm sure premium members had the same situation, so at least, the administration should do it for premium members.
I can guess the administration worked hard to fix the problem, but they should say something to members.
I don't understand why the owner of such a language site don't want to try to communicate with members in words.
Since I've been using Lang-8 for 8 years and similar things have happened many times, I've gotten used to their attitude, but I still want to tell them that it's important to let members know what's going on when such a thing happens.
Lang-8 started working normally!
By the way, has someone found that the Lang-8 administration announced about this system down?
While it didn't work, as I wrote in my last entry, I expected that the administration was preparing for opening Lang-8 for new members, but unfortunately, it seems that the system was only down.
Actually, it'll be over in one hour.
Yesterday, it wasn't as bad as the weekend, but it still seemed slow.
Today, it became much better.
While it didn't work, as I wrote in my last entry, I expected that the administration was preparing for opening Lang-8 for new members, but unfortunately, it seems that the system was only down.
By the way, has someone found that the Lang-8 administration announced about this system down?
When it started not working well, I checked their Twitter and Facebook, but I couldn't find any comments about it from them.
Now, it's working well, but if I were a member of the administration, I would apologize to the members that they had to go through the difficult time.
I'm sure premium members had the same situation, so at least, the administration should do it for premium members.
I can guess the administration worked hard to fix the problem, but they should say something to members.
This is the language site and we are learning languages for communication.
I don't understand why the owner of such a language site don't want to try to communicate with members in words.
Since I've been using Lang-8 for 8 years and similar things have happened many times, I've gotten used to their attitude, but I still want to tell them that it's important to let members know what's going on when such a thing happens.
Now, Lang-8 is working well, so I hope everybody enjoys using Lang-8!!
Does "as" in the following sentence mean "while"?
or something else?
The woman will get her money as a legal fight over releasing her identity plays out in court.
We'll be miss you so much.
It was supposed that he would be here a hour ago.
We'll be miss you so much.
It was supposed that he would be here a hour ago.
Romero's masterpiece movie "Dawn of the Dead" was filmed back in 1978--in collaboration with the Italian filmmaker Dario Argento.
There, a lot has changed since then, but a lot seems to still remain the same.
recent conditions
I've been absent for a while.
Actually, I was a little depressed.
I'd stayed at home during winter, for about a couple of months.
My contract work finished last December and the new work is going to start next May.
So, I've been free until May.
Because I'm married and my husband earns for us, I don't need to be warried about household budget.
I've been doing house work everyday and sometimes I've been shopping.
I'd like someone to correct these sentences above.
Read Harry Potter
I bought a book of the Harry Potter and the Sorcere's Stone and I'm going start reading it.
I saw the movie yesterday for I remember of the history.
A: I have a car of Lexus.
A: I have a car, Corolla.
A few days ago I had to go to an official government building to fulfill some papers.
It was a mandatory thing to show it to the government worker.
In that moment I thought maybe it could be at home in somewhere.
When I came back home I began to look for it in the entire house for two days but I couldn't find it.
Then I thought about going to the police station to get a copy of if.
First I had to make a date through internet on a government website.
When I filled the form to get the date a warning message appeared in the screen telling me that I couldn't get a date and I had to go to the police station in person to solve the problem.
Lucky to me this morning I went to the police station and I could discover that I lost my id in some place and somebody sent it there.
I save a lot of time and money too.
That makes my day happy.
He and I are mainly only speak Japanese, however I would like him to earn the knowledge of English language at least.
Even though, We cannot really expect for that education.
Because Japanese English teaching style is considered as the worst all over the world, but it cannot be changed at once.
My niece has learned a lot of things at the elementary school for four years.
Suddenly, she told us about science while we were having dinner in the house.
At first, I was confused about what she said because I thought that two things were the same things.
She kept explaining that when vapor gets cold by air, then it changes to steam.
It's been almost a month since I started "squat challenge".
Squat challenge is kind of a 30 days workout program.
On the first day, you start 50 times of squats, and add 5 times every following day having a day off after three days of squating to rest your musle.
This means you do 250 times of squats on the last day of 30 days.
But, I just do 200 times of squats every day now, because I've lost the track of counting!
lol I also skip the resting part because I don't really have musle pain.
Slowly but surely, I can see a little changes in my body!
On top of that, I've lost a weight a little!
For women in important positions such as teachers, there are many women planning to become pregnant, but I have never heard anything apologizing to the workplace or receiving instructions.
Even if I become pregnant How about a work environment not to say "congratulations"?
It seems that there is also a trade-off between nursery school officials and child care leave due to lack of workers, but this is the reality of Japan with a serious birthrate problem.
For women in important positions such as teachers, there are many women planning to become pregnant, but I have never heard anything apologizing to the workplace or receiving instructions.
Even if I become pregnant How about a work environment not to say "congratulations"?
It's " Darkest Hour" It's about a story of British Prime Minister Winston Churchill who saved us from the horrible war.
He was an important key person during World War II.
I imagine that it was most horrible period in the world history.
A British actor Gary Oldman offered him to work with him and Mr.
Tsuji and colleagues won Oscar for best make up, hairstyling in this film.
My friend Xe want to come to my city to find a job teaching Chinese in school.
Normally schools seek for teachers who has lots of experience, but Xe not graduates yet.
I belive that my dance moves are right.
Was this song designed the dance by Ryu-ichi theacher?
The chocolate cakes made from the egg and the chocolate and more.
By the way, this movie show my teacher!
He wear suit and black-haired slim man.
That section: passivity1&2
The chocolate cakes made from the egg and the chocolate and more.
By the way, this movie show my teacher!
He wear suit and black-haired slim man.
The chocolate cakes made from the egg and the chocolate and more.
write something to practice my thinking and mind.
I will write every for prove till reading and writing are easy to me.
Today is first day, I'll back tomorrow!
Grammar exercise 11 - tax havens
Why can't you treat them in the same way?
International companies have great lawyers, so they are able to avoid taxes.
Every employee is liable for tax because he earns money.
He hid our money from a company.
This chairman doesn't want to pay taxes, so he doesn't want to arise revenue from his company.
He tries to reduce earnings to reduce the tax burden.
It isn't possible because the company generated high income.
He should fairly report the revenue.
When he uses a tax evasion he will go to the prison.
This law prevails in many countries.
He tries to find a loophole in a low.
This can bring his company to the end.
This is a willingness on the part of associates to pay tax fairly.
Important components of the production masterpiese are music, respectively, an orchestra and a conductor, and also all-star cast.
The artistic staff and technical personnel are playwright, who writes plays; scriptwriter, who writes a script; dramatury, who interprets the play; producer, who has general controlof the money for the play; casting director.
who charge of finding actors.
To become an actor a person must have such qualities as a talent, a creativity, a physical fitness, a liveliness.
She is absent from work because of children.
She wrote wrong adress.
I got a phone call from deliery person.
Today, oh my goodness, I get out of the house for the first time in a week.
After having a cold, I need to take it easy for a while not to relapse.
After having a cold, I need to take it easy for a while not to relapse.
What a long time I had a cold!
Today I watched the movie "The Beguiled".
I watched a trailer and the movie was looked interesting.
I was expected too much.
Although it is written in the red letter on the poster "Women going madness", 
This trailer is made very well and it has good advertising skill.
By the way, I watched Kirsten Dunst after a long time in the movie,
she is very beautiful and ugly for each work, doesn't she?.
Unfortunately, this time was the latter.
Today I went to the post office to send a broken unmbrella to repair shop.
And I came back to my house after that.
I didn't find my wallet in my bag.
Luckily, the post officer called me that he has my wallet.
He checked my driver license in my wallet and called me.
It was arelief to find my wallet.
So I'm happy for his kindness.
And I came back to my house after that.
My name is Fernando, 22, from Brazil.
What you think about?
What's the most annoying thing about people from LA?
Is it a slow accent?
The--they sound like kind of like a dog with peanut butter on their roof of--on their roof of their mouth I think.
Umm, Italian I've heard it's great.
But using the Japanese calendar sometimes cause a little trouble.
The present Emperor abdicate at the end of April 2019, so 'Heisei' is also going to end at that time.
Then, the date 'Heisei 33' does not exist in the calendar.
I think that tendency delicious foods is worse for body.
For example fast food, instant noodle, convenience store food.
I crave for those thing once in a while, However I don't want to get weight.
I want to still continue maintenance on my body if I can do it.
I think that tendency delicious foods is worse for body.
I crave for those thing once in a while, However I don't want to get weight.
Mitochondria is an important organelle which produce energy substance, ATP.
Interestingky, mitochondria is inherited only from mother.
Therefore, all human being shares same mitochondria that cones from a single mother who used live in Aflica Continent very long time ago.
The payment is free until five times.
It will take 113 Yen if you take over five times.
Thank you, honey, for years of support and tolerance, for every single night when I had to go out and work, every date that I was late for, every mess that you didn't have to but still chose to stand by my side, you are the best award I can ever receive and everything I've accomplished, I own it to you.
Optimist's life is always happy or become happy end definitely?
I am not depressed, but I sometimes think whether there is a person who always have all the luck.
I know the man who looked luck guy, but he has been in trouble now.
Optimist's life is always happy or become happy end definitely?
I am not depressed, but I sometimes think whether there is a person who always have all the luck.
I know the man who looked luck guy, but he has been in trouble now.
Listening to that music style is making you get better at singing.
I like to cut off people when they're talking because that's the right thing to do.
The guy in the black Camaro cut you off on the highway and almost makes you lose the control of your car.
It's kind of stupid of you to think that someone gives a shit about you're saying.
What should I do before they will come.
The schedule is drinking session.
does this sound natural?
I mostly wear leather shoes rather than sneakers because I need to straighten my appearance when I work with wearing suits as usual.
If you see a person wearing a worn out pair of shoes, it gives you the impression that they are sloppy or really busy sales person.
On the other hand, if you see someone wearing brand name shoes that cost a fortune, you know the person has plenty of money to splash around and is a kind of a show off person.
I just have few shoes by function or occasion such as leather shoes, running shoes and walking boots.
Translating 16
She picked up the ball and run away.
She didn't look at frog.
Royal family is sitting behind the table in the dinning room when somebody knocked at the door.
-Little princess open the door.
I am here your friend, the frog.
The princess got frightened and told the story her father what happened in the garden that morning.
The old king said: Your promise have to respected.
Go and enter the frog.
The frog came into the palace, jump to the table, ate from princess' plate and drank from her glass.
The frog lay down into the bed, too.
The princess was crying but she doesn't want to do it.
The princess closed her eyes and go to animal with disgust.
In that moment when she kissed the frog it became a beautiful prince.
They fell in love each other, got married and they still live if they hadn't died.
The princess got frightened and told the story her father what happened in the garden that morning.
In that moment when she kissed the frog it became a beautiful prince.
Sometimes,I wonder if he has no common sense.
Today is the 100th my company's anniversary.
By the way, the oldest company in Japan is construction company called Kongo-gumi which was established 1,400 years ago.
Today is the 100th my company's anniversary.
By the way, the oldest company in Japan is construction company called Kongo-gumi which was established 1,400 years ago.
Today is the 100th my company's anniversary.
But even so she strongly made up her mind, I'd support her.
One, her life is herself.
I think that we can't affect her desicion.
I don't want her to regret if she doesn't do.
His punctuations of Japanese sentences are mess.
I don't know in what regard, he is criticizing my Japanese sentences.
The length of my Japanese sentences are normal, I think, but I don't know my English sentences.
Indeed, I also think sentences should be kept as short as possible so that people can read it easier.
Ooku allowed entering only women and the general.
The compartment was a woman's castle and there was a severe class society.
Ooku allowed entering only women and the general.
Only women and the general were allowed to enter the Ooku
What about commas?
And need I use "which" before "cooked by the best chef in Asia" or not?
However, in these New Year holidays on the Anna's great party our foreign guest in a beautiful small new red haute couture silk dress had already wanted to order her new friend, who has a business in Moscow, this famous dish, cooked by the best chef in Asia, with royal Mediterranean mussels online at the site of the popular London restaurant at lunchtime.
And need I use "which" before "cooked by the best chef in Asia" or not?
However, in these New Year holidays on the Anna's great party our foreign guest in a beautiful small new red haute couture silk dress had already wanted to order her new friend, who has a business in Moscow, this famous dish, cooked by the best chef in Asia, with royal Mediterranean mussels online at the site of the popular London restaurant at lunchtime.
Id like to able to speak and understand English well, so Ive researched how to learn English online.
However there are ton of information about it.
So I realized that the only thing can make me happy is a dream at night.
Where is the most famous for ski in the world?
The ski area was close of business this season.
It is little bit early than usual season.
I will enjoy skiing end of March.
When something bad happens, I tend to associate them with my everyday actions.
Do 50 Squats For Good Sleep
I gained 3 kg because there are many sweets at work.
My pants are getting tight and my face looks like a balloon.
I started doing 50 squats before sleeping.
There are two good things.
Okay each person have their own preferences.
They are have cute look, cute voice and attractive for some caucasians.
Based on my view esp lately some east asian women are also like caucasian men more than east asian men.
There are some fact that we can't avoid every where is about plastic surgery.
I think every women want look pretty, they can have a good look with plastic surgery.
I felt sad why would they mocking at us by the appreance?
They said south east asian women not attractive, ugly, and flat chest etc.
That thread is a good place to make a discussion but please not to looking down at other ethnicities.
Tbh I found myself lack of confident when it comes to " beauty ", I know that I'm not pretty, attractice or etc.
Every girls want become pretty and they want have a good looking guy, or maybe get many attention from guys.
In the end I remember something, that the pretty face is nothing last forever.
When you die it will be disappear, you'll bring nothing in front of the God.
I won two preview tickets, so I went to a movie theater to see it with my friend last night.
I watched it breathlessly.
The criminal was unexpected person.
My 8 years old son promised to play his friends in the park after school.
He was looking forward to playing with this friends from a long time ago.
He was waiting in the park for a long time, but his friend did not come.
The next day he heard his friend at school the reason why could not come.
A friend answered that he went to other parks with another friend.
But, I think my son is all right because I knew he got angry with his friend at the 
I would like to live strongly with each other.
My 8 years old son promised to play his friends in the park after school.
He was looking forward to playing with this friends from a long time ago.
My son decided to think that his friend could not come because of a sudden errand.
The next day he heard his friend at school the reason why could not come.
A friend answered that he went to other parks with another friend.
But, I think my son is all right because I knew he got angry with his friend at the 
I would like to live strongly with each other.
I am going to moving to London from next month.
I really look forward to living there.
This opportunity will makes me grow up.
I made Chirashi Sushi for celebrating Hinamatsuri event on March 3, Japanese girl's day, to wish for happiness of my 3 years old daughter.
Chirashi Sushi is traditional menu on the girl's day and it's very easy unlike rolled sushi because it's just a put any kinds of your favorite fishes and vegetables over the spreaded sushi rice on the dish.
I also displayed a set of hina dolls made by my grandmother in my house and we had a special dinner with my family.
Q: Your friend wabts to be a war photojournalist.
I don't allow you to become it.
You had better become a doctor.
Because it is safer than a photojournalist.
I will never permit that!
If you go to the front line, I will break up the relations with you.
---First, I'd strongly oblige to the opinion even after that she seems to decide to go there, I'm sure that her will is firm so I'll let her go.
I'd say him to "give up."
How serious you say?
You should stop being a war photojournalist.
If you become it, you need a lot of courage and money.
I've learned how to use "even if, even though, even when"
I was confused them, because these are very similar when Japanese people translated them.
So, would you correct these sentence?
Even if I want to go abroad, I wouldn't spend much money for.
Even thought I wanted to go Lake District, I couldn't go to there because I didn't have much money.
Even when I wanted to go abroad, I wouldn't have much money.
Today is raining.
Yesterday I attended the reading club, one sharing member he put up with one idea which impressed me, "Love your feathers.
I like that member a lot, he always shared a lot of interesting things.
The corresppndence to happy is not sad, but boring.
I won't ask how life was fifteen days ago, I only want to know how life will be after 15 days.
Afer fifteen days, I will start my new job in a new company, in a new industry.
On chinese new year, people go back to their hometown to gather with their relatives.
It seems like an economic crisis just happened.
but lately the shops start opening gradually.
but lately the shops start opening gradually.
But for example, in cases where there is a seal and a signature, is the verb conjugated as for plurals?
The fact is that I had coursed that subject on the first half of 2017 and sat for the exam now, in 2018, and as I had not "been in contact" with the subject for almost 6 months, I had forgotten some things...
The aforementioned woman whas able to sound native 99.99 % of the time but every now and then a very small mistake appeared.
I would say that the most important factor is the willingness to sound like a native.
If you feel identified with the Spanish culture.
If you want to fit in, then it will be easier for you to overcome the psychological barriers to speak like a Spanish native speaker.
We must not forget that sounding like a native requires mastering the pronunciation of single words and acquiring the right intonation, the right rhytm.
In certain jobs, for example, sales, telemarketers, the employer will look for a native or a person with a native like pronunciation in Spanish.
So maybe for someone who has learnt the language after puberty is nearly impossible to sound exactly like a native 100% of the time.
The aforementioned woman whas able to sound native 99.99 % of the time but every now and then a very small mistake appeared.
So it is possible for some people to sound like a Spanish native speaker, even if they learnt the language after puberty.
In certain jobs, for example, sales, telemarketers, the employer will look for a native or a person with a native like pronunciation in Spanish.
Reading a book, I came upon a sentence below.
He relishes the particular smell that inhabits those rooms, an order of rot, sweat, dried blood, must, sewage.
I doubt that "order" might be a typo of "odor".
Could anyone clarify for me?
Reading a book, I came upon a sentence below.
When I was sleeping in bed last night, I woke up because of chill.
My mother is in hospital.
My mother is in hospital because of developing lung cancer.
She is seventy two years old.
Her lung has no pain from now on, but she hurts terribly in her bones.
I have no idea why I can't use "environmental" for this sentence of No.1.
Does it pay off the effort that it takes to speak like a native?
Nevertheless, there are people who have a good ear or have fallen in love with phonetics, intonation, etc, for those I would encourage them to go as further as they can.
Speaking like a Spanish native speaker requires mastery of the grammar and the willingness to sound like a native.
In addition, it will be necessary devoting a lot of time to phonetics, intonation etc.
For most students of Spanish, it is not realistic trying to acquire such a level due to the hours, effort and circumstances necessaries to achieve that level.
Unless you are an actor or a person who is going to work for a company that requires that kind of mastery.
Speaking like a Spanish native speaker requires mastery of the grammar and the willingness to sound like a native.
Nevertheless, there are people who have a good ear or have fallen in love with phonetics, intonation, etc, for those I would encourage them to go as further as they can.
For most students of Spanish, it is not realistic trying to acquire such a level due to the hours, effort and circumstances necessaries to achieve that level.
Nevertheless, for most students reaching a clear pronunciation should be a desirable objective.
Does it pay off the effort that it takes to speak like a native?
Unless you are an actor or a person who is going to work for a company that requires that kind of mastery.
Nevertheless, there are people who have a good ear or have fallen in love with phonetics, intonation, etc, for those I would encourage them to go as further as they can.
Speaking like a Spanish native speaker requires mastery of the grammar and the willingness to sound like a native.
In addition, it will be necessary devoting a lot of time to phonetics, intonation etc.
Nevertheless, for most students reaching a clear pronunciation should be a desirable objective.
Working on your Spanish pronunciation and intonation from the beginning should be a priority so that you do not acquire bad habits that are difficult to get rid off later on.
What will I do if tomorrow is the last day in my life?
It is said that it's important to imagine the last day of life for making a decision every moment.
How do you want to spend the last day of your life?
Have you ever imagined the day?
One day, you're heading toward a funeral.
You really get surprised because the deceased is you.
It is the funeral is for yourself.
What do the attendants behave?
I was thinking that there was a hint in this assumption because I can realize how I want to be seen by my family, friends and coworkers.
To achieve this, I need to contact with her with a kindness, trust and sometimes strictness.
Like this, I was thinking I had to do everything while thinking of my last day every moment.
My thinking is changing.
It was very delicious and I want to eat again.
6  You should think over before you buy a new underwear so that you will have no regrets later on.
7  I finally could understand the meaning of the title of the movie after I watched over the movie.
8  You can edit a picture even after you took it, if you use this software.
I usually have no concentration on studying, sometimes lose self-control easily.
In class, I always decide to learn after class rather than follow the teacher.
However, I almost won't study during the following days.
Just a few sentenses
He doen`t like being involved in any scandals.
Having done her chorest, she ate a cake.
She was tired and decided not doing her homework.
Walking the dog I usually drink coffe.
Brushing her teeth she often repeats her favorite poem.
Going home she usually visits her grandmother who lives near.
From 1988, Australians use polymer money.
This kind of money has published on the 200th anniversary of the European residence in this continent.
Polymer money became popular very soon, because they were hard and waterproof.
Nowadays, you can see Australians money with motion pictures.
Anyway, the method of Australia for publishing this kind of money have applied by some other countries like New Zealand, Romania, Vietnam and Maldives.
That's a good idea for making an undamaged money.
I tried inspecting in pet hospital to know a reason that his hasloss of appetite and cramps in leg.
Doctor said all test result is a nomal.
I want find his reason of pain.
Nowadays, modern life has become easier because of advantages in technologies which have changed our life dramatically.
However, this causes many problems like addiction from gadgets among children, and consequently, they spend less time outside, resulting in health concerns and other problems.
Firstly, there is a multitude of children have been playing on the phone from childhood, this means that now they cannot imagine their life without it.
So, if they have a chance to go play outside or stay home, they will choose the first option because children like their phones more than active games.
The reason for that can be that they did not have such experience.
Parents can urge adolescents to go outside if they forbid to use gadgets for several hours.
As a result, teenagers will like outdoor activities and will use their gadgets less in the future.
Secondly, the more adolescents spend their time on computers, the less they healthier because they have a passive way of life.
For instance, teenagers can let themselves go and even do not notice it because they are fully immersed in their gadgets.
Finally, a stature because of a bad vision is quite widespread health scare.
Maybe some parents had thought that it would pass, but they failed because it is not a period of growing up.
Parents have to control the screen time of their children and learn them how to distribute their time.
For example, there is a myriad of tough films and games which influence badly on adolescents.
This problem can be worse if children do not play with peers in active games outside because it allows them to relax, take a break, and take their mind off of such games.
Without such activities, it leads to health cuts.
To sum up, as I have written, computers, smartphones, tablets and other gadgets leads to the lack of time outside and severe health problems like health concerns, psychological problems and the lack experience of active games with friends.
In order to help speedily these people, parents and doctors have to combine their efforts and help them.
- Goalkeepers in soccer can't keep a ball in hands for a long time to gain time.
- My boss was late for a business talk, so I talked about the super ball to gain time with clients, who are big fans of football.
- It's the best to make money doing what you love.
- My boss was late for a business talk, so I talked about the super ball to gain time with clients, who are big fans of football.
- Goalkeepers in soccer can't keep a ball in hands for a long time to gain time.
This restaurant provided us many kind of delicious hot baked bread, and we were able to chose them!
She broke her stomack next day.
It must be too much of a good thing.
Repeat doing over and over again,
you can get capability of doing everything you want.
Before I send the source code of the app, could you prepare a draft of the contract with the copyright is of the publications committee of the guideline?
We will send you the source code of the app after the conclusion of the contract.
Before I send the source code of the app, could you prepare a draft of the contract with the copyright is of the publications committee of the guideline?
We will send you the source code of the app after the conclusion of the contract.
Best regards,
I finished my interview today.
Only when they had come close enough for me to understand the words they were saying, did I brace myself, flew down the stairs and grasped my only chance.
In this moment, the door behind us was jerked open, and the shadows that were approaching us from the terrace stepped into the lights of the lanterns in the car park.
As the staff sergeant answered only with raising his eyebrows, I repeated my question.
I will travel between and December and January
I've been back here in lang-8 after a long time.
The inter-collegiate will held in Nagoya tomorrow.
Our team finished last practice.
I got a lot of gifts from my teammate.
None of them are too high quality!
Today I attend the farewell party of part-time job.
Finally, I will quit the part-time job that I have worked since I was a second year university student and I begin to work in full-time this April.
I feel that days go by so fast.
How much did I change until now compared with when I entered the university?
I have an inferiority to others so much.
I still have the inferiority that I felt when I entered my university.
I'm still stupid and not talented man, but I have to manage somehow.
Anyway, I'd like to enjoy today's party easily.
Could you explain the sentences.
How they are different with each other.
This study would provideinsight into the molecular mechanisms of how RKIP inhibits the occurrence and development of GC.
This study could provideinsight into the molecular mechanisms of how RKIP inhibits the occurrence and development of GC.
This study may provideinsight into the molecular mechanisms of how RKIP inhibits the occurrence and development of GC.
This study might provideinsight into the molecular mechanisms of how RKIP inhibits the occurrence and development of GC.
This study should provideinsight into the molecular mechanisms of how RKIP inhibits the occurrence and development of GC.
This study shall provideinsight into the molecular mechanisms of how RKIP inhibits the occurrence and development of GC.
This study provides insight into the molecular mechanisms of how RKIP inhibits the occurrence and development of GC.
Managererial accountants might be generally averse to outsourcing 
Managererial accountants could be generally averse to outsourcing
Managererial accountants would be generally averse to outsourcing
Managererial accountants should be generally averse to outsourcing
Managererial accountants seems to be generally averse to outsourcing
My memory is bad not only at English vocabulary but everything.
But I think that vocabulary is the most important skill to master languages.
If you know a good method, please tell me that!
My memory is bad not only at English vocabulary but everything.
But I think that vocabulary is the most important skill to master languages.
If you know a good method, please tell me that!
Employees are taxpayers, but employers are tax withholder.
Most an alcohol price provide an excise tax.
I want to pay out my money on travels.
This choice was coincidental.
All of us admit that our life has changed a lot by the invention of technology, some of people believe that technology made our life better than before.
Others prefer the time before discovering technology.
In my opinion, I agree that technology has made our world more comfortable and convenience.
Firstly, technology made our life more comfortable than in the past.
With the invention of automobiles, you can go to any place in a short time in comparison by using feet or animals.
Also, you can visit any country in the world by the invention of airplanes.
On the other hand, the electronic devices are very great instruments for us.
It give huge benefits for humans.
There are massive numbers of electronic devices that are considered nice and we have accustomed to use them, like smart phones, computers, hair dryer, iron, heater, etc.
Secondly, all what I mentioned above in one hand and the invention of the Internet in the other hand.
The internet gives us a lot of opportunity that we have never imagined before.
By the internet, you can download bunch of books and read from them anytime you want and anywhere.
Also, by the Internet, you can communicate with any person you know or if you want to make new friends by using social media.
You can search about jobs by specialized websites on the Internet.
You can go shopping by the Internet, you can order delivery foods from any restaurants by the internet.
You can study, entertain, and a lot of things the internet can introduce it to you.
that are difficult to count.
By the Internet, our world become closer to each other than before.
To conclude, for sure there are disadvantages for any invention but in general, technology has more advantages that I mentioned above that made our world best place to live and enjoy it.
According to the CUP, the current proposal on the formation of a new government presented by JxCat and ERC implies to respect the Spanish legal framework, the one that has never been respected by the Spanish government itself.
JxCat and ERC announced on Monday that they are both working on an agreement to present to the CUP as far as the end of this week.
Sources near the negotiations said that they have already modified several points of the initial one in an attempt to convince the CUP to join them.
People studying English always says you should watch a drama, and their recommendation is the drama called SEX AND THE CITY.
I tried to watch the episode1 yesterday.
The story is funny and you can learn some natural phrases in the drama.
The population had a 4-fold increase in this 100 hundred period.
To begin with, it can be seen that Asia has the largest population in both periods of time, however, as the years passed population decreased, in 1900, Asia had 60% of the population, and in 2000 it fall down to 54%.
By 1900 Middle East did not appear within the population records, in 2000 along with North Africa they registered a population of 6%.
Finally, it is interesting to point out that America maintained its population across this period of time, having a percentage of inhabitants of 5%.
The pie charts below give information about world population in 1900 and 2000.
The pie charts show information about world population in two separated periods of time: 1900 and 2000.
The population had a 4-fold increase in this 100 hundred period.
To begin with, it can be seen that Asia has the largest population in both periods of time, however, as the years passed population decreased, in 1900, Asia had 60% of the population, and in 2000 it fall down to 54%.
Same trend showed the Europe region, whose population decrease across this 100-year period, going from 25% in 1900 to 14% in 2000.
By 1900 Middle East did not appear within the population records, in 2000 along with North Africa they registered a population of 6%.
Such was the case of the Caribbean region, which had not come up by 1900, but, in 2000 this region together with Latin America registered 8% of the population.
I found a YouTube channel with videos of full trash talk.
I already asked you about it on the other post.
Although it seems to be a good alternative, it might cause long-term problems.
Firstly, back country is the habitat of thousands of different animal and vegetal species; said species have several and vital functions within our ecosystems.
Secondly, it is our job as human beings to figure out the way to solve the problems concerning to traffic and housing, mankind should not go everywhere invading landscapes just to meet their needs.
Professional of the architecture and engineering areas should be able to properly and conveniently design transportation systems as well as households.
It sure is not easy, as the population is daily growing, however, we must tackle the situation and seek the best alternative not only for us as human beings but also for our environment.
Garbage Day of Recycle Materials
Garbage sorting system in Japan is complicated, and it's slightly different every city.
On the garbage day of recycling materials, we take out newspapers, cardboard, old clothes and fabrics and glass bottles.
We have to sort glass bottles out by color.
I've thought that sorting garbage makes bother me since I moved here.
However, I heard that landfills have been full of garbage in the world.
I changed my thought.
Garbage Day of Recycle Materials
It's a garbage day of recycling materials next Friday.
I've thought that sorting garbage makes bother me since I moved here.
When I tried to log in, the speed was very slow.
The server seems better today.
This Japanese sentence implies that he was expected gold or silver medal.
- We ended without goals.
- We ended without goals.
Becsuse generally most people moves in March or April in Japan. And a lot of Moving companies and estimate companies are busy. So I think I move easily in June.
Shopping tired me.
Yesterday I went shopping at famous shopping mall which located at 30minites drive from my house.
Why am I shopping?
To buy gifts to my girlfriend.
But I am not good at shopping because shopping is needed lots of things I have to think!!
At which shop should I buy?
I wonder if she would be pleased with the present I bought etc.
Dose anyone know a good idea solving this problem?
I am watching the theater on this weekend.
The ticket is just little bit expensive for me however I would like to watch the theater at any cost.
I am watching the theater on this weekend.
The ticket is just little bit expensive for me however I would like to watch the theater at any cost.
I am watching the theater on this weekend.
The ticket is just little bit expensive for me however I would like to watch the theater at any cost.
The Theater on the Weekend
The ticket is just little bit expensive for me however I would like to watch the theater at any cost.
A lots of pollen recently cover Tokyo.
I'm badly suffering from allergy.
Especially inside of my nose is sore.
I took some medicines last night.
I wish that the pollun have gone soon.
I want to improve my pronunciation better.
To be honest, I don't really like Japanese accent.
So since I began studying English, I have been caring about it.
Yesterday, I filmed myself to make a self-introduction video.
It was actually the first time that I listened to my voice that is speaking in English.
And then I noticed that I still have the Japanese accent.
I think my pronunciation is not too bad, but still sounds like Japanese accent.
I want to speak with a natural accent...
So I decided to record my voice every day and try to figure out what is my problem.
I can't do by myself!
My birthday is 11th Mar.
Many people died of the earthquake.
I thought it was just normal one.
My wife, we had not married yet at that time, booked a restaurant at night to celebrate my birthday and we enjoyed the dinner together.
After we parted, I stopped by a bar near the dorm I lived at that time.
The old couple run the bar and I often contact to them even now.
I knew how serious and devastating the damage was there for the first time.
Since one of my best friends lived in the disaster area, I was really worrying about him and tried to call him many times.
My family celebrate me, I appreciate them and I feel really happy.
I will take a toefl test in the middle of May.
Hoping to find a friend,a teacher in here.
love you all!!
Since one's personality is more complicated than it looks, you cannot understand other people completely.
Nevertheless, just exchanging a few words with a stranger can make you feel as if you had known him for decades.
This kind of misunderstanding sometimes becomes the start of a long friendship.
I knew then, that In Germany they have no cicadas.
Stinging into the stones, The locust's trill.
I wonder why he used the "locust" instead of "cicada".
Not so long ago, as I watched some TV program reporting German travelers visiting Japan, they looked intrigued by the sound of singing cicadas.
They didn't seem to have any idea about the source of the sound.
I knew then, that In Germany they have no cicadas.
Cicadas live only in warm countries like Japan and therefore I suppose most Europeans don't make out the singing of cicadas.
I took it for granted that there would be full of singing sound of cicadas in mid-summer seasons.
The memories of summer vacations in my childhood could be evoked accompanied by those ringing sounds of cicadas with a feeling of nostalgia.
Moreover, March is the end of a year here.
Acturally, I don't like busy schidule but I try to enjoy enjoy parties.
I bought new clothes and had my hair cut to begin with.
I had headache from yesterday that probably cause to the hay fever.
I drank medicine, so I hope heal it quickly.
How long keep it?
I'm fed up it.
I hope the cedar pollen don't scattered in air.
I regret not having done my best on my GPA.
It is not highly considered when enrolling graduate schools and applying for jobs in Japan.
On the other hand, it gets indispensable in many respects in foreign countries.
I am being confronted with my low GPA score.
Unfortunately, there is no way to turn it over to very high scores for a student who is about to graduate.
I should have known better than goofing off with my friends during classes!
There are two ways of expression.
There are two ways of expression.
Most worst thing for health is...
I thinking that most worst thing for health is getting something too much even work out, have vegetable, get stress, ext...
At the time, I thought that most worst thing for health is getting stressed even though I didn't know why is it worst thing for health lol.
Why I thought getting something too much is I have some experience people around me.
First one is about seafood.
One of my friend worked at fishmarket, then she has been having rest of seafood almost everyday, unforthnately she was had seafood allergy by too much having seafood.
It is same thing work out, get stressed too.
If you work out harder that would be brake your health some day.
If you had been getting stressed, It would be brake your health.
These days, I visited Kagoshima for trip.
Kagoshima is where those who contributed to Meiji Revolution are from.
Then I came the sea in order to go fishing.
Kagoshima has beautiful sea and abundant of fish.
Syrian Civil War. Are We Getting Used to Watch Painful Images?
The civil war in Syria is lasting seven years now, and it doesn't seem that a finish or peace is proximate.
The war began in the first months of 2011 among of protest of Arab Spring, across many Arabian countries.
The peace protests in Syria were dissipated with violence, with guns, even shelling against inoffensive people.
Since then, every day there are heartbreaking videos and pictures which show the pain of the Syrian people amid of the war.
About this war, there are a lot of audiovisual material, there are many witnesses, victims, and survivors who show how they struggled through the war and their suffering.
Of course, there had been attempts at finishing this war, United Nations, Europe Union, among others but the failure was a constant in those attempts.
About this war, there are a lot of audiovisual material, there are many witnesses, victims, and survivors who show how they struggled through the war and their suffering.
Of course, there had been attempts at finishing this war, United Nations, Europe Union, among others but the failure was a constant in those attempts.
So many years have passed and It seems that we are normalizing indifference to what is happening in Syria.
The ads are really various, but most of the ads that I've seen most are about English schools.
I'm not sure why they want to advertise although they are already known in Japane.
I think one of the reason is that it's common that many Japanese can't speak English, so they want to take an advantage of it as a business.
Japane is one of the top developed countries, but obviously we are behind developing countries in terms of English.
We have not learned spoken English, we've learned written and listened English through exams.
It is irritating to deal with them.
He made me an eye contact first, and then 
You can have one.
Jone some sweets.
4  Did you give your elder sister any present for her birthday?
the reason why I had to come here is that I tried to work at VFX company.
I have got used to it but I have felt I need English skill more recently because although I can work with my current English, I have some situations that are difficult for me to explain.
So I start to keep a diary log here
There are not many traditional houses and such in Japan anymore in the town and cities.
So, if you want to glimpse them, you must come and see our house where is in the area designated as Important Preservation Districts for Groups of Traditional Buildings.
On the episode, they covered a story on an American man who live in a village at risk of dissapearing and work as a Community-Reactivating Cooperator Squad.
He is 31 year old but he is the second youngest person after a high-school kid in the village and he is like a son of all the residents.
He said that he kind of upset when somebody say to him that he can use chopsticks very well or call him with his first name like Western style while they call other Japanese worker with "san" as a polite way.
He think he is the same with them so he wants them to interact with him just like they do to other Japanese.
I had never thought that kind of things so I bet I would say those things to people from abroad.
I think that means that he had been soaked into Japan that much though.
I wonder if he will go back to his country or find a job and stay in the village or anywhere in Japan.
I wish he would come to my town because now they are hiring Community-Reactivating Cooperator Squad!
I watched a show called "The reason why I live in Japan" the other day.
On the episode, they covered a story on an American man who live in a village at risk of dissapearing and work as a Community-Reactivating Cooperator Squad.
He is 31 year old but he is the second youngest person after a high-school kid in the village and he is like a son of all the residents.
He said that he kind of upset when somebody say to him that he can use chopsticks very well or call him with his first name like Western style while they call other Japanese worker with "san" as a polite way.
He think he is the same with them so he wants them to interact with him just like they do to other Japanese.
I had never thought that kind of things so I bet I would say those things to people from abroad.
I think that means that he had been soaked into Japan that much though.
I wonder if he will go back to his country or find a job and stay in the village or anywhere in Japan.
On the episode, they covered a story on an American man who live in a village at risk of dissapearing and work as a Community-Reactivating Cooperator Squad.
He is 31 year old but he is the second youngest person after a high-school kid in the village and he is like a son of all the residents.
He said that he kind of upset when somebody say to him that he can use chopsticks very well or call him with his first name like Western style while they call other Japanese worker with "san" as a polite way.
I had never thought that kind of things so I bet I would say those things to people from abroad.
I wonder if he will go back to his country or find a job and stay in the village or anywhere in Japan.
I wish he would come to my town because now they are hiring Community-Reactivating Cooperator Squad!
Why cats knead paws
Zoologists explained, for what purpose cats made massage motions to the man or other animals.
There are a few variants of explanations for specialists.
By means of massage motions, animals from biological family Felidae smoothed a grass, to prepare a place for sleep.
Today I watched the movie " your name".
The movie is in set in both the big city of Tokyo and the Japanese older country side.
So you can find not only traditional old town and rural scenery sorrounded by beautiful mountain and nature but also the latest brilliant view of a city.
The movie made me nostalgic because I was born in country side and lived in Tokyo.
After I go back to Japan, I'm going to visit the real place used in the movie.
Warm days continued for a while, but it got cold yesterday.
Influenza is in fashion this year, and we need attention to cold.
What he emphasized the most was to save and as much money as possible before starting the business and to secure as many people to lend money for emergency as possible.
He told me that he had lost hundreds of thousands of dollars for the first year because of no customers.
I have heard many times that more than half of new restaurants close door when one year passes.
He told me that it's very important to know about it, because most restaurateurs get so anxious that they give up their business before fruitful second year comes.
Choosing a topic has always been hectic for me.
So, I thought to seek help in choosing a topic from my sister whom I had an argument with just a few minutes before regarding my old garment that she wants to throw away, but I want to still wear it.
I asked my sister to say any word that I can write about.
But, I started wondering what makes the things nasty.
How could you stop things from being Nasty?
Lastly, we should avoid making opinions about somebody without knowing him.
There are situations where we start presuming things without knowing the actual reasons behind the situation.
Please feel free to express your opinions regarding the same and I would love to hear on what things you agree or disagree with me.
Please let me know any mistakes or any changes in sentence construction that you think can help in improving its quality.
We can use a simple one - dimensional value to express the emotion, the value of number is the intensity of the emotion.
If the value is less than 0, it indicates that there is a negative emotion, if the value is greater than 0, there is a positive emotion.
This is an illustration of the classification of emotions in the book "cognitive structure of emotion".
human subconscious will make a decision, but people always can't notice it.
Human beings can not do pure rational decisions, decision making are mixed feelings and emotions.
conclusion: we could use machine to perceive the inner feelings that human beings can't realize themselves, so that people can clearly know what their real feelings are and their subconscious choices are.
In April, 68, Cayo Julio Vindex, the Governor of the Roman province of Gallia Lugdunensis initiated a rebellion against Neron.
Galba was killed in January, 69
Other three Emperors governed Rome during that year, until the last one, Vespasian, pacifyed the Roman Imperium.
Neron was a polemic Roman Emperor.
Galba, who was the Governor of Hispania Terraconensis, accepted his proposition and inmediatlely marched with his army to Rome.
When the news of Vindex rebelion arrived to Neron, he inmediatlely ordered to the Roman army placed close to the border of Germany attack Vindex.
But this victory wasn't useful for Neron because the Senate of Rome used this rebelion as an opportunity to gred rid of him.
The army who defeated Vindex desagree with the appointment of Galba as Emperor of Rome and started a rebellion against him.
Being Afraid of Sick House
I was afraid of the chemicals from the wall paint of our building affected the health condition of my wife, and I went back home just after my work to check it.
I arrived at home at 6:30 PM, and I found that the wall wasn't painted yet.
Because there were no need to circulate the air of our room to dilute the chemicals, I took the time for preparing dinner.
Today, the painter will do it and I'll go home early again before my wife.
Lang, 1885 put forward similar emotional theory that the physiological changes of the organism form before the emotion.
So sadness is caused by crying rather than crying caused by sadness.
Not shudder caused by fear.
However, this theory unilaterally emphasizes the role of the autonomic nervous system and neglects the regulation and control of the central nervous system, thus causing a lot of controversy.
Button pressecperiment.
Cannon, 1927 theory emphasized the integration of the brain, thus having the Cannon-Bard Theory of Emotion.
Frontal lobe is an important part of the cerebral cortex.
As the command and control center of the brain, it can make decision functions and high-level thinking.
So we can come to the conclusion that the brain first makes the subconscious decision, and then produces emotional changes.
It is considered that emotion is a kind of experience tendencies that are beneficial to the perception and beneficial to the mind and away from perception as a harmful thing.
Schachter 1970, the generation of emotion is attributed to three factors: stimulating factors, physiological factors, cognitive factors.
He emphasize the important of cognitive process on regulating emotion.
I had those players left available, I had only a doubt between Lulic and Leiva between those who send in the first 5 and all 2 had given the go."
"We were very good, apart from Kalinic's shot, at the end we conceded little or nothing to Milan that we knew was going to have a gameplay on restarts."
"It is normal that in a home and home games the looseness of thoughts is less."
The hunger to put the ball inside, the tiredness after 120 minutes, the weight of the in or out.
Because such games are in or out, with a lot at stake."
"When going down by a score Lazio and Juve are the best on comeback wins.
"Napoli runs, Tottenham turns goes well, the bianconeri, as of results have nothing to envy, but have to deal with some emergencies: De Sciglio, Cuadrado and Bernardeschi out for a long time, Dybala has returned for the derby because of the offensive emergency, and for the seasonal illness of Mandzukic and the prudent management of Pipita Higuain, who could easily find a slot against Inzaghi's men."
"Entering his football sunset, Ferenc Puskas actually enjoyed some of the best years of his career, making his debut for Real Madrid on September 14, 1958."
I received a letter from dental clinic.
The letter said that your timing of the periodic medical examination came.
I'm reluctant go to there because I afraid about result it.
It may be more severe if I don't go to there.
I hope that the result no problem.
We were Walking an afternoon sunday and we saw 2 haitian taking pictures of theirself, and my friend said: they are celebrating a Sweet 16 or what?
how many pictures hahaha, and we started laughing about it.
She drank a coffee with her friend.
I'll read this article over and over again until it make sense.
She has brought her daughter up alone.
They are putting pressure on him to he takes this exam.
This is the place where the production is made.
I want to make huge money but I could not find the way how could I earn big amount of money fastly.
I can not earn enough money by doing only a job, I should have to do somthing like business.
If I depend in one source of my salary then I would never get a freedom in financial.
If I think about the business then what kind of business I have to do.
I don't get any idea.
I don't have any experience in business.
But without doing anything how could I get the experience.
I want to make huge money but I could not find the way how could I earn big amount of money fastly.
I can not earn enough money by doing only a job, I should have to do somthing like business.
If I depend in one source of my salary then I would never get a freedom in financial.
If I think about the business then what kind of business I have to do.
I don't get any idea.
But without doing anything how could I get the experience.
My chief and I have been working about a new product for a client of the factory we work for.
That new product has been having a lot of little problems and we has been under pressure by the big boss.
We talked about our little problems of process of assembly and we found together the possible solutions.
At the end of the meeting the customer was satisfied of the work we made and me and my chief as well.
After the customer was off, I was tired but very proud of my job.
I like very much work with my chief and try to solve problems in team.
Now I'm going to see my little lovely niece and I'll play with her up to she goes to bed.
I Wish I Write Perfectly all thing I figure in my mind with looseness, Imagine could change minds with just words and make people happy and motivated.
What a beautiful is when somebody has the skill to transform sadness and happiness, and now these days, full of despair and agony, children begging for changes and nobody can explain them, Why Human Being is such a Bad?
I Wish I Write perfectly, perhaps I Could change Something
M life in the UK: Do you want to work in Japan? What CV is like in Japan? 
Generally in Japan, you have to prepare some official CV documents and you have to fill in by hand in Japanese.
You have to take a picture of you and put it on like a passport.
It's depends on the company.
Personally I think that CV in Japan is really unfair as Japanese society require your appearance, age and sex.
If you invited assessment or job interview, you should wear black or navy business suite like try not to stand out.
Japan is still closed society unfortunately.
Holiday in Japan or being students in Japan will be fantastic but woking in Japan can be nightmare.
M life in the UK: Do you want to work in Japan? What CV is like in Japan? 
Generally in Japan, you have to prepare some official CV documents and you have to fill in by hand in Japanese.
You have to take a picture of you and put it on like a passport.
You have to write about basic information like your name, address, age, date of birth, sex, home town, personal statement, educational background and work history.
Personally I think that CV in Japan is really unfair as Japanese society require your appearance, age and sex.
If you invited assessment or job interview, you should wear black or navy business suite like try not to stand out.
Japan is still closed society unfortunately.
Holiday in Japan or being students in Japan will be fantastic but woking in Japan can be nightmare.
So it will be necessary that the muscles of our mouth get used to it.
it will be recommended to pay attention to the way Spanish native speakers move the mouth, jaw and tongue, so that we can imitate those sounds when we talk.
It will be useful the help of a small mirror to check out if we are moving the mouth, etc, properly when we speak.
Even people who haven not lived in a Spanish speaking country might be mistaken with a native in a short conversation if they have worked very hard on their phonetics and intonation.
So it will be necessary that the muscles of our mouth get used to it.
it will be recommended to pay attention to the way Spanish native speakers move the mouth, jaw and tongue, so that we can imitate those sounds when we talk.
It will be useful the help of a small mirror to check out if we are moving the mouth, etc, properly when we speak.
Even people who haven not lived in a Spanish speaking country might be mistaken with a native in a short conversation if they have worked very hard on their phonetics and intonation.
I spoke with her for around five minutes and I did not realize that she was not a Spanish native speaker until a friend of hers told me a week later that she was from Romania.
The second time I spoke with the Romanian woman, knowing that she was not from Spain, I paid close attention to her speech and I noticed some slips of the tongue every three or four minutes.
I previously wrote the an entry that our dog could put his feet in the door knob to open the door.
After that, he also masters the way to open a sliding door with his nose.
Thus, when my daughter is studying for the test at her study room, he always runs into the room and starts to disturb her studies.
I admired his high learning ability.
After that, he also masters the way to open a sliding door with his nose.
Thus, when my daughter is studying for the test at her study room, he always runs into the room and starts to disturb her studies.
I admired his high learning ability.
Regarding my semester plan, I need to share some information with you.
3rd week of my practicum in human genetic:
On Wednesday 11.04.18 at 13:00 - 15:15
On Thursday 12.04.18 at 13:00 - 18:00
On Friday 13.04.18 at 09:15 - 18:00
4th week of my practicum in human genetic:
On Wednesday 18.04.18 at 13:00 - 15:15
On Thursday 19.04.18 at 13:00 - 18:00
On Friday 20.04.18 at 09:15 - 18:00
I am actually very flexible with the timing, so, I would be very grateful if there is a chance to compensate those 2 days, like by staying later than usual in the lab, if it were possible.
Thank you very much again for your email.
A: A lot of anime-fans have an account of SNS, such as a weblog, LINE, Twitter, and Facebook.
B: A lot of anime-fans have accounts of SNS, such as weblogs, LINE, Twitter, and Facebook.
"We are all good mates, that picture on the socials was only among Brazilians because we are always tied to help each other "
"The kid dominates the midfield in the airplay, the speciality of the house.
"Like if his trademark was simply turned into a spare part, and eventually Milinkovic has established himself to the attention of everybody."
"When you need Milinkovic, he is there, with head and feet."
Which team was more confident during the questions?
Is this correct: 
As Azeem saw his father Arbaaz arguing with his uncle, Arbaab, he went to call Timkey and Pinkey who were playing with their dolls in the street with their friend, Popri.
Arbaab asked his father to divide their property, but he refused.
My current job mission is to manage training session for managers.
Our training session is divided into three types.
Trainees repeat learning new skill and trying it at own workplace for six months.
This finding is key to upgrade and make successful organization.
Third one is for upgrading test for general manager.
Frankly speaking, I'm not so interested in preparation for upgrading test.
First one and second one let me know how trainees have changed.
This is my favorite factor of current work.
The most difficult concept in the foreign language is the style of writing.
Maybe the style of communication, or "the manner", I'm not sure about the correct synonym.
It always slips away when I try to catch the right tone, the correct situation for a word or a phrase.
Be sometimes ironical, sometimes silly, sometimes...
bureaucratical, that's a fun too, why not.
I already can enjoy some of the English stylistic games in the writing of others but only when they are emphasized.
And of course I can not repeat that trick on my own.
What of French...
I guess I can be consoled by the fact that I know three languages instead of one and I'm good at one of them!
Not everyone in the world can enjoy the Russian poetry in the original, right.
And a few can enjoy the Russian poetry in the original _and_ read English and French too.
I just noticed that I can not remember a proper spelling for some words such as "empasized" and "a speech".
Good for me I'm here now.
Until this January I've been learning English almost purely by listening, for years.
It was a good practice, but writing is a crucial skill for me.
The most difficult concept in the foreign language is the style of writing.
Be sometimes ironical, sometimes silly, sometimes...
bureaucratical, that's a fun too, why not.
Not everyone in the world can enjoy the Russian poetry in the original, right.
And a few can enjoy the Russian poetry in the original _and_ read English and French too.
I just noticed that I can not remember a proper spelling for some words such as "empasized" and "a speech".
Until this January I've been learning English almost purely by listening, for years.
Or leave a comment about difficult concepts for you in the foreign language you learning.
We have an old saying in Chinese, "An old man loses his horse, but you never tell whether is bitter or sweet", which means the same as "Misfortune might be a blessing in disguise".
This is quite suitable to describe my experience with the worn out phone.
After a few testings, the staff told me that there was not much he could do and he had to replace mine with a brand new one.
I was like, why don't I just get a latest iPhone if I have to pay that much?
It was a shame that Apple doesn't have a rating system for their staff or I would definitely give him five stars.
The other good thing was that I got myself an ipad by the way, and there happened to be a special discount for uni students during the first month of the semester, plus a Beats Bluetooth headphone as a gift.
I am sick of my boss's lies.
My boss has promised me a raise for months now but still hasn't given me one.
A few month ago,
I found the leather gloves in Japanese department that you made.
I found the leather gloves in Japanese department that you made.
You can study whatever you want here," a college student asks in the exhibition.
There are lots of things I want to do," I replies.
You can study whatever you want here," a college student asks in the exhibition.
There was a chilly draft blowing through the gloomy hallway.
I almost missed a step and came to my senses.
I went to the park with children in the morning, but we went home immediately because it was strong wind.
Recently my son's favorit is to watch Youtube.
He is watching it everyday.
He always says " I want to watch Youtube" to me.
I want to have him to play toys and outside.
This afternnoon I wake up at 2,30 pm.
Last night at work It's not more thing to do becouse there was untill problems of material.
Leonardo went ciclying for workuot.
Michela arrived home from work at 14,30 pm and cleaned the houseand.
Now cooking the pasta and meat for us.
It is said to be equivalent to MBA in Japan.
I've been interested learning MBA for a long time, but since I haven't graduated university and it doesn't cost as much as MBA requires, I decided to study for this.
Sometime, there was good time, sometime not.
My strength is to promote products from nothing by using SNS or SEO. And streamline sales process, create sales copy and etc.
Otherwise, promotion doesn't go well.
Until I get 30 years old, I didn't realize that there were not so many great product out there.
Not only that, most of products suck. Especially for small business owners.
Most of them have little money, knowledge and experience.
After I found this fact, what did I do?
I kept thinking how value is created.
All the book as to start-up or anything similar didn't explain about that.
That was quite a difficult question.
Interestingly, when I search for the word value in google, its definition is different in Chinese and English.
In Chinese, it's defined as "time it took" in short.
In English, it's defined as "how worthy or useful" in short.
Anyway, I live in Japan where capitalism is believed.
I am getting sleepy, so I will continue this diary tomorrow or later.
It is around 22pm now.
I'm gonna go to bath and go to bed soon.
I got the result of TOEIC.
Average at the time I took was 589 points, and my score was 590 points.
So my score is almost average.
I studied English vocabularies intensively for two hours.
Today, my little sister came to inquire after me.
I will be able to get back to work tomorrow.
Yesterday, I found a Japanese book titled ''don't talk with a foolish'' in a book store.
As a result, I didn't get the one.
Because I could image that I would lose the confidence after reading this book.
However, now, I regret what I didn't buy the book.
Don't talk with a foolish
Yesterday, I found a Japanese book titled ''don't talk with a foolish'' in a book store.
I wondered whether I should buy this book for a while.
Because I could image that I would lose the confidence after reading this book.
However, now, I regret what I didn't buy the book.
T is a woman of 30s and Clinical psychologist.
She will take maternity leave from 13rd March.
We spent the time at psychological lessones.
I thought that we should have to make small talk now.
However, I was glad about only the above.
Dear T
Finally,our customer promised, they clean all of the returnable box, at their responsibility.
There were over twenty people at the deli corner to get food at the reasonable prices.
Maybe, next time, I want to get a pack of fried chickens or croquettes for our lunch.
It is so helpful.
I found that I do assume Huntington has implied the assumption of a stable party system or at least people have a particular psychological attachment to one specific party.
Thank you
Best,
Like vocabulary, pronunciation an accent are part of a bigger context.
The first step as I said is discriminating, recognizing the sounds.
Not only has our brain gained certain rigidity, but also the muscles of our mouth might not be prepared to make those sounds correctly.
When Laetitiar will do her housework everyday, we will have to expect everything.
You won't go out from here before you have finished!
I'll come back as soon as the lecture begin.
We will be able to come and visit you when we have the car repaired.
In Japan, it is said that competent housewives know when supermarkets are having a sale.
I assume that's because I am kind of twisted.
I just wanted to resist against their advertisement that says "If you don't buy at us on Tuesday, you're an idiot!" 
At my house we have still more than 30 eggs." For a while I was speachlos not being able to follow the story.
In Japanese food culture, as long as I know, we don't use many eggs at a time.
It's over my imagination.
Why did the person buy so many eggs?
I know, the answer is: "That's because eggs are cheaper on that day."
It's like a suggestion by hypnotism: "If you don't buy now, you will regret it in the future, and lose your money when you want to buy for the next time."
Buying too many unnecessary food in a sale price still costs buying nothing.
I'll prepare some snacks and Japanese tea, also bring plastic picnic mats and a tarp tent!
Please remember to bring your own lunch and drinks you want!
I hope it's going to be sunny on the day!
I can't wait to have the picnic with you!
Why don't you ask your Korean friends who want to talk in Japanse as their practice!
I hope everyone can enjoy the meet up!
See you soon
For a short moment, this desperate fight in the air had captivated me just as as it had done with the staff sergeant, when I suddenly heard the rumbling of heavy boots from one direction and loud voices from another.
Involuntarily, I looked for an escape route, but there was none.
The car park was surrounded by a low wall and the only hiding place was the wooden shed, where I had laid out my equipment to dry.
The voices from the terrace turned into dark shadows that turned around the corner with voluminous gestures and bursting laughter.
When I am nervous, under stress or with worry, I can't sleep well or eat much, either.
Last a few weeks I had forgotten what the feelings are like, when I'm sleepy.
I had been under extreme tension, so I slept and ate less.
When I am nervous, under stress or with worry, I can't sleep well or eat much, either.
Last a few weeks I had forgotten what the feelings are like, when I'm sleepy.
I had been under extreme tension, so I slept and ate less.
I was relieved and now, I feel sleepy and like eating.
They are wonderful feelings.
I had been under extreme tension, so I slept and ate less.
They are wonderful feelings.
I want to say thanks to you all, who helped me, listened to and advised me with my problem.
I like it when I see my cat is sleeping in the sunshine by the window.
I like it when I see my cat is curling up herself in her house.
I like it when I feel my piano sound is softly melting in the air.
I like it when my cat eats snack which is on my hand.
I like it when I dip myself in a warm bath at the end of the day.
I like it when I see my cat is curling up herself in her house.
I like it when I feel my piano sound is softly melting in the air.
but I saw my brother fixed car by himself.
Study and repair yourself.
I mean, something big problems like break error, engine error etc.
but Small problems, You can handle it.
and another way is check up your warranty period, You don't need to cover the all the costs within warranty period.
As far as you may know, my first business trip took place on the 7th of Feburary and it was tough for me given my physical condition.
Nevertheless, I have to admit that this unpleasant journey has allowed me to establish contact with our counterparties and know in depth their needs, which are not consistent with the message passed by our project leader.
Because of this information distortion, our project was delayed and our performances were not convincing.
With hindsight, we could conclude that we, researchers and deleveloppers, should have communicated with our counterparties and jumped into their shoes from the very beginning in order to make sure that we are on the right track and eventually be able to deliver a satisfactory product that meets exactly their needs.
I have asked our project manager why our company didn't send us on site earlier, "our boss underestimated the challenge of this project so that he was reluctant to do so," he replied.
Surely I can't blame my boss for this unwise decision but we can take lesson from this experience to standardize development process.
Nevertheless, I have to admit that this unpleasant journey has allowed me to establish contact with our counterparties and know in depth their needs, which are not consistent with the message passed by our project leader.
Because of this information distortion, our project was delayed and our performances were not convincing.
With hindsight, we could conclude that we, researchers and deleveloppers, should have communicated with our counterparties and jumped into their shoes from the very beginning in order to make sure that we are on the right track and eventually be able to deliver a satisfactory product that meets exactly their needs.
I have asked our project manager why our company didn't send us on site earlier, "our boss underestimated the challenge of this project so that he was reluctant to do so," he replied.
Surely I can't blame my boss for this unwise decision but we can take lesson from this experience to standardize development process.
I want to sleep because I worked last night until lately.
I have to work at least one week.
To get sick doesn't allow to me.
I feel a little cold.
I encountered a must-see video for those who loves cats.
And then, the parent cat squeezes the kitten.
Not so good
School started again, which has caused me in a bad mood for a long time.
I spent 3 weeks with my family.
I felt comfortable and happy, and I almost forgot that I have to go back to school.
During my undergraduate period, I had same feel.
But now, I missed my undergraduate school and that period.
When a person evaluates an object or an experience, he is actually imaging the feeling which the associated consequences will bring to him.
Patients with impaired VMPF have normal intelligence but can not feel or express certain emotions.
A study found that these patients also had difficulty in making decisions in their daily lives, which shows that the emergence of human decision-making is accompanied by emotions, is supported by emotions, is an irrational process.
A book about idea 
I have finished reading a book today.
the book is about idea.
It was very interesting book.
I am going to go to the reading club about the book.
I am looking forward to join it.
There was a undercover cop outside your house two days ago.
Uh, yeah, what do you--what is so funny?
What's coming.
Umm, no, I mean, obv--definitely my twenty fifth birthday where my friends surprised me with, uh, Kris Jenner holding my birthday cake.
I mean, I don't wanna sound like, "I know like that is like a famous person story." But, like, when I was a kid, my parents would be like, "It was your birthday yesterday." Like, we didn't have like parties, so my only birthday parties are after I'm famous, so suck my dick.
can you help me fix the sentences
1: the shell conch is the natural thing not perfect, no one is the same, and no one is complete, for example, if the God mind the natural handicap, please take care of it carefully.
2: craft jewelry, shell carving, wind bell technology products, often modify the more beautiful shape, will not be exactly the same as the map, the actual shape and color is physical.
3: coral, clam, gemstone ornament, using natural raw material, the individual will be above the small flaw spot and mind the shot.
4: all pictures are photographed in kind.
A little color difference may be produced because of different lighting and display reasons.
Please contact the owner and discuss the way of transportation before 5..
Do not affect the pleasure of our transaction because of transportation and other unnecessary problems
Can be used 
Conch and shell can be used to dress up the style of home, not just the ocean style.
Many of us often see their figures in modern, English countryside, Mediterranean, Korean pastoral, and so on.
They can be matched with any scenes and styles
They can be posted on the wall, a special background wall, friends to your home, you will admire the show ingenuity!
They can be put into the fish tank, with sand, grass, rockery, to give the fish a carefree paradise, to give the fish a sweet home 
Would you like to come?
A: Would you like a water?
A: Would you like to go to the football match?
I'm inviting Lena und Dima too.
After dinner we can watch a film on DVD!
Maybe see you at the weekend?
PRONUNCIATION AN ACCENT
From point of view, this is the most problematic area to master.
It is very easy for children to acquire the accent and pronunciation of a language until they turn 5 years old.
However, after puberty it is very difficult to achieve a native like accent.
It is easy for children under 5 to produce the sounds of the Spanish language or any other language without effort.
If a child has enough hours of exposure to the Spanish language before turning five and continues having exposure to the language later, he or she will speak Spanish with a native or native like accent.
However, after puberty, it is much more difficult to discriminate the sounds of a foreign language.
At this point, If you want to reach a native like pronunciation and action Spanish you will have to use different strategies than a child.
A child grasps the sounds naturally, apparently without effort, but and adult needs to tackle this in a different way.
It is very easy for children to acquire the accent and pronunciation of a language until they turn 5 years old.
It is easy for children under 5 to produce the sounds of the Spanish language or any other language without effort.
At this point, If you want to reach a native like pronunciation and action Spanish you will have to use different strategies than a child.
My best friend contributed to making the sales of 100 million yen only in a single year and received top award several times for her excellent performances.
Therefore, I always want to go to a bed soon.
Recently, I'm trying to read BBC news when I have time like when I'm on the train or in lunch break.
I hope it lifts my English level up and gives me knowledge of what happening in the world.
Log In Lang-8
These days it had been not easy to log in Lang-8, but I was able to do it smoothly today.
And, if you can do something for you happy, I'm always ready.
And you are one of the few girls that make me shy...
My princess, I do not know if I have success in the future or not?
But I know, if I can do something to make you happy, I'm always ready.
And you are one of the few girls that make me shy...
My princess, I do not know if I have success in the future or not?
But I know, if I can do something to make you happy, I'm always ready.
'Heisei' is one of the era names called 'Nengo'.
'Showa' ended at the time the former emperor died in 1989 and then 'Heisei' started.
Dodge ball game has been also getting more popular in our elementary school lately.
Once upon a time there was a wonderful princess she had a gold ball.
She played with ball every day.
Once of time, she played near the lake and the ball fell into the water.
The princess would sad, she only were sitting on the grass and were crying.
How old was the ten year-old kid that you were talking to yesterday?
One of my friend who is really good friend for me.
And working in the US is not so easy thing for Japanese.
He was in tough situation but he achieved what he wanted.
But now he complained about his life because he is not comfortable in his company.
I think most important thing to live is not where we live.
When I picked up my luggage and left the airport, I felt fresh ocean breeze on my face.
It was cold night but you could tell that it was raining not that long time ago as I could feel humidity in the air.
While I was waiting for my friends to pick me up in front of airport, I saw this lady.
She was tall and beautiful, the way she was dressed you could tell that she's not working on minimal wage.
It took me a minute to realize who is she.
Mostly because of people around me screaming and getting excited and the security keeping her safe from everyone else.
That's not bad for a first hour there, isn't it?
Right after that, my friends picked me up and we went to get some food
No, he suddenly showed up to us.
To be frank with you, my uncle hide himself for about 17years after he borrow some money from brother and sisters.
At that time, I was so young so I didn't know detailed situation.
Of course my parents don't tell about those thing to us, I just guessed that there's something happened.
On saturday, my mom came to me and said, "Your uncle would coming our home tomorrow"
I thought the uncle was my mom's second brother with no doubt.
But my mom tells me it was her third brother.
She said that she got a call from him on friday and he was wondering to find my mom for a long time.
He had came around my apartment and ask my parents name to find them, but he couldn't find at that time.
Anyways, I was little bit nervous to meet him and I thought it's better to give them alone so that they can catch the lost time.
After I came back to home, my parents and 2uncles and aunts came home.
He looked changed a lot.
He gain his weight a bit, but it was not that bad.
It was so glad to meet him again!
He tell us that he ordered frige and TV for us.
I didn't believe at the first time but it was real.
we win the lottery!
I'm so happy to see my mom is being happy and I also happy that my uncle is healty and happy that I found my uncle!
When does she come to me?
She camed to me.
When did she come to him?
Why does she come to me today?
But he want come to you.
Then it published in Germany.
It was wrote by German who lived Japan.
I learned about this book today contingently.
In my country, the critical spirit is not common, but this old book will tell me about Japan, which was observed from a different perspective.
Why We Alive?
After retirement, I realized that work was not all of my life.
What is the life?
After retirement, I realized that work was not all of my life.
1  I was listening to the heavy metal music while I was on a bus.
3  I was watching Thomas and Friends on You-tube while I ate dinner.
4  It was raining while I played outside alone.
6  I'm always quiet while my wife is in a house.
7  I was playing a dull game on a smartphone while I waited my girlfriend coming.
3  I was watching Thomas and Friends on You-tube while I ate dinner.
6  I'm always quiet while my wife is in a house.
I took interview today because of applying for the internship of Vail ski resort in Cororado.
I don't know how to say these people, just like the woman in the photo and the place where they help paying.
Plus, I'm not even sure the word, calculate, and counter are appropriate in this 
One of the most famous laws is the 'Bald-Hairy' in Russia.
This theory is strictly applied to every leader, since Lenin, who found the USSR towards the current president Putin.
So we can soon assume that the post-Putin leader must be exuberant!
South Korea has another presidential rule: almost all the ex-leaders are supposed to be charged guilty soon or later.
Today, I heard news that the former South Korean President Lee Myung-bak was summoned for his possible corruption by prosecutors.
It was just last year when South Korean incumbent President Park Geun-hye was arrested and jailed.
I don't think this kind of law is favourable to South Korean citizens, because the frequent change of political fundamentals may prevent many capable politicians from running a Presidential election.
The real thing finally approached.
I gave my team mate a bookmark detail of the tournament.
It was hard to prepare by myself...
Today I submitted my resign report to my manager, but she didn't sign on it.
Today I submitted my resign report to my manager, but she didn't sign on it.
My manager didn't want me to leave.
She told me she could raise my basic salary, but I didn't want to stay.
He just purchased one order.
Now I have to pass this customer to my colleague.
But that also mean you give up other possibilities.
He is a clumsy man, but he is a obedient and good man.
Please to fix!
If it were up to me, I would pay mothers a salary for raising their children to provide them whole opportunity to invest all their energy in this work.
And, by the way, this work has no days off, holidays and pensions.
It seems that people have not understand yet how destructive it is for mankind.
Please to fix!
If it were up to me, I would pay mothers a salary for raising their children to provide them whole opportunity to invest all their energy in this work.
I have a large family, and I consider myself entitled to say: to nurse, to raise, to bring up, and to educate children is a job.
And this is more important and more difficult job than any other.
And, by the way, this work has no days off, holidays and pensions.
It seems that people have not understand yet how destructive it is for mankind.
Please to fix!
If it were up to me, I would pay mothers a salary for raising their children to provide them whole opportunity to invest all their energy in this work.
And this is more important and more difficult job than any other.
And this is a job with responsibility, like no other job.
In today's world there has been a breakdown of the family and a loss of respect for the mother.
It seems that people have not understand yet how destructive it is for mankind.
I have been feeling a noticeable change in my physical condition since I began gluten-free diets.
I have not still undergone food sensitivity tests such as ELISA.
However, once I can exactly know the foods to which I am very sensitive and I can eliminate all of them, I am sure that there will be a noticeable difference.
She wanted to Akita dog in Japan, so Japan will present a dog to her.
It means winning in Japanese, but it is named for men.
She wanted to Akita dog in Japan, so Japan will present a dog to her.
It means winning in Japanese, but it is named for men.
Alina ZAGITOVA is an Olympic gold medalist in figure skating.
Machine Laerning
I want to challenge to create something with this new knowledge down the road.
When I ate an instant noodle as a child, I became very sick, but I remained ignorance about food intolerance and food allergy for a long time.
I was determined to get rid of wheat and barley from my diet.
Is it possible to speak Spanish like a native for a foreigner?
There is a lot of controversy about this issue.
Many people even consider irrelevant trying to speak Spanish like a native.
I think it is possible for a foreigner to reach a point where he or she is able to speak Spanish almost as a native.
If a student uses the right approach and devotes that necessary time, he or she will probably achieve a native like fluency in Spanish.
In order to sound like a native speaker in Spanish, you will need to achieve a flawless grammar and a native like accent.
I think that it is possible to attain a really good grammar in Spanish throughout study.
But in order to achieve a native like level is necessary to reduce the mistakes practically to zero.
However, mastering sintaxis, acquiring a feeling of the language so that you can speak like a native is much more difficult, for many people it would require living in a Spanish speaking country for years.
My english is very poor,I worry about it.
I hope i can improve it.
The insurance costs, on the other hand, almost levelled off in 1991 in comparison to the level shown ten years earlier.
Nevertheless, in 2001 the insurance expenditures reached 8% and nearly approached the spendings on resources.
Moving on to the insurance cost, it is worth mentioning that this expenditure constituted the lowest cost within all three given decades with mild fluctuation from 2% to 3% in the first two decades, and substantial growth in 2001 up to 8%.
Meanwhile if they feel any hazard, their aggressive mood will appear.
Because of these factors, Chinese authorities, use of geese to prevent motorcycles theft.
The last time, a robber who poisoned guard dogs and jumped from the fence arrested by the sounds of geese.
I couldn't post my entry on Lang-8 for four or five days!
I write this entry for the first time in four or five days because I couldn't connect to Lang-8 site.
I wanted to see other's post and write sentences last weekend.
I found I was able to connect this site a while ago, so I immediately post this text!
Why do I live as barista?
Which one is better?
* I though about my job and I ask myself like this: why I started this job and why I still have this job.
Of course I have passed through many problem in field because favorite thing comes to work but I treat doing well finally.
Suddenly I though like that All I need is ' why ' in life.
Who don't have a favorite actor or rock star who follows in his work or is interested in his opinions or the way he acts?
As says the writter of the article, many celebrities donate money or help to raise founds for a NGOS or study illnesses like cancer.
But the influences is not only positive but also can be negative, especially when we talk about teenagers.
All things considered, in my opinion, celebrities should be carefully that they show us of their lifestyle because no everybody are able to distinguish where beging the life of the fame ande where real life beging.
I went to my workspace early in the morning.
When I attended the meeting room, a presenter had really confidently announced.
I really impressed it.
I was so fun.
Especially, I talked a little with Mr.
I felt better good.
I went to my workspace early in the morning.
When I attended the meeting room, a presenter had really confidently announced.
I was so fun.
Especially, I talked a little with Mr. xxx in Korean.
I felt better good.
I practiced speaking Korean.
Since there is also a meeting tomorrow, I will go to work early.
March 06, 2018 -- I Will Translate My Friend's Diary
Especially, I talked a little with Mr.
I felt better good.
These days, I have a lot of trouble.
I'm feeling better today, I will do my best tomorrow too.
China's Huawei set to lead global charge to 5G networks.
5G networks, now in the testing stage, will rely on denser arrays of small antennas and the cloud to offer date speeds up to 50 or 100 times faster than current 4G networks and serve as critical infrastructure for a range of industries.
Let's looking forward to the 5G networks period.
I read the Absent in the Spring by Agatha Christie 2 years ago and I was so impressive the story.
It's story about a women in a family who live in the UK.
The beginning is that when she think about her family on the way from her daughter to her house.
she was confident that she understood exactly what her family is and how her family should live to make a life better.
She believed that they followed her and proud of her.
But it's wrong.
her family hates her who put her thinking on them and never ever look back whether she was right of not.
Because that story is likely happened on me.
When I look back my old memories, I had many experiences to express my thinking like her.
I'm not sure that is right of not.
What I learned from the book is having thinkings flexibly.
Don't forced someone my thinking too much.
and have a brave to admit my mistakes.
I will have a experiences to express, but I never lose modesty and get arrogant.
Do you like someone who is so particular about something?
Someone who sticks to somthething and refuses to change his mind or way of doing it?
"When you made up your mind to master a certain skill, you need to be extra-particular about it.
There's no way around.
If you give in, it means you give up, and that's the level you reach."
I thought about it for a while and came to a conclusion that ther's a truth in what he says.
Looking bakc, I loved playing basketball when I was in junior high.
We would shoot and remember every bit of movement from where to place our feet, how to hold the ball, where to place our fingers on the ball, when to start pulling the ball upwards, and so on, and on, and on, and on.
We had so many checkpoints from the beginning to the follow through of a shot that if we would really check everything one by one, we would have to move in a tremendously slow motion.
But after numerous practice, going through every checkpoint became just a pice of cake.
What happened was that we could shoot exactly the same way every single time, and shots were bound to go in.
What's more, even when we had to move our body differently for some reason, like getting pushed by the opponent, we could kind of "know" how to adjust our shots, and most of them went in.
Days have passed and I'm so much obssesed about singing better now.
The issue is am I being particular about creating sounds at the same level as I was particular about making shots?
There are lots of signals that happens in my body that I'm overlooking.
I need to sense every tension and movements that happens when I start creating sounds.
If you give in, it means you give up, and that's the level you reach."
One day, me and my twin brother decided to master shooting.
We would shoot and remember every bit of movement from where to place our feet, how to hold the ball, where to place our fingers on the ball, when to start pulling the ball upwards, and so on, and on, and on, and on.
It could take us a whole afternoon to shoot one shot.
What's more, even when we had to move our body differently for some reason, like getting pushed by the opponent, we could kind of "know" how to adjust our shots, and most of them went in.
The issue is am I being particular about creating sounds at the same level as I was particular about making shots?
I need to sense every tension and movements that happens when I start creating sounds.
We would shoot and remember every bit of movement from where to place our feet, how to hold the ball, where to place our fingers on the ball, when to start pulling the ball upwards, and so on, and on, and on, and on.
It could take us a whole afternoon to shoot one shot.
Days have passed and I'm so much obssesed about singing better now.
It'll take time at first like it did in basketball shooting, but after it becomes a part of myself, I know I'll be able to reproduce exactly the same movements, which will enable me to reproduce exactly the same sound.
The project of 'Kamakura of the earth' has started.
'Kamakura of the earth' is an artwork by a creative team which is several types of artist and craftsman such as a plasterer, lighting artist, textile artist, designer, carpenter.
Kakishibu Noren's ivory colour reminds us a beautiful winter atmosphere.
when we get through into it, we'll see another Kakishibu Noren that has soft, light pinky colours with a sun textile.
They make us get into a spring atmosphere.
The product in the middle of Noren is called ' Kamakura of the earth'.
which constructed by a female plasterer.
Kamakura of the earth is an object that contains Awazi island's soil, stones, and straws.
You can be interactive with your senses, touching, stroking, get into the Kamakura, sit on a chair, breezing...
You'll notice a beauty of soil when your eyes get used to seeing darkness in the Kamakura.
The concept of "Kakishibu Large Noren' and ' Kamakura of the earth'.
Our daily night scenery has been changed very blight and convenient because of a great development of LED technology.
On the contrary, blight lightings are everywhere in a town and our home.
Therefore it is difficult to find out a luxurious darkness.
We noticed that when we turned off the light in our room and saw small lights of indicators.
We could feel relaxing when we see an existence of lights because of darkness, and a texture of a soil which illuminated by a weak light in a darkness.
We even could forget about a bustle of a daily life.
As a usual 80s kid in Japan, I like robots since I was a child.
Especially, I can feel from it something like future and advance world to help us.
- Do not throw containers into the fire.
He is a cheater, but he is incredibly charismatic person.
All he wants found a person who has enough money and take it from him, but without any violence.
He lives not bad, but suddenly his wife decides leave him.
He do a hunger strike, and his wife, forced looking after him, stay with him for a time, until she catch him devouring cold borsch.
There is a strange country has many beautiful landscapes and forest resources in the world.
But some people of the country doesn't feel enough, they like more power and money.
Every party want to win in election and get more power.
They cheat their according to fool policies.
The power and economic of this country become weaker and weaker.
This morning, I learned the word "broke" and "chap".
I was surprised the word has the meaning same as "man", kind of colloquial word.
I've never heard the word in conversation though, do native speakers use this word in conversation??
how's your going?
Yesterday I watched a film Black Panther, with one of my co-workers.
His funny scenes make me smile each times.
The dog name is Masaru given by Zagitova.
The name is for man but dog is girl.
The dog name is Masaru given by Zagitova.
The name is for man but dog is girl.
The exam will be next morning.
It was in april last year My son went to the denist.
Foutunately,all of them are not permanent tooth.
We go to the dentist for treatment next monday again.
I will take care his teeth more carefully.
Getting enough nutrition is very important especially for kids.
Recently we hear that getting little carbohydrates makes us slim.
But it is dangerous for kids because they need it to use their brains for thinking.
I'm writing about food in English. this time I wrote about sushi I'm wondering the article I wrote is makes snese to you native english speakers. 
I'm wondering if the article I wrote makes sense and sounds natural to native english speakers.
Tuna, salmon, eel, yellowtail, bass, sea urchin, salmon roe sushi are the most common.
Tuna contains a lot of fat so it has melting texture.
Generally, the fattier the better and the fattier the pricier.
Quality sushi also should have the right balance fish over rice.
How to eat sushi is very simple.
I focused on study to listening of TOEIC today.
My tentative goal is 400 points at listening part. because I want to get more than 750 points this Friday pretest.
I want to acquire confidence.
I worked from 8pm til midnight last night and the rain was drizzling.
My spanish friend is teaching me how to pronounce castilian Spanish.
My mom said she had remember all the verbs in -er, -ar and -ir.
Can even baby eat it?
One of the trends that can be easily noticed is that sales at lunch time are considerably lower that sales at dinner time each and every days of the week.
The sales at lunch time are around 2,400 dollars in week days, corresponding the lowest sale to Thursday with $2,375, the highest value, on the other hand was observed on Wednesday with $2,595.
Concerning dinner meal on week days, the sales were around 3,600 dollars.
Regarding weekends, it can be seen that on Saturday and Sunday the sales experienced an important decrease.
In the case of lunch meal the sales were $1,950 and $1,550 for Saturday and Sunday respectively.
Overall, it can be seen that sales are higher during weekdays that during weekends.
The sales at lunch time are around 2,400 dollars in week days, corresponding the lowest sale to Thursday with $2,375, the highest value, on the other hand was observed on Wednesday with $2,595.
Finally, At dinner time the sales on Saturday and Sunday were $2,900 and $2,200 each.
It costs very cheap and I have became able to understand their English well, but I cannot hear native speakers ones, so I checked the price of native tutors' course.
It was very expensive and even the cheapest online company provides it 10 dollars for a 30 minutes class.
I thought that I do not want to spend money 10 dollars to chat with a native speaker, but it means that nobody want to talk to those who can not speak English well.
It will be very tired.
It is a common saying that after we get old, nobody listen to us free of charge.
We have to pay money basically.
It costs very cheap and I have became able to understand their English well, but I cannot hear native speakers ones, so I checked the price of native tutors' course.
It was very expensive and even the cheapest online company provides it 10 dollars for a 30 minutes class.
It is a common saying that after we get old, nobody listen to us free of charge.
I used to use a Hallo Talk, which is a famous app for those who are language learners.
There were a lot of Japanese wanting people from abroad to practice English, so it has more Japanese who are learning English than those who are learning Japanese.
I went online to look at an another app, and I found two apps that I can conect with people from other countrins, which were called "Speaky", "Hallo Pal".
They have several differences compared to the Hallo Talk, but I don't feel anything about them.
These apps allow us to have an opportunity to have a chat with people from different counties.
You can practice your language that you are learning, and teach someone who are learning your native language.
I've made some friends on the Hallo Talk a while ago, and We went out many times.
If you are very curious and enjoy your life style, it will be easy to learn language.
I said to him the date I sent it.
There was a boom of this "blood type personality theory" in the 1970s and received a lot of media attention.
The blood type was one of the most popular topics mainly among young Japanese those days.
According to this theory, a person who's blood type is A tend to have the traits of earnest, reserved and sensible, while a type-B person is passionate, active and creative.
I suppose that one of the reasons of this theory having risen up is the fact that type A constitute 40% of Japanese population, type O 30%, type B 20% and type AB 10%.
According to this theory, a person who's blood type is A tend to have the traits of earnest, reserved and sensible, while a type-B person is passionate, active and creative.
I suppose that one of the reasons of this theory having risen up is the fact that type A constitute 40% of Japanese population, type O 30%, type B 20% and type AB 10%.
It seems like kind of nicely balanced proportion, doesn't it?
When our group started this design project, the final interaction effect is actually not as expected as its imagined to be stunning.
However, due to the limitation of our programming ability, we are not able to write a perfect program, but in general, it is a playful interaction device.
Just in a few seconds, audiences can explore the correct interaction way by themselves, and then complete the whole interaction experience within the next 10 seconds.
This is just a quick and short-fresh interactive process.
Last week I met one of my friends who is always eager to talk about her.
I usually silently to hear that.
but the day I was preoccupied with something eles.
I coudn't witty coment.
I usually silently to hear that.
I'm having a lunch at restaurant.
They always say " My wife doesn't allow me to have money a lot, she gives me JPY 30,000 monthly as pocket money, so I need to lessen the expence." 
It's pretty common in Japan that once you get married, your wife get a right to manage your salary, so no matter how much money you earn, your monthly pocket money doesn't change.
I'm going to take an online course to study marketing at uni from in April.
I paid the school tuition at bank today.
It's beem a while to be a student.
Some people wonder even thongh I have a job, I want to studay and be a student again.
I've been asked this question that why are you so interested in learning something?.
My anser is always simple.
Learning something doesn't have a negative thing, it only gives me an education.
These days, I decide to learn english grammar systematicly.
So, I downloaded a grammar book called "Grammar Club", and I began to learn it.
Today, I have studied the section two "Noun phrases and Article".
I was always confused of the usage of a, an and the.
By the way, at the end of the section, there are some exercises to review the content above.
One of the sentence is "He has two daughters; one is signner and the other an actress."
Could you explain me why we don't say "and the other is an actress"?
These days, I decide to learn english grammar systematicly.
Today, I have studied the section two "Noun phrases and Article".
I was always confused of the usage of a, an and the.
One of the sentence is "He has two daughters; one is signner and the other an actress."
After over the last 17 years growing and evolving since 2000
year, especially corporate culture edifying from long-enduring
brands, company's founder Mr.
technology tackling and innovations in LED Flex Lights for every
You can find the spirit of craftsman in our products and also
You can count on us as reliable Supplier and Partner!
Even the street named after him was built in his hometown.
Unfortunately, I've never seen this movie yet.
I saw its trailer when I went to the theater to see another movie.
But, the merman in this movie is scary even now.
But, the merman in this movie is scary even now.
I am writing to you introduced by Dr.
As you requested, we have made a video about our guidelines but whose narration is Japanese only.
If there is no problem with it, we will send the video to you.
Regarding the mobile application, we could send you the source code.
Would you like to make the application as independent Mongolian version only?
Otherwise, we could embed the application you will make into the the application which we already released.
About 2nd lecture of the diagnosis and surgical treatment, please directly contact to Dr.
Hashimoto.
Which do you prefer?
Millions of people every year move to English-speaking countries such as Australia, Britain or America, in order to study at school, college or university.
Every year, millions of people decide to go living in English speaking countries like Australia, United Kingdom or the United States to study.
Among them, there is the fact that English is nowadays the lingua franca, it means, it is the language spoken worldwide and consequently, it eases the communication between people coming from different parts of the world.
Currently, most of the scientific information is in English, thus, speaking English opens an enormous window that allows people to access knowledge.
Given the situation above referred, speaking English represents a good skill to have.
A person with the ability to speak English has better job and study opportunities than those who do not.
It is very common to find people who speak English, so English comes to be a valuable tool that breaks geographical and spatial barriers.
Over internet, people can contact other people with different ideologies, cultures, and customs, then, language is no longer an obstacle for people to communicate.
It is evident that moving to an English speaking country is the best option because living among native speakers allows the students to learn accents and popular expressions used in real life situations.
Millions of people every year move to English-speaking countries such as Australia, Britain or America, in order to study at school, college or university.
Every year, millions of people decide to go living in English speaking countries like Australia, United Kingdom or the United States to study.
There are different reasons why people choose to move to English speaking countries to learn English.
Currently, most of the scientific information is in English, thus, speaking English opens an enormous window that allows people to access knowledge.
Given the situation above referred, speaking English represents a good skill to have.
Over internet, people can contact other people with different ideologies, cultures, and customs, then, language is no longer an obstacle for people to communicate.
It is evident that moving to an English speaking country is the best option because living among native speakers allows the students to learn accents and popular expressions used in real life situations.
Attending English lessons at academies is a good option for some people and basic or even intermediated levels, however, in order for people to become fluent the best option is getting completely involved with the language.
One of my colleagues has bad health.
She keep a regular schedule: go to bed early and get up early.
Besides, she cook for herself and seldom eat outside.
There were not for everyone so we decided who would get it using an app and I was selected as the last person.
Since It was the last, I couldn't choose one but I got a cute knit hat.
On the day, I went the office empty-handed, so I couldn't put in any bags and there was still a tag.
Today I made a little rice bag and my teacher asked it for teaching.
I saw my roommate's bag was more beautiful than mine and the fact made me dejected.
I probably not get out my house, that over expression.
Well, I hope all clear it.
I finally bought new PC.
Last week, I posted that "I must change my PC" and yesterday, new PC was arrived.
It was the most expensive shopping I have ever done in my 19 years life.
And this was the secound time that I bought a merchandise online.
Also I am concered about whether I can use designing software smoothly which use large storage.
30,000m2 industrial park in Huizhou and a marketing & sales center in
founder, Bob, who has over 26 years experience in the lighting
experience, we are able to develop cutting-edge products with
technology created independently and offer bespoke manufacturing
solutions to the custom-fit and built environments.
Our Products have approved by international authoritative
organization and got many
certificates, over 80 patents have been authorized in Europe and Asia-
We continuously invest heavily in our R&D and establish the
How do you know things?
I wonder if it's my misunderstanding, or I read something wrongly written.
I think it's always missing the part that you first see any doctor.
But the advice given sounds like saying you have to have a home doctor, but I don't have any home doctor in this foreign country, and I believe this situation can happen to anyone.
I just couldn't fill the missing information.
Well, thinking about it, so many things in this world works like that, at least to some including me.
My son got really good grades in the exam he took the other day at a cram school.
Simultaneously I thought he would get much better grades if he becomes a little bit serious and studies every day.
It is difficult to make children get habit of studying every day, however.
For even adults, it is difficult to get such a habit.
It may be said so because getting a habit is very difficult.
Here you have a link in Spanish and below another written on English.
I wish it could be interesting for you.
First, as for Company A
There is no reporting bugs.
There is no progress of A-2 System Project.
Development timing is undecided.
Go-live date will be after August.
The same system has already been created for Company ABC, and takeover work will be the main work.
Next, as for Company B,
We were going to estimate existing B-2 System scale, but they have only production environment.
So we are going to do that after backup production server by Company EFG
facebook
I have my account of facebook.
One day a stranger person from other country applied to make friends with me.
I felt strange but I accept it because I felt it's nice.
After a while I checked facebook again and surprised at a situation.
some stranger persons from other countries like Korea and where Arabic language is used.
I totally don't know who they all are so I felt little confused.
I have my account of facebook.
One day a stranger person from other country applied to make friends with me.
I felt strange but I accept it because I felt it's nice.
After a while I checked facebook again and surprised at a situation.
some stranger persons from other countries like Korea and where Arabic language is used.
I totally don't know who they all are so I felt little confused.
One day a stranger person from other country applied to make friends with me.
I felt strange but I accept it because I felt it's nice.
After a while I checked facebook again and surprised at a situation.
some stranger persons from other countries like Korea and where Arabic language is used.
Yesterday, it went something wrong.
I eliminated it and was going to install the newest version.
It seems that Micro Soft wanted to force Windows 10 users to use the Windows Store version.
It seems that Micro Soft wanted to force Windows 10 users to use the Windows Store version.
My life in the UK: Japanese don't say " I love you" enough 
In my country, words are nothing and action are everything.
It's easy to say nice things and cost you nothing.
Love is tough and very strong words for me.
I think Japanese believe that action with consideration is more important than saying " I love you".
You will know and feel how much you and your partner love each other through your action without saying "I love you"  I have an English husband but he doesn't overuse " I love you " which is good and it's just right for me.
I think maybe Japanese don't say " I love you" enough but westerners use the words too much.
It's not good overuse them because It will lose the power of words.
However It's not that easy to take actions and sometimes it costs you.
You will know and feel how much you and your partner love each other through your action without saying "I love you"  I have an English husband but he doesn't overuse " I love you " which is good and it's just right for me.
I think maybe Japanese don't say " I love you" enough but westerners use the words too much.
It's not good overuse them because It will lose the power of words.
As many people realized, the Lang-8 was heavy the past few days.
Now, it's recovering from such a status.
I was really frustrated at the heaviness since I use the Lang-8 everyday.
I realized that the Lang-8 is really important for me.
I strongly want to improve my English, so I need the Lang-8.
I believe that I can improve my English by receiving corrections from my friends in the Lang-8.
Also, I thought that I should introduce some new English trainings.
I keep the following trainings now.
- Writing English journals everyday and checking corrections by my friends.
Speaking training is lacked.
I should introduce a speaking training, but it will be a bit hard because I probably can't find time to do the training.
So, I think it might be a good idea to replace one of the trainings with new one, or to do all trainings alternatingly.
Today is very cold, even though it was very hot last Sunday.
Yesterday, she found a memo on my to-do list saying 'call on my parents to maintenance their PCs.'
She asked me about it and I told her that I would visit my parents near future.
I had never noticed that the visiting was stressful for her.
In such cases, the best solution to consoling her is just listen to her opinion, not saying any quibbles.
It is very hard to reach a agreement because everybody says whatever they want to day.
A lot of people doesn't face the reality of the situation and believe that their opinion must be accepted.
The problem is that every people has every opinion and one's opinion sometimes just seems to be ridiculous for others.
So, we have to keep looking for a compromise, even though others look sstupid.
A lot of people doesn't face the reality of the situation and believe that their opinion must be accepted.
The problem is that every people has every opinion and one's opinion sometimes just seems to be ridiculous for others.
To Reach a Agreement
It is very hard to reach a agreement because everybody says whatever they want to day.
A lot of people doesn't face the reality of the situation and believe that their opinion must be accepted.
The problem is that every people has every opinion and one's opinion sometimes just seems to be ridiculous for others.
So, we have to keep looking for a compromise, even though others look sstupid.
To Reach a Agreement
It is very hard to reach a agreement because everybody says whatever they want to day.
So, we have to keep looking for a compromise, even though others look sstupid.
I called her and asked to buy Macdonald.
After lunch, I was able to go home next time, but....
Though I tried quickly, the time I finished was 2:00pm.
My major job is just watching network system.
It's simple and easy job for everyone just sit in the office watching system monitor values.
I mean It's barely shut down for error.
Even if it's got shut downed I have nothing to do with it except calling server engineer.
So you think I'm just killing time in the office.
No it's not.
kind of side job is fixing everything about computer things like printer and computer, monitor even they ask me for fixing thier phone in office.
What I have to do with the phone!
get a new one jesus.
just call facility team...
They just calling me when something has electric chips is broken.
these nurse in the hospital they are young they look 20s and 30s.
These days, in Korea there's no one who don't have computer, I bet you.
Well that means they have been using computer at least for 10 years.
I think they should know how to solve trifle things like not forgetting password!
or plugging in a electric code and just push the reboot button!
There IS PC support team.
but at night they go to their home and I should pick up their phone for night.
so nurse keep calling me and I tell them to call PC support team TOMORROW MORNING.
If I can fix it I just do it.
Today I went to downtown to have dinner, then I decided to walk my way back to home.
I thought it might be around 7or 8 kilometers, but it turned out to be 12 kilometers.
I have walked 2 hours.
I didn't know will it recover tomorrow.
If it is going to recover well, I would like to walk up10 kilometers tomorrow.
Walking and listening music is a big relaxation for me.
I thought it might be around 7or 8 kilometers, but it turned out to be 12 kilometers.
I have walked 2 hours.
I didn't know will it recover tomorrow.
If it is going to recover well, I would like to walk up10 kilometers tomorrow.
I have walked 2 hours.
Mother's Day comes on the second Sunday in May.
It is celebrated in USA, England, Germany and other countries.
It is also observed in Ukraine too.
It is a day when people honour their mothers.
The most important holiday of Ukraine is the Day of Independence, which is celebrated on the 24th of August.
We always celebrate this date.
The New Year Eve, Christmas, Easter are also celebrated in Ukraine.
The New Year Eve is my favorite holiday, because we usually buy a New Year tree, decorate our house with garlands, lay the table, dance and sing, have a lot of fun.
In our country people usually invite their friends to their homes, or visit their relatives and friends, or just stay at home with the family on holidays.
My city is located on the territory with a temperate climate.
I'm waiting for spring weather, then it is warm, everything begins to turn green and to bloom.
I saw an announcement that informed the gathering in memory of Misao Jo in a newspaper yesterday.
Then we decided to be a member to be allowed to weave there for a year.
She wrote back that she also used a Saori loon and was going to visit Saori headquarters.
Since she never wrote her entry again, I lost track of her.
I saw an announcement that informed the gathering in memory of Misao Jo in a newspaper yesterday.
Saori weaving is to weave on her handlooms.
We were able to use any yarns among innumerable kinds of yarns placed on shelves around.
Then we decided to be a member to be allowed to weave there for a year.
I came across a very short Japanese entry that an Australian woman posted for the first time.
She wrote back that she also used a Saori loon and was going to visit Saori headquarters.
Since she never wrote her entry again, I lost track of her.
Saori weaving is to weave on her handlooms.
She just sat on a sofa or she wove on a loom when she was well.
Question of Comma
Which is better or correct, A or B?
A: We can see a lot of English words and sentences in our daily lives.
B: We can see a lot of English words, and sentences in our daily lives.
You like to let your dog walks you instead of you walking him.
You like to let your dog walks you and not the other way around.
They were pretending that they liked the food that you cooked for them.
We've always been trying to agree with you.
The robber got arrested after being on the loose for two weeks.
They may have changed their mind, but they also look for more tourists and investments as what I have heard.
When people have better view over Arabs they can extend it to the whole Middle East, and the opposite is also true.
Iran also claims that they try to provide more opportunities for women.
Many women already work in different grounds, however there are actual limitations for women to reach higher political positions.
If Saudi Arabia do this, then there would be more expectation from Iran to facilitate this.
For example, Hijab is not mandatory in some Arab countries, but it is in Iran.
When this will be resolved or should this be resolved depends on many other factors, the important one is the pressure of people.
Feel free to leave a comment; a reply is not guaranteed, however.
Only if you die under the flag of our King,does it make being born in this country truly worthwhile.
Since a few days, I have difficulty logging in the website.
I don't know why, but whenever I try to log in I've got a blank page.
I have to try several time before being able to access to the website.
Nowadays, with the advanced technology, the world is getting more and more smaller.
However, most college students in Taiwan do not know what the latest things happen in other countries.
The following are two reasons why I think college student acquiring an international student is an important thing.
One reason is that they are taking the high level education, knowing the International situation can help them doing research and getting more knowledge.
Therefore, broadening international perspective can make college student get more job opportunities.
In my views, there are two essential to broaden their understanding of world events.
English is a common language of the world.
People who have excellent English abilities can get new information from other countries soon.
Second, reading and analyzing the international news: After getting a news, they should try to understand why the things happen by searching online or asking the professors.
New year have left,spring is coming.
I like spring in the season.
Because all of anything is grow up.
Advertaising is an advantge for companies but the consumers, really need a great deal of advertising everywhere invading their minds?
But, where is the tipping point between information and manipulation?
Some expert people claim that the advertising could be dangerous for the consumers because it encorage them to buy things they don't really need or generate an anxiety to consume that is harmful to their mental health.
In my opinion, the control of the advertising is a obligation for the Goverment and it should harden the control mesures, especially in television, on the exposure to the flood of announcements that the consumers suffers.
or just me?
Hope it will get back on track very soon!!!
Lang-8 has been so slow and laggy these days.
Does anyone know what happened?
I am working in Hong Kong but living in Shenzhen.
My supervisor taught me how to do this and that in Cantonese.
I am getting better in understanding Cantonese but still, I have a hard time to catch all the meaning of my supervisor.
Speaking in Cantonese and writing in English, this is how people work in the accounting or finance industry in Hong Kong.
Cantonese is a lovely language but I have difficulties in pronouncing it in a right way.
I showed my flower arrangement at the school exhibition on February.
I had made my work one month before from the exhibition day, but after few weeks, an important flower was a nothing at any flower shops.
So, I ordered it to a flower shop, but the shop couldn't get the flower the previous day.
I had to hunt around for my flower arrangement materials at other flower shops not only my town but also neighboring towns.
However, I couldn't find the flower out so, I decided to go to more far towns from here.
When I drove to there, I looked at a small flower shop in my town.
I had never go to the shop, but I stopped over the shop, just in case.
After all, I couldn't look at the flower.
When I was disappointed in front of a flower case, salesoerson asked me "May I help you?"
I told her about a story how many shops I looked around the green flower Temarisou: It looks like a green lawn ball.
She smiled and said, "you can get it.
By the way, it is unbelievable, the green flower Temarisou is still alive!
It is a cross boarder train and I am going to work.
I had been talking about working in Hong Kong for quite a long time and now I make it comes true.
Today is actually my second day working here and I am still on my way to adapt myself to everything in Hong Kong, Cantonese as a new language for me and auditing as a new job for me.
I need to travel 2 hours to get to my company from my current place.
I am looking for an apartment in Hong Kong, however, it is not easy at all with a low income.
I need to adjust myself for it.
Financial stability is my goal and I really want to achieve it.
I have to scarify something like privacy to achieve the financial stability.
I went to English meetup weekend.
I atended to this meetup at fifth times.
I talked everyone that I started to write a diary in English at lan-8.
The day, a few new members came here.
They colud speak English smoothly.
It was more than I thought.
Today I had rain.
I felt a little bit hotter than any other days in this year.
Pretty hard to give up sweets, to learn every day English words, to tolerate the lack of hot water, to not skip classes, to use cheap cosmetics and sincerely believe in a bright future.
Today is the first Spring day, but weather forecast -18C for tomorrow.
With him it is possible to talk pleasantly about your teeth and to not immediately understand that he only pretends to be interested.
In generally, the real professional.
When I was looking for a job and considering lots of companies and diffrent jobs, I did split some time to think of myself, what kind of job is good for me, what I want from a job and things like that.
But, after I started working it became clearer what I found fun and interesting throughout experiencing a lot of things with my current job.
That's pretty much all the reason.
I start to write a diary for today.
Considering my lazy personality, it may be too hard to keep writing it. But I'll just keep trying it for now.
Today is the first day, so it will start things want to do in this year!
To take a driver license
To go to Korea
To save money
Is it a correct expression?
always sleepy
I am very sleepy recently.
Because it's spring?
It's getting warm from yesterday in Japan.
And the powder of flower started to go everywhere.
It's effect our body especially our norse.
By the way, Lang-8 moves very slow recently.
I hope it fixs soon.
Today I felt a little sick.
I had a little temperature.
However I manage to work for a day.
I think I will recover tomorrow by I go to bed early today.
One of the noticeable aspects is that the high-speed railway was built to connect a golf course with business district and residential housing area situated on the right bank of the river.
Another positive difference is that the business district has been increased significantly and has almost been doubled.
A comparison of the two illustrations reveals that the residential housing area on the left riverbank, as well as the recreation area, did not suffer any differences and remained unchanged.
Overall, the two maps show the valuable differences occurred in the Riverside Town after thirty-nine years as a result of the implementation of the infrastructure program aimed to modernize the town.
I didn't learn English for about a half month, because I wanted to take a relax.
But I felt that I became some lazy these days.
So, taking a vacation is not always be a good thing.
I didn't learn English for about a half month, because I wanted to take a relax.
The Mobility of Foreign Labor Force
I realize the meaning of the figure showed.
If they had enjoyed good economy in Nepal, they wouldn't have come to Japan.
Earning money in Japan might be just one of the ways to improve their lives.
If the Nepalese economy is improved, they will stay in their own country.
In fact, the number of Chinese people studying or working in Japan has declined these days, because the Chinese economy has got better and they don't need to move out China.
Moreover, other countries such as Korea and Thai need to get foreign workforce.
Getting workforce is one of the global issues and a competition.
I realize the meaning of the figure showed.
Earning money in Japan might be just one of the ways to improve their lives.
Moreover, other countries such as Korea and Thai need to get foreign workforce.
Getting workforce is one of the global issues and a competition.
These days, did Lang-8 have a bad connection?
Opening new page takes ten seconds or more.
At first, I thought my laptop had a problem, but something's wrong.
Today, it seems the situation is getting better.
"You are jokey."
"You are jokey."
It's too hard to get a job because there are too many people to work in Korea.
Also companies want so many things to new emploees.
Korean companies want job experiences from new recruit.
What's more, even though you get a job, they say "You guys have to do more than you are paid.".
As you know, Korean work so much among the OECD countries.
Korean somtimes even call themselves "company's slaves".
Parents will be in mandatory retirement age soon.
If they didn't make enough money, their children can be a breadwinner.
Then, the economic situation will be more and more worse and the unemployed will be increase.
I'm looking forward to look at cherry blossom.
In Japan, it becomes a news when cherry blossom blooms.
Then, I will go a picnic with my boyfriend.
Yesterday the Shizuoka Marathon was held.
Actually the first Shizuoka Marathon four years ago was my first full marathon debut.
I still remember the mandarin orange I ate after finishing was so delicious.
Unfortunately it was rain at that time and I ran with a raincoat at that time, but it seemed to be hot yesterday.
Though it's difficult to run a race at the best because weather condition can change ease of running, it might make marathon not so simple.
By the way, yesterday there were two good things relating to running.
I ran around the Aichi-ike reservoir yesterday morning and I was surprised when I checked the time after running.
Amazingly, it was just 30'00''.
Ironically the best thing seemed that I dropped my pace after 6 km.
When I visit a sports store casually in the afternoon, I found the running shoes ASICS SORTIE MAGIC were sold at a discount of half-price.
They were last one and fit to my foot when I try on, and I bought them.
I think an encounter with new shoes is good thing.
I'm looking forward to enjoying the feeling when I run with them.
What is the most effective non studded winter tire?
Here in Japan, March is spring season.
But the area I live in is still sometimes snowfall.
And then, when I drive my car, I need to keep putting on non studded winter tires.
The question is which manufacturers of tires makes the most effective such a winter tires?
Because a lot of kinds of tires exist in the world, I am puzzled which manufacturer of the tires should I chooses?
Some people think that parents must not pay taxes if their children study at home or at private schools, while others believe that it is obligatory for everyone.
I am inclined to believe that despite having children or not, everyone has to pay the same amount of money in order to maintain a good level of education at public schools.
Firstly, for the government, it is much easier to receive the same taxes from everyone because it is very difficult to control each family with children and where they study.
For instance, there are many families with children who have been moving from childhood from one town to another because of they just like travel.
So, how in this case to collect taxes?
More than that, children can change schools very often from a private school to a state school, and it means that in one period they have to pay, but in another period not.
Secondly, the level of education of population plays a very important role not only in the social structure of a society but in the place of a country in the global arena.
In other words, each citizen must be well-educated, but not all people can allow very expensive education, and that is why it is the duty of everyone to maintain an appropriate level of education at school.
Despite some people arguing that they do not care, the education must be available for everyone because it is a kind of social welfare.
Thirdly, the government has to hire more employee in order to observe where children learn and collect levies from those families where children study at public schools.
Consequently, the government has to bear the costs on the new staff.
Your dog almost get hit by a car this morning.
That guy must live surrounded by weird people just like him.
The guy over there told you to fuck off after you gave him crap over a spot in the parking lot.
It's very pleasant to come back and see this service working.
The most amazing thing i experienced is traveling to Budapest this winter.
That was a great trip full of communicating, troublesolving, visiting of plenty places, driving over the Europe by car, eating local food during Christmas selebrating.
I'd like to visit Hungary one more time.
Hi, I'm English learner.
Every morning i listen English education radio and do my homework like make some sentence.
I do it hard but i'm a little bit confused that the sentence is right, did i use proper English..
So i need you help!!
The best way to stay warm in winter is staying at home!
there's no place like home.
why or why not?
I don't use it.
Because i concerned about electromagnetic waves.
so I bought water mat.
basically It's same with electric mats but it use water circulation.
so I don't need to concern about electromagnetic waves.
Ondol is equipped with water pipes under the floor.
and hot water circulation give off heat.
However, I think this movie is kind of overrated because I don't find anything in the movies that makes it stand out from other movies of the same genre.
The plot is set in a tribe in Africa, where lots of state-of-the-art technologies overwhelmed you.
Its box office in Northern America has broken the record set by Iron Man 3.
I think perhaps because Avenger 3 will soon hit the big screen, it kinds of boosts Black Panther's performance in box office.
Although I almost had made plans to UK, I eventually cancelled all my bookings of hotels and postponed my trip again.
I had been trying to make this dream coming true these months, but I finally had to give up my plans.
The fact is that, I was not able to squeeze 2 weeks of vacation this year from my tight work schedule!!!
Hopefully, at least I can take a short trip.
So I changed my destination to Hongkong.
Let's see how I can make it this time!
How can you be smile?
Lang-8 takes huge part of my studying so I hope it will get back to normal soon.
One of my favorite characters, Jirocho came back to the main story.
I mean, he abandons his wife, daughter, the heart as a human and everything, so that he can keep a promise to his late friend, Tatsugoro.
The promise is to protect the city and the woman Tatsugoro used to love.
Former episodes introduces Jirocho's back story.
Pirako keeps believing in him even when there are noone on his side.
In the latest episode, Jirocho regained things he has lost and came back.
Gintama is going to the climax.
Lang-8 seems to have some connection problems right now.
Lang-8 maje up a huge part of my studying so I hope it will get back to normal soon.
He gave up being a human.
Former episodes introduce Jirocho's backstory, which focusing on the relationship with his daughter, Pirako.
In the latest episode, Jirocho regained things he lost and came back.
Gintama is getting to the climax.
Lang-8 maje up a huge part of my studying so I hope it will get back to normal soon.
Pirako keeps believing in him even when no one else is on his side.
I started watching two of new American drams in English.
One is Curbs your enthusiasm, and the other one is Black Mirrors.
Both are recommendations from my friend from Texas.
I have already finished watching season one of Curbs your enthusiasm and am watching season two now.
I took a day off from work today, so I was able to oversleep this morning.
It seemed that my niece forgot to buy a new notebook for her school.
This time, one notebook would solve the problem and fortunately I had a bland new one.
At first, I hesitated to enter their room, but I got inside and told them that I had the notebook for her.
She needed to have a notebook which has square line for arithmetic.
Some people think that if the death penalty exists, it is a responsibility of society for these killings, and subsequently, it is better to sentence the perpetrators to life in prison even in the severe crimes.
I am inclined to believe that death penalty must exist and should be applied in special cases.
Firstly, in the world, there are multitude dangerous criminals, who threaten the global security.
It means that they are quite powerful and have supporters, who can help escape from a prison.
In other words, there can be a war between the special forces and terrorists for only one guy who in prison.
All these things are bought for taxes from citizens, and if the death penalty exists, these levies can be spent on other public services and goods.
However, scientists have argued that we can not kill all people who have committed a crime, it can be applied only in very severe crimes, and consequently, the Institute of a prison still will fulfill its functions.
So, who had hoped that after the death penalty there would be a lot of money in state coffers, they were wrong.
Some argue that it is inhuman to kill people in our modern world.
More than that, what would be, if already killed people will be recognized by the court as not guilty.
As I have said, the death penalty should exist by as a form of punishment in special cases.
Today, I did almost nothing because it was raining and windy outside.
I hope it's going to be less rain tomorrow.
#01 Reading-- The Convenience Store World by Sayaka Murata
I don't have to go to office today.
My only and gentle coworker told me that remember to take a rest, so I read a novel by Sayaka Murata, a Japanese writer.
Here is the link about the book, 
I bought it because I was attractive by its book name when I was shopping online.
Convenience stores are everywhere in Taiwan, I go to there every week to buy coffee or food.
Yesterday, We went to the mountain to see my uncle's grave.
There are a lot of tree.
When I woke up, my family had gone out for each their events.
After I drank coffee, I also went out to see my friend.
I didn't eat anything since the morning, so I went to Wendy's to get lunch.
When I woke up, my family had gone out for each their events.
I met with my friend 3 o'clock p.m.
I met with him long time ago in the caffee but he sat behind his table.
He did not write, he did not read, only saw nothing.
- What is the order?
Firstly: wake up 8 o'clock a.m.
Wash: in the fresh and clean water.
Get on clothes.
Caffee: never 
There is a caffee in my street: coffee with modest breakfast.
It't 8.30 a.m.
It's 8.30 a.m. and start to working.
Yes, write, early morning with fresh brain and minds.
It will keep for 11 a.m.
Wedding afterparty
She's 5 years older than me, and married a guy of the same age.
He's also working for our company, but I'd never seen him at the office.
We work at other floors.
Then I put on my makeup for myself.
However, I was very shocked because I noticed that I'd forgotten wearing my favorite perfume at the party.
The bride looked so happy, so many people were celebrating them from the bottom of their hearts, and we had some meal and drink.
I was disappointed because I thought I could have a full-course dinner, but it was not like that.
We stood all the time and just took meal as much as we wanted.
They got married and looked happy and that made me happy, but, but, it was just disappointing.
Photography
Then, I show my family or friends with my trip stories.
How do you enjoy photos that you took on holidays or events?
Then, I show my family or friends with my trip stories.
In addition, I noticed my studying abroad plan.
Although they looked really surprised at first because of the unpredictability, they promised kind support for that.
I feel I have nice parents and wife.
Plwase could you explain and give examples of the phrase usage?
I don't quite understand the exaxt meaning
Plwase could you explain and give examples of the phrase usage?
I don't quite understand the exaxt meaning
My motorcycle is light because it is a off road type, so I was a little scared.
On my way home, I rode my motorcycle, the wind was strong.
On my way home, I rode my motorcycle, the wind was strong.
It rained heavily today.
On my way home, I rode my motorcycle, the wind was strong.
My motorcycle is light because it is a off road type, so I was a little scared.
My motorcycle is light because it is a off road type, so I was a little scared.
I was able to see page 2 on this page for the first time in about three days.
- She's dating with rich guys.
Today, luck of sleep is a problem that you cannot overlook.
One of the reasons for this is that whole a society works on the assumption that many people sit up far into the night.
Lighting instruments may also make our body clock out of order.
Today is heavy rain for the first time after weeks.
The climate is warm.
The connection is bad still.
It happened when I was on my to school, for the sake of not being late, I ride faster and faster.
it was not until I discovered that pain in your car, did I realized that I have made it.
At first,I did want to stay here for apologize to you face to face.
"Sir Ambroise, to begin with," continued the former commissioner of Yard pitiless.
But he was so fragile, his heart sick - he never climb up the stairs - and this illness made him look older than he was.
I think parent's role is very important to children from infant to adolescence.
Many people think there are 2 opinion.
one is parent's role.
The other is the environments.
People who thought parent's role is important is children is immature, dependent, irresponsibility.
So they would imitate parents.
Adolescence students or defiant child  follow their instinct.
Parents have obligation to raise a child as good person.
The other who thought the environments is important think the relationship with their friends or TV.
So parent can't play a role in model.
and they are interacted each other.
Today, it was rainy for the first time ina while.
I heard that this week will be almost rainy except tomorrow and day after tomorrow.
The women earn as much money as men nowadays.
The women earn as much as money that men earn nowadays.
The women earn as the same as money that men earn nowadays.
I am back to Lang-8.
It has been many years since my last time sign in.
I have studied English for more than 10 years and had l little progress.
My English listening and reading are OK, but my speaking and writing are very poor.
Because I was not study hard before, so I decided to study hard from now on.
Every day I will write one article on Lang-8.
And I hope to you can help me to improve my writing.
Painkillers tablets try to don't transfer pain to your brain.
By this mechanism, you don't feel any pain.
However it depends on the dose of your pain and the amount of medicine you consume.
Some people like me, try to avoid to use them, because if you use them for every pain, that drug won't affect on your pain like past.
On the other hand, this way your body needs to stronger painkillers.
Does the phrase "down to the bottom" sound natural?
I went test room and there were five English teachers.
In my turn to test, I was taken to a seat and there was my favorite teacher.
With my favorite teacher, I thought I wanted to do the test and speak well.
I live in Tokyo away from my true house due to my job.
Last weekend, there was a happening when I stayed at the house for the first time in a while.
The Sunday night, sudden heavy snow fell, and it paralyzed every public transportation systems.
My mom told me that I should stay until the traffic would be recovered.
Other family member kept looked at us making a conversation like that and leaned forward so that they can hear well.
They also agreeed my mom's opinion.
I can't give a detailed explanation because I don't usually watch the historical play of Japanese well, but I would like to an easily explain it.
I watched the drama because I had a lot of free times yesterday.
I can't give a detailed explanation because I don't usually watch the historical play of Japanese well, but I would like to an easily explain it.
Nevertheless, I quickly re-arranged my gear loops before bringing the clinging, clanking and clattering to an end by stashing everything into my bag.
Even more interesting was what I found when I followed the gaze of the staff sergeant.
I though had to look twice to realise that the huge, white bird that was turning somersaults in the treetops was in truth a plastic bag, an ordinary, white plastic bag of the kind tourists carry when they come out of a souvenir shop.
So, what was all of that about?
Lang8 started functioning again.
So, what was all of that about?
This week will do the night shift.
I don't like the night shift because I have the problems to sleep to the morning.
I'm getting better today.
I have less runny nose.
My sore throat eases.
I have less runny nose.
I have less runny nose.
We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable rights, that they are among these are life, liberty and the pursuit of happiness.
The only unalienable rights is that you can take eaxm by yourself, you need prove you are worth to live in this world, or you have no any right, and you should not be respected.
I have been studying Eiken Grade pre-1.
It is very difficult about phrases and vocablary.
I think why I have to study difficulty phrases and vocablary like the grade.
I don't usually it in daily life.
Especially topic of Writing test is difficult to think.
For example, "Do you think that Japanese married couples should be allowed to have separate surnames?" and "oday, some automobile companies address the development of self-driving cars or driverless cars.
These are tough in Japanese too!
I wish I could study practicaly English.
Of course, I know I should learn varerious expression.
And,The Japan Kanji Aptitude Test Grade 1 level don't use much.
There is a speech time for foreign people to speak something in Japanese so students and teachers take time to prepare it every time.
I have a good time teaching Japanese with my senior who introduced the class to me.
She undergraduates from a university but I don't belong any group so far at this point.
Though I'm Japanese, I'm not good at Japanese so years ago, I decided to study English and Japanese together.
At first, I looked for books to go with, and I read most of Roald Dahl's stories.
Since I have to decide about what I would report, I went to library that has a lot of children's English books at hand choosing target book.
A nearby library is inconvenient because English books are mainly stocked at basement floor.
At an another library, I borrowed four series of comedies about which I would go with.
I'm afraid my internet connectivity is unstable.
I don't have an opitical environment and cutting-edge rooter.
So I can't spend a lot of time to correct someone's message.
It's a snowfall in Moscow again.
Again all around just covered by snow.
I wait when it will be warm because I want riding my bicycle.
And I want walking a lot.
I'm tired to sit at the home.
Last year it was warm in the beginning of March, and I walked in my coat.
But now I still must wear my winter jacket.
Yesterday I wanted go for a walk in a park, but it was too bad weather.
So I sat at the home and watched The Twin Peaks by David Lynch.
It's interesting TV series.
It's a snowfall in Moscow again.
But now I still must wear my winter jacket.
I saw people doing a fund-raising campaign on a street yesterday.
They were speaking out to gather a donation from people passing by.
I know it wasn't easy to speak up for a while outside.
A man who dated with me last night wanted me to be a girlfriend. But I refused that because I don't like his character...
I like a gentleman.
I went for the interview today morning.
When I knew the salary and benefits are not good for me at last,also need work overtime often,I feel bad.
I hadn't done that for a long time.
I ate roasted beef with shampagne.
Also, the manager explained about the meat and showed us how to eat.
What I do for health is just moving body regularly.
it's not hard thing like running everyday or go to gym.
I do pile a easy thing like go to the station without using transportation.
In general it seems younger don't care about their health.
It's certain the time flies so fast.
It means everybody get older so fast.
you could enjoy a certain time although, you couldn't enjoy all time unless you care about yourself.
For example, you will have own family, your wife, your sons, and you hope to be with them as long as you can.
The hope wouldn't make it unless you've been caring about your health since you are a younger.
I can imagine younger feel health sounds like.
They want to work to go up career radar and play with closed friends while they are a younger.
Please just remind yourself to care about yourself and pile something a little bit healthy.
The bedrock will show up when low tide.
It's feels like telling us all the life on earth come from the ocean...
Sea of Kaikoura, it may be similar scenery from millions of years ago.
I feel like that.
When I walked the walkway, I met many cattle while grazing.
Spaciously hill and beautiful sea, you guys feel so great, right?
Knowledge is power
Many times we have heard from parents and teachers the phrases "Knowledge is power".
What kind of power is such that it doesn't live in the muscles, heavy and strong machines?
Knowledge helps people to understand the law of nature, human relationships, the world, and then use them it desire direction.
For example I I try to learn something new in addition to my school program.
I prefer to read books, watch movies, or just look for some extra information in the Internet.
It helps me to be versatile and intelligent, but in my opinion, at school we should have lessons such as history, which teaches us to understand what is right and and what is wrong, what is good and what is bad, psychology, which can teach us how to communicate with people without any arguments or how to understand other people.
Also we should learn how to become a successful person or how to become a leader.
I think it can be really useful, because we should know how to use our time, abilities, opportunities and information.
Today it is often said that the main wealth of this century - information.
What's your favorite Japanese home cooking or ones you would like to eat?
I might have a guest from abroad and in that case I have to prepare some meal.
Do you have any authentic Japanese restaurant nearby?
Do they have variety of foods besides sushi, tempura and teriyaki?
If you have any recommendation, please tell me.
What's your favorite Japanese home cooking or ones you would like to eat?
Do they have variety of foods besides sushi, tempura and teriyaki?
What's your favorite Japanese home cooking or ones you would like to eat?
I might have a guest from abroad and in that case I have to prepare some meal.
Today is first day in a week.
It's been a long time since I posted here last time.
I didn't study English all the time, so my English is getting worse.
By the way, it take me time to open Lang-8's pages.
It make me a little irritated.
How about you?
When I find beautiful scenery, I stop a car and take a break.
I take out a lunch box and sit down on a bench.
A quiet and luxurious moment that no one disturb.
HINAMATURI
It was a doll festival on the weekend
I wish for my daughter's growth and health
Hina festival is to wish for the growth and health of my daughter
I just came upon an expression "take his job and shove it", reading a book.
I didn't get the meaning of this, and after I consulted some dictionaries and googled this and that, I found the famous country music titiled "Take This Job and Shove It." According to Wikipedia, "Take this job and shove it" became a popular phrase as a result of the song and it also became a snowclone phrase.
I didn't get the meaning of this, and after I consulted some dictionaries and googled this and that, I found the famous country music titiled "Take This Job and Shove It." According to Wikipedia, "Take this job and shove it" became a popular phrase as a result of the song and it also became a snowclone phrase.
Discovering a light source billions lighter than the Sun
It locates in the Whirling Water Galaxy and is about 31 billions light-years far from the Earth.
Some specialists used to consider it as a black hole.
However, recent researches proved that 3 sub-ULXs was actually super-condensated neutron stars.
Yesterday I had speretime so I went to the shopping mall to buy something with my older sister,
I couldn't find anything is I like it.
Eventually It was just looking some of shops.
I chose the white iPhone X and it cost my mother and father 92000 rubles.
Apart from looking cool, my new phone had many new features.
Firstly, front camera has become more powerful and so on.
Finally, the new iPhone includes powerful chip, the new A11 Bionic.
This is one of the most expensive model phones, but this model has many advantages.
Some Bitcoin investigators go to terrific lengths to keep their wealth.
Time will be allowed around 40 minutes.
One of the most popular activities is to walk a hiking course to see quiet nature and historical buildings.
Time will be allowed around 40 minutes.
There are different many reasons that some people believe that success in life comes from taking risks or other believe that success results from careful planning.
In my opinion, I believe that success in life comes from taking risks or chance because it is advantageous for us to come from taking risks or chances.
To begin with, there are a lot of social issues such as an aging society, declining population, and the recession.
With the development of technology, we are required to get special skills.
Therefore, the success in life comes from taking risks and chance in modern society.
However, I was interested in sociology after I had got an economic course.
I thought that I took a chance to get both economy and sociology.
I studied many exams more than other students.
Even though there were a risk to get both courses, I achieved both courses.
As a result, thanks to getting both majors, I obtained a better job.
Second, There are a lot of opportunities to do if we got a risk and chance in order to be successful in our lives.
For instance, when I was a university student, I took teacher license courses.
It was very hard to take ecnomoy and sociology courses as well as teacher license course.
This was the most important to meet them in a student life.
Before I met them,I was so shy that I couldn't talk with people.
I could not only learn knowledge but also have a wonderful encounter.
Thus, taking a risk and chances can get a life asset.
In conclusion, I strongly believe that the success in life comes from taking a risk and chances.
Therefore, the success in life comes from taking risks and chance in modern society.
However, I was interested in sociology after I had got an economic course.
Even though there were a risk to get both courses, I achieved both courses.
For instance, when I was a university student, I took teacher license courses.
It was very hard to take ecnomoy and sociology courses as well as teacher license course.
This was the most important to meet them in a student life.
Before I met them,I was so shy that I couldn't talk with people.
I changed my mind after I met them.
Thus, taking a risk and chances can get a life asset.
In conclusion, I strongly believe that the success in life comes from taking a risk and chances.
Where is the meaning of life?
I only could say that I hope to have more chances to make me go out and see the world.
I wonder if I have been able to do something in every spring because this is a time when we meet new friends and leave the old behind.
Do I deserve to be wanted to see again for them?
I have to keep changing in a good way.
Am I still what I was last spring?
Do I deserve to be wanted to see again for them?
I've been pressed for time, but I know that's no excuse.
Do I deserve to be wanted to see again for them?
Get access to lang8, finally!
This morning, when I got out to work.
There was a little rain.
But now, the sunshine again!
I like the warm sunshine of everyday!
I took three job interviews in the end.
I got out from home at eight thirty, and I finish the last interview at about six.
First time found Nanjing was so big and got the feeling I would get a subway sickness.
If everything goes smoothly, I will take that jon offer.
Because At this Olympics, Although the team was in substandard conditions, coach kim managed to pull curling team together and led the team work in perfect harmony.
B: I usually wear to work a skirt and a blouse.
A: What clothes do you usually wear for a party?
B: I usually wear for a party a dress and shoes.
I like coach kim, who is a Korean curling team coach.
Because At this Olympics, Although the team was in substandard conditions, coach kim managed to pull curling team together and led the team work in perfect harmony.
My daughter leave to hospital today.
She is do may best, while she was driped to arm.
Today, her arm's needle of drip is removed for her arm.
I'm grad to her get to move free.
I can't help crying and runny nose.
it might be hay fever.
I think a tissue that dramatically decrease.
I was in my room in the darkness, liying on the floor, when I felt something on my arm and I grabbed it.
Of course after I shaked my arm off I killed it,
I Had Nail Art Painted on My Fingernails
I had nail art on my fingers done at a hair salon the other day.
My daughter's friend started working at a salon as a nailist in January. So, my daughter insisted that I go to her salon.
During my manicuring, my daughter's friend and I talked about a lot of things.
I shared my current situation relating to English study with her as well.
I like the nail art a lot.
However, normal price is very expensive.
I Had Nail Art Painted on My Fingernails
I had nail art on my fingers done at a hair salon the other day.
My daughter's friend started working at a salon as a nailist in January.
I had never thought about having nail art on my fingers.
During my manicuring, my daughter's friend and I talked about a lot of things.
She went to Kansaigaidai university and studied English in New Zealand for four months.
I shared my current situation relating to English study with her as well.
About my fingers, the nail color is pale pink.
Some of my fingernails have pearls, shiny stones and stickers of roses, and all finger have the golden sprinkle.
I like the nail art a lot.
I think my daughter's friend was doing great.
I only paid the campaign price this time.
I had nail art on my fingers done at a hair salon the other day.
It was my first time doing this.
During my manicuring, my daughter's friend and I talked about a lot of things.
About my fingers, the nail color is pale pink.
Some of my fingernails have pearls, shiny stones and stickers of roses, and all finger have the golden sprinkle.
I think my daughter's friend was doing great.
I only paid the campaign price this time.
I'd like to have these beautiful nails but I don't know if I will do it again or not.
I had never thought about having nail art on my fingers.
It was my first time doing this.
She went to Kansaigaidai university and studied English in New Zealand for four months.
I shared my current situation relating to English study with her as well.
I think my daughter's friend was doing great.
I only paid the campaign price this time.
About my fingers, the nail color is pale pink.
Some of my fingernails have pearls, shiny stones and stickers of roses, and all finger have the golden sprinkle.
I think my daughter's friend was doing great.
A new employee will come to my office from tomorrow.
He is the successor of me, I will quit my job this May.
She looked k very much alike with her!
Last weekend I went to ski area,.
and I took ski lessen.
I think I think my muscle pain is it effect.
I finally begin to work next April, but I'm worry about one thing.
It is that I'm too short of the knowledge about our society.
Of course, nobody knows the society before entering the society, but I don't know the society especially.
Many people study these knowledge more or less in university, but my major was welfare, so I didn't have any opportunities to touch these fields.
Had you had worried about these matter before starting to work?
It's said that there are many times you feel stress nowadays.
There may be many people who are suffering from relationships at school or companies.
I think that they all have each stress relief method.
I seems that people who has hobby bonsai as a means of forgetting such as stress are increasing overseas.
I thought bonsai is for old people to do, but recently I'm surprised to hear that young people are very popular.
Questions and Answers.
Q: When does bonsai become popular?
That's because many bonsai were exported after 1990 to overseas from Japan.
Q:  What kind of tournament is held?
More than 1000 buyers visit not only in Japan but also many other countries.
A: "Bonsai" which originally started in the Heian era when the "basin scenery" which 
had been held in China, Tang Dynasty entered.
In the Edo period bonsai as well as gardening was a very popular hobby.
I Wonder Who Will Carry the Envelopes With the Winners' Name this Year in the Oscars.
I am not a huge fan of this event but guess I will watch a bit of the ceremony.
Do you remember the mistake in the Oscars of the last year?
In that time the organizers said that the couple who used to carried the envelopes with the winners' name will be fired.
I remember they both were workers of accounting firm PricewaterhouseCoopers.
In the ceremony of the last year the couple of presenters made a mistake and they named to "La La Land" as the winner of Best Movie, but they were given the wrong envelopes and instead of saying that "Moonlight" was the winner as best movie, the presenters told that "La La Land" was the winner.
It was embarrassing to see the casting of La La Land on the stage accepting that they were not the winners but Moonlight was the winner.
I wonder who did carry the envelopes with the winners' name this year.
Maybe the couple of the last year actually was fired.
Until this moment I have not read anything about that.
Do you remember the mistake in the Oscars of the last year?
In that time the organizers said that the couple who used to carried the envelopes with the winners' name will be fired.
I remember they both were workers of accounting firm PricewaterhouseCoopers.
In the ceremony of the last year the couple of presenters made a mistake and they named to "La La Land" as the winner of Best Movie, but they were given the wrong envelopes and instead of saying that "Moonlight" was the winner as best movie, the presenters told that "La La Land" was the winner.
It was embarrassing to see the casting of La La Land on the stage accepting that they were not the winners but Moonlight was the winner.
I wonder who did carry the envelopes with the winners' name this year.
I've just done workout, and now I head for a kick boxing gym.
I have a plan at night, so I'm free until then.
The plan is meeting up some friends that I met when I studyed abroad.
We wll be four people in total, two of us are men, the rest are women.
I get along well with the man, we go out for drink once a month.
He doesn't have day off on weekends, his day off is basically on Sunday, so we have no many chance to meet.
But I want to study English here again.
Please tell me my wrong English!
Way to my goals.
I am from Russia but now I'm living in Vienna in Austria and Studi at the University.
Pass an international Englisch Exam with Level B2-C1 until 1.
Pass an international German Exam with Level C1 until 1.
the additional goals:
Get a Job-offer
I would write here what I made to achieve my goals every day.
If you have some recommendation how I can achieve my goals, just write here.
In many families, it has been traditional for them to choose their children's professions, while in other families children choose their future career by themselves.
I can see advantages in both situations, however, I am inclined to believe that future profession should depend on children's choice.
On the one hand, choosing the future career by children has a myriad of advantages.
If teenagers choose what they really want to do, there will like their job and be quite successful.
For instance, if a child has been really passionate about design since childhood, parents must not dissuade him from doing this thing.
More than that, they have to contribute a lot so as to this job will give him success, attraction and a fell of his place in life.
On the other hand, sometimes it is good to listen advises of your parents because they have a long experience in life, and that is why their suggestions may be quite useful.
For example, my good friend had hoped on their parents, but his results were not successful.
And as a result of a wrong choice, he can be casually employed, stressful, cold front, subsequently, some people decide to enroll at university once more but on their favorite subject.
To sum up, despite some people think it is better to follow parents advises, others may argue that children must have a choice and choose themselves their future life.
As I have written, it is better to let children pick up something out and only sometimes draw attention to advise from parents.
On the Friday night, I met up with my friends, and went to Izakaya to drink.
After that, we went around some places to drink and Karaoke.
It lasted until 5 am in the morning, and I arrived my home at around 7 am, but that was really fun.
Also I hanged out with other friends on the Saturday night.
We also played some games and were awake at around 4 am.
These days were great days and this picked me up!
Also, they have to work as part-time workers at such as convenient stores to live.
Also, they have to work as part-time workers at such as convenient stores to live.
Also, they have to work as part-time workers at such as convenient stores to live.
Also, they have to work as part-time workers at such as convenient stores to live.
Also, they have to work as part-time workers at such as convenient stores to live.
A foreign body approaching the Earth soon
A sub-planet called 2017VR12 whose diameter is 488 meters will pass over the Earth at dawn of March 7th, according to Newsweek.
The NASA classified it as a possibly dangerous object.
However, the distance between it and the Earth doesn't exceed 1.4 billions of kilometers - the safe and enough near length for people to watch it through a house-telescope.
Although to calculate how big a sub-planet is from a far distance is very difficult, researchers can do this.
They can predict its size upon measuring its light intensity but this method can result in a big error.
As consideration for an object small but very bright, its lightness can be the same as that of a bigger one.
Some people think that life in the 21st century is easier, more innovative than it was about 100 years ago, while others may suppose that their ancestors were living better than now because they did not know about some global problems, should not check their email each hour or just simply they used to live for themselves, in their own pace.
However, I am inclined to believe that nowadays life has introduced a lot of innovation and discoveries.
It is more exciting to live now because we can develop in different ways, know lots of things and think broader.
Firstly, a modern life has introduced a myriad of innovations in our everyday life, consequently, it has become easier to live.
For instance, we can use the internet so as to communicate with friends or siblings or use search engines to find a necessary information.
We should not spend time on cooking or go to the movie because of all of them we can do through the internet.
Moreover, other gadgets like smartphones or appliances make our life easier.
Another development is transport systems because we can very fast travel from one country to another.
However, all these innovation cause global problems like global warming, pollutions, and other major issues, but with such developments in technologies, people will overcome these problems in the near future.
Secondly, now we still getting used to a myriad of professions.
For instance, 100 years ago people did not have the same amount of occupations, but since that time, technologies have been developing and now we have professions like VR designers or developers of artificial intelligence and so on.
In other words, people whole lived several decades ago, just did not imagine such professions.
More than that, now we can receive more knowledge than it was accessible a century ago and know a lof thing about the space, our planet and so.
All of it improves people's ability to think broader, subsequently, people think more global than our ancestors who thought mainly about their own problems.
To sum up, despite some people believe that life was better a century ago, others believe that now it is easier and better.
I agree with the latter opinion because the world has become more interconnected, that is why it is more interesting to live nowadays.
Some people think that life in the 21st century is easier, more innovative than it was about 100 years ago, while others may suppose that their ancestors were living better than now because they did not know about some global problems, should not check their email each hour or just simply they used to live for themselves, in their own pace.
It is more exciting to live now because we can develop in different ways, know lots of things and think broader.
Firstly, a modern life has introduced a myriad of innovations in our everyday life, consequently, it has become easier to live.
For instance, we can use the internet so as to communicate with friends or siblings or use search engines to find a necessary information.
We should not spend time on cooking or go to the movie because of all of them we can do through the internet.
Another development is transport systems because we can very fast travel from one country to another.
However, all these innovation cause global problems like global warming, pollutions, and other major issues, but with such developments in technologies, people will overcome these problems in the near future.
Secondly, now we still getting used to a myriad of professions.
For instance, 100 years ago people did not have the same amount of occupations, but since that time, technologies have been developing and now we have professions like VR designers or developers of artificial intelligence and so on.
In other words, people whole lived several decades ago, just did not imagine such professions.
More than that, now we can receive more knowledge than it was accessible a century ago and know a lof thing about the space, our planet and so.
All of it improves people's ability to think broader, subsequently, people think more global than our ancestors who thought mainly about their own problems.
To sum up, despite some people believe that life was better a century ago, others believe that now it is easier and better.
I agree with the latter opinion because the world has become more interconnected, that is why it is more interesting to live nowadays.
I am thinking to take TOEFL or another English profficiency test, but I need to study a bit more.
Study one language is hard, even more two, but I will try my best.
I understand a lot of English but listen the people speak it is a bit difficult to me and I even forget a lot of words, but I will try to listenning more to take this test.
Since I had drunk too much on the previous day, I woke up late.
My wife and my daughter had already gone out for her work or playing each other.
I sometimes eat takoyaki which is usually stocked in my refrigerator.
I think that the frozen takoyaki, which I buy in Amazon, is really useful for busy persons.
One pack of the takoyaki contained 60 ones.
I usually put five takoyaki in the microwave oven for three minutes.
No sauce or no mayonnaise are OK.
I recommend the frozen takoyaki for everybody.
Yesterday was a warm Sunday, so I jogged.
I have a hard homework.
I quoted two examples below.
An Ocean is the largest.
A sea is larger than lake.
A major is the most important.
A captain is more important than sergeant.
I quote few of them and add my answer to them.
A town is the bigest.
A platinum is the most precious.
A gold is more precious than a silver.
A road is more wider than a lane.
What does "precious" meant at No.3 question.
It wrote "Gold is the most precious metal".
Now the following are my question.
I'll do *5 to *8 after *1 to *4 is clear.
Today went for a walk and noticed two youth gangs standing in front of each other and watching two guys fighting in the center.
It was afternoon and nobody was giving a slightest sh..
Some passer-by stopped for a moment to get a better look but none of them called police or something.
By the time I walked out of the shop on another side of the street both gangs disappeared.
On this picture two armies standing in front of each other watching two warriors fighting.
I read somewhere that this is a very ancient thing which originate from our ancestors.
If one of them win, the whole pack it belongs to back down.
If the leaders are equal and none of them can defeat another then it is time for the packs to get involved.
Scientists say that this type of behavior was created by nature deliberately to prevent our specie from dying out in endless fights.
It is heavy raining now, even though I have only the hold umbrella.
He gets 74 rec, 1,549 yards, 13 touchdown in the last 6 game.
In the pitch he is very well respected by colleagues and players of other teams.
His name is very well known, even over state.
He has already cups jeans scarves hat and shorts with his name on it.
Last Saturday a local television aired for the first time the commercial where he is the protagonist.
There was a local campaign on television last year with the Senator Mcfly who said -Please not open your door if you smell a bad odor-.
It showed a swarm of flies hovering around a golden and blue door.
Golden and blue are the color of the State.
This morning Cronemberg is in the field.
-Hey man, how are you doing?- say his friends
-No problems, we would easily win today cap- assures the coach 
This is in fact the last game of the season and it is very very important for the team to win and to have a statistically good individual performances.
After the game he returned to his apartment.
He lived all by himself.
There was silence in the building.
He walked six flights of stair.
Couch Net told me him that he was a real champ and if he wanted to live by himself he would have lived by himself.
No questions about it.
He opened the door graciously.
He checked nearby that no flies were around twice, the, he closed the door carefully and took a shower.
He ate what he was supposed to eat strictly following the diet instructions.
-You are absolutely no fat-.
There were also those one called 'the additives'.
Medical supplies, completely legal, he took every day after a game, win or lose that it be.
He put these little bottles of addictive in front of him in 3 rows.
Mr Buger told him to take only 1 row of addictive per day.
-Have you heard me little boy?- asked Mr Bug.
-Have you heard me?- He recalled him adding something before reminding him -no more than 1 row per day-.
-Don`t drink more than one row of bottle, captain, is it ok?- said the old coach.
Have you understood me, son?- he asked and then asked again- Do you have it all clear?
The day after that day it rains the whole day.
They inspected the place to find evidences.
They looked to each other clueless.
He looked around to find evidences of any kind but he found nothing.
Journalists from local newspaper and local TVs were waiting outside.
He explained that the young boy suffered from an aneurism and probably passed away while sleeping on the couch.
It's slow tempo with relaxing sounds always make me happy.
Yesterday, a Sunday morning, was a day as the somg.
I woke up on time and did my chores slowly with my wife.
We had enjoyed doing them as well as chatting.
On the top of that, we had a small dinner party and took a nap.
All was right in this world yesterday!
Convenience or Study.
I moved my working desk to the other building last week.
From this week, I work in the building.
Since the building has many companies, many people stand in long lines in front of elevators every morning.
To arrive earlier, I need to take the train 15 minutes prior to the one I was taking until last week.
Although I need to leave my house earlier, the time I'm in the train becomes shorter than last one.
It is good for me and for my back because the stress gotten on my back gets lighter.
However, The time I can study English becomes shorter than before.
This movement was good or bad.
When I attended a IT conference in the past and listened to the speech by Mark Jarvis,Oracle Chief Marketing Officer then, he gave the audience an anecdote of top IT manager and a genie:
The genie declines because it's above his ability.
I want to get maximum customer satisfaction ever." To this, the genie says, "Well, how many rains do you want on a bridge."
That seemed like a punch line and the audience laughed without me.
Most Japanese speakers cannot discern the "L" sound and "R" sound clearly as they are listening to English speech.
When I attended a IT conference in the past and listened to the speech by Mark Jarvis,Oracle Chief Marketing Officer then, he gave the audience an anecdote of top IT manager and a genie:
The purpose of this report is to outline how our body language could change our mindset and what kind of hormones are released when we posed in a high-level position or in a low-level position.
I will reflect on the benefits of our body language and I will give some tips for doing job interviews and speaking in from of a crowd.
In the same way that you come to a meeting and you scrutinize who is the leader or the alfa, your brain gives an opinion about how you are and how well is your behavior in a relationship.
However, how your brain categorizes you, that is the way you are supposed to act.
Our brain cheats us in a violent way.
Keeping an open body gesture for two minutes, allows us to release testosterone which helps us to maintain a positive attitude and limits our level of stress.
Given that, when you are in a stressful situation, if you are able to keep a positive gesture instead of freaking out, you will be more capable to overcome the situation and being successful.
Breathe, be in the present and keep high-level position will help you to overcome the hardest situation that you can face it.
If you are in a stressful job position or even if you want your improve your lifestyle balance I strongly recommend that you must study your body language in your daily basis.
It would help you to improve your positive thoughts, to overcome stressful situations and to be more confident speaker.
The purpose of this report is to outline how our body language could change our mindset and what kind of hormones are released when we posed in a high-level position or in a low-level position.
I will reflect on the benefits of our body language and I will give some tips for doing job interviews and speaking in from of a crowd.
In the same way that you come to a meeting and you scrutinize who is the leader or the alfa, your brain gives an opinion about how you are and how well is your behavior in a relationship.
However, how your brain categorizes you, that is the way you are supposed to act.
Our brain cheats us in a violent way.
Amy Cuddy says that we can change that if we are conscious of our posture and we keep a high-level position.
Keeping an open body gesture for two minutes, allows us to release testosterone which helps us to maintain a positive attitude and limits our level of stress.
Given that, when you are in a stressful situation, if you are able to keep a positive gesture instead of freaking out, you will be more capable to overcome the situation and being successful.
Breathe, be in the present and keep high-level position will help you to overcome the hardest situation that you can face it.
It would help you to improve your positive thoughts, to overcome stressful situations and to be more confident speaker.
It's becoming harder and harder to write an entry or comment on lang8.
Also, the corrections or comments can just vanish after you click send.
It's keeping people away from using the site.
It's becoming harder and harder to write an entry or comment on lang8.
It's keeping people away from using the site.
Why is the debate of medical cannabis blocked out when it comes to them?
Why is the debate about medical cannabis blocked out when it comes to them?
104-2 Raise the price of transportation from last week is the second time in this year.
104-3 Unfortunately many terrorist incidents has happend in this century.
104-2 Raise the price of transportation from last week is the second time in this year.
104-3 Unfortunately many terrorist incidents has happend in this century.
You made it up this story.
I felt extremely hot today!
I went to ski area.
Today was worm it like May.
I got my graduation in march 2012 in commerce stream.
After completed graduation I was started to seek a job.
But I did not get any job, I was stayed in home for six months then luckily I got offered for an accountant in one of construction company.
I started my career in the month of october 2012 with one of sub contractor company which I worked there as an accountant.
I worked there for two years then I got offered to switched to big company where I served around 4 years.
I Feel Languid.
Recently, I cannot have a day off on every Saturday.
I have to work hard on Saturday as a weekday.
I really want to have days off in a row on both Saturday and Sunday...
She has worked with three firms including a telecommunications company so far, and she met people, with various ethnicities, values and sexual orientation.
When her clients told her "I will continue the contract with your company as far as you are in the company", she felt very grateful.
I want to catch up with the best English learner all around the world, but I think I don't commit enough to that task.
Albeit I learn every days new words, expressions or idoms, I don't get the impression that my English level has improved
I would have love to have a casual conversation with a native speaker day in day out but it's tremendously diffucult to implement, 
Despite the fact that it's diffucult in my town to find native speakers ain't an excuse to not try find other way to speak English.
I could pay a teacher online once or twice a week and exchance few words on different topic, I know isn't a plight.
Moreover, I added these songs!
Also, I want to go to the Karaoke with the member!
What anime did you see in your boyhood or girlhood?
In addition, What anime songs do you like?
Also, I want to go to the Karaoke with the member!
I went to see Grandmother today afternoon with my Mom.
Grandmother is ninety three years old.
She is too old to wash her head and foot.
So we help her to complete all things.
There was a big smile on her face like the sun.
Grandmother wants us visit her often.
A thing which we use when we eat rice.
People who study in school.
People who make lows.
There are a lot of discussion about English education now in Japan.
Entrance examinations for university have been very difficult and complex whose text is Russel's essay,for example.
However, world has become much smaller place these days and global communication is needed, so some officers, politicians and English teachers assert that students must study more speaking skills.
According to the MLIT, many people move in March and April because of their company transfers or entrance universities.
The reason for the lack is because increasing online shoppers makes the transportation companies busy.
The minister of MLIT, Ishii, commented that he was afraid it might be impossible for people to move whenever they want to do.
Japan trucking association is handing out the brochure that asks the people who plan the moving to change the date to less congested days on the streets.
I wrote several basic questions which used in coaching sessions and my answers to these questions.
Being in the environment where I can learn new things
Move first, worry less
What I experienced being engrossed in before is:
Reading fictional books, solving programming quiz
Today, I was ready for tomorrow trip.
The package is heavy for every time.
So, I want to cut of it!
The picture on the right shows another doll today.
The Doll Festival has gone.
The dolls for the festival were changed to another doll this morning.
It is said if the dolls for the festival were exhibited past the festival day the daughter will get marriage late.
While some people think that all pulis must have classes in a foreign language since the earliest grades, others may argue that a foreign language is only an option and if children do no wat study a foreign language, it should not be obligatory for them.
For instance, despite the UN is an international organization, it requires knowing two languages: English and French, without them you can not be an employee there.
Bi-lingual people can go to work to another country and read and write documents in another language, or they can continue their academic career after school and enroll at a university in another country.
People who know another language can communicate with people or find a lot of friends in others countries.
In other words, they can be familiar with a myriad of cultures, traditions and be kind of a citizen of the world.
Secondly, studying a foreign language improves children's ability to think more creatively and deeper.
In other words, they used to listen and see familiar words, however with time their brain get used to new vocabulary.
To sum up, there is an opinion that for teenagers language classes should be studying since childhood.
As I have written, I agree with this opinion because of it has a lot of advantages in their future and it develops their ability to think.
No one told you that you had your fly down.
If somebody would've told you that you had your fly down, you had taken care of it.
What word do you use for when you want to close your fly?
Do you use the word "close"?
I don't want to use "taken care of it." 
If somebody would've told you that you had your fly down, you had closed it.
In Japan, employees at eateries also deliver foods when they get orders from customers, whereas staffs at eateries are completely separated from delivery workers in NY.
People in NY are basically hectic.
How can we improve this stakeholder relationships?
This is preparation for IELTS part 2.
I wrote script for speaking.
The language other than English that you would like to learn
It is French language that I would like to study.
French language is the second most popular language in Japan.
The location where French language is spoken of course include France and some other African countries like Senegal where many people who study French visit to learn it as it don't cost as much as in France.
The difficulty I assume in French is that comprehension to listen French, French language is spoken so fast and liaison occur so many time.
These makes me difficult understand what is spoken in French.
On the other hand, the easy things is that French grammar is similar to English grammar.
This enable me to learn French easily as it is able to compare French with English.
The reason why I would like to study French is that I would like to study in France in near future.
Currently, I came to be interested in artificial intelligence and considering to enter a university.
In France, tuition fee is almost free to gather competent students from all over the world.
That's what you get for having your pants off.
That's what you get for wearing your pants not high enough.
That's what you get for not wearing your pants high up.
Do I have my fly down?
Cherry bubs are also begining to prepar for flowering.
I prefer to study alone because it is easier way for me to focus on my study than studying in a group.
I want to get a good score at TOEFL test because my dream is to study abroad and higher TOEFL score is an advantage in my career.
Last Sunday, I went to a library near my house and studied English.
I used words books to increase my vocabulary, listened to podcast programs using my iPhone, and wrote some short essays to improve my writing skill.
I did anything I wanted, not caring about others, and I had a great productive time to study.
At the end of the day, I did a practice test and got a good score.
I prefer to study alone because it is easier way for me to focus on my study than studying in a group.
I want to get a good score at TOEFL test because my dream is to study abroad and higher TOEFL score is an advantage in my career.
I used words books to increase my vocabulary, listened to podcast programs using my iPhone, and wrote some short essays to improve my writing skill.
I did anything I wanted, not caring about others, and I had a great productive time to study.
There were some waves against such amendment on the internet.
A seemingly knowledgeable person explained the logical behind that: President Xi has to continue his terms when they are over because the anti Xi power has not been loyally annihilated yet, once he leaves his position as president, they will step in, causing upraising and unrest.
This amendment is temporary, and it will revert to its former way when the right moment comes.
President Trump even showed his support, calling Xi is a good man, and saying America should give it a shot one day.
He might be the second man who will have continued his terms until he dies after Mao.
I was in charge of lectures on history of literature from the new semester.
They tend to end up just by memorizing the name of the work and the author.
When I Was Alone
When I was alone, I always feel very sad.
Everyone might like to forget many days of their life.
To me, the day I gave a speech at my age 25 is still contorting me.
I gave a lot of thought about how I can give a good impression to other people for many days.
But I made a huge mistake.
I changed my script before the day I give the speech.
Sometimes, the thin line that divides reality from fiction becomes blurred and makes the way for such incredible stories as the one I'm about to tell you in the following paragraphs.
The last rays of sunlight were giving way to night when the old turtle that was calmly floating on its trunk, heard an unusual sound coming from the sky.
Right there appeared two flying toads each of them on a lily pad.
The sky was full as if it were a rain of toads.
Not even the rest of the animals seemed to understand what was happening there.
All of them were identical: huge, fat, brownish-green stained with spots skin, bulging eyes that seemed to look nowhere and with a big smile of satisfaction in the face that gave them an almost Martian appearance.
The moonlight illuminated a sky full of flying toads that broke into the houses taking advantage of any gap.
At 4.38 am or so, just before the break of day began, all the toads flew aimlessly as if disoriented, as afraid that the morning sun would discover them flying in the sky outside their pond, until they found a dog that without saying a word, began to guide them to the place where it thought they belong to.
Later on with the first rays of light, the smile of the toads wiped when discovered that the sun made the magic wear off and the water lily leaves stopped flying, falling in a nosedive into the pond as if it were a biblical plague.
Next Tuesday at the same time, the last rays of the day seemed to project on the wall of an old barn what looked like...
She likes it so much that she was looking forward to wearing it at the recital.
However, not everything got by.
m, but he was not able to run fast on his bicycle.
I got angry with him because his speed was too slow for us to reach the rehearsal stage by the fixed time.
In the end, we managed to get there by the time and he was able to attend the rehearsal.
His performance was too bad to extol, but he did his best.
She was not able to play the tune perfectly enough and often made big mistakes when we practiced this morning.
She might be tough enough in front of audiences.
I am highly motivated to fill the challenge of your patent clerical position, where I believe my skills and experience of mine will contribute greatly.
I have experienced four different clerical jobs, a cardboard manufacturer as a regular employee and three public offices as a temporary employee.
I can work on several tasks at same time accurately and quickly.
I majored in English literature at my graduate university.
Working on patent related job is the best for me because I can make use of my English skills and improve at the same time.
Also, I think this job suits me, who felt happy to find something new every day while improving myself in the field of clerical job, English and music.
I would like to be one of specialists of Intellectual property right at your patent office and contribute to the development of industry.
My friend and I were looking for a cozy and dreamy room in London on Airbnb now for our trip.
But we start thinking that hotels in London might be much better for now.
The room was so cozy and the cost wasn't so fancy.
Even though we have to talk all in English to the owner, she was so gentle.
My friend and I were looking for a cozy and dreamy room in London on Airbnb now for our trip.
But we start thinking that hotels in London might be much better for now.
The number of the people who is over 60 have been increasing in Japan, while the number of the people who is less than 20 have been decreasing.
That means the burden of the young people will be very heavy because now 3 young people have to look after 1 old person, but in 30 years 2 young people have to look after 1 old person.
He fixed the ruining computer.
She seat on the breaking chair.
She seat on the broken chair.
I sewed the unstitched shirt
He's a interesting person.
He's interested in buy it.
Owing to his characte, he'll be alone.
He went prior to go to Japan 
He is the boy, that of other school.
Eat your food in place of being to play.
In the evening today, I will be attending an orientation for a temporay job that begins from tomorrow to Friday.
I'm supposed to help a meeting, called "one on one meeting".
It takes place in a hotel room; listed Japanese companies that look for investors are allowed to use each room, and foreign investors visit rooms.
During the session, the investors check in at the information desk, and they go to the rooms.
It sounds easy, but when I expcerienced the job before, I was confused and about to make mistakes because I was in charge of a few rooms when they showed up at once.
In addition, the investors entered the room ignoring my roll call.
I have to be calm down.
In the evening today, I will be attending an orientation for a temporay job that begins from tomorrow to Friday.
It takes place in a hotel room; listed Japanese companies that look for investors are allowed to use each room, and foreign investors visit rooms.
It sounds easy, but when I expcerienced the job before, I was confused and about to make mistakes because I was in charge of a few rooms when they showed up at once.
I have to be calm down.
It's such a beautiful sunny day today that I can't believe it will be rainning tomorrow.
In my region, we have had warm days for these several days.
The washing I hung out just before noon already dried up.
I want to do something enjoyable on such a peaceful Sunday like today, but unfortunately, any good ideas don't come up with me.
Have You Noticed Some Problems With Login Lang-8 in Recent Days?
In this last days, I had some problems to navigate in Lang-8 web page, and the problem was not only with login, even if I wanted to correct some entries, the page never loaded.
Just in the Saturday night I could enter to this web page, correct some entries and write this paragraphs.
I hope these problems finish because it is very uncomfortable not being able to access here.
Who likes to navigate on the Internet with problems?
I do not think that the problem is with my Internet connection, other pages are available without any problem.
Now I write about Lang-8, I remembered that I wanted to recommend this website to my nephew but I almost forget that new subscriptions are not available anymore.
It is a pity due to the fact that this page is very useful in order to learn a foreign language.
My nephew is learning English in an institute in my city, he already understands when someone speaks English but he has some problems to understand English grammar.
Have You Noticed Some Problems With Login Lang-8 in Recent Days?
Just in the Saturday night I could enter to this web page, correct some entries and write this paragraphs.
I learned English.
Economic growth and environmental degradation have been two terms in the sense sentence for a long time.
Developments in technology have brought various environmental problems.
Some believe that people need to live simpler lives to solve environmental problems.
In my opinion, technology has a big role in sustainable development.
Living a simple life is a way to solve environmental problems, but we must be honest, everybody uses technology in your daily life.
Also, many industries depend on Developments in technology, such as manufactory, communications, energy, international commerce, and so forth.
On the other hand, there are a bunch of initiatives and project reaches that could help to solve these problems.
For example, there are many studies related to alternative energy sources like Solar Energy, Wind Energy, Biomass energy, etc.
This kind of projects could reduce the use of Fossil Fuels.
Additionally, many findings show good results in inventions such as electric and automated cars, systems of recycling and reuse, Advanced Biorefinery, the list is so long.
Today, I'll write about what I've been thinking about my job.
There are some reasons why I think about that.
One is that the food industly is so stable that pretty much no one quite their job or move to a different company.
Because of that, the average age of the employees is very old.
I respect my coworkers who work hard and always make a good performance, but on the other hands it's not stimulating and inspiring.
I should have done more research on this before joing the company but you'll never know what it would be like until you actually become a part of it.
One is that the food industly is so stable that pretty much no one quite their job or move to a different company.
I respect my coworkers who work hard and always make a good performance, but on the other hands it's not stimulating and inspiring.
Preston Garvey is also one of player's companions, so you can go adventuring with him once you allies with him.
He becomes useless even more than a randomly spawned settler.
Preston Garvey is also one of player's companions, so you can go adventuring with him once you allies with him.
After that point, Preston gets furious and disappointed in you, so you can't interact with him as a companion anymore.
That makes sense how he reacts in that situation, but as a player, I thought, "I just did that to simply enjoy the DLC!
I took a bath and got out right now.
I really like a bath but today I'm so busy.
I cannot say daily sentences immediately.
Our school will end on March 15th.
The graduate ceremony is on March 15th.
That is a candid decision.
I try to dissuade them to cancel the mission.
3 months have passed since I moved to Boston from California.
It is popular to run along the Charles river which runs in the center of Boston to all the way west, and I often run there too.
There is a nice trail both sides of river.
You can see many runners anytime of the day even in snow storm days.
On weekday after work, I only run 3 miles along the river, but literally I see more than 50 runners during runs.
It is encouraging to see a lot of runners, both serious and casual runners.
In California, there are many runners, but it is much less likely to see runners on even a drizzling day.
Soon Boston marathon will be held.
I am excited about seeing all the elite runners from all over the world.
When I read a juvenile story called "Holes" in the past, one of the characters has a nickname of "X-ray." I was intrigued by the fact that this name of X-ray was a product of game called pig Latin.
I didn't know about pig Latin before.
There is also a language game like pig Latin in Japanese.
Therefore, Japanese pig Latin is far more simpler than English one: Remove the last sound from the word and put it at the beginning.
However, speakers of Japanese may think of the combination of a consonant and a vowel as one sound and you don't aware specific consonants consciously.
Therefore, Japanese pig Latin is far more simpler than English one: Remove the last sound from the word and put it at the beginning.
By the way, I think "Holes" is very intriguing, interesting well-made story and I recommend this to ones who didn't read it yet.
I make it a rule not to eat between meals and to exercise at least three times a week.
What is the most effective method to succeed in a diet.
Recently, I started the diet.
So, there is this guy I know from work, he`s Mexican, Jose is his name.
Too funny, he came from a city or a village with the longest name, guadalupa, guantaladupa, the fuck I know.
When he joined us at the farm he was the worst, he had no clue about how the work is get done and also was the laziest of the guy, you know?
Most of my job consists in walking through them with a watchnwhile they`re picking up, and to pretend I`m take the time.
Ehy, I`m not sayin` they`re saints or whatever you wanna call`em, I am not saying that.
They take of their interests all right, you know what I mean?
If they hire Mexicans they do for the money they spare all right.
It is what it is.
An early morning I found him around a corner smoking good stuff.
- Ehy yo motherfucka, what are you doin`?
You betcha go to work now- The motherfucka glared at me smiling and started moving his ass.
-Hey come here Jose- I said -What are you smokin` at?- I took the dark cigarette from his fingers and took some drag.
So since that day, every day before work we have been smoking marijuana every morning before work.
I even chipped in a couple of time with good money.
-But I am your boss, remember-.
We changed the place where to do it `cause we don`t want to get caught.
-So Jose- I used to mock him -who is your boss?- One time this lazy guy gave me an answer I can`t still wrap my head around.
He said -You ain`t no my boss.
You ain`t none boss around here, man.
You don`t have the words.- What the fuck he meant I `ll never know.
I am Italian all right, I came here with a better English than everybody around here and this motherfucka told me I have no words.
-Go to work motherfucka- I said.
He kept the cigarette around his fingers for a while then put it out and left.
I don`t have the words.
See, I am not against immigration, I am not even against illegals to be honest.
They do their job all right, I guess.
Americans need to do other stuff if they wanna pay mortgage.
I kinda recognize we need them.
But if you legalize motherfukers like this, they would learn some English and pretend do have better job than we have.
In ten years we are screwed.
I mean, they need to pay their dues as everybody`d else, is that clear all right?
The wall, well the wall is all good, it is pure gold.
Because they will understand we don`t want them here all right, they will keep in mind who`s the boss `round here motherfuckers.
You hear that all right.
Jose was neither good nor bad, to be honest.
He worked, minded his own business, earned his 3 dollars per hours, and went home after sunset like everybody else.
Only in the morning, we had our little affair with the a little marjiuana all right.
This morning he isn`t there.
Fuck Jose, where the hell are you?!
It makes me works, zero thoughts, work`s good, silence in mind and mind to the job.
I see these two guys comin` towards me, Juan and Pedro, their names.
They`re kids all right.
-Hey fellows, where the hell is Jose?
You know that all right?
-They look at me speechless, there is something wrong, I`m Italian for Christ`s sake and I know what I am saying.
-What`s wrong with you guys?
I am going now to tell the boss if you don`t rat him out all right, right here, right now- I want to sound intimidatory and caught them by surprise so they couldn`t resist me and confess.
But they are making that much resistance.
The sun blinds me through the sunglasses.
They move fast enough between the rows picking up, picking up.
They follow a kinda rhythm, nobody is too slow nobody is fast or hectic.
Even girls work here sometime.
We reach a place where everybody gather to drink some water but I can`t stop, if I stop I faint, if I stop I am done.
It is on open space between two plantations, it is just 20 feet large.
-Well?- I say.
And the two guys, Pedro and the other say -Here`s Jose, senor-.
I kinda figure it out better now.
There is this tomatoes plant, very well kept, of a good red and ready to be picked.
-We shall pick him up?- ask the two guys a little confused.
-The hell I know - I say-I have to ask my boss-
After finish my work today, I'll have day off tomorrow.
So I'll do my best to finishing my work today, but it'll rainy tomorrow, so I'm sad.
Anyway, I want to go fun time today.
Is lang-8 going to be closed? 
I've heard that lang-8 has suspended new members from joining and would start receiving new members again by March of this year.
But now it's March, and this site doesn't work well.
It became worse than before.
I'm not sure if I can succeed in posting this entry or not.
I discovered this site in 2015, but there was a long hiatus.
Anyway I've been enjoying here since late last year, but...
In case, I'd like to say good-bye to lang-8 friends.
In addition, doing physical activities which are not related to our work is great not just for our physical health but also for our mental health.
On the way to Tokyo Tower, we passed a lot of places, seeing many scenery, including many houses, buildings, bridges, rivers, and greenery.
It was a lot of fun, and taking the time riding my bicycle is great way for me to relax.
As my stylist said to me that you came here after 10 months, I was really surprised.
As I increased my workdays, only Friday is my day off in weekdays.
I have something important to do in weekend.
So, the internet was cut the connection.
Spring has come, so a lot of stray cats in heat are caterwauling every day and night.
They are tossing and turning on other's park lot.
When I walk my dog, he is always makig a mad dash for stray cats, so I have to use extreme care to prevent from the collision.
Spring has come, so a lot of stray cats in heat are caterwauling every day and night.
Summarise the information by selecting and reporting the main features, and make comparisons where relevant.
The bar chart below gives information about challenging situations people from 18 to over 55 years old face when living abroad.
For 18 to 34 years old people the most challenging situation is making friends, with a 46%, followed by finding somewhere to live, which has a 40%, and finally 29% of the people ranging from 18 to 34 years old find learning the local language as a challenge.
Thirty nine percent of the people from 35 to 54 years old think an important issue is finding a place to settle down, 36% perceive making friend as an important issue and 35% of the people thinks learning the new language is challenging.
Today,I got up 10:30.
After morning, I went to massage. Because I felt a pain neck and shulder.
After noon,I went to AKASAKAGYOEN with boyfriend.
From a few days ago, the response time of Lang-8 is getting slow again.
From a few days ago, the response time of Lang-8 is getting slow again.
If the response time is too slow, it will cause users make a breakaway from this system.
Some people say the government should not put money into building theatres and sports stadiums; they should spend more money on medical care and education.
Some people think authorities should spend more money in medical care and education instead of investing money in building theatres and sport stadiums.
Even though medical care and education are vital for all us, they are not the only things determining the welfare of human beings.
First of all, we should consider that the activities performed at theatres and sport stadiums contribute not only to our physical health but also to our mental health.
It is evident that sports require physical activity that helps us maintain our bodies in a good condition.
But it has been scientifically proved that practicing sports also promotes mental health.
It is also healthy to stimulate our brains by attending artistic activities, watching theatre plays would be one of those activities.
Secondly, activities like sports and art allow people exploring their minds.
All things considered, governments should include education, medical care, sports as well as entertainment in the budget of a nation, giving of course, the highest amount of money to the areas that are priority to the society.
I seldom go business trip now, but I had gone business trip to Hirosaki-city, Aomori-prefecture almost every week 10 years ago for the monitoring of clinical study site.
the site had no expperience of clinical studies. So i needed to go the site every week by plane.
The clinical study was very challenging, but we could achieved it.
By the way, the Lang-8 site don't work well now, do it?
I have interned in Moushi Daily and I was responsible for the Yiyu Caifeng column, whose duties includes writing, auditing and editing English manuscripts of the Editorial department.
In my spare time, I taught myself the multimedia software such as photoshop, and worked as an intern in an advertising company during my summer vacation.
I have interned in Moushi Daily and I was responsible for the Yiyu Caifeng column, whose duties includes writing, auditing and editing English manuscripts of the Editorial department.
In my spare time, I taught myself the multimedia software such as photoshop, and worked as an intern in an advertising company during my summer vacation.
The spring has come!
Since the end of the last year,
I have been cold and I can't stop my cough.
My health condition was not so good.
Today, on the way to the gym, I dropped by Holi festival.
Last Wednesday, for the preparation DDD-san wrote some sentences in English.
But today Indian people in the park had make up with colorful powder.
I got two pieces pf tandoori chicken.
BTW, some kinds of biriyanis were sold.
A man who is a member of a board of education came to the elementary school for an inspection.
Language learning is very important memories the many word and use to it.
I almost sleep, good night.
The city of Montreal built on an island in the Saint Lawrence River.
This last two days was hectic days for me.
I got journey from one place to another, carryied lots of luggage, and I don't even had my lunch whole day.
At last finally I reached my destination.
Unfortunately my room was locked and I was trying to called my house made but her number was out of coverage.
I stood outside of the door and I don't know what I have to do and I was extremely hungry then luckily her number was ring and then she pick my call I told her get my key as fast as possible then she came and got my room key.
I suppose that why I grew up as a feminist is that I had learnt feminism from this kind of sci-fi or fantasy when I was a child.
He got tired of being ignored his friendly messages.
I froze by shock and horror.
It tried to heal me by reading.
I had no idea why I put it in my rucksack before I left my flat this morning.
Can anyone help me to correct these translations, please?
Ted might have bought some bread on his way home, even if he rarely does it.
May it go on like this!
A virus erased many files and I didn't have any back-up.
The day before yesterday was strong wind and cold, but yesterday was fine and warm.
Some people died of cars that could not move due to deep snowfall of storm the day before yesterday.
It was a very sad news.
Yesterday was a contrasting day.
Do you think that the students' council should have a voice in deciding about the future of the University of Warsaw in cooperation with the University officials?
University of Warsaw is an institute where very a lot of students spend most time.
The biggest part in that University are students but all decisions about universities always make the University officials.
Is it right or maybe students' council should gave a voice as well?
As part of the University officials, they come people who were studying before, who has experience and for who the most important are students because students create all society at University of Warsaw.
They know also the history and needing of students the most so anyone should impose new things.
On the other hand, the students are people who are also mature people and also they want to create good place where they are studying and new young people will be studying as well.
The day before yesterday was strong wind and cold, but yesterday was fine and warm.
Some people died of cars that could not move due to deep snowfall of storm the day before yesterday.
I moved to Tokyo for changing jobs.
I already want to see my friends.
I was very happy and became sad.
I have a lot of stuff to do this week. So, I 'm able to distract myself from being sad.
My new job start soon.
Study to death!!!!
I started putting on a face mask to avoid pollen.
I also put on glasses so I have to think about the way to keep them from fogging.
Anti-fog face masks are costly so I'm using anti fog spray to my glasses instead.
write a letter to Adrenalin Adventure asking for more details
I have recently seen your advertisement in the international newspaper.
Firstly, there are seven of us and we would like to go on 12-13 August.
Could you please let me know if there are any empty rooms for those days?
Secondly, I would be grateful if you could tell me what the lower age limit is because one person in our group is only 17 years old.
Thirdly, would it be possible to sleep in single rooms?
Finally, the advertisement mentions that the cost will be 199 pounds per person.
I wonder if you could inform me if the cost per person includes meals and equipment rental.
Yes, this dialogue is from Dragon Ball and most Japanese know this scene.
I've been watching the dragon Ball series since I was a child.
The new season, Dragon Ball Super is going to end soon.
He is a Saiyan, which is a combat ethnic.
A few Saiyans can transform into Super Saiyan and once they become Super Saiyan, their hair turns into gold from black and gets more stronger.
The dialogue above is when Goku became Super Saiyan for the first time by being killed his friend, Kuririn.
Anger is the trigger to become Super Saiyan.
In the new season, he fights Gods and the strongest fighter in universe.
For your information, here is the ascending strong order.
This is funny but most characters are named after vegetables, food or underwear.
I've been watching the dragon Ball series since I was a child.
He is a Saiyan, which is a combat ethnic.
A few Saiyans can transform into Super Saiyan and once they become Super Saiyan, their hair turns into gold from black and gets more stronger.
For your information, here is the ascending strong order.
It's said that it's tough for even God to master the Ultra Instinct.
This is funny but most characters are named after vegetables, food or underwear.
My day was start at 6.00 am,I do the first shift,when I finish my shift I went in the hospital for get the medical report of Michela.
Later I come at home and I clean my car.
Now I studing English and at 6.00 pm I will prepare the dinner.
I started Golf this year.
So I went to Golf Practice place.
it took an hour to practice a golf.
I am not good at golf yet,I think to practice more.
Actually, making a decision was difficult for me before.
Because I was thinking too much, and then I took many risks into account.
So I'm trying to change my personality, trying to be able to believe my tuition.
In my experience, asking other people would make a decision better.
They give me an opinion from objective standpoints.
When I was looking for a job, I only consider what I want to do.
However, some other people such as my friends, teachers, said that I had better think about working conditions, and they were right.
Asking other people is a good chance to me, to take some time to calm my mind down.
I found many people got together one place and I approached there.
There was time bargain for socks.
There a many kinds of socks for men and women and variety colored socks.
Many women stretched their arms and looked for ones.
This week it's really cold and rainy in my village in Spain.
It's been hard to live with this weather so many days.
It's boring because I can't do running or go walking to my job.
So, It difficult for me getting used to it.
In fact, In winter the temperatures are above zero almost always.
This winter, the average temperature is 9 degrees centigrade at daytime and 1 o 2 degrees at night.
It usually rains very little, only 20 o 30 days during the winter.
I was wondering what is the weather like in your city...
how can you live below zero for months?
or if you live in a tropical site how can you live with moisture and heat?
One thing that annoys me upon using the mobile phone is a autocorrect function.
It is always trying to replace my Spanish words into English words.
Someone had put boiled chicken breast strips on the alley where my house was every Tuesday and Friday night for the last two weeks.
I don't know why, but that's not bother because if that's bother, I would put them in front of the back door, but they were put on the end of the alley.
I thought it's for a stray cat.
It is Gils' Day.
Hinamarsuri is a day to pray for the health and happiness of young girls.
For more variety, sometimes we change the decoration of the place we live.
For doing this, having a big house will be easier than a small home, because a small flat doesn't have enough place to change everything.
Therefore you need to think more about every changing.
For changing a decoration, don't need to buy any new stuff.
Only, try to show your creativity for making a new design for your rooms, halls an so on.
As a result, do every change that make your space more enjoyable for yourself not others.
Boomerang by Michael Lewis Review
My impression of this book is still fresh as I read it on the last week.
Author tells about how several developed countries behave as if they were the third world countries.
He makes it with sense of humour and in easy language.
There are 5 chapters, each of which two one if the following countries - Island, Greece, Ireland, German, the USA.
Island is a waterlocked state, which population is about 300 000 people.
The interesting things started happen when they find new industry to develop.
That was Investment banking industry.
Despite the fact that there were a few people who understand something in finance, this idea became wide spread.
Normally, there three approach to invest money.
The course of your stocks is also growing fast.
You hold your stocks till the moment when you earn enough, and decide to get into the cache.
You buy a large part of stocks of a company in a poor state, and improve its performance.
Their market capitalisation is growing up after that, you get into cache.
There are few people who possesses this knowledge in Island.
They invest plenty of borrowed cheap money in companies outside of the country without appropriate knowledge.
The borrowings became too big even in country level and the bad quality of debts revealed.
The course of local currency went down.
Taking into account that all the debts were in yen and Swiss francs, people are all in debts.
They need to pay 3 times more for the current property.
For instance, they need 100 k USD to pay off a car that costs 30 k USD.
Some people expect to live happy in heaven and some people believe in next life.
However, first of all, we should make this world peaceful for ourselves and next generations.
However, this seems to be the same with us.
We should not punish others but live with others.
The nice two room apartment is located diagonally opposite the main canteen.
We have a beautiful kitchen with a dishwasher and a dining table, where we can meet, cook and talk.
Your room is 12 m2 big and has a nice green view from the window.
Many shopping possibilities and good connection to the city center are also available.
The room has any furniture and the walls of your future room were painted white by my room mate one years ago.
In 100m from our house is a large park, where you can jog, barbecue or just chill with friends.
There are also in the immediate vicinity a river, beach and a sports center of the university.
In that case you can keep the apartment if you want.
WATCH OUT!!!
What happened in lang-8?
I tried to connect from morning but I couldn't.
I'm glad to be able to write a diary in the end.
Whenever I post,I am thinking about what I want to post.
Ater all,I couldn't think of anything I wanted to post yesterday.
Although I faced myPC for a while since I came home,I coulcn't think of it at all.
That person might not realize it, but every time I encounter with this person it grows pain.
Every time is like ache.
I shouldn't let this feeling goes to far.
I will drown myself with this feeling, eat this feeling, and act nothing wrong.
I shouldn't make this feeling goes to far..
Maybe you will angry with me?
Or maybe you won't become my friend again?
I went out took a walk with Jjanh-A for enjoying the nice sunshine.
army is ready for sortie in fifteen minutes against the attack of terrorits.
army is ready for sortie in fifteen minutes against the attack of terrorits.
I was talking about okra with an black American woman.
Okra is originally from Africa and now spread all over the world.
Yesterday's Part Time Job
Yesterday's part time job was very busy.
I work at the restaurant and many people visited there.
I didn't know a lot of things of its job because I started it recently.
However, visitors didn't know it so they asked me many things.
She has sneezed and got eye mucus for the past few days.
She eats as usual and takes a long walk in the night.
However, her beautiful face has marred by eye mucus.
I carefully wiped around her right eye with a tissue to remove mucus.
After I finished it, I tried to wipe her left eye.
The mucus would be removed when she is grooming her face with her paws.
Does the previous sentence work if I use "anything" instead of "something"?
My PC froze when accessing Lang-8
Today my PC froze several times when accessing Lang-8.
I couldn't log-in.
My PC had no problem when accessing other websites.
My PC froze when accessing Lang-8
My PC had no problem when accessing other websites.
Your friend found out that you were the only who kidnapped his dog.
nice sweets
The store isn't located at crowded area but many customers go there.
Actually there was a long line even I went there 10 minutes later after opening.
So only 3 pairs of the customers can eat there.
Kawazu-sakura known as early blooming cherry blossoms beside the bell tower of Hongaku-ji Temple are in full bloom.
A small bird has come to pick up flower nectar.
The cherry blossoms beside the main hall usually start blooming around the middle of March.
Yesterday and today, lang-8 is extremely laggy.
I'll eat it for lunch because it was left over.
I'm wondering if I make curry udon noodle.
My computer is acting sluggish, and so I will post my message on iPhone.
Incorporating this data into database is required.
Programs that allow all the resources to be operated effectively are needed.
As you see the sentence 2, you can find that there are long subjects in the sentence, you know.
Could you please spell out the reason to me?
Is it hard for you to understand the meaning of these sentences?
In Japan, spring comes soon.
trees will regain green,
I'm getting excited that only I'm thinking so that.
Too See How The Situation Is
If our situations are not looking so good, we should admit it first.
Someone who won't face the reality can never clear up the problem.
Life is hard and it isn't often like what is supposed to be.
It's no use saying, "It's suppose to be so!
Why isn't it so?" We should just admit our bad situation and start to look for the way to solve it.
Life is hard and it isn't often like what is supposed to be.
Have you ever been pulled your tooth?
I certainly have several times.
When I was a little child, I have a rotten tooth.
I was scary of going to the dentist.
He haunted me from the last time when he pulled my three teeth at the same time.
So I was intentionally waiting until the rotten tooth fell out of my mouth by itself.
Then my dad throught it up to the roof.
It's been a so long time since my last post.
Today I'd write about my university life.
I'm in 5th year at school of medicine.
I have studied diagnosis and treatment of diseases at hospital for an year.
I spent 2 week in each department, and I wrote reports about patients in the department.
At night, one man is hiding in the dark by the Dr-F's laboratory.
Dr-F has developed a numerous wonderful medicines in the past and It is said that he is about to accomplish a new one.
He peeks from a window of Dr-F's room and finds that he just stashes some document into a safe.
After Dr-F has gone to bed, the thief furtively picks the window, steals into the room, and opens the safe dialing as Dr-F did.
He fetches the document inside and frees away.
Returning to his hiding place, he tries to make up a medicine consulting the prescription on the document, because he cannot sell them unless he knows its effect.
He takes the medicine and relaxes on his couch waiting whatever effects to appear with him.
After a while, he abruptly stands up and goes to the Dr-F's laboratory.
The effect of the medicine proved right.
This intended to reform bad guys, but I had trouble getting test subjects bad enough to affirm the effect.
He peeks from a window of Dr-F's room and finds that he just stashes some document into a safe.
The effect of the medicine proved right.
At a sushi-go-round restaurant
The internet connection to Lang - 8 has been very slow this past few days.
It timed out again and again.
I am sorry that I cannot make good progress with the work correcting your posts because of that.
This can be a problem on the Lang - 8 side because I can connect to other sites as usual.
"Would you please help me repair my bicycle." he asked.
I guess most of you have already recognize it, but Lang-8 hasn't worked very well since last night.
It's been so slow to renew my page and sometimes just blank page comes out after correcting entries.
Lang-8 had been working without any serious problems for a while, so I was surprised that it started to work so slow and couldn't reach the page that I wanted to go last night.
Last summer, a rumor, "Lang-8 will be closed soon," and all members were worried about it.
A scammer tried to get members information by using this rumor.
The Lang-8 administration announced that they would never close the Lang-8 and would be thinking of starting to collect new members this spring.
It's March, spring!
It's the time that they mentioned, so I wonder if they're preparing for new Lang-8 page.
It might be just my wishful thinking!!
I guess most of you have already recognize it, but Lang-8 hasn't worked very well since last night.
It's been so slow to renew my page and sometimes just blank page comes out after correcting entries.
I can't go to my entry page, but it seems that I can post an entry.
Lang-8 had been working without any serious problems for a while, so I was surprised that it started to work so slow and couldn't reach the page that I wanted to go last night.
Last summer, a rumor, "Lang-8 will be closed soon," and all members were worried about it.
The Lang-8 administration announced that they would never close the Lang-8 and would be thinking of starting to collect new members this spring.
It's March, spring!
It's the time that they mentioned, so I wonder if they're preparing for new Lang-8 page.
It might be slow because of that.
102-3 Foreign exchange reserves of Japan decreased in the first half of 2005.
Installation is a content that display screen on a wall with a projector and it interact with people's movement.
I said, "I am sorry, but I don't know how to repair a bicycle." He said, "Ok, then I will try to repair it by myself." Then he spent a long time on it and succeed at last.
The comparative and The super lative: The adverbial comparative and super lative
Is Osomatsusan one of the most popular animetions in japan.
My mother gets up earliest in my family.
The tournament will compete among qualified candidates.
The tournament will be competed among qualified candidates.
The tournament will compete among qualified candidates.
I have several reasons for learning English.
First of all, I have a few research issues and want to send my thoughts and ideas to the world as a teacher, researcher, or businessman at colleges or in business fields; therefore, I need to acquire communication skill in English.
Secondly, I want to learn collaboration among diverse individuals abroad because it, I figure, give me strength and flexibility.
Wow~ It seems awesome the the sunshine through out of the window.
It sould be enjoy the nice sunshine like today!
I'd better going out and enjoy walking under the nice sunshine.
Put off napping for a while~~
So I often enjoy riding my bicycle as a good routine exercise.
It took about one and a half hours, but it was not hard for us to ride bicycle for such long hours because Tokyo is located on the basin geographically, and there are not many steep slopes.
We were able to keep riding until arrived at Tokyo Tower.
It is good for our physical health to do physical activities which are not related to our work.
So I often enjoy riding my bicycle as a good routine exercise.
Many weather forecasters said that it gets really warm today.
We was feeling cold outside.
I usually jog with listening to radio with my portable audio player.
Also, the sun was really brilliant this morning, so I was sure today definitely be a special day.
According to the first chapter, he sounds kind and mercy.
It seems like that his younger sister likes these dazzling silverware and gold chandeliers.
He always let the door of his church open, so whoever, even a person who meets him for the first time, can get into the inside of the church.
He gets a lot of money from the rich and gives the poor all of them.
His only belongings are six knives, cutlery, plates and two gold chandeliers.
He always let the door of his church open, so whoever, even a person who meets him for the first time, can get into the inside of the church.
I don't know why no one has stolen his silver and gold stuff up to now though.
I think the gold stuff doesn't mean that much to the story.
According to the first chapter, he sounds kind and mercy.
I don't know why no one has stolen his silver and gold stuff up to now though.
Today, I went to the Osaka Castle Park to see the plum blossoms.
I like cherry blossoms rather than plum blossoms.
I like cherry blossoms rather than plum blossoms.
My mother would often say, " I wish people could live without having to eat!" because she hasn't liked cooking.
It is one of Japanese traditional dishes and made with burdock root and carrot.
It has a sweety soy flavor and is good with rice.
But since a burdock is commonly known as a weed, non-Japanese people might don't like it.
I meal prep and keep them in the freezer on the weekend and take one of them to work every day.
It is exciting for me to think about its menus like "there might be a can of tuna in the kitchen cabinet so next week I'll "tuna mayo" sandwiches...".
I like brittle or crunchy cookies and don't actually like Japanese cookies because most cookies are tender and a little bit moist but I don't know why.
It is also called the peach seasonal festival day.
You may think the peach is out of season in March.
Though peach trees are usually in full bloom on March 3 according to the lunar calendar.
It is believed the cherry tree is a symbol of vivid life because it has numerous, trillion, fruits.
As I wrote before peach fruits had been used for the shamanic ritual in the ancient times.
It is also called the peach seasonal festival day.
It was said "Whether you believe globalization is good or bad is irrelevant.
Although I checked a website, a dictionary I couldn't find the answer.
If you have a time, I'd like you to tell me.
Am I can use English more well than now?
He is a member of Minutemen, which is a civilian militia to help powerless people.
All he wants to do is just protecting people from raiders or gunners.
After the protagonist first help him, he designates the protagonist as the general of Minutemen.
I thought "We've just met.
What an irresponsible man..." about this scene, but it's not the main reason why he is hated.
As the general of Minuteman, the player thinks "Why don't you go helping them yourself before asking me!?"
He calls the protagonists "general", but makes the players feel like an errand boy.
So his repeated lines get their the nerves and many of them end up hating him.
The SIM card cannot be read and I have checked it.
The 24-month contract has not been expired yet and I am going to have to spend half of a day traveling to the Apple store located in a distant suburb to repair my baby iPhone.
AND, my icloud storage ran out ages ago and I must update it before I send my phone to them.
AND, my card associated with my Apple id is expired and the new is still on the way.
WHY is my new card still on its way?
Why don't we just return to a free, primitive, naive cave life so that all of my questions can be resolved?
Peter Nadas, a Hungarian author, told in an interview, that we are all thrown into life.
We cannot choose our birth date nor our death date.
I do my homework every day, but today I am not doing my homework.
I always meet dengerous people.
I'm watching new serial and writing this message.
I wake up at 5 am every day, because I must be in my work at 7 am.
I always hold conversation with strangers people, if I'm bored.
As you know, sonic is famously video game character.
Creater and also designer ohoshima naoto was created.
Body color is blue and that he wearing red shoes those looks like good on him.
Sonic the hedgehog
As you know, sonic is famously video game character.
Creater and also designer ohoshima naoto was created.
Body color is blue and that he wearing red shoes those looks like good on him.
C, a young musician, is about to leave the hold house in Texas where he has been living for several years with his wife M.
There is some tension between the two of them, even if it is obvious that they are in love.
It was just one sentence or a short poem, only aimed to leave her mark.
At the mortuary, M stares at C for a long moment before covering his face with the white sheet enveloping his corpse.
The silhouette in the white sheet wanders in the corridor and goes toward a bright light in the far distance.
However, at the last minute, the ghost makes a U-turns and slowly heads toward his former home.
There, trapped in the house, he can see a sad M, grieving, listening to the song he wrote for her, binging before vomiting, or packing some more things.
Just before moving out, she writes down a few words on a small piece of paper that she folds in four, and then she slips it into a slot of a wall.
He does not really want to move out, but M is determined to live in town and she is already packing her stuff.
While lying with C on the couch, M recalls that, as a child, she used to hide a note in each house where she had been living, just before moving out.
Lunch is seeds of my daily happiness.
That will make me happy.
Having happiness there that I promise.
Everyday I got up early and back home late.
I'm gonna take a bath and then go to bed soon.
There will be many relatives, they will ask me a lot of questions, which will surely make me uncomfortable.
I would have to act politely and answers as they expected.
My parents used to force me to enjoy it before, but in this year, they gave up doing so because I showed them my unwillingness.
In this short comedy video, the black box assumed to be the internet, I understand that but what does "the elders of the internet"?
Is it an old the internet or the internet for older people?
I am bad at cooking and I rarely try to improve it
I wish I am good at cooking, but the fact is that I am bad at it.
I used to learn how to cook by watching TV program, but I didn't improve even a little after practicing a lot, maybe the materials I used are bad.
Maybe I just take the bad materials as an excuse.
I couldn't directly face the fact that I maybe naturally bad at it.
I think I will be skilled at someday.
My friend tasted my dish once, and she said, one bite is enough, luckily I didn't die of it.
I used to learn how to cook by watching TV program, but I didn't improve even a little after practicing a lot, maybe the materials I used are bad.
I stooped by a RIMOWA shop for finding a new body.
The black one is I was concerned about.
I still can't decide yet which I buy.
The both carry backs are attractive for me.
I'm still consider about it.
Anyways, I've been studying TOEIC at school, My score was improved dramatically.
Thank to my thoroughly make effort LOL Just kidding.
Thank to my teacher and around my supporter.
I just want to appreciate you guys.
I must repay obligation for you.
I am very sorry to have to tell you that the Board of Directors has not given this approval due to budget cutbacks.
If the situation will be improved and the Board of Directors agrees to the creation of this position, I will inform you.
Dear Ms Mendez
I regret that we must withdraw our job offer because your qualifications and experience make you the ideal candidate for this position.
Antidoping Test
I usually read the journal "Marca".
I enjoy this journal becouse its about sports not about politics.
He also has won four times "Le Tour de France".
It's not the first time that one cyclist wins an important race and was tested positive during an antidoping test during the race.
All the cyclers that have had this experience have been sanctioned and their victories were removed.
After solve questions and before check its answers, I check my answers using my scientific calculator or Maxima.
The question from one of the past test.
Maxima is a computer algebra system and we can do calculus on it.
The question from one of the past test.
I still remember the moonlight filling the hallways, and the blood flowing from my heart, through my sides, to my feet.
And after what I could say was my life's fastest run, I reached home.
I closed the door behind me and jumped on my bed, only to realise that I was bathed in sweat.
I contemplated it raise and descent as I kept breathing with a strangle mixture of both surprise and content.
It is early riser today.
It will be early riser tomorrow.
There is no rest for a while.
The diagram shows two big sorts of processes.
First, at the left, we have those having to do with the manufacturing of the product itself; secondly, at the right side, processes related to conceptual aspects.
Above, we can see how based on raw material and manufactured components go through storage stage, then production planning take place and it needs design as well as sales feedback, following there the processes of assembly, inspection, and testing, the latter step give feedback to the design stage.
Once testing has been done, packaging stage takes place and it requires information from market research, once packaging is completed dispatch and sales take place.
The diagram shows two big sorts of processes.
First, at the left, we have those having to do with the manufacturing of the product itself; secondly, at the right side, processes related to conceptual aspects.
Above, we can see how based on raw material and manufactured components go through storage stage, then production planning take place and it needs design as well as sales feedback, following there the processes of assembly, inspection, and testing, the latter step give feedback to the design stage.
Once testing has been done, packaging stage takes place and it requires information from market research, once packaging is completed dispatch and sales take place.
The sales step also returns information to the market research area, which at the same time feeds the advertising area.
In any language, there is a large difference between general expressions and frankly expressions.
So learners of foreign language are confused by how native speakers actual talk.
In nowadays times, the advances that technology has achieved have led to change the way people communicate with each other.
For some people the current functioning of communication implies that writing letters will not be necessary anymore.
Besides, our message may be as long as we want, and we may attach all kind of files, including images, video as well as other countless kind of formats.
Writing on computers, tablets or any other electronic device allows addressing multiple persons at the same time.
When we need to give the same message to several people we only need to copy and paste the text and by doing that, we will save ourselves a lot of time.
On the other hand, writing letters in the traditional way, by using a sheet of paper and making the effort to handwrite whatever message, conveys an especial feeling.
So, whenever we want to let someone know how much that person mean for us, writing a letter will make the difference, as simple as it might appear, it is a great way to give a message to someone special.
However, I do not think writing letters is meant to disappear.
Has Lang8 slowed down again?
Or is this only happening on my smartphone?
Has Lang8 slowed down again?
Or is this only happening on my smartphone?
Hi brian!
I had got a temperature for two days.
In addition, when I recovered from my cold I had a terrible sore throat, so I had to rest until I got over.
I've felt under the wheather for so many days that I forget to answer your questions about your situation.
It's really sad that your marks are dropping because of your social networks addition and it also affects your mood.
You should try to take up new activities, for instance any kind of sport or play an instrument.
You are an incredibly well balanced person and I'm sure you'll improve with this tips, and you'll forget your additions.
Please, call me if you want I accompany you.
On the other hand, I'm going to organize a trip to Rome with a friend for five days next week, do you want join us?
In addition, I've been looking the wheather forecast and apparently, there will be mild and sunny days!
She likes it when I'm calling sick to work.
Spending the whole day hanging with her.
She likes hearing how good she looks on her bluejeans.
Confu charged around the course in what appeared to be a very quick time.
The clock stopped at 34.14 - but Laura was just a blink of an eye slower."
Switzerland bans cooking live seafood.
Who will check if the creature was lived or dead when it was put to cook?
In Galicia it is watched with unbelief the Swiss law which bans cooking shellfish before they were stunned.
Since today in Switzerland is not allow cooking shellfish as spider crab, lobster or spiny lobster.
The law includes different modifications about animal protection issues as this prohibition.
From here onward, in the Helvetian country the shellfish have to be stunned before kill them.
Among professionals of shellfish bars the feeling is disbelief.
Who will check whether the animal is lived or death when it is put to boil?
He hopes that the rule stays in Switzerland and we won't finish doing the same.
Some professionals prefer say nothing because the here the people point a finger at you.
The result was 5 points upper than last time.
I didn't confidence to get high score because I wasn't forces on test during then.
If I feel same as today when my test day. I get definitely worse score.
I'm reviewing my test right now, I found what my weakness part.
I made a easy mistake and spend a time to answer so I answered in a hurry.
Today is lantern festival, which falls on Jan 15 in lunar calender.
After lantern festival, the Chinese New Year officially come to an end.
2018 is the year of the dog,so you will see many gigantic dog lanterns in these events.
I went to Chengdu Museum to see Afghanistan Ancient Treasure Exhibition yesterday.
It left a deep impression on me.
Simple question, but it has deep meaning.
Seriously, are you happy?
Simple question, but it has deep meaning.
It's harder to translate verbs and adjectives than something real nouns.
For real nouns there are image which are in your head.
This image consist of several senses: pselaphesia, osmesis and other.
It's harder with verbs and adjectives, because sometimes image is inexplicitly.
Also creates difficulties, because sometimes one verb mean different actions in different languages.
It has to do with something historical conditions.
A few examples below:
Where can I change my money.
If it were not for mosquitos, I could spent the whole summer comfortably.
Had it not been for the computer, I couldn't have written this sentence.
One of my experienced co-workers has brought a coffee machine to the office about one month ago.
Many people have enjoyed drinking nice coffee which cost only 50 yen.
Is it related with Chinese or Italy?
One of the things that really excited me when I was travelling last month was to see wild animals that are not found in Japan.
We were going for a hike to mountains and my buddy was looking for a flashlight although he already had one.
today l went to english class.
It has a long time since i speak english, I was nervous.
But, every menber in class were kind, I want to be speak english more fluently.
After the class, l decided to enter the english class.
I hope thing will go well.
Most of us were aware of what was going down last night.
He got intoxicated in that restaurant last night only because he tried out some weird food.
They got him intoxicated with their shitty food for not listening to you.
We've waiting for you thirty minutes.
All right, I don't have time to listen to you yell.
I don't wanna go on trips if this is how you're every fucking time.
I'll call you when I get back from that thing.
Bye.
If you have only a mobile phone, you don't need to carry them.
On the other hand, cell phones have the advantage that is harmful for our health.
How to get confident to use foreign languages
I had one month before I go to China, so I studied Chinese.
I looked for several language partner and had chatting with them.
I was surprised that I could communicate with them with my poor Chinese 
Every time I had chatting with them, I got more confident.
Actually, the years it took for me to learn Chinese is much less than I have been to learn English.
But I have more confident to speak Chinese.
But I think I had little opportunity to get feedback than I had when I learned Chinese.
That's why I'm keeping diary in English.
I`m Japanese.
Please correct this sentence.
Who have same motorcycle and passion about it.
We had spend awesome time.
I hope to go with they somewhere again.
For example, it's not a rare case when flights are cancelled due to unexpected bad weather or natural disasters, and you have to put off your stay in a foreign country.
What is necessary anytime is that you try to solve the problem by judging your situation rationally, making good use of your knowledge and information about the very place you go as well as using your ability of the foreign language effectively.
For example, it's not a rare case when flights are cancelled due to unexpected bad weather or natural disasters, and you have to put off your stay in a foreign country.
What is necessary anytime is that you try to solve the problem by judging your situation rationally, making good use of your knowledge and information about the very place you go as well as using your ability of the foreign language effectively.
How to Solve Unexpected Troubles During Your Trip Overseas
Travelling abroad is basically a lot of fun, but you cannot avoid getting troubles during your trip overseas.
For example, it's not a rare case when flights are cancelled due to unexpected bad weather or natural disasters, and you have to put off your stay in a foreign country.
What is necessary anytime is that you try to solve the problem by judging your situation rationally, making good use of your knowledge and information about the very place you go as well as using your ability of the foreign language effectively.
I feel my writing skills has become rusty because I haven't written like I did.
But, regretting won't make anything!
I just do what I have to do!
Tom Cruise played a professional killer, want to kill six witnesses are bad for an international business at one night.
Silver hair and grey suits with sharp eyes when he kill person, Tom Cruise is super cool.
When he was going to the next place, he took advantage of the taxi.
In the beginning, the black taxi driver didn't found Tom's identity, but Tom pushed down from the window of a witness body fell in the top of the cab, he realized that Tom is a killer.
But the taxi driver was threatened and had to go to the next place.
Have you ever been guilty of conscience when you kill person?
Do you know the Rwandan genocide?
There is make none sense preaching to a killer.
At the end of the film, the black driver fought with Tom to protect the last witness, a woman.
In the end of the fierce gun battle, Tom was shot to death.
The black driver protected the important witness.
And this movie is very interesting.
I recommend it to you.
What's happen with them?
Did you bring eggs?That's a good idea.
I will try to do the same things.
I will go to safety patrol with my boss this afternoon.
I don't like safety patrol, but I think it is very inpotant work.
The workers must not be injured.
Movie I watched last Friday
After finishing some tough work late at night last Friday, I came home, and I started to watch a movie, in which the main character was a business person, and she had a strong will and courage to challenge difficulties.
She discussed things with her stubborn boss and her clients passionately, and she persuaded her clients eventually, while her evil colleague lost his clients because of his bad behavior.
Finally, people around her praised her and she completed big project.
That's when people choose to live at home, in a community they're familiar with, for as long as possible as they get older.
March 1st snowed.
The snow includes a lot of water. The snow melted by afternoon.
It was as a dream.
Why wonder if the human thought to want going there?
It is enough I only look at it.
The snow includes a lot of water.
Could anyone help me explain the meaning of this phrase?
Thank a lot.
"Practice, don't go in cold" What does " don't go in cold " mean?
I usually go to our old house we used to live once a month and maintain it.
I guessed some part of supplying pipe froze up and broke.
I asked the maintenance company to visit and see it next time I go back.
The house has a heat pump unit with boiler.
We had used it for 14 years.
He investigated it precisely and found that there was a clack in the one of the joint of the valve that connected 3 pipes.
I had immediately him call the manifucture and they answered that they didin't know if they had a replacement part.
He said another advanced mechanic will came here tomorrow again.
I knew I wasn't able to use our bath, so I went to warm-bathing facility.
Next day, another mechanic came and saw inside of the ecocute.
He said "Heat insulators absorbed a lot of water and it didn't work well.
Even if we can fix it this time, it would be worse one after another.
If you don't use a bath often, I recomend to change to a gus boilor that is relatively cheep.
We bought a ecocute eventhough it cost a lot because it would last at least 20years and reduce electorisity very well.
But we have to change it earlier than we expect.
I can't accept that we pay for the house that we don't live.
However we can't sell the house that doesn't have a boiler.
It might be the good time we should sell the house.
I slightly miss it, though.
Tokyo 2020 Games Mascots were Decided!!
The Tokyo Organizing Committee of the Olympic and Paralympic Games announced the result of schoolchildren voting for mascots on February 28th.
Each class in elementary schools could take part in the selection and vote their favorite from among three final candidates.
Which do you like?
Since the second B and the third C got 61,423 and 35,291 votes, respectively, the top was overwhelmingly popular.
- She fainted due to fear.
- She started crying because she felt so happy.
- Excited so much, she couldn't sleep at all.
- Her face turned red due to embarrassment.
Thank you my friends!
I received 8,794 corrections during that period.
However, I feel a little sad because Lang-8 is suspending accounts.
But, as always, I didn't finish my plan.
about my cat
Today is so warm like spring has come!
It also means scary season has come for me.
Because I have a hay fever.
I have to wear musk and glasses to block pollens.
There is no choice.
I want to be free from pollens and just enjoy spring without worrying.
There is a honey shop nearby my mother is living now.
The shop is selling Japanese honey and foreign.
Honey I ate when I was a child, it tasted like a medicine, and the texture was bad too.
Then she continued, "If you will eat only pure honey doesn't get cavities because it has bactericidal action." I can't believe it so I have not tried it yet.
However, I remembered about my childhood.
I'm currently at office, but I have nothing to do now.
Since we're going to change our office to new location, there are many moving stuff around us, and they are cleaning, and putting things away.
Our office mates are not so many, we are actually only around 100 members.
Some of coworkers have left, so it's time for me to leave.
We have three dates which concern about our marriage; one is the date curved on our rings, the second is the date when we officially got married, and the third is on April and the date when we had a wedding celemony.
We were supposed to officially get married on the date on the ring, but I got abortion threatened and had to stayed in a bed.
So now the date on the ring means the importance of the life and be thankful that my son is here with us.
We don't do anything perticular on the day because there is no cake shop or restaurant nearby.
I long for a romantic situation like the one I see on movies but my husband and I are typical Japanse who are bad at being romantic.
We have three dates which concern about our marriage; one is the date curved on our rings, the second is the date when we officially got married, and the third is on April and the date when we had a wedding celemony.
I'd better stop crying for the moon and be thankful for our staying together healthy.
I have cherished my iPod touch for several years since my wife gave me it.
It was very useful and I always have listened to my favorite songs with it.
So far, one of the physical buttons has broken and had it repaired a few times.
But, this time it has come not to boot.
When pressing a button to boot it, it is turned off after the apple logo is displayed for a few minutes.
It was shocking.
Fortunately, I have another portable audio player, so I can listen to music with it, 
but I'm not still used to operate it because I bought it recently.
Also, its capacity is smaller than iPod touch.
I can put many songs or pictures in it.
Having it fixed is too expensive.
I will go to IRIOMOTE island.
Many animals live in island,so I hope to meet them!
This island has beautiful sea and rivers.
I like JAPAN, and I want you to visit JAPAN someday!
It was a hazelnut latte.
The Mario cart which came to see frequently in the Metropolitan area.
7,8 go-carts were running by make a line.
It enabled go-cart to run on the 
Old lady: Is it not dangerous?
There are no helmet, no seat belt.
It will be thrown out
If it is the country of the manner, an
I went to my doctor to get treatment of my back this morning.
I chose eating Tonkatsu for lunch.
Since today is weekday, the restaurant is not crowded at all.
I was going to find new shoes for jogging.
I came to know I could get a check of my physical characteristics at the store.
I could choose my shoes with understanding my physical characteristics, consulting the staff.
If she had explained the result to me kindly and passionately, I might buy the one.
I had a meeting with customer.
Although schedule of this meeting had been until PM.5, I had appointed the dentist at PM.4, so I though that I had to exit the meeting on the way.
But, the meeting had been finished, so I had free time by the dentist.
I went to bookstore.
I have tried to learn English for contact people for over the world.
so I practice every day to learn English as native speaker.
As I wrote down on the previous article, I will work at the new office from next week.
I'm so happy to go back home at 5PM, I usually get out of work at 8PM, so I'm envy of people who can leave their office early.
They have a lot of choices to do after work, which I don't have.
All I can do after work is to go back and take a rest at home.
What's your favorite choice of doing after work?
I don't mean to go back early every day because I'm just a one of employees so I'm not eligible to whine like that.
Obviously, there are tons of workers who get out of later than me, should think I'm not working in a bad environment.
A Piece of Advise
When we give correction or comment, it will be need to give a link, for instance on Wikipedia.
It is possible just to copy your browser address bar and to insert it your entry or comment.
Sometimes, it could look as here:
In this case, you can do it in two stages.
First insert content before the lust slash 
and then insert a rest
It must look as here
If_a_content_include_some_macrons, a link could not work, but whatever it look better.
I think the best hospitality is to give first priority to customer.
For example, in the lunch box shop, if customer have many short bags, lunch box staff prepared for a big bag and the staff together short bag.
If so, it is easy for customer to carry bag.
In Tokyo it has got warmer since yesterday.
Until then it was cold and it was quite difficult for me to motivate in everything, but I has been in full of enthusiasm in one sitting.
In Tokyo it has got warmer since yesterday.
Until then it was cold and it was quite difficult for me to motivate in everything, but I has been in full of enthusiasm in one sitting.
Finally the warm and blue sky has made me feel looking foward to the season of cherry blossoms.
She help me.
She help him.
He help she.
He help me.
He doestn't help me.
She doesn't him.
He doesn't him
She doesn't her.
He doesn't her.
I started doing my homework.
When we were all about to leave together, Aman Wadi asked us to wait at the door of our house.
She was going to do with me what most people do to their girls in rural areas of Pakistan: Stopping them from attending school.
Yesterday, we had a walk in the park.
It was frosty and sunny day and we were strolling slowly along a narrow lane.
My hands were frozen and I was rubbing it.
A couple of beautiful twins were playing on a playground.
Their mother was looking at them smiling.
There's a peak called "Angels Landing" which I had wanted to climb during my life.
From the trailhead I ascended moderately strenuous switchbacks in an hour and reached a point called Scout Lookout.
Most hikers seemed to enjoy the view from there and then double back to the trailhead while the rests set out to the summit push including me.
After Scout Lookout, the last half mile of the trail got more strenuous and went through the ridge like Godzilla's dorsal fin.
Therefore, it has been called one of the most dangerous hiking courses in the world and it's not for those who have the fear for height.
However, there were chains for grip all along the trail, so I didn't have to feel tremendous fear until the summit.
The view during the trail and from the summit were the most stunning things in my life.
Great to see you again!
Everyone, how have you been keeping?
I had only written posts here from now, when there were things that I want to write.
However, I try to write them once a week from now!
Recently, I have many English books which I will want to read, so I think that I need to learn English more and more.
To be honest, although I am interested in Chinese, I will focus on English because I am not multitasking.
Recently, I have many English books which I will want to read, so I think that I need to learn English more and more.
To be honest, although I am interested in Chinese, I will focus on English because I am not multitasking.
Great to see you again!
Everyone, how have you been keeping?
I had only written posts here from now, when there were things that I want to write.
Output Efficiency
Someone said that the way to increase our output efficiency is to increase our workload as much as we can.
If we are overwhelmed so much, we have to consider seriously whether it is really necessary and then we start to choose what we really have to do.
However, I don't want to be overwhelmed any more....
Yet it reamined a dominion of the British Empire until 1948 when it was officially declared as a Republic.
The main Irish parties fought for the complete Independence of Ireland and its establishment as a Republic.
Yet it reamined a dominion of the British Empire until 1948 when it was officially declared as a Republic.
I sent an email with the link to my SoundCloud account to one of my cowkers, coming out that I've been posting recordings of my singing there, asking her if she could listen to them and give me some feedbacks.
She told me once before that she used to belong to a courus club when she was a student, and I always wanted her to give me some comments on my singing since I assumed she knew about singing much more than I.
But right after I clicked the send button, I kind of freaked out about what I've just done.
Why would she have to listen to my songs and comment back?
That would be nothing but just troublesome for her!
I knew my face was turning red without even looking myself in the mirror.
I saw it on my laptop screen, "You got mail".
I went to my inbox to find that she had read my mail and sent me a reply.
It made me happy, and gave me strength to really open it up to her about my love for singing and what I've been doing on my SoundCloud account.
How did you feel when you first came out about your secret?
What happened after you came out?
I'm sure everyone has one or two of such an episode!!
What would she think of me doing such a thing as uploading my poor singing on the net?
That would be nothing but just troublesome for her!
This morning, I saw her there sitting in her seat as ususal, of course.
I couldn't tell if she had already read my mail or not.
I knew my face was turning red without even looking myself in the mirror.
I went to my inbox to find that she had read my mail and sent me a reply.
It made me happy, and gave me strength to really open it up to her about my love for singing and what I've been doing on my SoundCloud account.
I'm sure everyone has one or two of such an episode!!
According to it, survivors from the shooting in the high school in Florida launched activities demanding the gun regulation.
Their movement has attracted people and affected some companies that have sold guns and rifles.
Dick's Sporting Goods announced they stop selling automatic rifles and don't sell guns to people who are under 21.
Walmart also announced that they don't sell guns who are under 21.
I suppose it's very difficult to change their gun society, but without making the first step, nothing would be changed.
Dick's Sporting Goods announced they stop selling automatic rifles and don't sell guns to people who are under 21.
Walmart already stopped selling automatic rifles in 2015.
For those 17 victims and many other victims killed by guns, I hope America will step forward even little by little.
A new term will start,I need to be confident to handle all the problems and challenges.
Although I have too many tasks to do,I will solve those troubles one by one.
I stopped to write a diary. Bcouse my life turned very busy.
The last diary I wrote is 2014!
Also I should take old.
Needless to say most of Japanese have to deal with hard work all year around but a period from March to April is the busiest season for them.
that is because we have special work task of the end of fiscal year such as planning sales estimate, work about settlement and so on.
then most of worker become gromy.
In addition that I have a symptom this period, pollen hay fever.
Detail symptoms are runny nose, sneezing and I can not stop those.
Furthermore I have to participate in a marathon competition in the middle of April every year.
the reason why I have to take part in is one of sponsors of the competition is our company.
That mean all employees should run forcibly.
then recently I have been working hardly, running, and standing by various symptom of pollen allergie.
Very hard period for me.
As far as I know, global warming is one of the most common topics in many English tests, because it's safe topic to talk about.
Yesterday, my English teacher gave me a topic "North Korea can be your good neighbor." I guess most of people have similar opinion about it, and this kind of political questions are unlikely to be given in the international exam.
I wonder if there is anything I can talk about global warming.
Same as majority of people, I believe scientists, it is not Chinese conspiracy.
Yesterday, my English teacher gave me a topic "North Korea can be your good neighbor." I guess most of people have similar opinion about it, and this kind of political questions are unlikely to be given in the international exam.
I wonder if there is anything I can talk about global warming.
Same as majority of people, I believe scientists, it is not Chinese conspiracy.
As far as I know, global warming is one of the most common topics in many English tests, because it's safe topic to talk about.
Honestly, I'm not seriously working on this issue, but I'm trying to follow the rules from government for reducing CO2.
The day officially ends the Chinese New Year celebrations.
Red packets don't hand out after the day.
I like the genre of mystery and horror when I read so I have not been able to suppress this desire to write a text with these characteristics...
I remember once, when I was eight years old, as I walked down a lonely street, an old and stranger woman came up to me and greeted me.
I really remember there was something very strange about that woman - in her face, her voice, her posture.
In fact, thinking about it carefully, I think maybe she wasn't a real woman because her features were rough.
The point is that there was something bothering me quite a bit so I forgot all about the kindness and ran desperately until I got home.
Being at my house, I told my mother what happened, but I don't think she took it very seriously because she told me that I had exaggerated things or something like that.
The creepiest thing was that, as my classmates said, the child had been seen, for the last time, hugging a strange old woman and walking away with her.
Tell Me The Recipe Of The Coconut Milk
I asked my Kenyan friend if she has cooked with coconut milk or not.
She told me that she used it instead of water while she cooked rice.
I was surprised at her idea.
Last month I cooked sweet potato with some coconut milk and sugar.
The recipe on the net and books are a little bit unrealistic.
I might not buy Thai vegitable.
The important of Japanese beer is sensitive taste.
The key is the head of beer, that is beer form.
Keeping beer cold is very important thing.
It gives unique and wonderful experience.
However, I disagree that all students should be required to study art and music in secondary because it is not advantageous for all students to study art and music in secondary school.
To begin with, we study many subjects such as math, chemical, and history when we were a student.
With the economic change, we are required to a special skills and ability to get a better job.
Also, an academic background is very important to be promoted to our career.
Therefore, it is not essential to learn art and music in secondary school.
For example, when I was a high school student, I got an exam to enroll in a high school.
No one needed to study art and music to go to a high school.
With the development of the internet, we can learn these subjects using the online course.
In addition, we can learn art and music at club activity in a school.
For instance, when I was a high school student, one of my friends made a music club activity at a school.
He gathered some friends in order to enjoy playing the music.
After graduating from a high school, he tried to be a professional guitar player.
Thus, we can study art or music on our own instead of taking a course.
When I was a child, I went there with my families and relatives, and I also went there on a field trip at school.
There is a beautiful waterfall, and many wild monkeys used to live in that area.
I still remember that they often nimbly had stolen food from people.
However, I've read that all monkeys might have moved to the different place because people changed their living environment.
As soon as we enter the building of the onsen, my husband and my son went to the men's bath, and my daughter and I went to the women's bath.
The thick hot water is called "torotoro bihada no yu" aka "beauty women's bath." It was pink and has a plum scent.
We were supposed to see my husband and my son at the place where we decided to gather again at 11:30 am and have lunch together, but my daughter and I were carelessly still in the bath.
I soon tried to go there, but I didn't remember how to get back the place at all.
The restaurant was all-you-can-eat-buffet.
I even saw a TV show introducing the restaurant one day.
I'd forgotten I had been being on a diet.
After taking a bath, I was trying to open my rocker in the dressing room but it didn't open quickly.
A few minutes later, two elder women came and one of them was trying to open her rocker but it seemed not to be opened quickly.
I overheard "Ohhh, what should I do...
I cannot open my rocker." "Ah, it's a bit tricky.
I had the same trouble a little before.
I think I can do it for you.
They were the tourists who came from Nara prefecture.
I had a great time with my family, and I also felt happy to talk to some strangers friendly as usual.
The thick hot water is called "torotoro bihada no yu" aka "beauty women's bath." It was pink and has a plum scent.
You can enjoy taking an open-air bath and sauna, too.
I wasn't able to stand the hot environment in the sauna for a long time, but my daughter was there a lot longer than I was.
We were supposed to see my husband and my son at the place where we decided to gather again at 11:30 am and have lunch together, but my daughter and I were carelessly still in the bath.
I lost my way.
I even saw a TV show introducing the restaurant one day.
We all enjoyed a lot of food.
I'd forgotten I had been being on a diet.
After taking a bath, I was trying to open my rocker in the dressing room but it didn't open quickly.
I was a little nervous for a just a little moment but it opened.
A few minutes later, two elder women came and one of them was trying to open her rocker but it seemed not to be opened quickly.
I had the same trouble a little before.
They were the tourists who came from Nara prefecture.
I may have become a pretty woman thanks to the onsen.
I slept two o'clok yesterday.
I had remaining work,after gone home.
Just, the work finished one o'clok, but I don't sleep.
So, I watch youtube at my phone.
I have pain of my left leg from this morning.
I didn't know why but I'm find it's too cold also wind is very strong today.
sometimes it old wound in my lef leg in bad weather.
I have pain of my left leg from this morning.
sometimes it old wound in my lef leg in bad weather.
Bsd Manner
I looked up my face and noticed that young lady blew her nose with large sound.
Japanese people considered that blowing their nose in public was rude.
After she left the table, her chopsticks put in the bowl and her leftover was messy on her tray.
I was surprised that she had bad manner.
Bsd Manner
Yesterday I went to a restaurant for lunch and it was crowded.
After I sat the table, two people came to shared the table.
While I waited for my order, I was reading a book and I suddenly heard the sound of nose-blowing.
I looked up my face and noticed that young lady blew her nose with large sound.
Japanese people considered that blowing their nose in public was rude.
After she left the table, her chopsticks put in the bowl and her leftover was messy on her tray.
I was surprised that she had bad manner.
All of the things that passed by me a long time ago has been so missed.
So I need a English score for enter the colleage.
To do that, I need more and more time for study in weekdays.
I might be quitting my job.
The season has been changing now.
Studying English is my favorite thing.
That would be great if I work for a foreign company.
I haven't had an experience using English at work, so my English is not great in terms of business English.
I wonder how different is it between spoken English and business English.
I know that spoken English has a lot of colloquialisms, so obviously we can speak casually.
On the other hand, I'm not sure we need to speak formaly in business English, since I'm not a native English speaker.
That could be true to speak formaly in business English as well.
He makes a lot of mistakes but it's helpless.
I filled out 'bungee jump' at the section of resumes where I should have written about my specialty.
I filled out 'bungee jump' at the blank of resumes for specialty.
He makes a lot of mistakes but it's helpless.
She got her teeth implanted.
I filled out 'bungee jump' at the blank of resumes for specialty.
The album credits say 'piano LangLang'.
The athlete was injured.
He makes a lot of mistakes but it's helpless.
I filled out 'bungee jump' at the section of resumes where I should have written about my specialty.
I filled out 'bungee jump' at the blank of resumes for specialty.
Things got out of hand last night
Several people got into a fist fight, and one person was taken away by the police.
There was a huge personnel changes in my company recently.
Because of that, my office has 9 members altogether, but 4 members are transferring to a different branch and some are to a different department.
I reunion with friends for the first time in a long time.
Nevertheless, Nevertheless, We don't feel awkward to chat.
The friend are not change anything.
We enjoyed talking and refreshing.
I'd like to going to keep to good relationship.
I reunion with friends for the first time in a long time.
We enjoyed talking and refreshing.
I'd like to going to keep to good relationship.
I'd like to going to keep to good relationship.
I bought cinnamon powder day before yesterday.
I put cinnamon powder in cafe au lait and drink it everyday.
It is good smell.
He developed his music activities mainly in Nagoya after his return and also somehow tried to became a stringer at a tennis shop.
Last night when I was doing my English listening tasks, I received a phone call from my friend Yue.
She told me a striking story -- her friend tried killing herself by taking poison because she caught her boyfriend cheating on her.
I can't believe it is a real thing.
I used to think stories about girls committing suicide for love are made up by some novelists or playwrights.
Please correct following sentences.
Thank you for participating on the one day trip around Izumo Taisha grand shrine.
First, please let me briefly explain about today's tour.
We will leave Matsue station at 9 and go to the Adachi Museum.
The Museum stores Japanese paintings and verious kind of art works.
And also its garden has been chosen as Japan's best garden in the US journal for straight 14 years.
We will leave the Museum at 11 AM and go to Izumo Taisha grand shrine.
It will take one hour and 20 miniuts, so please go to the toilet before you leave the museum.
We have a lunch on the street in front of the shrine gate from 12:30.
There are many restaurants which seirve Iocal specialitis such as Izumo buckwheat noodles, zenzai sweet bean soup and wagyu beef humburger.
After one hour for lunch, we will visit Izumo Taisha grand shrine.
We will enjoy one hour sightseeing on the shrine prisinct.
We will leave the shrine at 2:30 and head to Tamastukuri Onsen hot spring.
This hot spring is one of the oldest hot spring konwn to be "good for your skin".
You can find free footbaths, and varieties of souvenirs in the area.
After one hour sightseeing, we will leave the Onsen at 4:30 and come back to Matsue station at 5 PM.
I have been itchy nose today, so I'm pain.
I hope this season through quickly.
I don't like this season, so I take a lot of stress.
I thought about this morning.
I have been itchy nose today, so I'm pain.
I don't like this season, so I take a lot of stress.
I haven't spoken English at all, lately, I have a language exchange partner, but I didn't speak English so well and I usually wasn't satisfied with my English.
After all, I feel lack of vocabulary and usage., My poor usage of English is a result of my not studying it.
Come to think of it, I like playing around rather than study English, for now, I am less likely to study English than to play around.
I am so picky, after all, It ended up that I had to study not only English but also Chinese.
Doc: Your husband is suspected to have a cat allergy.
Do you have any places you can entrust your cat?
Woman: Oh, no, without my cat, I will be sick from the stresses.
Doc: Then, you can place it in isolation.
Woman: You mean I should place my husband in isolation?
learning Thai Language.
I'd like to start to learn Thai language because I always go to Thailand.
Although there are a lot of foreigners live there and some of the local people can speak English, but most of them doesn't good at it especially some vendors.
However, Thai language is so difficult for me.
It's difference with Chinese pronunciation.
But I have a wonderful teacher, he is a Thail, he is not only good at pronunciation but also patient.
So that can train my hobby with Thai language.
I hope I can talk a lot with Thai people when I go there in summer holiday and make some new friends.
However, Thai language is so difficult for me.
But I have a wonderful teacher, he is a Thail, he is not only good at pronunciation but also patient.
You know wasabi is hot and spicy, so I never had eaten wasabi in this way!
The point of this bowl of rice is good rice and fresh wasabi.
I Wonder if Learn Italian is Easy To a Native Spanish Speaker.
I was thinking that it would be interesting trying to learn another language than English.
I was thinking about Italian because I guess it would be easier to learn, considering that I am a native Spanish speaker, and both languages are Romanic languages.
Actually, in the last week I was watching some videos on Youtube, there are a huge number of those.
It reminds me that when I was a child there were not that amount of sources to learn a foreign language.
I would have wanted to have that sources to learn English in my childhood, maybe at this time, I would speak proper English.
Indeed, the videos to native English speaker seem to be more interesting than the others.
And my English skills now are useful to understand them.
I still have a long way to learn English at an optimum level but it is satisfactory to know that it serves me if I decide to learn Italian now.
I Wonder if Learn Italian is Easy To a Native Spanish Speaker.
I was thinking that it would be interesting trying to learn another language than English.
I was thinking about Italian because I guess it would be easier to learn, considering that I am a native Spanish speaker, and both languages are Romanic languages.
Actually, in the last week I was watching some videos on Youtube, there are a huge number of those.
I would have wanted to have that sources to learn English in my childhood, maybe at this time, I would speak proper English.
I found out another interesting fact in order to learn Italian.
Indeed, the videos to native English speaker seem to be more interesting than the others.
And my English skills now are useful to understand them.
I still have a long way to learn English at an optimum level but it is satisfactory to know that it serves me if I decide to learn Italian now.
I was thinking about Italian because I guess it would be easier to learn, considering that I am a native Spanish speaker, and both languages are Romanic languages.
I would have wanted to have that sources to learn English in my childhood, maybe at this time, I would speak proper English.
I still have a long way to learn English at an optimum level but it is satisfactory to know that it serves me if I decide to learn Italian now.
Dear Sir or Madam
According to the instructions your Customer Support Department gave me, I sended my Bosch CAL stove to that Technical Service, because it doesn't work.
When you turns it on seems like it works, the power light indicator works, but the stove doesn't give any heat.
I attached the stove bill.
A new convenience store was open near my house.
It's only about three minutes walk from my house.
Great!
Before opening this, I had to walk 10 minutes to get to nearest convenience store.
To celebrate the openings, the store is having a sale.
I went there two times yesterday.
To celebrate the openings, the store is having a sale.
Great!
Before opening this, I had to walk 10 minutes to get to nearest convenience store.
It is also known as a language which has lot of expressions.
In fact, there are more than 40,000 expressions in Japanese, which included idioms and proverbs and 3,000 idioms among them.
Idiom is a group of words which has special meaning in special way to say.
Idioms in Japanese can be divided into two.
One is the expressions that is not related to the meanings of each words, and the other is the expressions that is used the meanings of each words figuratively.
There is a similar idiom in English, burn with shame.
For example, when someone go shopping and try to pay by cash, then the person realize that they don't have enough money.
This person must be extremely embarrassed, and say "I'm burning with shame." This is one example of the expressions which isn't related to the meaning of each words because someone's face never burns, but Japanese people express embarrassment as a metaphor.
This idiom means to put a great deal effort to do something.
There is also a similar expression in English, break one's neck or back.
People can say this idiom when it takes long time to find their keys.
It is difficult for people to remember idioms or expressions, especially in Japanese because of the number.
Therefore, finding similar expressions in other languages is very interesting, and it may help people to remember it.
this is not a perfect version but it's a pretentious.
There are bright decorations, dresses, making-up.
It makes theatrical atmosphere with a playing of actors who act mad and unreally.
They play as they are on a stage not in a cinema shot.
And this is a main problem of this movie.
Despite the antiquated way of making this movie I think this is a great work of art.
More and more corporations have severed a relationship with National Rifle Association since mass shootings happened at a high school in Florida two weeks ago.
They offered a discount in their products or service if their customers had a membership with NRA.
The argument was brought up every time mass shootings were repeated, but nothing has changed because of NRA's lobbying campaign.
It seems, however, that some companies noticed that it would hurt their brand value and reputation if they keep having connection with NRA.
I'm afraid that American common sense in guns is far away from that of other countries.
They offered a discount in their products or service if their customers had a membership with NRA.
The argument was brought up every time mass shootings were repeated, but nothing has changed because of NRA's lobbying campaign.
It seems, however, that some companies noticed that it would hurt their brand value and reputation if they keep having connection with NRA.
My flight was late for an hour yesterday.
So I was back home at 3 AM.
Because the rythm of daly life was a little disturbed, I could not wake up early easily.
I finally wake up early this morning.
Because the rythm of daly life was a little disturbed, I could not wake up early easily.
I finally wake up early this morning.
No one told that you had your fly down while you were walking down the street.
No one told that your fly was down while you were walking down the street.
This morning I was off earlier than the other days to catch the bus to arrive at workin time.
I liked it very much, because there was silence and everything was covered of white snow.
I remembered the snowfall in my city in January 1985, in a couple of days it fell down around a meter of snow.
The schools were closed, the pubblic transport had big problems but I was a child and it was a fantastic week for me.
Every thing was covered by snow for days and the snow melted completed after three months.
It was a exceptional event, it has never been repeated.
In my city it usually snows only two o three days per year and not every winter.
Just imagine how the sound of scream, the sound of breath and every other sound can add to the effects of horror and fear.
For instance, you just try to watch a horror movie when it's mute.
Sometimes in this kind of movie, the screen is completely dark without any image, but the sound of background makes a horror atmosphere.
Therefore, you won't be so scared until the images and sounds play together.
yeah,my skin still not perfect but it's getting better.
since i have studied in Korea,my skin was break out a lot,and i'd been upset for a long time.
and then i deciced to live more happy, heathly,eating right,dont care about people's sights about my skin anymore.
now i got rid of mostly acnes but still have many acne scars.
love yourself weather you have acne or not!
Cause you're beautiful in your own way.
I dropped my friend at home.
That's smell good.
The pronunciation of 'r' is very difficult for Japanese.
But you do need your legs on track and must treat them nicely.
My boots swallowed one mile after another, and my mind got into a kind of meditative state where time seems meaningless, and your brain wakes up from its trance only when something important happens.
After a dozen miles walked quite uneventfully through a bleak and washed land, my brain did wake up.
The signal was emitted by my left leg.
I made a stop on the roadside, dropped my backpack, and sat on a small mossy boulder.
The right leg was okay and smelled of jasmine and violets.
I punctured the blister with a needle, having sterilized it by match flame, and put a small sticky plaster on it.
I sat on the boulder for about twenty minutes, waiting until my feet dried.
In order to pass the time, I reexamined the contents of my first-aid kit from which the plaster magically appeared.
The potion should be applied by a qualified doctor, but in certain circumstances, it could be done by a nurse too.
Here are some of those:
And I have to say, the lives of most of them were not bed of roses.
Barnard, as well as many other doctors, honored Demikhov as their tutor and the father of transplantology.
Why, you may ask, why were all those brilliant people treated as underdogs?
You have to read immortal "Levsha" by Nikolai Leskov to understand it; or at least to watch the cartoon.
Meanwhile, my feet dried and my stomach felt empty.
I put my boots on and hit the road.
But you do need your legs on track and must treat them nicely.
The signal was emitted by my left leg.
After a short examination of my lower extremities, I found that I had a blister on the medial side of my left big toe.
But I don't find what I want to do.
I'm disappointed it.
I really never thought my life.
Althought I'm 31 years old,what can I do from now on.
Life in the UK: Do you even feel like to do anything? 
It's extremely unusual for it to snow here.
It's beautiful to see it through the window however we are not really used to such snow situation.
I understand that, but what annoys me was that everyone seemed like drained, didn't feel like working basically because of snow I guess.
I ordered some aloma oils for work with next deliverly last Friday.
It hasn't arrived yet.
I rang post office with Tracking number, they said that number wasn't recognised.
I've checked it again, phoned them again, they said again this number didn't match.
I asked them this tracking number was definitely correct so could you check it again for me please.
Fainally they got it and I found out my parcel was still in Birmingham.
If you managed to go to work in snow, you should proud of yourself and work hard!!
Life in the UK: Do you even feel like to do anything? 
It's beautiful to see it through the window however we are not really used to such snow situation.
I understand that, but what annoys me was that everyone seemed like drained, didn't feel like working basically because of snow I guess.
I rang post office with Tracking number, they said that number wasn't recognised.
Fainally they got it and I found out my parcel was still in Birmingham.
If you managed to go to work in snow, you should proud of yourself and work hard!!
It's beautiful to see it through the window however we are not really used to such snow situation.
I understand that, but what annoys me was that everyone seemed like drained, didn't feel like working basically because of snow I guess.
I ordered some aloma oils for work with next deliverly last Friday.
I rang post office with Tracking number, they said that number wasn't recognised.
I've checked it again, phoned them again, they said again this number didn't match.
I asked them this tracking number was definitely correct so could you check it again for me please.
If you managed to go to work in snow, you should proud of yourself and work hard!!
Yesterday I have had a small phone conversation in English with a partner company manager.
Well, it was another confirmation, that without constant practise it's not that easy even to match proper words to explain easy things.
Understanding of what the manager had been saying also was not perfect.
To improve language or any other ability is necessary to become a regular and hard-worker learner.
- to read books in English to enrich my dictionary;
- to learn and to speak by heart dialogues and text fragments from English books;
- to increase situations in which I will have to speak English.
And one more time: the main rule is regular and hard-work training.
As one can see the regularity is not the best.
Since the third trimester has started, I have to be more careful about physical condition management.
My appetite has increased a bit more than before, sometimes I am craving for something sweet.
I know I had better cook by myself, but I go home late and get takeouts on weekdays.
Therefore I weigh up everyday so that it does not increase too much.
There are coffee makers in Japanese convenience stores just like Thailand
It was like a light thrown in the darkness.
It was like a light thrown into the darkness.
I'm heading off to the airport.
I think the previous two sentences mean the exact same thing.
It got me through those eight hundreds, four hundreds, and one hundreds at five thirty in the morning, so I thank you.
You know, you guys don't know this, but the last game--my last game, umm, that we had here against Utah jazz, I was really tired.
Umm, we've got one more game left.
I don't have any legs." 
That you don't understand it doesn't mean that anybody else understands.
That you don't understand it doesn't mean that someone else is on the same boat.
Does it make sense to say "someone threw a pie at my face"?
I'm considering traveling in Shanghai; for, I have a long time connecting a plane.
After work, I had my hair cut at a barber shop that I had gone for the first time.
I like this barber shop because cost was reasonable and a barber was very friendly.
Now, the wind has been still blowing hard.
but all trains in our area are stopping.
The boys who wore school uniform without buttons looked proudly.
They say that such a habit is decreasing among the teenager recently.
As to the Disney movies, I come up with two ones which I watched in my childhood, at the age of 6 or 7 around the time when I began to go to the elementary school.
The first one coming up is a famous animation film "Dumbo".
I didn't remember the story of it well except the scene in which Dumbo bathes in a tub mixed with so much liquor that he gets intoxicated and sees pink elephants, until I re-watched it after I became adult.
"The Gnome-Mobile" is a 1967 Walt Disney Productions comedy-fantasy film directed by Robert Stevenson, the Wikipedia says.
I suppose I watched it when I was around 6 and don't remember the details let alone the story.
I just remember that two adorable children, a boy and a girl who acted in a famous "Mary Poppins" with famous Julie Andrews, and many gnomes were running around in a wood.
I didn't remember even the title of this movie until recently when I googled this and that, and finally excavated this below.
As to the Disney movies, I come up with two ones which I watched in my childhood, at the age of 6 or 7 around the time when I began to go to the elementary school.
The first one coming up is a famous animation film "Dumbo".
I didn't remember the story of it well except the scene in which Dumbo bathes in a tub mixed with so much liquor that he gets intoxicated and sees pink elephants, until I re-watched it after I became adult.
The other one is not an animation film, but I think this is one of the most Walt Disney-like movies ever made in my opinion.
"The Gnome-Mobile" is a 1967 Walt Disney Productions comedy-fantasy film directed by Robert Stevenson, the Wikipedia says.
I suppose I watched it when I was around 6 and don't remember the details let alone the story.
I just remember that two adorable children, a boy and a girl who acted in a famous "Mary Poppins" with famous Julie Andrews, and many gnomes were running around in a wood.
Yesterday, I got a headache and went back home earlier than the usual.
I usually spent too much time on cooking.
Yesterday, however, I didn't have enough time to cook so I made Nabe.
Nabe is delicious, nourish, and easy to cook.
On top of that, I can use any kind of meet and vegetables, so I can save money through choosing ingredients on sale.
It is the best solution for me to surviving winter!
It's very fine this morning, but it was cloudy with a strong wind like a tyhoon yesterday.
It was the bad weather like a few trains or planes couldn't go on time.
The 1st of March, yesterday was the day that the graduation ceremony at every public high school has been held every year in Nara.
I saw some mothers decking up for it while my driving yesterday afternoon.
I wonder how emothion they had in it.
Compelete Different Language
Apparently, I'll continue literal translation between Japanese to English.
It is like remodeling a car to a ship.
It has been a strong wind since last night.
It began to change for the spring.
I want to wash and clean my car, because it has been very dirty.
Nowadays, people are damaging their health by eating too much junk food.
Many investigations show that this kind of food is very harmful to the human body, therefore, finding a solution for this problem is a good initiative.
Food education is a good idea because people should realize that this food could harm their health.
This topic should be taught at school and it is as important as any other subject.
Dietary habits shape our future, determine our longevity rate and our quality of life.
People need to know how important it is to eat natural products like fruits or vegetables, rather than junk food or industrial products with many additives.
In addition, this type of food is very popular and compared to other types of food, it becomes an easy option in many situations.
In summary, people should know these points of view.
We can avoid many health problems in our future, just change our habits now.
Many investigations show that this kind of food is very harmful to the human body, therefore, finding a solution for this problem is a good initiative.
In my opinion, there are relevant arguments in favor of these views.
Food education is a good idea because people should realize that this food could harm their health.
This topic should be taught at school and it is as important as any other subject.
Dietary habits shape our future, determine our longevity rate and our quality of life.
People need to know how important it is to eat natural products like fruits or vegetables, rather than junk food or industrial products with many additives.
Well, routine and a life full of stress are factors that promote poor diet.
After all, junk food is cheap, and you can get it easily.
In addition, this type of food is very popular and compared to other types of food, it becomes an easy option in many situations.
In summary, people should know these points of view.
Eating healthy is a way to respect our body, and for that reason, we must choose wisely and not just for pleasure or comfort, or simply because we do not have time.
We can avoid many health problems in our future, just change our habits now.
After running some errands, I walked around the university museum.
She instead replied, "He is too shy..." Before she finished saying that, he murmured, "Yep." I encouraged him by saying, "Good!
I read these words a few years ago and each time I find something new in them.
I hope I have done enough justice to its author, to whom all my admiration is dedicated.
I know how much you like to hear it said - but I do not write it just for this reason: I do so because writing to you warms my heart.
So much time has passed since I last wrote to you, almost two years, but I know you will forgive me because you know how I am, stubborn and realistic, and I thought that writing made no sense.
But now, my darling wife, I know I have to do what I have always delayed and have done so often in the past.
I find it hard to understand in my mind what it means to love you now that you are dead, but I still want to comfort you and take care of you, and just as I want you to love me and take care of me.
I want to deal with the problems with you, I want to do little projects with you.
I never thought we could do such a thing until now.
Thinking of us.
We started to learn to make clothes together, learning Chinese, using a movie projector.
Can't I do that now?
I am alone without you: you were my "ideal woman" and the instigator of all our crazy adventures.
This is the letter that Richard wrote to the love of his life: Arline.
I read these words a few years ago and each time I find something new in them.
I hope I have done enough justice to its author, to whom all my admiration is dedicated.
So much time has passed since I last wrote to you, almost two years, but I know you will forgive me because you know how I am, stubborn and realistic, and I thought that writing made no sense.
When you got sick, you were worried because you could not give me certain things that you believed I needed.
And now this is even more true: you can't give me anything, yet I love you so much that I couldn't love any other woman - nor would I love it.
But you can't do anything about it, my darling, and neither do I.
I don't understand: I met several girls, even cute girls, and I don't want to remain alone, but after two or three meetings they do not stimulate me to continue the relationship.
In the Post Scriptum, there is all the author.
He uses irony almost as if he wants to confine the pain of his loss, accepting the presence of his wife in a dimension that he himself does not conceive.
I don't understand: I met several girls, even cute girls, and I don't want to remain alone, but after two or three meetings they do not stimulate me to continue the relationship.
He uses irony almost as if he wants to confine the pain of his loss, accepting the presence of his wife in a dimension that he himself does not conceive.
I know that you will blame me that I am foolish and that you want to see me fully happy and don't want to be an obstacle for me.
I don't understand: I met several girls, even cute girls, and I don't want to remain alone, but after two or three meetings they do not stimulate me to continue the relationship.
It costs much money.
The first time I heard of it is when I was talking with my Indonesian friend on a skype call and he asked me whether I know this under-construction building.
However, I was really embarrassed since I didn't know about it.
You know that I'm not a knowledgeable person.
But later on, I saw it on a post by ASEAN Skyline and noticed that it was the one I had been asked about.
That post gave me some amazing information about Landmark 81, one of the top tallest buildings in Southeast Asia called "The Great Wall of Saigon" by ASEAN Skyline.
But the most surprising thing I got that day is that the unknown building I had been asked about is exactly the one I see every day on the way to school.
And it was which I was wondering about how tall it is in comparison with Bitexco tower.
Though I do know that Vietnam is nothing at all in terms of high-rise buildings, I was kind of proud when I knew that a Vietnam building will be one of the top tallest buildings in the SEA.
Today's diary
today's event
I wrote diary in English on my notebook until yesterday but I wonder my English expression is correct so I've decided to use lang-8.
My manager advised me that the target time to finish it is within 2 hours so try it keeping in my mind.
Making a quote is so difficult for me because of my lack knowledge of car parts that I thought I study about it more.
Thank you for your concern me and talk to me, my kind 2 boss.
I never try to choose kimonos that contain gold powder, also embroidered kimono, hand- painted and crepe de chine.
Getting wet can cause problems as shrinkage and loss of colour a lot!
I love cotton kimonos but they loss of colours for water easily.
I recommend that you wash them with water contains salt and clear vinegar.
You can prevent that with such problem.
Besides Bayonetta 3 and Octopath--whose relase date are still unknow--I have no interest in any released switch titles.
I really hope nintendo could keep the momentum and release more AAA games in 2017.
No more remaster games or transplanted mobile games please.
I can't remember my passwords, 'lang-8' sent me the email for this problem.
My last diary is written several years ago.
I often simulate original model of fluid dynamics by using "python".
python means programming language, which is familiar with beginner.
This building is called "Gojyunotou".
That means a 5-storied tower.
There are many sculptures shaping the Chinese zodiac on its wall.
Normally, the order is the following in the accordance with Chinese zodiac story.
However, firstly tiger, secondly rabbit and thirdly dragon...
, this order.
Why isn't is normal order?
Gojyunotou was built by Tokugawa Iemitsu and his signs of Chinese zodiac is dragon.
His grandfather's one is tiger and father's one is rabbit.
That's why such a weird order.
At the beginning of the lesson, my teacher offered me a chocolate cookie which is my favourite.
He told me that he also liked it, so he wanted to eat pillow sized of this chocolate.
Of course there was no such big sized chocolate cookies.
Or I should write a letter to the cookie company that whether or not they listen to our requests to make our ideal chocolate cookies.
I topped some chopped green onions and egg on the beef.
Even though it was carbohydrate and not good for my diet, the sukiyaki was tasty.
Since my wife and I were very tired, we decided to buy sukiyaki bento for dinner.
I topped some chopped green onions and egg on the beef.
It was very strong wind today.
If you could cry on anyone's shoulder,whose would it be?
He is trustworthy Because he listens to my talk sincerely and gives me good advise.
but since that I started my university studies I have participated more actively.
I can highlight that in 2013 alongside my brother I implemented a brewery company.
Since 2016 I am working at wind energy service company. in a at commissioning department.
this job has allowed me travel for different countries and to work together with people of multiple nationalities.
Hughes in a dope
pad on Orchestra Place".
I'm planning to visit Europe in this spring.
I'm not sure I'll be able to take my vacation though.
I'd like to take a night train in travel.
In Japan, night trains disappear one after another this decade.
As a result, they are in service only on new year holidays.
I've heard that there are many long-distance train line in Europe.
That is one of the reasons why I want to travel Europe.
French, Finland, Hungary, Switzerland,...
admition 
I have requested the Master in EAE Business School.
is due to personal recommendation from ex-student.
as well as for the good position of EAE in the different ranking.
and recently for the very good telephonic interview.
where I could know better the methodology used in the Master.
and also, the different departments and activities available in the EAE.
I have requested the Master in EAE Business School.
is due to personal recommendation from ex-student.
as well as for the good position of EAE in the different ranking.
where I could know better the methodology used in the Master.
and also, the different departments and activities available in the EAE.
I had Udon noodle for dinner today with co-workers.
March Started.
I have to make grades and to make final arrangements.
The trouble is I should know its turn.
I think it is stye.
I sometimes get such symptoms when I get tired.
How many times should I apply the medicine to my eyes a day?
Is it okay to use the medicine until it gets well?
I watched the greatest showman today
It was really nice and gave me important things.
Like I went through the life of the greatest showman.
And then back to my life, I can think my life in different way.
It is what I need.
Additionally the songs were absolutely great.
I already bought the soundtracks.
FIY.
We can take discount movies services on 1st day in Japan.
Funny Dialogues
Because you are an Asian."
I laughed again.
Maybe I should take some time improving fluency while ignoring all grammatical errors and accuracy.
If I can't say anything for a minute because I concern too much about grammar and worry if I am wrong, the opponent who is waiting for my words will be very tried and frustrated.
I don't have to speak like native ones now.
I just have written it down in a row without self correction to practice it.
But I think it's okay, at least now.
"I'm going to pig out tonight!" means "I'm going to eat too much!" My English teacher told us at the lesson.
He often teaches un some useful phrases.
Maybe this is the reason why the United States is great.
American freedom, democracy, human rights, I do not think it is advantages.
Most chinese people have not seen a American in whole life, it is regrettable.
I took a paid holiday yesterday.
I went to karaoke by myself and practiced English songs.
Then I went to dermatology and got treatment for my face.
I actually had many pimples on my face and it had been made me so depressed everyday.
Now I have less but still there are many craters on my face.
Accurately I take a laser treatment and injection treatment.
Before taking them, I apply anesthetic on my face and just wait until it works.
Then I take laser.
After this my face gets so red.
So I wear mask and go back to my flat hoping nobody see my face.
I think my skin has got better than before but I still feel insecure in front of people in a blight room where my skin reflect the light and craters stand out.
Do you know some websites or language course to learn English, which use "point of view" short story?
I know grammar, but I want to bring it to life and start to use it correctly, without thinking every time when I need them about grammar rule.
In point of view short story the point is that: the same short story are write in a few version.
Every version of short story is told in different time.
It helps me a lot to better remember rules, but I find only a few that kind of short story in web.
Or maybe you know better way to master them?
I heard an interesting story about Bitcoin.
A famous Japanese comedian was asked to buy ten coins for 1000 dollar by an acquaintance.
The coins are plated with golden color and carved a letter "B" on the surface.
He said these are Bitcoin.
He said to the comedian that Bitcoin would rise certainly and the comedian knew Bitcoin was popular.
So the comedian bought them for 1000 dollar.
If you notice it is strange, it means you know well about Bitcoin.
Because Bitcoin is virtual currency, so they don't exist as real coin.
The comedian knew that after he bought them and noticed that he was deceived.
Do you laugh at him?
Or might you be deceived like him?
I'm just in the spring vacation.
I do part time jobs and stay home all day recently.
Mostly I stay home and watch movies, read books, see twitter, and sleep.
I enjoy my vacation. But I don't do anything around DESIGN.
I learned basic of design 2 years until now.
Now it is time to think about what my dream of job is and what design I like.
I must organize my thought. But I couldn't have found my dream.
So I should know and experience any jobs or works.
I think the first step is managed your time because is very important for achieve your goals also you can more study because this you can open doors in the future.
other point important is that everybody has fears, and you need face your fears and understand situacion, if you achiave this point you can better drive situacion in the real life.
and finally you have to admit your mistakes because of mistakes you can learn more than good experiences this is part of learning
I think the first step is managed your time because is very important for achieve your goals, also you can more study because this you can open doors in the future.
other point important is that everybody has fears, and you need face your fears and understand situacion, if you achiave this point you can better drive situacion in the real life.
and finally you have to admit your mistakes because of mistakes you can learn more than good experiences this is part of learning
What I remember is only the odd thing or image.
But I can never remember the entire dream as they are too abstract.
Question1: Do you often have dreams?
Question2: Do you usually remember your dreams?
What I remember is only the odd thing or image.
Nowadays, many children are busy with school, homework, and other duties, that is why they do not have enough time to go out each day and just enjoy the sunshine or fresh air.
I am inclined to believe that they can not develop well without understanding the natural environment, activities on the fresh air, real knowledge why we must protect our environment and so on.
They have to go out, go each day several kilometers, breathe with the fresh air or do sports activities.
If people do not do it, consequently, it leads to the lack of health and some problems with health.
When they become adolescents, they enroll in university, as a result, they will have less time for such activities or just forget about them.
The main trend here is that if they did not such a habit since childhood, with age they will not do it at all.
Secondly, when children play out, they can know the world by playing in the park or with animals.
They are in the natural environment, subsequently, it develops their curiosity because they see a myriad of unknown thing which they will want to know.
With time, they will understand that the environment plays a crucial role in our life, that is why we should protect it.
In the future, this generation will be aware of environmental problems and will try to solve it faster and more professionally.
To sum up, children are very busy with their everyday activities and can spend their time on the environment, as a result, it leads to some problems with age, like a lack of mental agility or health problems.
Important components of the production masterpiese are music, respectively, an orchestra and a conductor, and also all-star cast.
The artistic staff and technical personnel are playwright, who writes plays; scriptwriter, who writes a script; dramatury, who interprets the play; producer, who has general controlof the money for the play; casting director.
The contents are for kids, but it is written well about pranksters.
I finish this book in English a couple of days ago.
The small cars are restricted the size and the power of engine, however The owners of the small cars can revive a lot of benefits.
For example The high way fee and the car insurance rate and the car tax will be offed at discounted price for the owners.
Except for above mentioned benefits.
The Owners can reduce running cost of the cars.
The small car is more light than other car models.
They can drive effectively on long way.
replacing tires cost
The owner have to replace their car tiers periodically, and It is a burden for owners.
In general the cost is related to the car size, so In case of the small cars, the owner can replace their tiers at reasonable price.
There are o lot of benefits for the small car owners.
I searched for the foreign affairs before tipping this article, and I know this car culture is only Japanese.
I understand that there are a lot of problems but I have confident that the small cars are good for many region.
The diagram below illustrates us about the functioning of a central heating system and how it works in a house.
Firstly, we can see on the top on the figure the water tank to fill the storage tank, it receives the cold water that enters into the house and then provides the storage tank.
This simple system known as central heating system provides homes with hot water by using the cold water entering into the house.
There is a pipeline distributed all over the house, this pipeline along with the pump allow transporting the water to the different places in the house.
Before the hot water get to the hot water taps and hot water radiators for final usage in bathrooms and kitchens inside the house, it has to go to the boiler, which can work with either gas or oil.
This simple system known as central heating system provides homes with hot water by using the cold water entering into the house.
Nuclear technology has given the national authorities the power to harm the world we live in.
On the other hand nuclear technology has been shown to have positive applications like electric energy production.
In my opinion nuclear energy can be as harmful as man wants so.
Even though atomic bombs can dramatically affect the population, it is not the only application nuclear energy can be used for.
Same thing happens with nuclear energy, it has good and bad applications, then it depends on human race to make responsible decisions on how to use technologies such as nuclear energy.
Nuclear energy produces big amounts of energy in a more efficient way than hydroelectric or wind power plants can.
In conclusion, nuclear technology is potentially dangerous to our lives to the extent man wants so.
It is up to governments, authorities, and us all as a society to make sure to wisely use the resources we count on in the current times.
Yet the technology has been put to positive use as an energy source and in certain areas of medicine.
On the other hand nuclear technology has been shown to have positive applications like electric energy production.
Same thing happens with nuclear energy, it has good and bad applications, then it depends on human race to make responsible decisions on how to use technologies such as nuclear energy.
Nuclear energy produces big amounts of energy in a more efficient way than hydroelectric or wind power plants can.
A fortnight ago, a gun shooting rampage happened at a school in America.
Just after the tragedy, Mr Trump insisted that the more teachers held a gun at school, the safer students would become.
No sooner were the words out of his mouth than American citizens saw another gun shooting incident today: a teacher threatened his students with the gun and barricaded himself in the classroom!
Grip hard onto human nature which is coming to an end.
Please pay an amount specified in the bill by the end of this month.
Please see the bill attached.
I am sleepy, but nevertheless live.
Last time I visited here I only read in a book Store, Kyobo.
The purpose of this journey is to see another book store, Young-gwang book store.
I am supposed to get there not by searching smartphone, but by asking people.
I found interesting, the following.
Sometimes they directley took me to get the place where I want to go.
Naturally the conversation is going to drag us many questions, for example, why do you do for living; why do you come here; how old do I look;
The artist
She finished a school of art in 2008.
Kate is taking a part in different exhibitions around the whole world all the time.
Recently she has opened new passion for herself.
She is going to take a part in exhibition in the next winter.
She has been working at her it for the last half year.
She has already made 3 sets of the picturis from the collection.
Kate is going to make 10 the same sets.
She is going to the France at next week.
She will visit a Paris and may be some village of the France.
Kate expect that she manage to make good photos for her project.
The friend is getting more and more curious, so next day he furtively follows Dr-F.
It doesn't carry Dr-F's bag, and when he drops his handkerchief accidentally, it doesn't either pick it up for him or even tell him about it.
Irritating, finally the friend plots to set the dogs on Dr-F.
The dog, being set free, runs to Dr-F and begins to bark at him.
The robot doesn't do anything but to run around with Dr-F, trying to get out of the dog.
Seeing this from his hiding place and feeling fed up, the friend thinks, "What a nonsense he made," and gives up his research.
Dr-F returns to his home in the evening and before going to bed at night, he gives an order to his robot, "Go ahead."
The robot begins his work for a while: sits at the desk, takes out the notebook, and writes in Dr-F's diary, "Lost my handkerchief while out for a walk.
Barked by a dog and narrowly escaped, and so on..."
Looking down from behind it, Dr-F mutters, "I hate mundane tasks like writing a diary.
The robot in tow still does nothing particular.
It doesn't carry Dr-F's bag, and when he drops his handkerchief accidentally, it doesn't either pick it up for him or even tell him about it.
Irritating, finally the friend plots to set the dogs on Dr-F.
The robot doesn't do anything but to run around with Dr-F, trying to get out of the dog.
The robot begins his work for a while: sits at the desk, takes out the notebook, and writes in Dr-F's diary, "Lost my handkerchief while out for a walk.
Annual Report of Casablanca Film Club
The aim of this report is to inform members of Casablanca Film Club about the main events carried out over the last year as well as present plans for activities in the coming year.
Additionally, it will also be summarised the current financial position of the club.
The Open Doors Weekend: During the first weekend of May, the access to the club was completely free.
Members of the club showed visitors the facilities and inform them about the wide range of activities that are carried out.
The Argentinean Week: In past years, the club organised a special week during which only films from Argentina were showed.
The annual meeting of film clubs: On the first of June, the club achieved to hold this prestigious event.
Members of other clubs gathering at the facilities of the club were they shared their experiences.
Many films are so deteriorated that they can hardly be showed.
It would also be necessary to acquire new films.
In fact, membership fees will have to be rise if the club wants to carry out the plans indicated above.
The club board is going to meet with the Councillor responsible of Culture and Sports to let him know what the plans and activities of the club are and to get funding from the City Council.
Additionally, the club is going to ask neighbours and business for financial support to maintain and improve something as useful for young people as the film club.
The aim of this report is to inform members of Casablanca Film Club about the main events carried out over the last year as well as present plans for activities in the coming year.
Members of the club showed visitors the facilities and inform them about the wide range of activities that are carried out.
The Argentinean director Pablo Ramos visited the club and spoke about his last project.
To increase the number of members: Although the club has to compete with more appealing activities in the neighbourhood, the club board is going to launch a campaign addressed to young people.
It would also be necessary to acquire new films.
In fact, membership fees will have to be rise if the club wants to carry out the plans indicated above.
It has ambitious plans and to achieve them, the club will need their members to be more involved.
Enjoy every moment of life without comparing it to anyone.
Try to take interest in the small things you do either for yourself or other.
If you keep comparing your life with others, you will never be happy.
You will have to live an unhappy and unhealthy life in doing so.
I think about the calm weekend.
I like the lazy weekend too.
We could go to the cinema or eat out at some cafe.
Do you love Asian food?
In addition, a impressive person was PNB Rock.
As far as I know, he is from Pennsylvania.
So I lived in there as a child.
I started Lang-8 from today,
But I'm not sure how to use it so far.
Today is a strong windy day.
It is strong windy in my city today.
However, the train that I usually use for work can drive today.
But it is not lucky because some colleagues cannot go to the office.
If the train stopped, I do not have to go to the office.
It happened a lot of happinesses yesterday!
First, we could decided to property to live with myboyfriend!
We are going to move on 22th March.
Moving body with old animetion songs get an adrenalin rush!!!
I am already looking forward to go to there on next week because he may use the song of Yu-Yu-Hakusyo or SlumDunk!
Lastly,I helped myboyfriend to job hunting.
I was very happy about professional praised me!!
First, we could decided to property to live with myboyfriend!
We are going to move on 22th March.
Moving body with old animetion songs get an adrenalin rush!!!
I am already looking forward to go to there on next week because he may use the song of Yu-Yu-Hakusyo or SlumDunk!
I Feel that the Spring is Coming Immediately.
I have many windy days lately.
I cannot stand straight, or I'm almost fallen down.
And sometimes, it's rain in my place where is not so many rainy days.
I feel that the spring is coming soon...
It like bread so, smell was good!
I downloaded a curling game on my smartphone during the olympic games were held.
I have played real curling once before but I didn't know the rule at all, so it was like just an imitating.
I learned a bit about the rule as I watched this olympic curling games.
Anyway, this smartphone game was so addictive that I can't stop playing on my free time.
I think the opponent is also the people who downloaded from all over the world.
So sometime they were very bad and sometime they quit as they know that they will lose, so watching opponents is also fun.
I bet I am also laughed at because I'm terrible player, too.
The other day, I really wanted to just enjoy a movie without any bother, so I went to movies alone.
The guy who sat at my back kept kicking my seat whenever he burst his laughing at funny scenes.
All seats around me was so packed, that I couldn't change the seat and I just tried to put up with him by thinking that he unconsciously was reacting to a movie.
When my patient was at last worn out, I just looked at him again without any word, finally he stopped kicking my seat.
We tattemped to persuade them to participate in an explanatory meeting to be held on Monday.
In English, are there any typical name for something like a paper with a lot of photos?
There are many photos of students or scenerys.
They are sticked on a large piece of paper, and it is put on a wall.
If you can, I want to know what they're called.
Very often, when my brother plays computer games in his room, his friend comes to him.
His friend says, that, as a matter of fact, he wants to invite my brother to the party in the country.
Five people are going to go by car and they invite my brother to comes with them.
His friend says, that these guys are very pretty people.
They don't drink and don't smoke, they play gold and listen to the good music.
His friend says, that these guys know a lot of funny stories and they speak English well because they do often go in Britain.
His friend says, that they want to help my brother.
They are going to invite him to their office because people there make much money.
It seems, we should be happier than our ancestors because many of us only read or hear about wars, famine and many other unpleasant things.
However, a global level of unhappiness is still high.
Maybe, it is impossible to find universal pieces of advice, which can help everyone to be happier.
Nevertheless, I want to tell about some personal tips of mine.
Our brain concentrates on exercises, we become healthier and more attractive and we can have extra energy to do something.
Having regular sport trainings is much easier than many people imagine.
We should just find time, choose the best suitable kind of sport and start going to a gym or to a sport studio at least 2-3 times per week.
I like dancing and go to bachata classes because it is sport, fun and a great linguistic and psychological practice for me.
My best friends live in another country but even an opportunity to listen to their voices or laugh at their jokes always brings fun in my life.
A good book can be the same as useful as a good friend.
It gives us important information, entertain us and make us more cheerful or creative.
For me it is a book about super power of an ordinary man, which always inspires me to see life brighter and achieve my goals more persistently.
It matters, if we want to be happier.
Some personal tips to be happier
One of the main psychological problems of modern society is loss of ability to be happy.
Having regular sport trainings is much easier than many people imagine.
We should just find time, choose the best suitable kind of sport and start going to a gym or to a sport studio at least 2-3 times per week.
Secondly, I think, we should talk to our friends as often as possible to be happier.
We should just call our best friends, speak to them and think about the best thing possible to have together right now.
My best friends live in another country but even an opportunity to listen to their voices or laugh at their jokes always brings fun in my life.
People, who read many books, are often wise and good speakers.
Reading does not need much money or special preparations.
We ought to choose a book, buy it or find a free e-version and begin to read.
It might not matter, which ways we choose to be happier.
I work form home today.
It takes about 90 min from my home to my office. so telecommuting is really useful system.
I bought lunch in my favorite baker and had it at a beach near my house.
The wind was strong but I could enjoyed nice scenery and delicious and fresh bread.
I think that learning English becomes your weapon
In fact, we realized the synthesis and the simulation of processes, and now we are doing experiences with the aim of optimizing pretreatment and hydrolysis steps.
Due to the limited technological averages that we have, we are limited to the sulfuric acid process, and analyses are limited to total sugars and some inhibitors.
The results obtained will be exploited for the rest of the process, in fermentation and distillation in which we have completed good results using simulation, mainly with molasses process.
I think it will be very interesting to conduct experimental work on pretreatment, hydrolysis, and fermentation, as you described above.
However, I can support myself just for 3 to 4 months of stay in Stellenbosch, and my school can only give me the travel expenses from Morocco to Stellenbosch.
Otherwise, I'm attached by a contract with the school to teach a few hours until June, and with the pay I get, I finance my studies and with it I can fund my stay in Stellenbosch.
I propose to perform some experiences here with the techniques we have, and coming to Stellenbosch just to conduct a reduced number of tests to confirm the results obtained and to achieve the analyzes necessary for the rest of the work.
I will try to double working hours, in Stellenbosch, if it is possible?
we can start also fermentation experiences, and your group will continue for the rest of fermentation tests, on my behalf.
Someone tried to con you last night while you were getting into a club.
The rest of us is going to wait for you by the pool because someone farted in the house and it stinks as hell.
Once you hooked one of your friends up with your neighbor.
Does it still work if I put the word "up" next to the word "hooked" in the previous two sentences?
It was warm today.
In Japan, there are some days that the strong wind blow s from February to the middle of March every year.
This morning, the weather forecast said, "The wind of last night was this first spring storm."
We say that on the day when the first spring storm blows, the temperature rises, but it will be cold return next day.
Actually, today's minimum temperature was 9 degrees and the maximum was16 degrees.
I don't know how to say
I'm 24 years old this year,However,i'm still a student and i need parents give me money to live.
I know that i should study very hard,but i always don't know how to do and i can't stop playing my phone.
My grandmonther dead this year,my father and my grandfather are very upset.
I never see my father cry before,but this time he always can't stop crying.
I always tell myself that i must try to study very well,then i can find a good job and make more money.
Only then can i take my family to play all over the world and buy things to them.
I like make plans,and most of them won't come true.
Can you make change this time?
Fightting!
It helps you to understand working life, relationships, disappointments, people etc.
One can only imagine these things before experience them and most likely his assumptions would not be %100 correct.
Before we did it we talked about one hour long for the chat but I was so involved and having a good time that while talking I saw the clock in a sudden and I realised that we had been talking about two hours at that moment.
We were talking about different things on the spot.
Idiomatics expressions, words and even phrasal verbs, the one that always mess with my mind.
We share what we know for mutually beneficial.
Sometime when you are reading or hearing a new word you can notice where it comes from because it is a compound word or you know what means a part of the word and you can figure it out.
Besides we could discover some words that mean the same in both languages what makes our life easier hahaha.
Ones of the things native English disturb a lot about Spanish language are the Spanish verb conjugation and the reflexive verbs.
They are a mess and gender in adjective and nouns more of the same.
Sorry for my English mates, can be frustrating sometimes, but the same to me with English.
In figure skating men's single, Yuzuru Hanyu won the gold medal.
In female ski jump, Sara Takanashi won the bronze medal.
Many athletes mimic her jumping skill and copy her jumping form and they excelled Sara's performance.
Sara couldn't make good record in recent years.
But she stayed calm and made up her mind to win the bronze medal whatever happens.
I'm very happy for her
During the 17 days of Olympics, I noticed one or two medal increased in the morning.
Thank you, Japan team.
And female curling was the most interest and Japanese curling girls took Japanese people's hearts away.
They took snack time in the middle of the game.
But Japanese girls always sit down and eat like picnic.
In Japan, NHK cut the snack time scene.
But NHK received many telephone calls claming, "Don't cut the cute snack time!
NHK uploaded the video, "Curling girls at snack time".
Pyongchang Olympics 2018 was the most impresive one to me.
In figure skating men's single, Yuzuru Hanyu won the gold medal.
He became the consecutive gold medalist in 66 years since Dick Button, USA.
Although his right ancle was seriously injured three months ago, he overcame pain and pressure.
In female ski jump, Sara Takanashi won the bronze medal.
In female speed skating, Japan team won two gold medals, one silver medal and bronze medal.....
And female curling was the most interest and Japanese curling girls took Japanese people's hearts away.
They always smiled and talked in happy mood.
They took snack time in the middle of the game.
But Japanese girls always sit down and eat like picnic.
In Japan, NHK cut the snack time scene.
But NHK received many telephone calls claming, "Don't cut the cute snack time!
My husband and I like joking to each other.
My husband got it first, and then, I got it from him.
A stupid couple!
My husband and I like joking to each other.
My husband got it first, and then, I got it from him.
My son told me that getting a flu shot might cost 5,000 yen.
What flu type did your doctor say you got?"
"I got A type.
One of my friends recommended me raw honey the other day.
Raw honey heals my fatigue and is good for intestinal environment, such as relieving constipation.
Honeycomb is edible, do you know that?
I work in Accenture since June 2017.
May I ask a question about quotation mark?
Why did she get rid of my affection?
On the first time I met her at a coffee bar, she was beautiful in a white cute skirt and even with her face.
I introduced about myself to her:
For example, your two eyes are lovely like chips A8 in Iphone.
Someday, if I remove the chips and gently clean with a piece of rough paper and re-clean them with a smooth towel after that, they will get highlighted.
Two lips are as same as two RAMs 8G, in general your face looks like a mobile CPU...
The teeth are as white as my keyboard.
She immediately reply me: "I think you confuse something and you get occupational disease seriously".
I beated the table and said: "It's impossible to say that I get occupational disease.
I am very patient in my job and hard work for my career.
I came back my company after that.
Today is chinese new year's day.
I went to a temple to make a fortune tell.
The fortune teller said I am going to have a good love in new year.
I think fortune_telling is not a thing to believe, all its effect is to make people feel a little happier.
I am pleased to address Admission Committee to submit my candidacy for Master in Project Management, 
My name is Alejandro, with residency in Albacete.
since my grandfather, to my parents and uncles that manage energetic, farming and engineering companies.
Since I was young I have cooperated with the family business.
I have participated more actively.
alternating these activities with my degree.
Since 2016 I am working at wind energy service company, in a commissioning department, this job has allowed me travel for different countries and to work together with people of multiple nationalities.
introduction
In addition, I carried out a complementary formation with an Introduction to Big Data course, and a Workshop of Leadership and Team Management.
Hi friends, I promised and show this dress to you for a tea party.
Hi friends, I promised and show this dress to you for a tea party.
I made the dress using a kimono and will wear it until Spring.
I think a garment with kimono fabric make a woman look older, because its print is very classic.
BUT I like classic print!
When I make a garment using a kimono, and I try to choose youthful and modern designed pattern.
Hi friends, I promised and show this dress to you for a tea party.
I think a garment with kimono fabric make a woman look older, because its print is very classic.
BUT I like classic print!
When I make a garment using a kimono, and I try to choose youthful and modern designed pattern.
My main objective studying the Master in Project Management.
is being able to develop my skills and knowledge in the field which I would like dedicate my professional life.
I have requested the Master in Business School is due to personal recommendation from ex-student. as well as for the good position of EAE in the different ranking. and recently for the very good telephonic interview.
where I could know better the methodology used in the Master and also, the different departments and activities available in the school.
Me on weekdays feel like 24 hours a day is not enough at all!
Me on weekends feel boring.
I once heard a saying goes "writing poems is the manliest way to cry".
I heard the melody I always use to wake up, from other people's phones and it startled me.
What does it mean: "freaking out"?
These priceless moments, when you sit with a book, leaf through its pages, absorb new knowledge, whether it's vocabulary, grammar.
For this I love languages.
And saraly is low.
My son complains of his elementary school every day because he and his classmates are forced to prepare for their graduation ceremony in the middle of March.
In Japan, in such a ceremony of school, students must yell their words simultaneously as performance in front of lots of guests, teachers and their parents.
In order not to make a mistake, students are forced to practice yelling their words together for an hour every day.
When I was a student, I hated such a practice and ceremony.
Surprisingly, some students used to begin crying many times when we were practicing the graduation ceremony.
I was not able to understand for what they were crying.
Did they deserve to cry for?
Maybe there are such sensitive children, who stand on the contrary to me.
It was my first time to go there.
I had ridden some attractions like that, but the attractions in FUJI-Q are the most screaming, I think.
I want to go there sometime soon!
In the coming season, it will be warmer for each rain
Today is a graduation ceremony of daughter's high school.
Her high school life was enriched.
She also experienced student council.
She passed an applying university.
Thank you very much for everyone.
I'd like to support her future.
It swept the rain clouds with loud sound.
My body had been getting stiff for a long time because it was cold, but I am released it.
I think that it will restart in this evening.
K without coat because today's temperature is 13 degrees.
The strong of the winds become spice of my life.
I would like to decide a lot of things.
My body had been getting stiff for a long time because it was cold, but I am released it.
My body had been getting stiff for a long time because it was cold, but I am released it.
The strong of the winds become spice of my life.
I want to run to the best of my ability with leaving myself to the wind.
It swept the rain clouds with loud sound.
K without coat because today's temperature is 13 degrees.
I would like to decide a lot of things.
I want to run to the best of my ability with leaving myself to the wind.
I think many second-hand kimono stores in siteseeing spots in Japan, but their kimonos are very expensive.
When I make my garment with kimono fabric, I usually take a part and wash it myself before cutting parts.
The step I'm on means the situation I have, and the upper steps mean the future situation I'm supposed to.
If I only look upper steps, I'll stumble over the steps I'm on.
If I only look the steps I'm on, it takes a lot of time to go up.
Watch Your Steps
The step I'm on means the situation I have, and the upper steps mean the future situation I'm supposed to.
If I only look the steps I'm on, it takes a lot of time to go up.
I have to look over the whole stairs to go up.
A state-run casino will being built by 2025.
It's because the number of foreign tourists has already increased without the casino.
If those who want to play games at a casion, they would go other countries.
The government will set a limitation on visits of casino, but they need to do more research and take measures to protect our lives.
The place hasn't been decided yet, but the candidate places are located in reclaimed areas and the casinos will be included in a huge amusument complex.
I think tourist's purpose of viting Japan is that they want to experience our culture or appreciating beautiful scenery.
The project management is an area for which I have always been interested.
therefore, I have a very good predisposition to learn in this area.
and, I will try contribute at the class with my experiences lived until this moment.
Therefore, I request be accept at Master in Project Management in a 2018-2019 academic year.
If everything happens for a reason,why do we have often a windy day in spring?
I wonder if the wind brings to us happiness.
Today my customer in Indonesia asked me to send him as many as brochures.
And I replied him an email that we can provide the brochures for free, but the freight fee they need to take care.
And he replied me very quickly, he told me he wanted in total about 40 brochures.
Glad for the progress.
hope for more improvement.
His course is not decided because the result of his university entrance exam will be released on March 10th.
My wife and I attended my son's high school graduation ceremony today.
It feels like he just entered high school yesterday.
Time flies.
His course is not decided because the result of his university entrance exam will be released on March 10th.
His course is not decided because the result of his university entrance exam will be released on March 10th.
The upper part of my throat have felt soar.
The trick to cure sooner is to keep my mouth shut.
The upper part of my throat have felt soar.
The trick to cure sooner is to keep my mouth shut.
Can I say "Who kept the water running?" instead of saying "Who left the water running?"?
I'm so happy today, because the sumo wrestler whom I like became coach of sumo.
In the 1980s, Oklahoma, where oil was extracted at a rate of 140 million cubic feet per day, was the biggest Gas well he drilled, and it cost him $ 4.5 million.
In the warranty period, buyer pays the freight charge for sending the broken units to seller.
And seller pays the freight charge for sending back the recovered units to buyer.
I wasn't be able to see the bottom part of the pole since I was riding on the Hover-board 
and was concentrating to push the button for the pedestrian signal to get cross the road.
I checked the metal cable right away after I took it out from my foot if it has a rust.
Fortunately that cable was not rusty but I have been worried about getting infection and tetanus from the metal.
So I phoned to the Medical center if I could see a doctor today.
It was selected main characters of 2020 Tokyo Olympic Games yesterday.
They are very cute and designed by patterns from modern and traditional mixed.
I am looking forward to the olympic games so much here. But I am worried about it at the same time. Because it will be held in very hot summer.
We should prepare no one will be damaged by very hot temperatures and high humidity.
A teacher tried to know about her new 3rd year students when the new school year started.
I miss myself when I was more brave enough to make pretty big life decisions without hesitating too much.
2 and a half years ago, I quit my job in Korea without thinking much about the consequences and just got a ticket to London to live there for 2 years.
All I had was a flight ticket and a visa as well as a flat to stay for 2 weeks that I booked on airbnb when I left to London.
I could do that only because I had faith in myself that I could do anything.
I got a job only after a week since I'd arrived in London and made friends so quickly.
It was not easy to survive in a foreign country without knowing anyone from my previous life in Korea, but I'm still proud of myself that I did that to have a such cool experience while I was still young.
Now, it's only been 2 and a half years since I came back to Korea and I will turn 30 in 2 years and I feel so scared about everything that's happening around me....
I know that I have to do something about it and move to a new company that's more stable, but I'm just scared to leave my old company where I have all my colleagues that I love to work with.
I miss myself when I was more gutsy with the thought that I was the best.
I've lost my necklace from my mom few weeks so I've been depressed.
But I didn't know where I put my necklace..
be positive!!"After that I asked who was woman she said "oh there it is.
Is it right?" What a suprised.
Think positive is very important!
My daughter was carried ambulance!
This story is yesterday.
I taked my phone call from my wife.
She said to me, "Our daughter was carrid ambulance!"
I got panic for too suddenly.
I said her, "What does she happened?"
She said me "She happen to heat convulsion,but The Doctor said to me that she is all right now."
Becaouse, my mother just died in early Februray.
A moment, my family decrease one more person.
The day is really terrible one day.
In every language, must be found a problem that confuses the learner.
With a few words that have the same meaning, making the Japanese language learners confused in choosing and using a word.
Moreover, the number of synonyms in Japanese has not been much explanation of when and under what circumstances such words are used.
Whether included in a variety of formal or non-formal languages, written or spoken language, there is not much or almost no detailed explanation of it.
In the Japanese-Indonesian dictionaries were just simply written the meaning of the words without knowing the words synonyms are used in what context.
Based on this, researcher are interested to discuss and explore more about the word synonymous in Japanese that is isogu, aseru, and awateru, which in the Indonesian language has the same meaning of 'terburu-buru', in research entitled "The Meaning Analysis of Isogu, Aseru, and Awateru Verbs as Synonym ".
The three synonyms are often encountered when watching anime, drama, or when listening to Japanese song, plus in dictionaries there has been no detailed explanation of these three verbs.
With these considerations, the researcher focused on finding similarities, differences, and possible substitutions of all three words in a sentence.
The method used in this research is descriptive analysis method.
Data obtained from reliable sources of books, novels, dictionaries, and also the internet.
As a result, the isogu, aseru, and awateru verbs have the same meaning in Indonesian as 'terburu-buru', but there are other meanings found.
This happens because of the consideration of the nuances of sentence when translating into Indonesian.
For the situation it can be seen that the isogu verb is used when in a state of calm and can think with a cold head, while aseru and awateru used in the opposite situation.
When I was on my way to come home, I found out 1000-yen note at the edge of my side path.
I wavered on whether I got it or bring the police station.
Because it was raining and the police station was away from here, I brought it home for the time being.
And I judged I might use it by myself.
That's because police cannot find the person who drop this small amount.
When I was on my way to come home, I found out 1000-yen note at the edge of my side path.
Because it was raining and the police station was away from here, I brought it home for the time being.
And I judged I might use it by myself.
That's because police cannot find the person who drop this small amount.
When I was on my way to come home, I found out 1000-yen note at the edge of my side path.
I wavered on whether I got it or bring the police station.
Because it was raining and the police station was away from here, I brought it home for the time being.
After coming home, I googled this problem. And I judged I might use it by myself.
That's because police cannot find the person who drop this small amount.
So I will go to bed around 10 o'clock.
Yesterday, I went to bed at 10, but I wake up in the middle of the night.
I am lacking sleep last night due to heavy rain.
I usually study or read a book around 9:00.
I am lacking sleep last night due to heavy rain.
This morning was rain today.
I always commuting to use train everyday. and always the train is delayed.
I can't think of a theme of writing today, and so I'm going to write a short story summary.
The title is "Mysterious Robot" written by Shinichi HOSHI.
The story goes like this.
He is getting curious much more.
I can't think of a theme of writing today, and so I'm going to write a short story summary.
According our last telephone conversation I attach a painting work budget.
The budget will be in force until a month as a deadline.
I must have mistaken something, because when I arrived at the party, everybody was wearing black suits, while I was in striking blue.
Indeed, I could see the dead in the coffin, acompannied by some of my acquaintances.
Without showing any sign of deference, I asked the attendees for explainations, but they just responded with a sad silence.
My frustration was growing as the people kept observing me in hush.
Then I made her dance with me, holding her waist with my arms.
After some steps, he could get away from me, so I tried to grab another woman, but this one pushed me aside.
"You are not understanding," she said.
I tried to invite more people to dance, but nobody wanted.
People continued beholding the scene, but didn't do nor say anything.
The panic made me jump, but two men held me.
Meanwhile, the two men who were holding me were driving me somewhere.
Then, the woman of before came.
Now, please, be quiet and don't dance over your own grave."
But I have a few very closed friends.
Of course, I have many acquaintances.
I know a lot of people from work.
On my thought, it,s all right to change to associate with friends.
For example, I was into running while a time and I have frequently met the friends of the running team.
Although we are different as for age and job, I was excited about meeting up them because of same hobby.
But even though closed friends go to other way, I want to meet up them sometimes.
In this morning,weather in Chiba was terrible.
It was heavy rain and thunder.
My son's school had to Shift to start after 2 hours.
They were happy to had free time.
The train operated as usual.
I was gonna have a sleepover at his place.
We were supposed to work on a presentation together, I found flashcards on his bed.
I took a look at them and put them back onto his bad.
I have been hay fever today, so I'm painful.
I have itchy nose and nose running, so I'm fed up it.
I drank medicine a while ago, but it still don't working.
I wait it work, so I'll endure.
I am pleased to address Admission Committee to submit my candidacy for Master in Project Management, 
My name is Alejandro, with residency in Albacete.
I come from a large family with a family business background, since my grandfather, to my parents and uncles that manage energetic, farming and engineering companies.
I am licentiate in Electrical Engineering Degree by University of Castilla-La Mancha.
In addition, I carried out a complementary formation with an Introduction to Big Data course, and a Workshop of Leadership and Team Management.
Since I was young I have cooperated with the family business, but since that I started my university studies I have participated more actively, both in the engineering company with my father as in photovoltaic company of the family, alternating these activities with my degree.
I can highlight that in 2013 alongside my brother I implemented a brewery company.
Since 2016 I am working at wind energy service company, in a commissioning department, this job has allowed me travel for different countries and to work together with people of multiple nationalities.
My main objective studying the Master in Project Management is being able to develop my skills and knowledge in the field which I would like dedicate my professional life.
I have requested the Master in Business School is due to personal recommendation from ex-student, as well as for the good position of EAE in the different ranking, and recently for the very good telephonic interview, where I could know better the methodology used in the Master and also, the different departments and activities available in the school.
The project management is an area for which I have always been interested, and it was one of the areas that I miss in my degree; therefore, I have a very good predisposition to learn in this area and, I will try contribute at the class with my experiences lived until this moment.
Therefore, I request be accept at Master in Project Management in a 2018-2019 academic year.
There are many different reasons that which country would you like to visit.
I think I would like to visit Itlay if I have the opportunity to visit a foreign country because I would like to watch football and eat Food.
To begin with, It is totally different from culture between Asian and Europe.
Especially, I'm very interested in Italy.
In Italy, there is one of the most famous football leagues in the world.
Therefore, I would love to watch a Football game in Itlay.
I can watch a football game of first class in Itlay.
As a result, I would like to get a firsthand experience in terms of the football.
It is valuable for me to watch football in Italy.
Second, I would like to try to eat European food, in particular, Italian food because I think Italian food is the best food in Europe.
For instance, when I lived in Ireland, I usually ate out an Italian restaurant with my friend.
There were are a lot of Italian restaurants despite Ireland.
Also, Pizza or pasta are familiar to popular food worldwide.
My 4 year-old son says some things like this when he gets in a bad mood: 
I joined to eat dinner with my office's workers.
I enjoyed to have lunch with my senior and younger in my office.
At first it tasted good and I chewed some time it turned strange.
It was completely different compared to Japanese one.
However I ended up eating all the pack.
I had it untill when I got on a train to go back home, but I I realized I lost it after I got off the train.
I left it on the seat I was sittng.
How stupid I was.
I also lost my commuter pass because I put it in a cover of the cell phone.
They told me that they have my cell phone at the station that is one stap after the station that I got off.
I went to the station to pick it up before I head for my workplace.
I asked a station staff that I was told to come here to pic my cell phone up, and showed my identification to prove that I'm appropriate for getting it back.
However, I noticed something is missing.
My commuter pass was not with it.
It was supposed to be in the cover, but there was nothing to be found.
I asked the staff "Didn't you see my commuter pass?
it's supposed to be in a pocket of the cover." He said it has nothing in it.
It's good at least to get back my phone, but kind of sad that my pass was taken away.
If I encounter the same situation as I did, I wouldn't defenetly take anyting away.
I joined muscle training class at morning.
I have a baby on the way that means my wife is an older mom.
Because this is her first-time birth, well-know they easily carry with high risks of hypertension and diabetes.
last time we had Ultrasound.
Even the fetus is normal, but the doctor still asked for the blood test for the Down Syndrome.
Tomorrow it is going to take blood.
only 10 weeks We already knew it will be a boy.
what is the term of natural birth?vaginal delivery and cesarean delivery are correct and natural saying?
I google it that says cesarean section.
It is heavy rain today.
So my daughter will spend time with my wife until going to school.
I'm a member of fitness club.
I'm a member of dance studio.
I almost go to a fitness club during lunch break.
I'm practicing on a voluntary dance or capoeira in a vacant studio.
Only 30min, but It is an important time for me.
When the work is over, I go to fitness club again.
I'm in the fitness club lounge, I'm doing data entry work until dance lesson.
When time comes, I will go to dance studio.
One of my regular Skype English teachers broke up her boyfriend about two weeks ago.
Since she was shocked very much, she had no appetite.
She looked recover from her shock.
She showed me her waist and said, "I lost my weight about 3kg for one week, and I got a smaller waist.
I make an effort keeping it."
Edward Hopper is one of my favourite artist.
He is called like "the dreamer without illusion" and "the poet of empty spaces".
Hopper created his pictures when in the world of art were very popular avangard styles, but he didn't influenced by them, therefore critics and viewers considered his works as old-fashioned in that period.
Inspite of this fact, time put everyting on its place and now Edward Hopper is one of the famous artist who recognizable by his original style.
Edward Hopper was inspired by New York and also provience cities.
People on the pictures by Edward Hopper looks like them are deprived of individuality, therefore they look like a typical townspeople in the crowd.
My favourite Hopper's picture is "New York Movie".
I really impressed by its melanholy atmospher, colors and lighting.
There are Nature Aquariums that made by Mr.
Amano at the end of life, it was keeping up by ADA staffs and amuse visitors.
Also, You might be healed by seeing skinship of penguins greeting a season of love.
Summarise the information by selecting and reporting the main features, and make comparisons where relevant.
This line grahp shows the amount of foreign tourist visits in five countrys for four separated periods of time.
Brazil, Malasya, and Egypt showed the same trend across the time.
Malasya and Egypt began with around ten millions visitors in 1995 and end up with approximately twice the amount of arrivals in 2010.
Likewise, Brazil doubled its international arrivals amount, beginning with roughly 20 million foreign visitors by 1995 and finishing with close to 50 million visitors 2010.
Even though The United States had an increasing tendency until 2005, afterwards it got more stable and experienced a slight downfall in 2010, so they did not continue leading the group.
Brazil, Malasya, and Egypt showed the same trend across the time.
Even though The United States had an increasing tendency until 2005, afterwards it got more stable and experienced a slight downfall in 2010, so they did not continue leading the group.
We could see so many mini igloos lighted up by candles or electric bulbs in the evening.
It was fascinating and I tried to take a picture to leave what we saw, but I couldn't do well because it was too dark for my camera.
When we arrived at the hotels, Futons were already prepared.
It was a first time to sleep with my foreign colleagues.
So, I wasn't able to drop asleep early even I was tired due to long day.
Some people believe that women should be allow entering different institutions like the navy, the air force, and the army exactly like men do.
Through the course of history women have gained their role and have showed there was a misconception about them.
In the most male chauvinistic years society thought women were less important than men.
This idea was widely spread and the only way for women to shoot down this notion was to claim their rights and demonstrate their abilities.
Moreover women and should be given the same opportunities in all fields.
However, there is another misconception: men and women are equal.
It should be clear for us all that we are different; in fact, there are several scientific evidences on the differences between men and women.
Men are stronger than women because their skeleton is heavier, it gives them a higher capacity to do harder jobs like those having to do with carrying burdens, for example.
In conclusion, women and men should be equally treated, they should have the same chances in order to demonstrate whether they are able to perform certain task or not.
In the most male chauvinistic years society thought women were less important than men.
It should be clear for us all that we are different; in fact, there are several scientific evidences on the differences between men and women.
Men are stronger than women because their skeleton is heavier, it gives them a higher capacity to do harder jobs like those having to do with carrying burdens, for example.
"Why not inquire about characters of the drama...
However, after two or three weeks, due to some unfortunate circumstances involving a teared book, a broken nose and an angry noble, I had to stop going to school.
After that, the only thing left in my everyday was me helping my mother in Elina's mansion.
One day, Elina had to travel to a far away castle to meet an equally famous noble, -from what I had heard at least-.
And as any child, my curiosity kicked in and I started checking every corner of the building I was dwelling at.
accidentally ended up in her room and discovered the huge amount of shelves and thousands of books she had.
A blue tome spread open over her bedsheets.
I felt strangely attracted towards it and, as any adventurer, darted towards it to satisfy my curiosity.
I flipped one, five, ten pages, stunned, before hearing the doorknob turning and jumping beneath the bed.
I then heard a few light steps, completely different from my mother's heavy ones.
I have a desire to build my body as a man.
I take a protein after training for making effect even foe just a bit.
According the package of the protein, This recommend to drink after morning and before sleep.
But There are not big change, my wife often said 'you should stop to drink'
I take a protein after training for making effect even foe just a bit.
According the package of the protein, This recommend to drink after morning and before sleep.
So I often drink it.
If I could, I would be more than happy to do it; however I want to make it clear that it is of you that care the most 
For your virtue and value, and also because I am respectfully inclined toward you.
Command me and I`ll do everything in my power to serve you as befits.
I had the impression -forgive my bluntness- that was you to having got the better of her.
Few hours have passed since I`ve met you for the first time.
Something new is suddenly happened?
But, countess, if this house ruins, you and your husband lives won`t benefit from such a catastrophic event!
My lady, have you heard yourself her saying such a thing?
But, chances are that who reported this to you, did it mistakenly or with the hope of having something in return.
Don`t doubt about my silence on this thing.
I act as a phycologist to my friends.
The refrigerator is acting up.
I usually ask my friends from university around my house to see a movie and eat pizzas.
His 40 years of work amount to high retirement class.
I have to make sure that my money can attent to today's dinner at this expensive restaurant.
What do these expences add up to?
Don't answer back to me.
When a country bankrupts, it appeals for help from th IMF.
I am going to ask that girl out for a movie.
I went to Japan Chinchilla Festival.
The venue crowded with lecture programs by breeders and doctors, and display of various hair color chinchilla.
Especially, The last stage like a fashion show was booming.
I woke up this morning with sound of wind outside.
Actually a weather forecast said that it will get warmer this weekend.
Spring will soon be here.
Since I hate the coldness, I feel happy about that spring comes.
So, I will spend a day of weekend with my daughter.
Recently, she has gotten into playing in the park near my house.
She really likes riding on the swing there.
When she rides it, she never want to leave there.
I have no idea about why it is called so.
Since I hate the coldness, I feel happy about that spring comes.
So, I will spend a day of weekend with my daughter.
I'll take here out for a walk.
She really likes riding on the swing there.
When she rides it, she never want to leave there.
I woke up this morning with sound of wind outside.
First, I would like to thank you for your interest on my request and for the suggestions that you are sending to me, and I apologize for the delay in replying to you, because I was travelling.
First, I would like to thank you for your interest on my request and for the suggestions that you are sending to me, and I apologize for the delay in replying to you, because I was travelling.
I was listening music of this band and I feel some sad because the singer already has died.
Reading the comments I can see that not only me, I felt that feeling about his music.
I have been knowing her since 2003, she was my host family's grand mother when I was in New Zealand so I call her granny too.
She has 2 daughters and 1 son, 6 grandchildren and 9 great grandchildren, everybody loves her a lot.
I didn't grow up with my grandparents so I stay in touch as if she is my real grand mother.
She is a great baker, I had had a baking lessen from her 2 years ago, that was amazing experience.
I expect that she had a tough life, such as war and she lost her husband in early stage.
Effect of Yogurt
One of the my friends seems to make yogurt by herself everyday.
Yes, I agree with her because firmamented foods are good for our health.
I heard We stated to eat yogurt after the Second World War in Japan.
I also heard Most of Japanese people are lactose intolerant.
In my opinion, many students travel the entire class to many places.
In these trips they can learn something new.
Personally, I think that the most popular trip is visiting museums and art galleries.
In the sightseeing tour students can learn the history of their city or get acquainted with another culture.
These types of travel will broaden the horizons of students.
Also, students can spend a weekend camping trip in the mountains.
This will teach them how to work in a team, and also be dexterous.
This type of trip will help students make changes in their everyday lives.
These types of trips, students can relax and develop their physical form.
To conclude, I believe that all of the types of students' trips have a positive impact on them.
They're digging the ground again trying to find where you hid the stolen diamond.
I understood that I need some communication more than just correcting of my texts.
I'll be glad to receive comments, messages and even suggestions about Skype conversation from native-speaker.
It's funny to read my old posts, cause I really dont remember what I wrote.
Sometimes I laught, sometimes I don't understand what I meant.
But in generall it's good that I have some posts, cause I dont have any another diary.
One more thing I wanted to say.
My little niece has had temperature for two days.
She was a little bit nervous so I held her in my arms for a while, and she became quieter and calmer.
I hope that she get well soon so we can play together again.
Today I went around her and I noticed that she wasn't so lively as last week.
She was a little bit nervous so I held her in my arms for a while, and she became quieter and calmer.
I hope that she get well soon so we can play together again.
Today I went around her and I noticed that she wasn't so lively as last week.
I don't like many-coloured clothes.
Black is my favourite color.
I wear black shoes, black socks, black pants, black shirt, black jacket.
I don't wear a tie and a hat.
Bruce lee
I meet again with my friends 
My friend has call me and told me he want to cook something at him home.
I arrived him home and we went to food shop.
It took a two hours but we could make an delicious curry.
I would like to know what is the Subject in the first sentence of this song.
The temperature has risen recently, and it's changing from snow to rain.
Snow melting has began to proceed rapidly.
The day continues on watching falling snow from the roof.
The movement for spring has begun.
Today, I'd like to talk about my experience that I was really impressed.
I'm going to school in England, and I take a bus to get school.
It was the first day to take a bus in England.
I didn't know the price of fare and in addition, there were problems that I was familiar with neither the currency nor listening to English.
When I got ride on the bus, the driver told me the price too quickly for me to catch what he said.
So I asked him to say again and again, consequently I almost understood how much I should pay.
I got upset because some passengers were behind me and waiting for.
I looked up my wallet.
I understood it means that I can use credit card!
I thought it must take long time to find the coins out of my wallet and paying by card is more easier, so I pulled the card out.
But it didn't work, because the reader was only for contactless card and my credit card didn't have the function.
I got upset more and more.
I realized what I have the only way to pay is by cash.
I looked up my wallet again.
But he refused it because the paper money was so old and it couldn't use as money anymore.
I was quite upset and pulled put another paper money, but it was also the same, too old.
I felt loose completely, went blank.
They helped me, a poor lady without any kickbacks.
How kind they are!
What is the vacation of dream in my life?
Oh, honestly, this is not easy question.
I would like to be in different places.
Although wait, I know where I would be go now, in February.
Certainly, I speak about Lake Baikal.
Firstly, why I began to think about Lake Baykal after your question?
It reminded me one of the episodes from book, which you recommended me for reading.
The hero that book is man.
Once he had reminisced about one day in childhood.
And writer was describing the nature with warm feelings and it was so pathetically and impress for me.
I liked to read it in English.
This view is unmatched beauty, I believe.
And it full wild animals.
For example, the nerpas, who lives there.
What is the nice picture when they are basking in the warm sun on rocks protruding above the water.
I would love to see them too much.
Also it would be interesting for me to travel by train around Lake Baikal.
I heard, the shore of lake is filled abandoned tunnels, stone galleries and bridges.
I guess it is picturesque scenery.
It would be big mistake to miss it.
Finally, I want to see the ice on to the surface of lake.
I saw a lot of photos different types of ice, and it would be cool to see it.
That is why I said about trip in February.
Obviously, is the best time to seeing the heaps of ice splinters on to the surface.
Lake Baikal is truly interesting, is not it?
Her work is making music, singing.
And high income women living in southern district and middle district.
Liu Tainiang has no talent, the music is not good, the song is not too good to hear, so there are not many people know her name.
She's just young and looks a bit more beautiful than ordinary people.
There were a lot of people in the day, and Liu Tainiang was dressed up very beautifully, so someone kept asking where she lived.
Liu Tainiang is very distressed, do not want to tell she lives in North district, but kept her head down.
Later, many people asked, she said there is a tall tree in front of her home.
Some days past, people are looking for the inconspicuous tree.
Before this, no one care the tree.
I already don't want to remember bad experience about it and learning because I want to do.
Eeveryday, I listeng to the English music on the television.
My favorite channel in this case it is Hard rock channel, although I try to changen the music that I love, I cann't don't it.
I listen this music since I was eleven years old and I love its sound.
I feel passion when I'm listening the electric guitar and along with the lyrics of its music.
When I was a single, i had a date with an American guy.
He asked me " What are you craving for?
' I understand that now, however I didn't get what he ask about at that time.
I answered like " You?" I meant " What are YOU craving for?
" I should have asked him with full sentence, but I sometimes use my stupid trick like when I didn't understand something I asked or repeated the same question and worked out what was it or what did it mean.
However it was my big mistake.
He asked me "What are you craving for?" I said " You?" Can you imagine this situation.
He was like " WHAT!!!???" We went to Ice cram shop after that and I found his way to have ice cram was not sexy.
It was melting ice cream were dropping on his hand and he wiped it on his jeans constantly.
When I was a single, i had a date with an American guy.
' I understand that now, however I didn't get what he ask about at that time.
" I should have asked him with full sentence, but I sometimes use my stupid trick like when I didn't understand something I asked or repeated the same question and worked out what was it or what did it mean.
He was like " WHAT!!!???" We went to Ice cram shop after that and I found his way to have ice cram was not sexy.
It is how one reacts under difficulties that shows who he really is.
Does it need a subject between 'that' and 'shows'?
And it takes some good--it takes some long time to get here from the beach.
This is a practice Chinese-English translation.
Fracking, the energy miracle in the US for drilling for shale oil, however is facing difficulties or even banned at other places across the globe.
A report form the Guardian has explained the controversies of fracking.
it is implemented through injecting a great amount of water mixed with a bit of sand and chemical materials into a well at high pressure, to crash rocks and release the gas and oil to the surface of the well.
To see the problem in a larger scale, fracking also influence the climate.
I was impressed by large format nature photography taken by Takashi Amano before his death and Nature Aquariums by amazing aquatic plants layout.
I want to raise my English skill and want to deal with foreigners who come to Japan in English.
When I tried to unlock the front door, I realized that I did not have a key of my house.
They are both working for a local financial institute and they are supposed to retire a couple of years later.
They are very frugal so I guess they would enjoy their life on receiving the pension from the goverment.
They nag me to get married or want to see grand child sooner from time to time.
I am in trouble but my age is appropriate to have family in Japan.
They both have hardly been oversea in their life.
As for my mom, her occasion was Hawai at honeymoon.
To go to foreign country especially Asia is supposed to be dangerous in their thought.
Because of that, they were clearly against my decision of working abroad in South Ease Asia a couple of years ago.
One of the good things to me was that they finally started to use mobile phone from feature phone.
So our communication is pretty easier than before.
When it comes to my mom, she is using it very well.
I am going to indonesia tomorrow for 2 weeks.
This my second time go to there.
But my first time go to there is while my 1 or 2 year old.
Hope I am safe and come back my home.
Conversation with mam over the Skype.
"I heard it will very windy tomorrow."
"Yeah, it will blow hard during morning commuting time."
Conversation with mam over the Skype.
Conversation with mam over the Skype.
"Yeah, it will blow hard during morning commuting time."
Conversation with mam over the Skype.
There was warm wind today.
It was like a macaron.
I like it.
What I would do or like to do if I became a designer
Well, I'm not a fashion designer yet but being a fashion designer is my final destination.
I mean, I would have anime characters wear my designed clothes in the anime and sell the same designed clothes in real.
Everyone says fashion industries in Japan are decreasing and it's getting harder to sell luxurious clothes.
I don't want to design clothes kind of like appeared in Paris Collection because that's different from my concept.
I personally think those kinds of clothes are for certain people by geniuses.
When it comes to designs, I want to incorporate kimono style to casual clothes, dress as well as suits.
It was really inspiring.
They have the celebrities in America wear their clothes as models.
Actual kimono is pretty difficult to put on and move around but they put more value on them feeling comfortable.
Don't you think kimono designs are very reflective to Japanese tradition or beauty.
There are some things I've been thinking.
It was really inspiring.
Well, I'm not a fashion designer yet but being a fashion designer is my final destination.
I mean, I would have anime characters wear my designed clothes in the anime and sell the same designed clothes in real.
Japan's anime has become popular internationally, so I believe they will be great advertising.
I wish to design clothes that make people who aren't really intersted in clothes excited.
When it comes to designs, I want to incorporate kimono style to casual clothes, dress as well as suits.
Actual kimono is pretty difficult to put on and move around but they put more value on them feeling comfortable.
Don't you think kimono designs are very reflective to Japanese tradition or beauty.
I assume that the origin of Tonkatsu is Schnitzel.
They could had been introduced to Japan many decades ago and then we recreated in our style.
Are Three Years Short?
Most of their jobs including interns are limited in three years.
It is short but might be a good way as a trial.
For example, most foreign English teachers in public schools are from JET program or temp agencies.
It is short but might be a good way as a trial.
However, if foreign people want to work longer, what should we provide them?
Local government should hire them directly and offer stable post and salary so that they can teach students constantly with a long-term strategy.
Are Three Years Short?
I wonder how foreign people working in Japan think about their three years.
Most of their jobs including interns are limited in three years.
Some foreign people will become homesick, while others will dislike Japan.
They may endure only three years or go back to their home countries.
However, if foreign people want to work longer, what should we provide them?
Local government should hire them directly and offer stable post and salary so that they can teach students constantly with a long-term strategy.
I mean foreign language teachers should become government employees as well as Japanese teachers.
I lost my earring today.
I don't have many earrings so it was very sad for me.
I lost my earring today.
My brother asked me about a plan of spring break.
My job was piled in front of me.
We have two big events.
One is the graduation celemony and the other is the entrance school celemony.
These two events are the most important.
My brother only wants to do a lot to be devoted to my mom.
Of course so do I too.
I will have the result, if I pass it or not, in about 2 weeks.
I guess I did it pretty well, but I am not sure whether I pass it or not.
I do not want to study for the exam more 1 year.
I had a entrance exam for a university few days ago.
I have been studying hard to pass the exam.
I will have the result, if I pass it or not, in about 2 weeks.
I guess I did it pretty well, but I am not sure whether I pass it or not.
I really hope I will get a good news!
I do not want to study for the exam more 1 year.
Review on "La cara oculta"
I'd been waiting for something chilling and thrilling more or less but the first scene I saw was devoted to their daily life.
I mean, the life between two people, which are madly in love with each other.
I thought: "OMG, C'mon, this is the first Spanish movie I'm watching, where are my expectations that I've been willing to see?".
But a little later I was absolutely ready to eat my words back!
I mean, you don't understand where the romantic line turns into something really chilly and macabre.
I'd never seen that star-studded cast before but I liked the choice the director cast different actors in the role of.
Nowadays, the film keeps going to be under glowing reviews that makes it much more popular.
Neither of other movies is able to show the same thing and the same idea in their chain of events.
I'd been always keen on America Movie Industry, but I even couldn't suppose that the Spanish could create one of the best atmosphere for detective movies.
Although it was cloudy in Nagoya, The daytime was warm.
That is the reason that the center of a low pressure area passed through Japan today, and warm wet air from Pacific Ocean blew into the center of it.
The broadcast says that it will be rain tonight.
Ume blossoms in Japanese, Japanese apricot blossoms, are in full bloom with red color.
Some white ume blossoms have started to bloom.
Ume is thought one of good fortune trees in Japan, that are pine trees, bamboos and ume.
The story came to Japan from China that they endure a severe winter and they invite the good fortune to us.
Ume trees bring us beautiful pretty blossoms, and their fruits that are made into pickled umes, ume sake etc.
Ume fruits are very useful to us.
We could offer more TV programs, like fun-filled cartoon, to introduce young people to sciences.
These programs already exist but most are available on pay channels and are therefore not available to everyone.
In addition, to make sciences classes more fun, teachers could organize trips to interactive museums, where it's forbidden to don't touch.
They will discover, in a fun interactive and educational way: exhibitions, workshops, experiences and animations.
Finally, it's very important to confront students to the reality of the world of work.
They will discover the sciences, not on a chair to listen to their teacher, but by participating in real projects with professionals.
I have hey fever.
On the way to my home, I bought eye medecine.
The thunder broke out at 10 p.m. yesterday.
The air is damp.
She has been listening this song on a loop for a few hours.
According to the weather forecast, the big spring storm has been coming up to my district from the southern part of Japan.
It was about half past seven, a lady who is a money collector for newspaper subscription, came to my house.
I felt sorry for her who had no choice to work in the stormy night.
Good afternoon,teacher.
I'm great honoured to be here for this interview.
Now allow me to give a introduction.
I graduated from JS university last year,and major in International trade and economic.
I like anything concerning economic,I also hoped I'll as expected work in this field and make some achievement, but when I finished my school, I realized that what I had learned was not enough for this target.
I thought it would be great if I can continue my interest in that, so that was that I choose to further my study with a master degree.
Considering career prospects, I changed my major, International Trade and Economic to Financial.
And I'm good at math,which great contribute to the study of Financial.
But I know my English is not good enough,I will continue studying.
I'm quick in mind and careful in everything.
I'm looking forward to my postgraduate studies and life in Hunan University.
I'll prove that your decision of choosing me is wise,
From the middle of January, my husband had been really nice to me.
He took me to Akihabara and he asked me if I wanted anything.
He took me to the toy floor of a big electricity store.
Monster Hunter World; going to be released the following day, he wanted it.
According to his explanation, the software is downloadable and he can do it at home, but the consumer machine is really definitely necessary.
The monster game can be played with just PS4.
Anyway he got the PS4 and downloaded the game at the midnight of the day of release.
Because he still does the dishes and laundry before playing game and I can have more time doing my hobby stuff.
This is a kind of a happy life, isn't it?
People should be only allowed to laugh when I say so.
Music can bothe improve your mood and depress???
I wish that I can meet you in my world.
Today I went to my knitting class and started knitting a new vest for me.
Since I started the class, knitting the vest was one of my goals.
I am happy that I could reach it.
I saw lots of advanced knitting projects which were knitted by my classmates.
They all were so perfect, and I sett up my next goal.
I am glad that I can knit among such talented knitters.
They definitely motivate me up!
From today I begin to study English grammar.
However, my skill for the grammar to do a communication couldn't trained very much because studying English were just object to take an exam.
So this time, I restudy the grammar to communicate.
We can wear kimonos in various occasions.
Yukata - a kind of kimono can be worn in only summer night.
I usually wear it in a fireworks festival.
Ise shirine is the most famous and traditional shrine in Japan.
So I am exitting.
The phrase is new for me!
I seldom be late to meet friends, but I sometimes be late to send e-mail.
English people use it as a blue collar, white collar and recently pink collar, don't they?
Of course you use it as shirts.
The pronunciation is alike color.
A man driving car to backside for 11 000 kms in India
From the Pune city of Maharashtra State, Santosh Raje Shirke completed his journey of 6000 kms throughout 11 states of India by driving car to backside.
His next purpose is to keep driving for 5000 kms remain, MSN published yesterday.
He started driving car by this style on June 2017 and used the 180-km-road linking two cities Pune and Raigarh for his practice.
When he got the higher skill and confidence, he controlled car in reversed style using back mirrors as a helpful tool.
My friend has sent me a birthday present.
It is a pretty flower shaped earrings.
Tomorrow is my last day to be 28 years old.
It's my birthday day after tomorrow.
I used to think that becoming this age is too far for me when I was a teenager, but my 20s went by in a flash.
I want to spend my last year of 20s with a happy feeling.
With an overwhelming progress of technology, our life is in changing in majority of things, technology makes the whole world to become closer to each others than before,and it spreads different cultures across the world so I'm not with who says that modern technology is creating single world culture due to different reasons that I will mention them in the following essay.
Firstly, technology enhances the communication among people from different places by smart phones, computers and the discovery of the Internet.
So, someone from the middle east can communicate with another one in the united state, they can recognize different habits, languages, ways of wearing and a lot of things.
For example, I have a friendship with a girl from South America which is a very cool girl, and while talking with her, I took and learned many things that I didn't have before, like her way of wearing sport and official clothes.
In addition to that, I become good of speaking English, because I was bad and afraid to practice the language.
Also, I learned new American food and She wanted to try our food counrty so, I gave her different Jordanian food recipes, and till now, she cooks and eat Jordanian food and tell the others to try it because of their delicious taste.
Secondly, with airplanes, You can travel to any place you want, discover new cultures and ways of living, you can give and receive in the same time; for example, my sister traveled to the US and studied in one of their universities.
In the same time, she worked as a teaching assistant, also she became a member of Islamic center in their state, and she participated in many events that specialized for international residents to tell the others about her country's traditions, heritage, the famous places available in it, etc.
So, this is a strong point to ensure that our modern life is a road of spread new experiences and variety of cultures all over the world.
To draw the conclusion, technology enables anyone to discover many communities and exchange different things like languages, traditions, education and others that implement multiculturalism across the world.
I feel I can do it without hesitation if I understand clearly the reason.
I know I should think of it before I started with something in fact, and I may look stupid.
However, I think that it is the best shortcut for me to clarify the purpose when I'm stuck doing something because I can't do eagerly anything without reason.
I know I should think of it before I started with something in fact, and I may look stupid.
I feel I can do it without hesitation if I understand clearly the reason.
In recent years,more and more multinational corporations occupy Chinese Market,in order to satisfy different market environments,Multinational Corporations have brought forth new ideas to their investment strategies constantly, they carry out localization tracits on R&D,H&R,the products with all-out effort.
The atricle will first introduce basic information of Multinational Corporations,definition of localization,also necessity as well as three stages of it.
Actually, I'm going to go on a trip from tomorrow.
This is a spring storm approaching now.
At this time, it is common in Japan.
The spring storm brings the season of flower.
I hope that I can find a small spring in trip destination.
In some countries for leaving, you need to pay the fee of exit from the country.
This rule has applied for Iran too.
It's interesting that recently the government of Iran approved this cost has to become higher for those people who leave Iran for second and third times.
It seems, a person who is traveling to other countries has made a big crime, so needs to penalize!
We are going to retrogression like North Korea.
Today, I went on a business trip to Iwate prefecture to attend a customer's meeting.
We did a good and deep discussion.
Josepha invited me at her GRANDMA's place.
It was stange this atmosphere: the green all around us, this classical music.
I went to a school with my son to confirm if the entrance examination was passed.
My son seemed to be really nouveous since yesterday morning.
When we arrived at the school, my son went to the room to see the result.
He has passed the examination.
We were really happy to see the certification.
I went to a school with my son to confirm if the entrance examination was passed.
My son seemed to be really nouveous since yesterday morning.
Haruichiban is the strong wind in spring in Japanese.
It tells us the beginning of spring.
After we have it, it will be warmer a little by little every day.
Does any other country has the same thing like this?
It is said that we may have Haruichiban the day after tomorrow.
Haruichiban is the first strong wind in spring in Japanese.
After we have it, it will be warmer a little by little every day.
Does any other country has the same thing like this?
When I arrived my office this morning, I noticed that there was not my pedometer in my pocket.
I thought that I forgot it at home.
However, after I got home, I searched for it, but I was not able to find it.
I thought that I forgot it at home.
When I arrived my office this morning, I noticed that there was not my pedometer in my pocket.
I usually put my pedometer in my pants' pocket.
However, after I got home, I searched for it, but I was not able to find it.
They beg for a few coins to buy ice creams and swear at those who refuse to give them money.
Sometimes, they spit on cars, insult the residents or make pranks in the motel.
Bobby, the janitor, knows very well that Scooty and Monee are doing a lot of silly things, but he also understands that they are just poor brats, all by themselves for most of the time.
He sometimes takes them in his office, just for a short moment because the two kids are impossible and quickly get on his nerves.
He always ends by throwing them outside when they become too cheeky and impolite.
Bobby often argues with Halley too, reproaching her for not paying the rent on time, for spending all day in front of the TV and smoking grass rather than taking care of her daughter.
The six-year-old girl hangs around with Scooty, her best friend, who also lives in the motel with his single mother, Ashley, who works in a local pub.
Every day, from the back door of the diner, Ashley furtively slips some waffles to the two kids, and it is almost the only meal they have everyday.
As it is summer vacation, the children spend their time watching the many tourists visiting the leisure park.
They beg for a few coins to buy ice creams and swear at those who refuse to give them money.
Sometimes, they spit on cars, insult the residents or make pranks in the motel.
Bobby, the janitor, knows very well that Scooty and Monee are doing a lot of silly things, but he also understands that they are just poor brats, all by themselves for most of the time.
He sometimes takes them in his office, just for a short moment because the two kids are impossible and quickly get on his nerves.
The six-year-old girl hangs around with Scooty, her best friend, who also lives in the motel with his single mother, Ashley, who works in a local pub.
Every day, from the back door of the diner, Ashley furtively slips some waffles to the two kids, and it is almost the only meal they have everyday.
They beg for a few coins to buy ice creams and swear at those who refuse to give them money.
Bobby, the janitor, knows very well that Scooty and Monee are doing a lot of silly things, but he also understands that they are just poor brats, all by themselves for most of the time.
He sometimes takes them in his office, just for a short moment because the two kids are impossible and quickly get on his nerves.
Bobby often argues with Halley too, reproaching her for not paying the rent on time, for spending all day in front of the TV and smoking grass rather than taking care of her daughter.
The range of theatrical fluctuates from traditional to experimental such as meta-theatre in which the line between a script and an improvisation blurs.
In the black comedy terrible and fearful elements are replaced by comical, and in the romantic comedy - an obvious clever scheming, happy coincidence, wondrous discovery which in the final lead to the fulfillment of all the desires of loving heroes.
I stuied English today
So I saied "hello
She accepted my greetings.
and I back home
I was glad to see my friend after a long time
We took five hours to drive there with our caravan on tow.
After driving 400 kilometers, guess which surprise awaited us!
In the meanwhile, the bursar put at our disposal the furnished apartment reserved for the chief supervisor.
What a nuisance!
However we had to wait for two weeks, before she complies.
I was told that at the town post office she used to allow herself to pass in front of everyone in the queue to be served first at the counter.
Moreover Mrs Gorde had caused a scandal at the end of the previous school year.
Strangely they had killed a hen supposed to represent the dreadful nagging woman and had carried out her burial in a corner of the playground.
The aimed person surprised them, demanded explanations and furiously kicked out twenty students without other formalities, without possibility of appeal.
The headmistress was laid off and transferred to another high school, in Ussel, a nearby town, without having any say in the matter.
Just arrived, on the orders of the Chief Education Officer, I had to reasume the expelled students and receive their parents, in turn, to assure them that no proceedings would be taken against their children.
You can imagine I had many other cases to settle in my 25 year career!
It would be take long to tell you all of them at once.
We purchased a white porcelain service that we still use.
We bought a blue porcelain hen too.
When I look at it, old memories keep coming to my mind.
People sometimes ridicule themselves or are being modest.
People sometimes ridicule themselves or are being modest.
Even If you have said "I am not smart," won't you be hurt when others say "you are not smart."
People sometimes ridicule themselves or are being modest.
Even If you have said "I am not smart," won't you be hurt when others say "you are not smart."
To organize means that listing all I have to do and prioritize them according to my values.
I would want to concentrate on specific things rather than to do everything I want to do because I believe that I can have more fulfilling days.
Its name was Essentialism.
I completely agreed with the ways to think written in that book.
Finally, all I have to do will be chooseing the best one.
But there is numeral before the noun.
My broken leg is well, I can play football again.
Eeg white can help you keep beautiful.
My Favourite YouTuber Visited Tower of London
She lives in London now, and introduces not only her unique life but also talkative Londoners almost every day.
Today, she uploaded a new video describing her funny visit to Tower of London.
At the last scene, an officer wearing the uniform suddenly talked to Kanon in Japanese.
She said she had been in Japan as an assistant English teacher for two years.
At first I thought she is British, but actually she comes from America.
I've never thought such a place where an American guide explains to visitors about the history of Britain's bloody prison in fluent Japanese!
Kanon is a very sociable girl, and she doesn't hesitate to greet to unknown people, no matter where she goes.
That's probably why she commands good English.
I just finished my work.
All things I are small things, I should forget about it.
All things I are small things, I should forget about it.
But I hope my brain will work well tomorrow.
All things I are small things, I should forget about it.
My daughter ordered it me three mounts ago.
It is a book title of 'The whisky'.
I was very happy for it.
Andy, you know I lived in Budapest, when it was happend.
The bankrobber had the habit: before he robbed bank he drank a glass of whisky.
I would like to watch it very very much.
I recommend you this book and movie.
I want to eat tempura and udon today, so, I'm happy!
It's as if we were a celestial object which spins and interacts with the piece."
However, we have not been North Europe, and I looking for place to go.
Please let me know your recommended tourist spot!
The land development company explored ways of a solution to arious issues regarding the construction.
After raining the air of the atmosphere is clean and without pollution and because of that the feeling when you are breathing is amazing.
Besides going for a hike at this moment is beautiful because all the countryside is wet, a thing makes me peaceful, and the environment smells better, the flowers and the trees.
I hope It will be raining for the next days because it can allow us to enjoy in Spring months.
After raining the air of the atmosphere is clean and without pollution and because of that the feeling when you are breathing is amazing.
Besides going for a hike at this moment is beautiful because all the countryside is wet, a thing makes me peaceful, and the environment smells better, the flowers and the trees.
I hope It will be raining for the next days because it can allow us to enjoy in Spring months.
Today was the last day of operation.
It's sad to lose a place with a good memories.
The weather forecast said it'll be terrible weather tomorrow.
I really hope that when I'll go out my house, the rain and wind will be stopped...
I tried to search for connective trip by bus or by train.
I tried to search for train schedule and for bus schedule so I can transfer easily.
I tried to search for connective trip by bus or by train.
I tried to search for train schedule and for bus schedule so I can transfer easily.
I have learned english for fourteen years, but i still can't use it.
Just that moment, a foreigner tried to have a comunication with me, it is shamful for me to talk with him, because i can't speak in a fluence sentence, just some unsure words.
What's more, I spend half an hour to write this short message.
This morning I soaked in a hot springs in a moutain village where is situated away from the bustle of the city.
I had been exhausted.
While soaking in a hot spring, I was able to break free from all the mundane things of my daily life.
This morning I soaked in a hot springs in a moutain village where is situated away from the bustle of the city.
the Walking Dead Season 8
The last half of the Walking Dead Season 8 begins.
I think that the coming up with a production of a zombie drama as television series is cool and deceptively easy as Columbus's egg.
The protagonists can endlessly travel around the North America, continuously changing members recruiting new ones to recover lost ones.
They have other continents like South America, Africa, Eurasia, if they want.
They might continue this series even until season 100, if they feel like it.
However, with Glen gone and now even CARL gone, this series has been recently losing its appeal to me.
I understand that even an important, attractive protagonist might die and that's the reality.
I'm not sure I'm going to subscribe the channel of the pay television this time.
I think that the coming up with a production of a zombie drama as television series is cool and deceptively easy as Columbus's egg.
The protagonists can endlessly travel around the North America, continuously changing members recruiting new ones to recover lost ones.
They have other continents like South America, Africa, Eurasia, if they want.
I understand that even an important, attractive protagonist might die and that's the reality.
I'm not sure whether I'm going to subscribe the channel of the pay television this time.
Have you ever read works by Fujiko F.
I like his works.
If you have ever read only "Doraemon", you will probably surprised at the difference in style between "Doraemon" and "SF short stories"
hello I am japanese.
I'm 21year's old.
But, I don't use it as I want.
soonly, I have to do job hunting.
Until that, I want to use English fluently.
I am not sure about how many corrections I would receive but, maybe I will just put my pieces of thoughts of the day here and make it my little diary.
The new subway station was promised to be built in 5 years and we both doubted if we could see it in time lol.
My friend agreed and said if it was in China, the bridge scheme would pass "unanimously" and be done in 5 months.
Then I thinked of the definition on the first page of our constitution - a people's democratic dictatorship.
Yes I even looked up in the dictionary specially for this term.
Well I am not a fan of politic sciences or a modern cynic or anything like that.
If we couldn't rely on the constitution anymore, what else is reliable?
She can't read the French subtitles
Films intended for the minorities
I try to translate Marina's video subtitled in Russia into English to train the language skills.
They argue that taking unilateral actions to build the Republic of Catalonia would severely affect the Catalan political prisoners, who could suffer retaliations, in the form of tortures, punishments, and longer prison sentences.
Today I was told by someone that my weitten English was poor.
Okay, message got.
Mark here.
It is preparing to a Festival of the Weaver.
Yesterday, I attended a monthly report meeting of our division at the one of our factories in Okayama prefecture.
I got some good ideas to create new products and technologies.
I pushed the thought to the back of my mind and ran my finger over the damaged ski one more time.
Afterwards, I stepped back out into the car park, letting the latch fall shut behind.
By now, I would have been disconcerted if the statue had moved.
Could you call back in next week?
The work plan analyzes the economic situations of all developed and developing countries in the world, which means it focuses on all of the potential markets around the world, including India, Russia, Vietnam.
Especially, using an advantage of being in central part of Asia, it successfully appeals to non-Western markets.
For instance, it collaborates with an online platform of leading international media companies like CNN.
As a result, among Asian and Pacific countries, Hong Kong ranked the second place in 2014 with inviting around 28 million visitors that year.
The second biggest number of visitors are from America, which demonstrates how successfully Hong Kong is appealing to Western market compared to other Asian countries.
When I can make good job.
I am engineer and develop a product.
It's going well when someone take cleary leadership.
But almost all case, Our boss is leader, but boss don't take leadership.
So It's not going well many casees.
In my opinion, leadership needs just communication.
I am engineer and develop a product.
It's going well when someone take cleary leadership.
But almost all case, Our boss is leader, but boss don't take leadership.
In my opinion, leadership needs just communication.
I went to an internet cafe in a while.
But they should know how dangerous this is.
I have reason to support my conclusion.
Because you didn't use it so often and don't have a information literacy.
In addition, most important thing is to make teenagers learn how to control the service and why the service is dangerous, not avoiding the service.
based on the reason, I believe that teenagers shouldn't avoid using social networking service.
Spring. 
I like Spring, when the breath of living come into my nose, I know that is it!
I like Spring, It represents that everything in the world begin to wake up.
I like Spring, when the breath of living come into my nose, I know that is it!
I like Spring, It represents that everything in the world begin to wake up.
I like Spring, when the breath of living come into my nose, I know that is it!
I like Spring, It represents that everything in the world begin to wake up.
I hope you guys can meet and enjoy it.
I like Spring, It represents that everything in the world begin to wake up.
I hope you guys can meet and enjoy it.
Nowadays education is very important for our life.
Some people claim that get education abroad is good, while others argue that education in their own country is better.
To start with, many students will get some experience.
Moreover, student will learn about new culture, find new friends.
They believe that getting education abroad so stressful for student.
Every time they have problems and they have to solve the problem by their self.
To sum up, Taking into consideration different opinions on this issue, I believe that education abroad could help students to be more confident and independent.
trip to London 
It was Saturday so a lot of people were there.
There were so many stores and food stalls on a street and they seemed interesting, but it was raining so we left there immediately.
There were a lot of vintage clothing stores and restaurants so I really like there.
We bought some cloths at a store called ROKIT and we totally fell in love with this store.
I hope this store was in my country.
It was difficult to understand whole story but it was incredible.
After the play was over, we could meet him in a lobby.
I was too excited so my hand and legs were shaking.
This is the best moment of this trip.
at the recently, I eager to transfer my job.
so, I took the job interview last week in Engish..
terrible interview i have ever been..
Only one of my boast is that I'm always healthy.
I've never been in hospital.
However, I've gotten cold with fever in the end.
I started feeling chilly around his cold recovered.
And then I couldn't get up cause of fever at last.
My restaurant had to close extra on Monday this week again.
I have been sleeping for almost the week except working because I had kept slight fever.
I got better a little because my temperature went down though I'm still coughing.
Only one of my boast is that I'm always healthy.
However, I've gotten cold with fever in the end.
My restaurant had to close extra on Monday this week again.
I have been sleeping for almost the week except working because I had kept slight fever.
Nothing is as precious as health.
Deadline is coming.
I need to stay up the night to complete the proposal.
The band came out of the indies scene and debuted in major music scene.
The band came out of the indies scene and signed up with a major record label.
He looks like a boy who boasts to Mom that he got all A at class.
The band came out of the indies scene and debuted in major music scene.
I watched the clip on Youtube.
He looks like a boy who boasts to Mom that he got all A at class.
The job was to collect data and information from the local government, non-profit organizations, and hospitals to assist women and children who have experienced sexual assault to provide them financial compensation from the government and criminals.
The job was to collect data and information from the local government, non-profit organizations, and hospitals to assist women and children who have experienced sexual assault to provide them financial compensation from the government and criminals.
I made a plan for one day trip.
When I explain the plan, Should I put "will" before Verb everytime?
And I want to use spoken language in stead of written language as much as I can for easy understanding.
Thank you for your participataion to one day trip around Sakaiminato.
We will leave the Matsue Station at 9:30 and visite our first destination, the Mizuki Shigeru road.
You can find out very uniqe souvenirs focused on Japaneses gosts at there.
We will leave the Shigeru Mizuki road at 11 AM and go to the Sakaiminato port, the largest landing port for crab in Japan.
After visitting the Sakaiminato fish market, we will enjoy a fresh seafood lunch at a restaurant.
After one hour luch, we will leave the restaurant at 1 PM and visit Yushien garden at Daikonjima Island.
At Yushien garden, you can enjoy Japanese sightseeing gardens and beautiful peonys, and the Korean ginseng museum.
Please enjoy sightseeing walking freely for one hour and 20 minits.
Please enjoy today's tour.
I have enjoyed to make it so much.
Comb its fur, catch lice for it
Bring it when picking fruits, digging roots, and fighting with other baboon
Only when baby banoon's body was so rotten
And then the big baboon was ready to leave it behind
But the big baboon still need to live
Today is cloudy.
In the morning, there is a little rain when I went to work.
This weather is very nice.
I went out to walk during the lunch break.
She also planned to change to her job.
And I talked with her about some plans I had now.
I am stubborn, and I also have a soft heart.
I easily got touched by others.
And sometimes I didn't want to treat others too hard.
I need to be more strict to myself, also to others.
My customer gave the 100% of the money, instead of 30%.
In the local.
"In this lot, restaurants often change."
"They are."
"Just the other week, ramen restaurant closed down."
"Then, another ramen restaurant open up now."
"In this lot, restaurants often change."
"They are."
"Then, another ramen restaurant open up now."
One of intriguing things I found in Pusan, most of travelers are Japanese.
To be more specific, Korean tend to wear standard clothe which every person think it suitable and only make a disparity in a small difference.
I tried to have a conversation with them, but they are barely able to English or Korean.
If I live in Pusan, I would have learned about Japanese.
One of intriguing things I found in Pusan, most of travelers are Japanese.
To be more specific, Korean tend to wear standard clothe which every person think it suitable and only make a disparity in a small difference.
Whereas, Japanese looks more noticeable.
I tried to have a conversation with them, but they are barely able to English or Korean.
Long time no writing!
I was long time no writing on here.
He said he went to study in New Zealand since he was fourteen.
I thought if you went to a foreign country and spoke that language since you were fourteen, you should have been semi-native to that language.
His English was fluent, but I was surprised that there were a lot of grammar mistakes in his sentences, and his pronunciation was very Taiwanese like.
I thought if you went to a foreign country and spoke that language since you were fourteen, you should have been semi-native to that language.
I thought if you went to a foreign country and spoke that language since you were fourteen, you should have been semi-native to that language.
Leaning basic economics in high schools
It is a good idea for high school students to learn some basic concepts of economics in their classes.
One of the great advantages of taking a class in basic economics is that they can learn to think logically.
Economics is the most instructive subject to learn how to understand facts appropriately, how to think logically, how to analyze issues precisely, and how to express one's opinions persuasively.
It is a fiction book, about a successful factory manager who manages his factory, using some notions of economics.
At the earliest stage, he struggled to handle his factory, and he suffered from poor sales performance.
He accidentally met a professor who specialized in economics, and the professor pointed out accurately the manager's failure on his way of thinking about management.
The manager was surprised at the professor's accurate analysis and asked him to teach him to manage his difficulties.
This book is very instructive for me when I am facing some difficulties and problems.
Leaning basic economics in high schools
He accidentally met a professor who specialized in economics, and the professor pointed out accurately the manager's failure on his way of thinking about management.
This book is very instructive for me when I am facing some difficulties and problems.
Leaning basic economics in high schools
It is a good idea for high school students to learn some basic concepts of economics in their classes.
One of the great advantages of taking a class in basic economics is that they can learn to think logically.
Economics is the most instructive subject to learn how to understand facts appropriately, how to think logically, how to analyze issues precisely, and how to express one's opinions persuasively.
For example, when I was a high school student, it was optional to take a class in economics at high schools in my country, Japan, but I took a class in economics, and I often read books about economics, such as behavioral economics.
It is a fiction book, about a successful factory manager who manages his factory, using some notions of economics.
At the earliest stage, he struggled to handle his factory, and he suffered from poor sales performance.
He accidentally met a professor who specialized in economics, and the professor pointed out accurately the manager's failure on his way of thinking about management.
The manager was surprised at the professor's accurate analysis and asked him to teach him to manage his difficulties.
In this book, the professor gave the manager all kinds of useful advice on factory management.
This book is very instructive for me when I am facing some difficulties and problems.
When I encounter some problems to resolve, such as decision-making on my career, relationships with other people, and many demanding tasks in my office, it is useful for me to recall the lessons from the book, and it helps me think logically and solve those problems easily.
It is a good idea for high school students to learn some basic concepts of economics in their classes.
Economics is the most instructive subject to learn how to understand facts appropriately, how to think logically, how to analyze issues precisely, and how to express one's opinions persuasively.
One of my favorite books is "the Goal" written by Eliyahu M.
It is a fiction book, about a successful factory manager who manages his factory, using some notions of economics.
At the earliest stage, he struggled to handle his factory, and he suffered from poor sales performance.
He accidentally met a professor who specialized in economics, and the professor pointed out accurately the manager's failure on his way of thinking about management.
The manager was surprised at the professor's accurate analysis and asked him to teach him to manage his difficulties.
When I encounter some problems to resolve, such as decision-making on my career, relationships with other people, and many demanding tasks in my office, it is useful for me to recall the lessons from the book, and it helps me think logically and solve those problems easily.
One subject is pass.
Two subjects failed.
One subject score is less 2 points and another is less 5 points.
How long is it for you visited your grandparents?
With reference to the subject, I seek your permission to grant me one week's leave.
I am going to attend a meditation course which falls in time of the month every year.
About fall asleep
I fell asleep before I knew it yesterday so I couldn't to some task in the day except working.
I end up fall asleep when I come back to house after finished work about twice a week becaue of tired for work.
I don't know how solving to stop fall asleep.
I post something in English nearly every day in order to be exposed to English making good use of some apps including twitter.
Additionally, people from the countries, where they don't use English as their native languages, correct my posts too.
English we taught at school is one thing, and English natives speak is quite another.
This means there are words we are used to depending on countries.
Their corrections become confusing to me sometimes...
I believe it's very important to consider how they wrote in their native languages too not to change the meaning..
All we have to do on the apps for helping the others with our native languages is to correct the sentences without the changing what they are trying to say.
English spoken by natives sounds cool actually, and I long for it!
Than you for your kind help!
I've been thinking about a trip in my spring vacation lately.
I wanted to go somewhere with my friends, but we couldn't coordinate our schedule.
So it will be a solo trip.
I want to try to sell my handmade accessories in a market while travelling.
Let me know if there is a market which I can appry in your town.
Finally, I saw some plum.
This year's plum is slow to start to bloom.
Japanese plum blossoms began to bloom.
He is immersing in the blue water, up to his brest.
On his face, there are tiny and black eyes and two teeth stick out from his big mouth, that makes he looks very lovely.
Around him growing the green trees that bend so softly.
In the right corner, there are the words " sweet time" in green, too.
The notebook is divided into 3 parts, with a colored paper ended each part.
I tend to use it for my English studying.
Recently I bought cat tower for them.
He always occupies the best position to sleep, so Mamiko sleeps another place and I felt poor to her.
The reason why I bought the cat tower.
I expect that she prefers to the tower and sleeps at the top rounded bowl.
how to make original tea
Natural Grasses flavor tea is adjust the combination and our campany original process that grows in clusters in Local, high quality veitch's bamboo incliuding.
This is an acceptable tea from children to the elderly.
Some people have a plastic surgery to make thier look yonger, but I think it's kind of risky and costly.
Even if they had the surgery, the effect of it wouldn't last long since we are aging at every singe moment, and they have to do it again constantly, which costs a lot.
Beside, there is no denying that they might accelarate their aging once they stop having the surgery.
March 3 is a Hinamatsuri festival in Japan.
We display Japanese figures in kimono clothes on the table in our home, and hope our daughters to strive healthy and lively.
Why we call it Hinamatsuri?
Ohinasama figures wear Japanese traditional clothes and hava some kind of accessories such as Japanese swords, bows, and instrumentals.
March 3 is a Hinamatsuri festival in Japan.
We display Japanese figures in kimono clothes on the table in our home, and hope our daughters to strive healthy and lively.
These figures are stocked in the box almost 10 months, then they are placed on only about 2 months at the Hinamatsuri festival.
Ohinasama figures wear Japanese traditional clothes and hava some kind of accessories such as Japanese swords, bows, and instrumentals.
The number of figures and the size of the table vary each family.
Bill of the Young Slave? In 21 Century?
The bill obliged the students of Community Colleges to work without a salary.
Until that point, there was no problem, but the issue emerged when the owner of the factory was not obligated to pay a salary to the students.
A career in a Community College lasts three years, but the bill suggested that students must only complete almost 300 hours, without salary.
Obviously, a lot of people, many students among them, protested against that bill.
A newspaper printed its cover page calling the bill as: "Bill of the young slave."
But the response of the congresswoman was worse, she called that cover page like "terrorist." She had to apologise for that commentary.
Days later, the congresswoman removed her bill from the camera, she just told the press that now the project must be debated with other organizations of students and the society.
In our country we have two institutions where the students can study professional careers, the first ones are the "Universities", and the others are "Institutes."
But I have read that those "institutes" are called in America as "Community College"
In an "Institute" the students can study technical jobs like Design, tourism guider, mechanic among others.
When a consultant ask me to color-print on nice papers, I have to go up 5 floors and set papers on a printers and call another assistant to press print on the pc and pick up papers.
It is not many that pollen fly in this neighborhood.
But my nose tickles recently.
If so, why don't you say "dog robots" instead of "robot dog" in common?
I went to Dinner with my friend.
First we went to Gyoza but it was the line, so we changed store that we ate chicken.
We had a enjoyed dinner, then we went to Karaoke.
Today,we has hungover but we had good time.
When I played Final Fantasy X years ago in a English dub, the conversation between two protagonists piqued my interest.
Down the ages, the Japanese have been shunning the direct emotional expressions.
Therefore, Japanese couples, married or unmarried, wouldn't say each other "I love you" even nowadays.
In the ancient literature, the writers expressed the idea of love by using implicit alternatives like "the moon tonight is beautiful, isn't it?" as in the present-day video games like the English-dubbed Final Fantasy X.
I am afraid that my reply may rude and too simple.
We really appreciate you inviting us to the chapter author of the manual.
Please find the attached files.
I went to London at the beginning of this month.
I was incredibly enjoyed this trip, so from this post I will write reports of my journey!
My high school friend and I gathered in an airport and took an aeroplane of Korean Air.
One and a half hour later we arrived at Incheon Airport in Korea.
And then I took an other aeroplane again and headed to Heathrow Airport.
The man surprised at the voice and moved to another place and made a different hole and put the fishing line into the hole.
So the man moved to another place and made a hole, after that put the fishing line into the hole again.
I am the manager of this skate link." 
So the man moved to another place and made a hole, after that put the fishing line into the hole again.
So the man moved to another place and made a hole, after that put the fishing line into the hole again.
I think it is important to reflect tasks.
Regularly, tasks have some contents.
Sometimes, some contents are not useful for the task.
We have to cut unuseful contents.
So we sometimes should reflect to check the tasks.
I heard this.
Did you know that?
And, Japanese cedar pollen is scattered today.
I had work from home yesterday, so I don't commuted for it's a easy.
But, I start commute the office from today, so I'm fed up it.
And, Japanese cedar pollen is scattered today.
I'm pain it today.
I believe that some of the long year users hope so.
It has been 3 months since I came to Sidney.
One of the my friend is from Australia told me I should be drinking.
I think He should have said you should drink.
What's the difference from should drink and should be drinking.
I don't understand grammar although He is native speaker so he is right.
Does anyone see my keys?, or
Has anyone seen my keys?
I am getting really confused with them.
Yesterday was the last day of the Chinese new year and today is the first day when most of the people in China go back to work.
I am experiencing emotional up and down at the moment because I need to talk to a senior manager in my company about my resignation.
Talking to a boss about resignation is similar as breaking up with a boyfriend or girlfriend, it requires courage and determination.
I need to go to work tomorrow and I will quit my current job tomorrow.
I am experiencing emotional up and down at the moment because I need to talk to a senior manager in my company about my resignation.
I am worry about you and you need to work hard to make money.
It means that I am able to generate enough cash flow to pay my daily expense and have some saving to deal with small problems.
Feeling towards computers
I used to dislike computers when I was a child because it seemed to me that a computer wasted a lot of time of adults.
I disliked seeing that parents spent a lot of time in front of the computer in our apartment.
However, now I grew up and I'm using them a lot.
More precisely speaking, I rely on them.
I study on Lang-8 and Cousera and enjoy American TV on Netflix, so I cannot think of the life without computers.
Why do they always hide what they feel at the moment?
Do they fear of person's reaction?
Nothing more, just thoughts intertwining in freaky knots that prevent them from acting directly.
The problem is hidden too deep and it takes some struggles to pull it out.
We constantly find indirect matters, but what is digged up in the very heart of the Trouble - that's what we're only going to find out.
Today was the day my husband had an interview for the job.
Butterfly in my tummy because I knew he tried his best for today.
He told me that it went well somehow, so we ended our day having a piece of cake from the convenient store to celebrate his all efforts.
The sweets taste so good especially when we have it after having some kinds of tense situation.
It ease us a lot.
It is getting late at night, good night.
Butterfly in my tummy because I knew he tried his best for today.
He told me that it went well somehow, so we ended our day having a piece of cake from the convenient store to celebrate his all efforts.
The sweets taste so good especially when we have it after having some kinds of tense situation.
It ease us a lot.
It is getting late at night, good night.
We went to A city to look for a new apartment.
I really thought there were well-dressed people and nicer shops.
I said the impression to a staff member in a real estate company.
He replied, "Yes, there are.
It's really different from C city." C city is just next to A city.
Although I said that, his reply made me a little surprised.
I often go to C city, good place!
There's a little suspicious-looking people depends on the area, but I like a bit of chaos.
We went to A city to look for a new apartment.
A city is known as posh area.
I said the impression to a staff member in a real estate company.
It's really different from C city." C city is just next to A city.
There's a little suspicious-looking people depends on the area, but I like a bit of chaos.
We went to A city to look for a new apartment.
A city is known as posh area.
I really thought there were well-dressed people and nicer shops.
I said the impression to a staff member in a real estate company.
It's really different from C city." C city is just next to A city.
Although I said that, his reply made me a little surprised.
I often go to C city, good place!
There's a little suspicious-looking people depends on the area, but I like a bit of chaos.
I really thought there were well-dressed people and nicer shops.
Yes, Maybe Not Safer
A city is known as posh area.
I really thought there were well-dressed people and nicer shops.
I said the impression to a staff member in a real estate company.
Although I said that, his reply made me a little surprised.
I often go to C city, good place!
There's a little suspicious-looking people depends on the area, but I like a bit of chaos.
I replied to her that I'd never head of it.
I didn't meet him recently.
I haven't seen him recently.
I haven't studied English recently.
I thought that she might have misunderstood what she had read, but I realized that if I used "recently" in the sentence of the past tense, it would sound strange.
"I didn't meet him yesterday" is, of course, fine because it includes a clear time "yesterday."
Why does "I didn't meet him recently" sound strange to me?
Yamada recently.
Some people tell that a zoo is useless.
The begin with, there are a lot of zoo in the world.
A zoo is a place where takes care of many animals.
With the change of natural surrounding, A lot of many animals has become extinct these days.
Zoo played an important role to protect animals.
we need to protect precious animal or endangered species at a zoo.
Secondly, a zoo is a place where scientist can search a wide range of habit about animal and species.
Studying animal and species discover a lot of knowledge or useful information about the environment.
We must live in animals together.
There are many reasons that a zoo has no useful purpose.
Some people tell that a zoo is useless.
However, In my opinion, I disagree that a zoo has no useful purpose because we need to protect their species and know about the habit of a lot of creatures.
The begin with, there are a lot of zoo in the world.
A zoo is a place where takes care of many animals.
With the change of natural surrounding, A lot of many animals has become extinct these days.
Zoo played an important role to protect animals.
For example, even though there are a lot of various types of precious animals In Japan, some animals became extinct because of the social problems such as deforestation.
Also, some people killed some animals in order to make money.
we need to protect precious animal or endangered species at a zoo.
Secondly, a zoo is a place where scientist can search a wide range of habit about animal and species.
Studying animal and species discover a lot of knowledge or useful information about the environment.
In conclusion, I strongly believe that a zoo has a useful purpose.
However.
Even we didn't pick our religion, culture, and tradition.
Some people are ready to die for beliefs which someone else had decided it for them, for country and people they certainly didn't choose.
You exist as a body and under a name you haven't chosen.
Being forced all of your entire life to live under unaffordable circumstances is miserable.
The journey must start by looking for an answer to this question: Who I am?
The Effectively Appeal Of Japan
It's out of fashion and have low productivity.
Now I am going to the hospital to hear about the medical check consequence that was held two weeks ago.
But I think I have an allergic.
A "Long" Answer Necessarily Requires Corrections.
- It's the problem when several countries share the same language, there is always some differences, even minor like this one.
A Quebecker wouldn't correct you as a French person would do for example.
I "cheat" a lot when I write.
I have to, otherwise it would look like a real gibberish!
So I'm sure you like the culture and nature of San'in region.
For your tour in large numbers, please keep the meeting time.
Pease tell me if there are something to correct.
Welcome to San - in region.
So I'm sure you like the culture and nature of San'in region.
I have some requests to enjoy today's tour.
For your tour in large numbers, please keep the meeting time.
Every organization has problems and potentials.
Every challenge has what we lose in it and what we obtain from it.
Which do you focus?
It depends on you which to choose.
At the same time, that makes you choose your own future as well.
However, most of doctors have good salary, but for dentists this topic is better.
Especially because dentists don't need to study many years as much as other specialists like, neurologists, cardiologists, orthopedic specialists, etc.
This fact gives a big chance to dentists to make more money from their field.
The maps provide a breakdown of the improvement a city underwent from 1700 to the present.
However, nowadays there are some contemporary infrastructures: a supermarket, traffic lights and a car park as well.
As for the paths, they are now all double-lined, with the exception of Steggle Road, where Steggle Farm was located, that is tree-lined.
At the intersection of High Street and St Peter's Lane, there is now a roundabout and along the two streets, more shops and dwellings have been built anew.
The mall is located on a side of St Peter's Lane opposed to the lodgings.
On the other hand, the farms of the seventeenth century have been demolished to make room for a car park, new houses and to pave the aforementioned Steggle Road.
Moreover, the stables, for example, have been substituted with modern flats and the field has disappeared.
My life in the UK: Do you have some puddings after meal? 
Things I've change myself since when I moved to the UK is eating pudding after meal.
I always want something sweets after meal.
If I didn't have it I wouldn't feel I finish my meal completely.
I still agree with them and I'd like to take over my family custom however in the UK, everyone seems like enjoy having a pudding after meal.
It's a layer of sponge cake with custard,fruit, jelly and topped with whipped cream.
If I didn't have it I wouldn't feel I finish my meal completely.
You might meet the kind owner and friendly dogs and be surrounded fluffy.
The anger of my wife continued for two days.
She got angry because I failed to tell my arriving time correctly the day before yesterday.
Yesterday was an extra holiday for me, so I did house keeping works.
I cleaned my our house and prepared dinner for her.
I was waiting for her e-mail, and she told me her arrival would be at midnight.
I replied OK, and started some chores, but it was her lie.
She wrote that e-mail on the bus to our home and came home early.
Through these actions, she wanted to show the thing what I did yesterday.
I'm wearing thick socks against with the coldness of winter.
I can feel that warmth is quite different from thin socks.
There is a saying in Japan that warmth should be taken from the feet.
There is a saying in Japan that warmth should be taken from the feet.
One of the deaths of the battle was the last Visigoth King Rodrigo.
The Muslims lasted twenty years in conquer all the Visigoth Kingdom.
They continued advancing to the South East of nowadays France for conquering the Frankish Kingdom.
The Frankish King to avoid the Muslim threat ordered to Carlos Martel his Mayor of the Palace to attack them.
He found the Muslim army close Pottiers and attack them.
They defeated the army of the last Visigoth King in the Battle of Guadalete and started the conquest of the Visigod Kingdom.
not very useful and totally unpractical things like geometry and maths, but also interesting subjects like philosophy and chemistry.
I tried to help them get good marks, and even made the effort to LEND them my favorite books, but they would still pick up fights with me...
They should be grateful I would often just ignore their provocations.
I am still poor at hearing and listening.
How do you practice conversation for foreign langage?
How can I be fluent in English in three months.
How do you practice conversation for foreign langage?
I am still poor at hearing and listening.
Hi, I write a essay. If you had plenty of free time, please read this. 
Endless bad dream.
Recently I read a book named Dagon.
I was remembering a novel, when I was reading this, Mujina.
This is written by Koizumi Yakumo.
I let talk about Mujina from now.
He didn't see her face because she hide it.
However she was seen her face by him.
He soon run away because she didn't have face.
He managed to find a person but his face looks like egg too.
Then the light turn off.
Next I want you to read Dagon's end.
He went to the highest hill in here.
There was a big and deep hole.
He searched here and found an ancient stone monument.
It was drawn a man that was half human and half fish.
In addition the biggest fish man was as big as whales.
He imagined what kind of meaning this have.
Then in front of him appeared the fish man that was drawn by the monument.
He was hardly run away.
Despite the night with a full moon, he looked a vision about the monster.
I think it have two same points.
One thing, reality was changing over fiction.
In Mujina, at first the woman spoke the man normally, hiding her face but she deployed her face.
Next Dagon, the man looked the monument before the monster appeared.
In these stories, daily life was changing over unusual.
Next, these stories didn't have clear end.
We couldn't know what main characters happen.
It's seem to be endless bad dream.
We need to think what happened at last.
Can you explain me the difference please?
When I must use the first and when I must use the second.
I'm pretty much interested in the cultural differences between in Japan and in America.
The one thing I can say clearly is that most Japanese people in Japan are happy that non-Japanese people wear kimono.
During all this week the weather will be cold, but next week will be warmer.
During all this week the weather will be cold, but next week will be warmer.
During all this week the weather will be cold, but next week will be warmer.
So we will see together the reasons for this decline.
Indeed, several reasons explain this lack of interest for the sciences.
First of all, scientific studies are very hard and selective. This can strongly discourage students.
Then, one wonders if this is not related to the disappearance of mathematics in our daily lives.
We all have today a calculator or a mobile phone capable of calculating on our behalf.
Finally, it can be assumed that wages should not be commensurate with the effort provided during studies or work, or that it is low relative to the cost of studies.
To conclude, we can deduce that to give young people an interest in science, it is necessary to improve wages and especially to give them a positive image with a more attractive teaching with for example, workshops or internships with professionals.
It has been becoming warmer these days.
Long winter will be over and spring is coming soon.
I have a lot to want to do if spring comes.
I have my driver's license but don't have my own motorcycle.
I have had the one while I was living in Osaka, which is one of the biggest cities in Japan, but I let go of it because keeping it took quite expensive cost every month.
I want to have my motorcycle again now since maintenance costs are not needed because I live in my own house, including some parking space, in a suburban.
Also, roads are large and not crowded there.
I'm sure now is the best timing to buy the new one.
In advance, I am planning to go touring by a rental motorcycle with my friends.
So, I decided to go with my friends next time.
I want to go touring in United States someday.
I've been to Grand canyon several years agree.
I can definitely feel great if I drive my motorcycle there.
One of the lawyers left the law firm where she worked for, because there was a disagreement over its policy among them.
However, she didn't take my advice, because she had a romantic feeling with him in a unilateral way.
I asked her what her complaint was, and she told me that he didn't give her a raise nor full-time job.
I changed my job three months ago although I have 7 years experience from career before.
It' s huge chanllenge for me.
Every time when I meet is strange, new field, new people..
But, I have to do my best since I have two kids and wife who are seeing me as a strong man.
I changed my job three months ago although I have 7 years experience from career before.
Sometiems, I regret.
I've never been there so I don't know habits and history.
I would like to visit countries in that part of Europe, and I'd like to do with some natives so they could tell me a lot of particular stories about their countries and they bring me to visit places out of tourist tours.
Today I had to go to a supplier to solve a problem.
Since many lorries came form east Europe, I imagined little towns in the midle of nothing, snow, ice and cold.
I've never been there so I don't know habits and history.
I would like to visit countries in that part of Europe, and I'd like to do with some natives so they could tell me a lot of particular stories about their countries and they bring me to visit places out of tourist tours.
When will you be able to handover to new company?
I tried to describe my home town, Osaka.
The sentence below is written as spoken language.
My hometown is Osaka, the second largest city of Japan next to Tokyo.
It is located in West part of Japan, called Kansai region.
It is well known around the world, maybe especially East and Southeast Asian countries, for its amazingly variety of food and unique cultures such as Manzai, a kind of entertainment talk shows.
The main language is, of course, Japanese, however this is spoken with a very heavy dialect peculiar to the Kansai region.
The advantages of living in Osaka are the high employment prospects, the range of things to do, such as culture and social activities, and dozens of shopping malls and streets.
Other industries are finance, retail, tourism, banking and so on just like same as other large cities all over the world.
Anywhere in public transportation and shopping malls is very crowded and cluttered, and even though when you drive your car in Osaka, you must feel roads are quite narrow and very busy with not only cars but also bicycles.
Osaka also faces environmental problems such as air pollution, caused by heavy traffic, and also natural disaster, for example tsunami and earthquake, as 90% of its area is at flat and lowland area.
It also faces social problems such as overcrowding and homeless.
This force is called "force of king", and this force appears when conclude an agreement with "code user" who owns an ability that is called "code".
The representative one is "Geass of absolute observance" that Lelouch owns.
Eyes of person who owns Geass emit a purple light, and a symbol of phoenix emerge to center of those eyes.
However, generally, most of them are ability that operate a human's mind, and kind of the ability is decided based on content of a desire of person who concluded the agreement.
On the other hand, a strength of effect of Geass is decided according to a aptitude of Geass user.
Therefore, if a person who lack of the aptitude concluded the agreement, an awkward Geass that received a restriction appears, or Geass does not appear.
The quote is a finest example of what I can going to write about.
We are often spellbound by enticing things in life and we indulge in them.
The child is never satisfy." that's how we are when we get older and responsible person.
We go in the search of fake happiness and nebulous the true one.
I have met so many rich people and what I notice that they always complain how sad they are.
Some even want to become a monk as they don't care about the money.
But a poor person will laugh at the rich man as for him the money is the only happiness.
You can see the real happiness on their face.
I want to give example of it.
Once I was going to temple and the taxi driver was talking and smiling as he won a lottery.
I asked him "why are you so happy?" and he smiled and said, "I'm always happy like this because I have everything and I don't desire for more." I was surprised and socked because he was indeed a poor taxi driver.
Besides of seeing people in real life I have read some articles and they say money can't buy happiness.
For the true happiness you should learn to give and be kind.
I don't believe this because I am a person who always try to help others and what I get in return is sadness.
S I will answer that in next entry.
If you know the answer, please write here.
that's Galaxy note 8!!
The feature it has are the following.
This is the reason why they call "Galaxy note".
I really feel deference from the previous cell phone which I used.
Another dimention!
I was very pleased to attend seminar on Japanese teachers as volunteers.
I learned useful Japanese from the seminar.
My Japanese teacher said" if you enjoy studying then it suits you, please keep it going.
Yes, I will!
but I have seen many people done something inappropriate for example 
when people are going to with their dogs a run or a walk and dog 
done dirty the street or field and these people do not clean 
the place and I think thats inapropiated and incorrect because 
all people should be polite and if their pets dirty the place, 
their are required to clean
It is a small city, and it's localized around forty five kilometers of capital city.
That city has cobblestone streets and it has views volcans and it's have a small market and thats city have many tourst foreign, and also exisit many church of colonial time and few words it is a beuatifull city.
Will be finally banned everywhere?
On the one hand, that tabacco is unhealthy and annoying is a reality.
Non addicted people have had to endure people smoking near them in schools, planes, restaurants or even hospitals.
For instance, in Spain, students could smoke during the classes until 1988, however people could smoke in restaurants and public locals until 2010.
Tabacco involves plenty of illness, for example, tumors or breathing difficulties.
Furthermore, to smoke pollutes the air and hurts other people who breath the fume.
On the other hand, if smoking is banned in public places, people who smoke can think over they are deprived or freedom.
In addition, they can suppose they have less right than the rest of the citizens and it can bring demonstrations or strikes.
To sum up, I totally agree with banning smoking in public places, because the health is the most important thing we have.
If I were the president, I will ban smoking everywhere, except private houses.
Most of countries have banned smoke in public places. Especially, in bars and restaurants, public buildings or even streets.
Will be finally banned everywhere?
Non addicted people have had to endure people smoking near them in schools, planes, restaurants or even hospitals.
For instance, in Spain, students could smoke during the classes until 1988, however people could smoke in restaurants and public locals until 2010.
Furthermore, to smoke pollutes the air and hurts other people who breath the fume.
On the other hand, if smoking is banned in public places, people who smoke can think over they are deprived or freedom.
In addition, they can suppose they have less right than the rest of the citizens and it can bring demonstrations or strikes.
If I were the president, I will ban smoking everywhere, except private houses.
Today I texted one of my bestie but she does not replied.
Why she behaved like this.
Without any reason she has stopped talking with me,At least she has to tell me that what she has a problem.
I want to tell her that If she has a problem then she has to say frankly to me.
I know there is some reason she hiding me.
I'll turn 22 years old this year.
Here 22 years old is quite old but not that old for marriage.
When I looked at them, I was realizing that we already old and we were adults.
I still have a lot of dreams, I want to take my master, work as a diplomat, or maybe get a good job sooner.
In the other hand sometimes I think about marriage.
I'm curious about who will be my future husband?
Sometimes I think what if I were marrying with someone who converted himself to the same religion with me?
I'm a muslim and I'm a female, it is not easy to muslim women who will marry a converted man.
I know, the women can help their converted husband, but it takes so much effort, patience, and sincerety, especially for the husband who can learn and wants to learn about his wife religion.
The marriage life will fulfill with good vibes and joyfull life.
I drew the branches on pastel paper of a small size.
Usually I paint on a large paper, because I feel free to do it.
This month, I have been managing to pratice English for more than 90 hours.
I'm really happy with this.
It's a long vacation so I have had a lot of time to practice English.
I don't know if I could continue in that way because I'm going back at work in March, so I won't have as many time as I have right now.
You will need to know this because it won the championship the past two years in succession.
And the pitchers in charge of setup and closer are both excellent.
They are good at training young generation.
Are those sentences correct?
I can't stand my grandma telling that I take after my mum behaviour since my mother is very arrogant.
My friend is looking forward to having her final rehersal.
A first-person shooting game which is called Playerunknow's Battlegorunds took over the crown of the PC games last year.
It's the bestseller on steam, a PC games platform, in last 50 weeks.
A hundred players will spawn on an island after they joined a match.
The player who joins this game only has a single purse which is killed everyone he meet in a single match.
And the last alive person will get a Winer, Winer, Chicken Dinner slogan which means he wins this game.
In fact, it's not only a shooting game but also a horror game, because people may get shots form anytime and anywhere.
Playerunknown's Battlegrounds
A first-person shooting game which is called Playerunknow's Battlegorunds took over the crown of the PC games last year.
It's the bestseller on steam, a PC games platform, in last 50 weeks.
The player who joins this game only has a single purse which is killed everyone he meet in a single match.
And the last alive person will get a Winer, Winer, Chicken Dinner slogan which means he wins this game.
In fact, it's not only a shooting game but also a horror game, because people may get shots form anytime and anywhere.
It's just too embarassing to recive all those corrections lists, I usually make a lot of mistakes.
Looking forward to recieve some comments.
I try to use English and think English, not to translate from my language.
The two texts present opposed points of views regarding tourist industry and its effects on the places where it is carried out.
The writer adds that not only are the towns themselves deteriorated but their populations too.
The second text tackles the controversy among those who firmly believe that tourism industry is seriously damaging and, on the other hand, those who object to this statement.
Whereas the former ones make the point that the only aim of tour operators is to offer travellers the last opportunity to visit virgin places, the latter ones argue that some tourist companies are now trying to fix the damage previously done though this could be done for obscure purposes rather than for being concerned about preserving environments.
As mentioned above, both texts gives strongly opposed perspectives with regards to the effects of tourism.
According to the first text, tourism has turned idyllic places into huge tourist resorts whose only purpose is to satisfy their clients regardless which price has to be paid.
The writer supports his point quite well and although he draws a very pessimist picture, I could not agree with him most.
In conclusion, I very hope that in the short term, private companies and governments are able to cope with this worrying issue.
The two texts present opposed points of views regarding tourist industry and its effects on the places where it is carried out.
The first text highlights the fact that villages, which used to be peaceful and untouched, have been transformed into huge tourist hubs where buildings and nature have been completely spoiled.
People who used to work in traditional jobs now are working almost like slaves for tourist companies.
The second text tackles the controversy among those who firmly believe that tourism industry is seriously damaging and, on the other hand, those who object to this statement.
Whereas the former ones make the point that the only aim of tour operators is to offer travellers the last opportunity to visit virgin places, the latter ones argue that some tourist companies are now trying to fix the damage previously done though this could be done for obscure purposes rather than for being concerned about preserving environments.
In conclusion, I very hope that in the short term, private companies and governments are able to cope with this worrying issue.
She had started again arguing with my mother.
I mean she is going to give birth to her 4th baby boy.
She had started again arguing with my mother.
And will make a wish while prostrating before his grave.
I mean she is going to give birth to her 4th baby boy.
To me, every human life is limited in some way.
She had started again arguing with my mother.
When I pray it is to God not His saints.
I felt that my question was silly.
I collected the potatoes and put them in the plate to wash them.
I wonder what those so called religious scholars would say if I asked them questions such as, "Is it easier for boys to follow Islam than girls?" or "Why are the rules for boys and girls different?"
Perhaps, Azeem was also unable to figure out the reality.
I live in Shanghai for two years.
Last December, January and this month was so cold that everyone wore a down jacket.
My home town is southern part of Japan so winter is not cold like this.
Now March is coming and temperatures are getting high.
Do you know there are some spots for cherry blossom viewing in here Shanghai?
I am going to see Shanghai's cherry blossom until I will leave here this March.
It must be great and attractive as well as Japanese ones.
Some remarkable reduced forms of the proposed theory will be deduced in this chapter to reveal inner connection between previous studies and the proposed theory.
Study comes first, I don't understand "come"
it seems that there are something wrong,isn't it?
they go to an office supply store to buy the school things.
I have my own car, but I just drive it around my apartment.
When I buy the new car, it will be an compact car.
The last day I write a diary is 6 years ago!?
Though I don't like study, I want to understand English these days.
I want to go overseas travel and talk with local people.
If I study English more, I can communicate with them.
But now, I can understand little. So, I decide to start studying English.
At first, I use lang-8 with an electronic dictionary.
They would feel troublesome.
I had used to this web site until I was busy.
But now I have finished every tasks in University like experiment, presentation, write essay! So I started to use this web site to study and improve my English skill.
Maybe, I often write something, but it is not everyday.
So I apologize in advance that I couldn't say "thanks your advice" immediately.
She told me that she has been sick.
I went by at a McDonald's.
I bought fries and burger and wanted to take it home.
I rode rented bike to go home.
I felt terribly tired at halfway and I didn't know why.
The rest I had to walk through.
The fireworks are cracking everywhere, which is very noisy.
I rode rented bike to go home.
I went by at a McDonald's.
I rode rented bike to go home.
I felt terribly tired at halfway and I didn't know why.
The rest I had to walk through.
The fireworks are cracking everywhere, which is very noisy.
Is this usage -- 'say about xxx that it is xxx' -- grammatically correct?
Basically, shouldn't I mind the structure in case of lyrics?
Juve have the mental strength to overcome difficulties however and nullified their opponents with ice cold efficiency."
"- We must say there where some nice combinations for example Martina Rosucci played very well and also was fouled in occasion of the penalty but frankly speaking the midfield was almost perfect."
"I was out for such a long time so I trained on Monday and Tuesday but anyway but I think for the other guys it was very important to get focused for the next game against Atalanta, to get a free mind, to recover to take time with the family is very important."
Does 'in one week's time' mean during the next week?
"We're a great team, but we need to have the mentality each great team possesses, and a team like ours can't possibly take such a dip in the second half, even though we're playing a tough side such as Shakhtar, in such a vital match during the Round of 16."
Today, The train which I will ride on was stopped.
Now, I have itch eyes.
We expected to hear the ring in there, but nothing happened.
Then I was very surprised that someone picked my call.
A customer, which was my father, left it on the table.
I asked him to keep it until my father return there.
Parents with a stroller in the train.
Some people regard that bad-mannered.
My mother said that when I was a baby she  used a baby front carrier in the train.
She says she didn't want to trouble people around her in the train.
I think using a stroller is not bad manner, but parents with a baby have to be careful around them when they use public transportation.
Some people regard that bad-mannered.
My mother said that when I was a baby she  used a baby front carrier in the train.
She says she didn't want to trouble people around her in the train.
I think using a stroller is not bad manner, but parents with a baby have to be careful around them when they use public transportation.
It is great to see you tomorrow.
I have a question that When someone ask me Which one should do first between A thing and B thing.
I think you should have this thing done first.
I have been studying English since five years ago.
However, there are many periods which I haven't.
This evening i was on the city center.
I wanted to spend some birthday money in a book.
Years ago, I saw I Dickens book which in the old library that is the corner of Conor Street and I was decided to take this.
Imagine my surprise when I saw that all Dickens book were sold.
In this moment I thought that I must buy some comedy book because the situation was very hilarious.
I like Luis Piedrahita too much.
I recommend you to toke one.
I like eating it so I wan to travel around Japan to do it.
There are a lot of kinds of ramen in Japan.
I like eating it so I wan to travel around Japan to do it.
Chinese people would have a special feeling when they leave with their friend.
This feeling is some picture would show in your mind.
This is because of the Song Dynasty a man named Liu Yong wrote a poem, and one thousand years later, people have same feeling as past.
For example, if someone often speaks the word 'petrol', they must be a British English speaker.
I've tried this test many times, and mostly the results are correct!
On the other hand, someone usually chooses the word 'tokoya', the speaker will come from East Japan.
Recently I spent a lot of time to listen Luke's English Podcast since I found the App in Google Play store.
All contents of LEP can be accessed behind GFW, I love this bonus feature.
I thought I should spent more time on speaking and writing from now on.
Taking hair style as an example, I've often looked younger than I am and I felt not bad at all every time.
But I recently realized that one of the reason is I always create my fringe.
And then, it makes the others feel clean and tidy to show the forehead and I learned the necessary business manner as business person.
And Honestly, I had thought that I have taken care of my appearance.
Though I sometimes am told that I look smart, I have come to think the design is sometimes judged as gorgeous or it is seen as childish on the contrary.
It's really difficult to care for dressing well 24 hours a day, 365 days a year, I keep in mind to have an appearance that is nothing to be ashamed in public.
When you make the list, please refer the invoice 1.
Invoice 2 is the price for the custom clearance only, so Invoice 2 price is nothing relevant to payment.
A, this case is that I did the sending back repair.
2 is the price of the unit, 1 is the cost of the repair.
It's obvious that which is the billing amount, isn't it?
Recently lestening songs and Touei animetion on the youtube
Today, I wrote two entries because I could write English entres recently.
On a side note, Touei animetion delivery some animetions at the youtube because it is 60 anniversary.
Recently lestening songs and Touei animetion on the youtube
Today, I wrote two entries because I could write English entres recently.
On a side note, Touei animetion delivery some animetions at the youtube because it is 60 anniversary.
There are Sailor Moon, Pretty Cure, Dragon Boll, GeGeGe-No-Kitaro and more.
I might see from what animetions.
Recently lestening songs and Touei animetion on the youtube
There are Sailor Moon, Pretty Cure, Dragon Boll, GeGeGe-No-Kitaro and more.
Today, I wrote two entries because I could write English entres recently.
Not from fear of the antennae of the authorities, but because I had the feeling of disrupting a picture.
I passed on in silence to one of the ski racks, where I brushed the snow of my skis and then buffed the running surfaces, straps and binding with an old cotton cloth.
After everything was dry, I checked the wax layer for defective spots and found a deep scratch on the blade of the left ski.
I had pushed the limits of the snow layer.
I repaired the spot provisionally, before smoothing the edges to ready the skis for the tour the next day.
A couple of days ago, I saw yarn sale online and ordered some.
Before I ordered them, I checked out the color numbers.
I checked out the back up of my order, but I couldn't find it.
Just as we performed the marriage ceremony for our dolls, Azeem, our cousin, ran to us.
Once my mother had told me that Father had married her because he did not want to marry from a Soomra tribe.
Father had more tendency towards Islam than uncle Arbaaz.
In addition to that Father followed local customs, and he was often misguided in many ways by the Imam of mosque.
Now, I'm in Adelaide and I have some homework to make a report.
Also China is the largest partner which Thailand export to.
If you have any advices, please tell me!
I'm too intelligence to be called a mouse.
So don't call me the mouse.
I can't come back here,because I forgot this site.
I can't speak English well.
I don't change befor time.
We need study English,
But some colleagues can speak English.
I don't change befor time.
I'm an accounting from 2015.
But some colleagues can speak English.
Playing video games teaches us about life?
In my country, Japan, especially parents generation do not believe that playing video games teaches us about life because they assume that playing game is just harmful and a waste of time for their kids.
However, I agree with the statement that playing game teaches us about life for following reasons.
Most importantly, in most of video games, the main character is all about you as same as your life.
In RPG games, it is allowed to select your party, skills, ways, etc, and it is all up to you.
Why don`t you go your own way even it is your own life?
That way playing video games make us realized how important to believe that everyone is necessarily the hero of their own life story.
Although there may be disadvantages for playing video games, I strongly believe that playing video games teaches us about life.
Usually, people tend to give up their goal or dream on the way while facing big walls or difficulties in their life.
Nevertheless, they continue to try to beat bosses by training themselves in video games until the end even if the game over happens many times.
Through playing video games, you are learning a practice of overcoming your difficulties instead of just forgiving it.
That is why you should never stop challenging in your life like your video games despite you feel depressed about your life.
Because of these reasons, I insist that playing video games teaches us the important things in our life.
Not only does this help to make you believe yourself in your own life, but also because you can learn how important to keep challenging.
In my country, Japan, especially parents generation do not believe that playing video games teaches us about life because they assume that playing game is just harmful and a waste of time for their kids.
Most importantly, in most of video games, the main character is all about you as same as your life.
It means that you can choose your life as you wish, and you always can be true to yourself because you are the only person who spends your life.
In RPG games, it is allowed to select your party, skills, ways, etc, and it is all up to you.
Why don`t you go your own way even it is your own life?
That way playing video games make us realized how important to believe that everyone is necessarily the hero of their own life story.
In addition, playing video games teaches us that it is vital that once finished setting your goal or dream, you should keep following it until the day you die.
Nevertheless, they continue to try to beat bosses by training themselves in video games until the end even if the game over happens many times.
That is why you should never stop challenging in your life like your video games despite you feel depressed about your life.
In conclusion, I suppose that playing video games teaches us a lot about our life.
It takes two hours to go there as riding time, and plus waiting time.
That means that a socio-pedagogical professional comes to your home and assists you and your family in the education of the children and in different other tasks.
We would like to explain some basics of the social services for families to you:
The company xx assists you by the order of the Youth Welfare Office.
The employee therefore assists you primarily for reaching these goals.
These days, I hardly do the handwriting except my address or name when I need to put in some forms, because I use always computers or digital gadgets to write something.
More than that, I can't believe that I wrote all the papers and essays in longhand those days.
If you want to add or erase even one character, you have to rewrite all from that point.
If all computers and digital gadgets vanish, I will be at a loss totally.
I wonder how could I have memorized over 1000 kanj characters during high school.
More than that, I can't believe that I wrote all the papers and essays in longhand those days.
If you want to add or erase even one character, you have to rewrite all from that point.
Today, I took blood donation at blood mobile.
I was refuse to it for 3years so, I was happy to take donation!
I'll take it at June.
Once, we organized an event that I never forget.
The aim of the event is stirring the proud of country in each person, especially young people.
We reached it through carring out a chain of activities that had a combination of teambuilding games and English.
Is the phrases sounds okay??
Me:"Heart, listen, he is only a friend for me.
I regret to inform you that I will not be able to attend your morning classes from tomorrow on, because of an unexpected twist in my life.
It seems that I just did fine because a few hours ago I was contacted and told I had got the part-time job.
Now, apart from being quite speechless and nervous due to the extremely short time I have had to make a decision, I must admit I am quite happy with this new career opportunity.
Unfortunately, as I said, I will not be able to attend my classes any longer, and this is the negative aspect of the whole matter, and the reason I am addressing to you.
I was planning to sit the IELTS exam in a few months, so do you think I could turn my morning lessons into a more suitable evening course?
Would you possibly suggest anything different?
First of all, I talked about PS4 pro or Nintendo Switch.
I want to recommend PS4 pro.
The first point.
The resolution for mobile mode, which is the sale of the Nintendo switch, is 1280x720 pixels.
In contrast to PS4, PS4 and PS4 Pro both have a resolution of 1920 x1080 pixels.
However PS4 pro is compatible ith 4K so you can play with the game while keeping high picture quality on the TV screen.
The second point.
Since PS4 pro is released before Switch, cassettes are abundant.
However, since Switch sells various softwares from now on, expectation expands.
I am also looking forward to Nintendo Lab released in April.
The third point.
The number of people ho can multiplay is different.
As an example, I chose battlefield from PS4 pro and Mario Kart from Switch and compared it.
While Mario Kart is playing eight players, the battlefield can play with up to 64 players.
Higher number of people makes the game more complicated and doubles the fun.
With the above, I would like to recommend PS4 pro.
If you establish a Japanese record, you can get 100 million yen.
Yuta Shitara established a Japanese record in this race, so he will receive 100 million yen.
If you establish a Japanese record, you can get 100 million yen.
I also want 100 million yen, but I can not run so fast.
If you establish a Japanese record, you can get 100 million yen.
Yuta Shitara established a Japanese record in this race, so he will receive 100 million yen.
I also want 100 million yen, but I can not run so fast.
Back in the days, all the stores on that street were playing jazz.
Neither I nor Peter is forcing her to be perfect.
I was so popular.
A: What is your standard that is popular?
Back in the days, all the stores on that street were playing jazz.
Neither I nor Peter is forcing her to be perfect.
A: What is your standard that is popular?
I did a part-time job at a drugstore in the morning.
I had a few customers than I expected.
It was really nice to take a rest while doing part-time job.
After I finished my job, I went to a cafe in Seoul that is capital of my country to meet an old friend of mine.
I think it would be the last meeting with her because she is going to study in German as an exchange student.
I knew that she's into cosmetics.
So, That's why I decided to buy those things.
Maybe, I should have spent more time with her.
Some time ago I started to go in dance school that named Smile.
At every class we were learned 2 new elements, which everybody, who wants, may repeat at self-training.
It's were very funny, and then were appeared many questions.
Our coaches were explained as every step of every elements.
And then we were trying to dance it with music.
One month later we have evolved from beginners into continuators and elements were become more difficult.
Now we have time to learned only 1 element at each lesson.
But 2 month later count of elements were more then 40 and we were started to record video for each element, which we know.
Now everybody in our group may open video and remember how to do this element.
It's very comfortable at self-training.
On holidays after class we gather at the table with our trainers and celebrating together.
I don't dislike spring, but the pollen allergy is really annoying me.
I feel itching in my eyes, ears, and even throat.
And I always blowing my nose, and have many sneezing all the day.
I really hope that such an annoying season will go over soon...
There are many different opinions that some people are always in a hurry to go places and other people prefer to take their time and live life at a slower pace.
To begin with, there are a lot of social problems such as the recession, an aging society, and declining population.
With the development of technology, we are required to work extra time and holiday work.
We don't have a lot of pastime in modern society.
Therefore, we need to manage our life and a private time.
Also, we need to have a high-quality job as well as the speed of the job.
If I finish a job in a hurry, I can spend a free time.
By getting a job done in a hurry, I can enjoy a free time.
In limited time, We must live our lives.
Also, I visited Ireland in a hurry more than other because I wanted to make friends and see a lot of places in Ireland.
When I started taking a class at a school, I already have made some friends.
Thus, going places in a hurry and getting things done have a positive effect on us.
and get things done.
Life is not only time and also money.
I mean the cryptocurrency will be very popular in the feuture.
Tell me please what we need to have skills for success in the feuture?What we need to learn?
Today, the scent of the Daphne flower smelled.
The cherry blossoms will blow after around 1 month.
My life is normal, so it will not change anymore.
However, scent of flower always gives me a little hope.
It looks saying like this,
It is all right just the way you are."
I hope that I will invite my mother when the Sakura festival will begin.
Today, the scent of the Daphne flower smelled.
The cherry blossoms will blow after around 1 month.
It looks saying like this,
It is all right just the way you are."
I hope that I will invite my mother when the Sakura festival will begin.
It's getting warmer bit by bit.
My life is normal, so it will not change anymore.
Some of the kanji characters dosn't seem like kanji.
I think of two of those kanji characters right now.
You would think they look like puzzle pieces used in the game called Tetris or Pentomino tiling puzzle.
Some of the kanji characters dosn't seem like kanji.
I think of two of those kanji characters right now.
You would think they look like puzzle pieces used in the game called Tetris or Pentomino tiling puzzle.
As for me, that is work, family, friends, music, foods, drinks, cooking, English and so on.
I read some books where such effectivenesses are given by writing diaries.
The people in Lang-8 writes many journals everyday.
Through writing about what I thought, the things which I am truly interested in have been becoming clearer.
When people write a diary, they possibly write about what they are interested in.
Now, I can exactly recognize what I like.
Writing journals brings about not only the improvement of my English skill but also some new recognitions about myself.
What a great job it is!
I read some books where such effectivenesses are given by writing diaries.
The people in Lang-8 writes many journals everyday.
Also they, including me, can read others journals.
Through reading others journals, we can know various things, what's more, we are motivated by the journals.
I'll keep posting on Lang-8 and read various journals.
It's been a while since I posted last here, because I've recently focused on improving my speaking and listening English.
I actually quit taking English online classes and I make opportunities to use English by myself by using an app for language exchange.
By the way, I was into watching an TV drama called "Atypical".
I really liked the story, also I was happy to be able to watch them without subtitles.
Today, I slept as long as holiday.
I gaved them most frequently ideaes of my group at the facility.
There are theme song of different languages of the Disney movie.
First the new book store is as bigger as the store in Pusan.
And It has a better facility, for example, it provides us a personal reading area and even charging place for smart phone.
It was from 7 o'clock twenty to 8 o'clock and a half.
But I could not read all of the book by that time.
She spoke us her idea as if I made it.
Due to it, I didn't be ashamed of myself.
Next meeting will be one month later.
I will read a book.
I had a reading circle today.
It was from 7 o'clock twenty to 8 o'clock and a half.
Each person is expected to read the same book and to speak about their own impression in the meeting.
But I could not read all of the book by that time.
However the meeting's sponsor had known it.
She spoke us her idea as if I made it.
Due to it, I didn't be ashamed of myself.
Next meeting will be one month later.
She asked service counter but could not find it.
So I adviced to her stop credit card and reissued her drivers's licence.
But Here is Japan.
Next day, There was a phone that it was found from store.
My wife said it does not need to stop credit card.
You fell in love with the rabbit that was hidden on the grass.
To day is Tuesday
So I bought ramen and Kimbap
I feel happy to see it kk
Everybody, who are in this room, know history of Frankfurt market very well.
Today, about 100 from countries, about 8000 books business come tu us every year.
Trust is, that these lot companies and about 80000 professional visitors don't come just book market.
In early fifties years they discovered that business opportunities are for their, for example translation.
So, the Frankfurt market became book meeting place of all the world.
Trust is, that these lot companies and about 80000 professional visitors don't come just book market.
For example, when people run into someone in the office in the morning, people just casually say "hey, you look so tried today" and it's just considered as casual as saying "how are you today?".
Also, a lot of people say things like "hey, you look like you put on some weight recently" without even thinking that the other person would take it personally.
People would only mention how good I looked if they were gonna say something about my appearance.
The first thing I heard from my dad when I arrived at the airport from my one year of journey in London was that "oh my, you've gained a lot of weight in London".
No wonder I lost 5 kg within 3 months after I came back to Korea.
Ordinary, I write articles about twice a week. But yesterday, I wrote two articles and transcribe tapes.
Furthermore today,I wrote an article and transcribe tapes.
Because many Japanese company is at the end of the fiscal year on March. I get more orders in February and March.
I don't want to piled up works.
So,the more there are works,the more I work briskly.
Please correct my diary which no one has corrected yet. Because I tend to overlook the correction of an entry which someone has already corrected.
if it's OK with you, please write not only corrections, but also reasons.
I feel happy when you leave comment my newest diary without having to correct.
I'm always seeing things off the wall on this phone.
There's a bear walking towards you right now - you'd better not run.
After I fell off the cliff, I can hardly move.
Since I fell off the cliff, I haven't been able to move.
My dear friend, I don't know how to thank you for destroying my life, you left me alone with no reasons after years we have spent it together I know it is not your mistake but it's mine because I trust you more than anyone in this world I used to be kind with you 
I respected you I gave you all my time and by the end.
you left me, you didn't even think to call me, However, you have been taught me a good lesson.
I am gonna to add it to unforgettable part in my memory 
I promise you I will not think of you or call you and I will remove you from my life as you did, now I have the vision to see other people more clearly.
At the end thank you for making me stronger.
Anybody knows what the animal is called "xolo" in Chinese?
President Xi asked for a non-limit period of being president of China.
However, I think Mao's era can not come back as Chinese people have been well educated from culture revolution which was launched by Mao.
Xi is not so foolish to be against Chinese people.
I think Xi need to concentrate the right of the party to push the reform forward and now he is doing it.
His target should be to change the situation of the party to the state, weaken the right of the party and strengthen the right of the state and finally, China will become a much greater country.
Then, I received larger size pants than that I ordered.
I was irritated because that kind of mistake wasn't the first time on this online shopping mall.
They had called me when my size had been sold out before.
However, they don't call me for informing any more and they just send incorrect size or different colored clothes from that I ordered.
Sometimes, exchanging is a bother thing.
I have to apply for exchanging online, repack it and send back it by delivery service.
Therefore, I sometimes don't exchange and give them to my sisters or my friends.
If so, the online shopping mall doesn't make any loss even if they deliberately send different size or different colored items.
I was irritated because of their continuous mistake that it may be wilful.
I applied for refund online and sent back the larger size pants this time, but they made me very angery.
They didn't refund until I called them twice and asked refund again online.
It wasn't a considerable sum of money, but I hated to let them to lookdown on customers.
Finally, I got back the money today!
He has been searching planets where there are intelligent life forms in the early days of their history, and introduced the foundation of civilization and culture to them.
He finds another planet which might satisfies this requirements, and lands on it.
The residents there wear primitive fur-like clothes and live in caves, like humans of the Stone Age.
More than that he educates them about how to build a house, storage foods, prevent diseases and all.
His robot has a database of huge knowledge and so, using that he can teach anything.
After a few months, the residents begin to live well, learning themselves and stop arguing.
He says that they built a statue with sincere gratitude and wants him to take a gander.
I watched a video of Smosh on Youtube.
I could understand almost whole English on the video
but I cannot understand the quote at 3:22.
I would appreciate you if could tell me that.
This video contains violent languages in some parts.
Lets thinking what to do.
First thinking.
The reason why house owner hesitates about the foreigner.
For that matter, a unified variational principle consistent with former studies would be of significance.
Today I have an appointment so I have to leave here at 10 to 12:00.
It was very interesting weekend!
My girlfriend came to my from Nizhny Novgorod.
We were also in a cafe where make color coffee!
It's a latte where add multi-colored syrups with unusual tastes.
I have drunk orange color coffee with blueberry taste!
My girlfriend have drunk blue coffee with tastes of a chocolate and almonds!
It was very unusual drinks.
We liked it.
I went to a hair salon to redo.
I got a perm a few days ago, but it was too soft, so I needed to get it tighten.
It is difficult to tell what I want to be like to sylest.
The hair salon can redo for free within 7 days of previous procedure, but they charge you when they do different precudure.
"Ten Thousand Fists" is their 3rd album released in 2005.
Through the whole album, all instruments plays heavy rythym together which make the listeners feel like to headbang.
My favorite tune is the first song of this album which has same title with the album.
The vocal keeps long note powerfully, and makes me want to raise my fist in the air like its title says.
Through the whole album, all instruments plays heavy rythym together which make the listeners feel like to headbang.
My favorite tune is the first song of this album which has same title with the album.
Distrubed is a heavy metal band which was formed in Chicago.
She talks to me in Spanish and I as well.
I dont think that she is ever serious about meeting me because she doesnt talk alot and takes a long time to reply.
If she were serious about meeting me, she would do the extra mile to get to know me.
I joked one of my colleague who ate 2 hotdogs in the lunch time 'You have to run 4 hours of running machine because of the two hotdogs'
Recently I feel pain in shoulder joint sometimes.
I thought shoulder pain is related with the wrong sleeping posture.
I will lie down straight when I sleep.
Umbrellas serve a purpose to get people avoid getting wet from the rain.
Sometime, Our life doesn't flow as we want, and we should come to term with it.
I've never deal with this kinds of situation, I hope I will work through it well.
Great leaders always try to take people's opinions into account, whenever they make decisions.
Which one do you recommend to say?
Are those correct?
Which one do you recommend to say?
I like playing the piano, I'm not very good at it though.
Are those correct?
How do you treat when you get a cold?
I think it depends on the country or area.
For example, in Japan, it's common to drink isotonic drink but I've heard drinking coke is a popular way in plenty of areas.
Washington Square by Henry James
I've finished reading just now.
I understand this is the reality.
We can't dream a fantasy even in the novel.
I'm really happy that they experience Japanese cultures.
I don't understand why non-Japanese wearing kimono are criticized.
I'm actually very happy that they experience Japanese cultures.
I agree with Jun 100 percent.
I don't understand why non-Japanese wearing kimono are criticized.
I'm actually very happy that they experience Japanese cultures.
I hoped she would get the first prize, but another Russian player defeated her good rival by a hair.
Medvedeva has made great efforts to do a better performance on the ice every day for years, and her emotional dance always attracts a lot of audience.
The other day, I came across a YouTube video showing what kind of exhibition performance she did in Japan last year.
She is such a big fan of 'Sailor Moon' that she danced to the opening music of the anime in a cute costume as if she became a Sailor Moon itself.
A lot of Japanese students make a mistake like "I think ~ not."
"I think ~ not" is much closer to Japanese expression so I don't feel such weird.
But contact us as our reference to know the number of users if you wish to stay overnight.
Chessboard has a checker pattern.
Plus chessman has various shape which is really cool.
On the other hand, the piece of Shogi all look the same.
The rules of the chess is much more easier than Shogi.
On Shogi you can use the piece you took, which makes Shogi difficult.
On chess you can attack dynamically.
The move of chess piece is much more stronger than Shogi pieces.
Chess man looks really cool.
It is earlier to get to your destination when we take an airplane than a ship.
A: Sorry, I don't know him.
I went to an old-line Cat cafe "Nekonomise" because I had time.
We can read books and interact with cats there.
By the way, they seem sleepy because of they just finished feeding.
"My condition has already settled down."
"Hey, are you already alright to come back to your desk?"
It's my wish to come back to my work.
Please carry on your work."
"My condition has already settled down."
It's my wish to come back to my work.
"Hey, are you already alright to come back to your desk?"
"I'm OK.
It's my wish to come back to my work.
"No way.
We drunk a cup of zunda smoothie.
We drunk a cup of zunda smoothie.
My wife also seemed to be sleepy and be dull all day.
I have been sleepy since yesterday morning.
It is very warm yesterday and today.
It is warm autumn day.
I do't want snow to melt, but I like to get warm.
They had never expected to lose her so sudden like this.
Actually, he brought several Japanese ladies to his room one by one before her.
I wondered why she was killed, not others.
Why did he killed such an innocent lady who just came to see him?
The police found out all those ladies and confirmed that they are safe.
I hope they had a good lesson from this.
It's really sad to say not to believe others, but in this society, many bad people, so we should be careful.
If he told you that he wants to meet you alone, I guess it's better not to meet.
My sincere condolence to the family who lost their loving daughter!
I got sudden deafness last year.
I surprised very much. But, I have gotten a lot better now.
Ryotaro Shiba is one of the most famous novelist who have written historical novels.
He has more influence on Japanese people's view of the history than any other historians or researchers do.
I got sudden deafness last year.
I surprised very much.
I Started Talking A Singing Lesson!
Whenever they say, "Let's go to Karaoke!", I feel uncomfortable.
I like music very much and I wanted to sing well.
I decided to take a singing lesson to solve my problem.
As for me, it worth to pay!
I can't wait for the time when I go to karaoke with my foreigner friends!!
Most of my French friends really like to sing at Karaoke but I'm not good at singing.
Whenever they say, "Let's go to Karaoke!", I feel uncomfortable.
It was an amazing lesson.
As for me, it worth to pay!
I can't wait for the time when I go to karaoke with my foreigner friends!!
I will sing MUCH better than before.
Right now I am thinking if I should change the job.
One from Australia, one from Indonesia and one from Middle East.
If one of them can cooperate with me, it is probably I will have a stable customer who will give me regular orders.
Introduce myself
I am a sophomore in the department of agronomy in NCYU.
It is earlier to get on an airplane than a ship.
The port of airplanes are on the ground and ships are on the coast.
You can choose which to take depend on where you travel.
Five years ago I wanna get high score at TOEIC, and I would always study English grammer and words.
But my motivation decreased little by little and I stopped to study someday.
Now, my motivation regenerated, so I restarted studying English.
I believe I can do whatever I want if I make sufficient effort.
A man whose eyelids were both with greenish-purple around came back from the work.
Then I found the skirt was sandwiched between her butts, so I just pulled it for her.
What happened?
A man whose eyelids were both with greenish-purple around came back from the work.
Then I found the skirt was sandwiched between her butts, so I just pulled it for her.
My friend from arizona told me the story.
While her and family want to visit El Paso of texas, but they go to Mexico....
No border between both countries?
Actually they are native american, so Mexico sent them back to US.
Second, the number of the users.
Third, the number of letters we can use.
First, It is easy to send out information.
The number of Twitter users is 45 millions.
So you can connect with more people when we use Twitter.
Third, we can get much information on the Twitter.
First, reality.
Humanoid robot with AI, artificialization of animals and plants, battle of human vs AI, all these things will come true and we will face them in the future.
Therefore, we can learn from this novel how to coexist with science in the future, more specifically AI.
Is it a murder to destroy a robot with intelligence and feelings?
Does the robot have human rights?
What is the meaning of this bizarre title?
Speech Preparation
Do you think snow is a fantasy?
After this speech you will be able to learn about the troubles of living in snow country.
Commuting to workplace and to school takes a lot of time than in any other seasons.
If it snows hard, we have to come the second floor.
Study English my way.
While I'm going to office, I study Engilish time.
When I ride on the train, I read a manga was drew english.
when I walk to office, I listen to youtube english comunication.
and lunch time, I'm writing diary now.
This is my one day.
I went to took my dog out for a walk in this morning.
It took an hour to that.
The dishes in this restaurant is good!
Food in this restaurant is good
Dishes in this restaurant is good
It doesn't matter if I'm interested in you.
Also, I know there are some possibilities that we can speak some other languages like a native speaker depending on our efforts or environments surrounding us.
So, I can understand how well you can speak English once I've talked to you.
I really think your attitude that you show your own native language on your personal page is very good!
Actually, you have the right to choose it.
I feel like I'm mentioning a meaningless thing...
However, I just tried to write what came to mind now.
Native speakers don't care about how the English phrase consist of because they can make the correct sentences naturally.
To be fair, I couldn't explain Japanese to my international friend this morning.
But, he knew the Japanese grammar we were talked about without the explanations haha.
How smart he is.
I have totally changed my hairstyle, but I'm worried that my girlfriend will like it.
This month, I have paid too much for others, not for me.
I agree with the idea that in the stories of movies and TV programs, good people should be rewarded, and bad people should be punished.
Children can be easily affected by TV programs and movies, and they can learn a lot from stories of TV programs and movies, such as the importance of being good.
For example, we have a famous tale in Japan, called "a rabbit and a turtle." This story has been broadcasted again and again on TV for many decades, so almost all of Japanese people, including children, watch and know this story.
The rabbit was able to run much faster than the turtle was, so the rabbit went far from turtle soon after the race started.
After the rabbit could not see the turtle behind him, the rabbit felt ease, became inattentive, and started to nap because of his overconfidence.
I believe that the lesson of this story is that it is great to do something constantly and diligently even if we are not good at doing it, and people who do that should be rewarded.
The major reason is that we can learn from stories where good people are rewarded, and bad people are punished.
For example, we have a famous tale in Japan, called "a rabbit and a turtle." This story has been broadcasted again and again on TV for many decades, so almost all of Japanese people, including children, watch and know this story.
The turtle overtook the sleeping rabbit, but the rabbit did not realize that.
I agree with the idea that in the stories of movies and TV programs, good people should be rewarded, and bad people should be punished.
The major reason is that we can learn from stories where good people are rewarded, and bad people are punished.
We often watch TV programs and movies, and the influence on us is huge.
Children can be easily affected by TV programs and movies, and they can learn a lot from stories of TV programs and movies, such as the importance of being good.
For example, we have a famous tale in Japan, called "a rabbit and a turtle." This story has been broadcasted again and again on TV for many decades, so almost all of Japanese people, including children, watch and know this story.
The rabbit was able to run much faster than the turtle was, so the rabbit went far from turtle soon after the race started.
After the rabbit could not see the turtle behind him, the rabbit felt ease, became inattentive, and started to nap because of his overconfidence.
Skimming over the list of questions that has been given the past English speaking exams, I start worrying what if I have to talk about sports for 2 minutes, because I don't know anything.
I haven't paid any attention to anything relating to sports so far.
and luckily I live near Tokyo, so we would be able to feel the atmosphere of anticipation.
I need to talk more...
Skimming over the list of questions that has been given the past English speaking exams, I start worrying what if I have to talk about sports for 2 minutes, because I don't know anything.
I haven't paid any attention to anything relating to sports so far.
For example, this is one of the expected questions, "What benefits do international sporting events bring?"
Hmm, maybe I am supposed to talk something about Olympics.
All the transportation will become more convenient and useful for foreigners, 
and luckily I live near Tokyo, so we would be able to feel the atmosphere of anticipation.
What benefits do international sporting events bring?
Hmm, maybe I am supposed to talk something about Olympics.
All the transportation will become more convenient and useful for foreigners, 
and luckily I live near Tokyo, so we would be able to feel the atmosphere of anticipation.
I need to talk more...
Fear of crypto currency.
I found related some movie when I browsing some movie on Youtube.
The title is 'my currency is thefted'.
I watch the movie.
She said police and exchange ignored me even if I report it.
Her damage cost is 20,000 yen.
I fear crypto currency.
He rises early every morning and studies for one hour, then go to work.
Hello.
After this speech you might like Japan a little more than before.
Foreign food is heavy and has a poor vocabulary.
However the Japanese food is not only good in taste, but an appearance.
In Japan, the public things including roads and the restrooms are hygienic.
The mind of the hospitality of Japan is splendid.
Actually, the service of Japan is popular among foreigners.
This book said the reason.
I just read only first and second chapters.
The way of thinking, "Rhythm of rice cultivation" was interesting and fresh for me.
I am 17 years old japanese girl.
I will graduate from high school in March 1st.
But I get wrong I have friends.
I probably be alone commencement ceremony.
Why I have no friends?
My niece is four years old, and she has went to nursery school since last year.
My smartphone standby display is a piacture of her.
When she was one year old, she looked her father but now her mother.
She imitates komedians apearing on TV.
If you hear this theme, you enjoy going to these places.
Second, ingredient of the water.
Third, hot springs make us happy.
Although hot water of public baths are artificial water, hot springs are natural water.
Lastly, I feel happy when I go hot springs.
Hot springs make us happy but public bath only make us warm.
While hot water of public bath is tap water, hot water of hot springs are natural water.
Then, I told you about ingredient.
While public bath has no ingredient, hot springs have some ingredients.
For example, sulfur and acidic springs.
While public bath makes us only warm, hot springs make us relaxed.
I may transfar to phillipine braunch abroad.
I have two anxiouses.
One of my anxiety is leaving my recent job and people in my work.
I like my job of now and people are so kind, and I always take care of me.
I was disappointed with myself.
I have negative thought everytime.
I am tend to think about tasks to do next when someone suggest one idea.
But someone have positive thinking is tend to do first.
I should change my mind positive.
If so, I will have more chance for success.
As you know, snowboarding has several ways to enjoy.
First of all, you can ride down a big mountain, which is not maintained.
You can feel the fresh snow and enjoy wonderful natural view.
Or you also can jump and turn around at the specjal place called 
"Halfpipe".
By the way, I never did such a dangerous move, but I enjoyed watching snowboarding games of the olympics.
I do believe this application would give the chance, to a potential candidate, to explore further possible results, to play in a fully immersed experience, adopt new point of views and methods, exchange from the environments and their member and nonetheless create ideas.
I want to talk with foreign people in various countries, that is one of my purposes of learning English.
Sightseeings are good,too.
I can see beautiful and huge sight which I can't see in Japan.
Travellings are great.
My wife and I have been to Turkey on honeymoon.
We could see some huge sights and had a few friends there.
We enjoyed eating local cuisines and shopping.
However, we have not taken any trips recently, so we want to take one.
What is the most important when you take a trip?
As for me, that is sightseeing.
I'm sure that I can enjoy trips more if I could speak English fluently.
Imagining that I have many friends all over the world is very exciting for me.
I hope I can meet Lang-8 friends in reality someday.
With him it's safe to take a spin in my ride.
It looks like rain is comming.
I need a some hot tea.
How about you.
Has the instant food improved the way people live?
Contemporary, there are so many instant food all over the world.
The kinds of food are various, for example rice balls, sandwiches, hamburgers, noodles and so on.
We can buy everywhere like convenience stores or super markets opening 24 hours.
In my opinion, the instant food has definitely improved our lives.
Let's imagine the situation that a working mother has just got back to home at night and has to prepare the dinner for their children who are already starving.
In the ancient time, she has to start with raw materials.
However, thanks to the frozen vegetables and ready meals, she could get the dinner ready for a short time, which leads to extend her relaxing time after the meal.
Using the instant foods, we can enjoy much more free time than ever without them.
Also I consider it very important that less injuries like cuts with the knives or burned with the fires are happened if we use the instant foods.
Today, I had a change jobs interview after work.
I want to quickly end this activity.
Working for other people can be a good thing what allows you to become a good professional.
When you begin from the scratch the fact of going into a company where you can find lots of experienced people who you can learn a lot make the path faster to become a professional.
But in some point, you discover that most of the time you are the person who are teaching to the others.
But this also makes you think that if you are good enough to teach people maybe you can be good enough too to run your own business.
Besides running your own business can allow you to increase your standard of living and scheduled your own time to do it compatible with your life off the working.
I feel so good when I'm here that I don't want to come back home.
I'm waiting in the airport Roissy-Charles-Degaulle.
In the first sentences the reader gets to know some insights and impressions about the employee Mae and her trip to the Francisco Bay.
After all, she is convinced that knowledge is a basic human right that everyone should have access to it.
We can watch well Squirrels in "Squirrel's Path" because we can enter there.
Afternoon I went to a supermarket.
I felt a little embarrassed, because I don't have girlfriend.
She had her teeth pulled out yesterday, it bled a lot, so she didn't feel like talking too much.
Afternoon I went to a supermarket.
The clerk asked me that did I come to buy chocolate.
I just bought a starbuck can coffee.
From the given excerpt we learn that is Mae a young employee at a tech company called Circle.
One day, she is going on a secret trip to San Francisco Bay with a stolen kayak.
More than that, she perfectly accepts the hard criticism because she admits that she behaved very egoistically.
Yesterday, I went over to my friend's house, who is a Japanese but grew up in the US.
His first language is English, but he speaks Japanese the almost natural way.
I asked him to say it again, because the name of the company he mentioned sounded unfamiliar to me.
Something occurred to him, and he said to me in Japanese that it was Zurich pronouncing "Chu-Ri-Hi".
I don't know why, but we call the company or the city that way.
I can't believe because there's nothing in common how to call it between two languages.
There are many words like that such as Athens and Vienna.
I think it makes studying English more tough for us.
I back in Japan for year!
I was really want to back to japan when I am in Germany.
always I think there is good things in where not here.
So I do enjoy at now and sometime I miss something as not now.
Today was my holiday and I want to utilize that time for my personal work but due to whole day power cut I am not able to do anything.
It was my fault that I am not charged up my laptop and mobile.
Whose known that today will gonna be load shedding.
Drugs Epidemic
Thousands of people dying for overdose every year.
It is thought that is not going to be a quick solution, so the autorities expect the problem will last for at least two decades.
It seems that the issue started with doctors prescribing painkillers in a not very addecuate way, at least not forseeing the addition of this type of drugs.
Trying to stop the health problem the autorities and the health system begun to reduce the prescription of these medicaments, so people who are addited turn to sustitutes and go to the black martket for them.
It was more related with poor and marginalize people who went into drugs as a way to escape their situation.
Many youngs lost their lifes in that period, whole families were affected and it was a really hard time.
In this days, there is no marginalize people who are using these drugs, is just people trying to cope with the effects of other drugs as cocaine and syntetic drugs.
I hope, that the authorities and the goverment forsee this problem and take the needed steps to avoid a major health problem.
I shovelled snow and I snovelled snow and I snovelled snow and I was very tired every day.
The snow mounnd is about 80 cm height.
1.'Barbie Doll' respects an aspect of a distorted beauty that is standardized and strange.
The third party looking a girl
Sometimes, I've got this feeling as if I had been growing up in a carefree daydream.
The months end were always trying us.
Around my tenth years, times became particularly difficult.
Actually, it's also because my parents couldn't feed us anymore with the only pay of my father that my mother went in Castres to open her shop.
At night, on his luggage rack, he brought back at home a cartboard box fulled with the suits that had to be tried or delivered.
Thanks to my mother's new urban relations, he could gradually have some extra customers in Castres.
The skeletons of the almost leafless trees swayed back and forth, their shadows synchronously gliding over the ground.
Amidst this bustle of silently gliding shadows and stirred-up, rustling leaves I suddenly noticed a shape.
It was standing, motionless, at the bottom of the stairs that led to the backdoor of the inn, staring into the sky.
I had the TOEIC exam on January 28th, and yesterday I receive the results.
I ran out of time and couldn't finish the exam, but my score was pretty better than I expected.
I think I prepared enough for it.
Anyway, I'm glad I could know my English level, even though TOEIC may not reflect my true skills.
Honestly, I'm satisfied with my results because there are room for improvement.
My goal is to speak English fluently as native speakers do but I'm not there yet.
At least, this is the result of my work last two years.
I started studying two years ago, but I forgot when I actually started it.
She was my English teacher but now we're friends.
Now, I'm relieved.
I stayed up late to study for it.
Well, I can say it's more worthwhile than studying.
Anyway, I'm glad I could know my English level, even though TOEIC may not reflect my true skills.
Hmm, actually I would be liying If I said I'm satisfied with my results.
She was my English teacher but now we're friends.
I had the TOEIC exam on January 28th, and yesterday I receive the results.
I ran out of time and couldn't finish the exam, but my score was pretty better than I expected.
I stayed up late to study for it.
Well, I can say it's more worthwhile than studying. U-uh you know, the manga's kind of like a textbook of life.
Hmm, actually I would be liying If I said I'm satisfied with my results.
I started studying two years ago, but I forgot when I actually started it.
She was my English teacher but now we're friends.
My husband has been doing job hunting lately.
He has been studying even harder than usual in order to be hired in new field.
He has worked in branch of American firm in Japan.
He is thinking to move to foreign firm in Japan this time, too
He is going to be interviewed in English, so he has been studying most of his time currently.
However, he has been struggled with making an answering script for the interview that he can not make it the way native English speaker makes.
Stimulated by him, I have been studying English by outputting and memorizing new words.
I think so-to-speak teachers' roles are mainly two things, sharing their knowledge with students and supporting students who try hard to advance toward their goals both educationally and mentally.
They always pleasantly tell children not only knowledge, wisdom and tips, but also their experiences that they consider are good for children to know.
Even those are shameful and embarrassing for parents themselves.
Who else except for parents can tell us the ashamed stories in their ever lives?
That kind of stories is usually the best advise for the young.
Additionally, needless to say, parents always support their children, especially mentally.
And also, they grasp deeply about the strong points and weak points of their children.
Parents are the only existences which can guide us toward the short-cut to the goal based on our individual characteristics.
When I study English by myself, I usually write first and then I listen some english TV program, often about cars or houses.
Every episode has different protagonists, some of them speak very clear so I can understand pretty everything, but other ones speak quickly and with slang so I don't understand anything.
In those cases I stop the video and I repeat many times the sentence I haven't understood but there isn't anything to do, I don't understand.
I don't get discouraged and I continue to train my listening.
Language learning - is my passion.
Through the language I can learn more about people and their culture.
So, that`s what I`m basically doing.
My hobbies apart from languages: fiction and self-development books, bodybuilding, psychology, poetry, chess, philosophy.
As regards your studies.
Except to Japan.
People lies and another who say truth hurt, where is the justice then?
Manners are a way to showing respect and kindness for another people.
We will be perceiving in better way if we will behave well.
Everyone should be respectable and also respect others because everyone want to feel good in that world with people, not alone.
slowly went back to my life prior meeting my Dwarf friend and hearing all that rubbish about those hidden libraries.
I've been tracking Tim's behavior lately and it's been a letdown for me.
He needs to dispel all his preposterous fantasies about the people in the office fostering innuendo against him.
Psychologically speaking, he's heading off for a very dangerous trip.
His nascent paranoia probably stems from his love for drama.
He's always on the quest for excuses to play the victim.
If he blocks you and gets angry, stand your ground, pick up the story.
If you feed your imagination with distressing falsehood, as the result of that, you will become nuts.
He'll eventually become incapable of zeroing in on any realistic or constructive criteria, when the time to benchmark ourselves against our competitors comes.
His strategies, so important for us, will stop being actionable.
They will lose the breadth and depth that we need in them.
No siree bob.
We can't allow this problem to degenerate.
Solve this, even if you have to walk him through a primer in mental strategies to block his paranoia.
Tell him he needs to shed his old mental models.
I think many people would not be even able to easily remind how they looked.
When it comes to spiritual objects, however, the story seems to be qualitatively different.
It is much harder to make one of such objects go away.
Far more importantly, one enters the theater with the feelings very similar to those that their distant ancestors had before the start of the performance, say, 200 years ago.
Even if one prefers to read from an e-reader rather than feel physical paper pages and flick through them, this does not mean at all that they have never bought paper books before, or will never buy them on occasion.
For example, dataism, the novel trend which is the product of computer sciences and modern biology, argues that the dataflow is, or is about to become, the most valuable thing in the twenty-first century.
Material world versus spiritual sphere
Carriages were completely replaced with the mass production of cars.
No one is using horse-drawn carriages as a mode of transport nowadays.
When it comes to spiritual objects, however, the story seems to be qualitatively different.
It is much harder to make one of such objects go away.
For instance, the rise of the cinema could not significantly affect the theater, just as the Internet did not manage to 'destroy' newspapers or radio.
But after a while the balance was restored; those who sincerely loved watching theatre performances returned to their favourite pastime.
Far more importantly, one enters the theater with the feelings very similar to those that their distant ancestors had before the start of the performance, say, 200 years ago.
I am just thinking that maybe this law is called a double sinusoid, because a process concerning the spititual sphere, no matter what it is, first experiences a downward trend which is usually followed by an increase, and it may continue this way.
Such considerations may lead, or at least, contribute to the idea about the infinite and somewhat special nature of the spiritual sphere in contrast to the totality of objects constituting the material world.
To put it in another way, novel things appearing in the spiritual kingdom neither prevent the old ones from prospering nor make them obsolete or superfluous.
Even if one prefers to read from an e-reader rather than feel physical paper pages and flick through them, this does not mean at all that they have never bought paper books before, or will never buy them on occasion.
As for my opinion, I think that all this sounds, at least to some extent, convincing for us, contemporary humans.
For example, dataism, the novel trend which is the product of computer sciences and modern biology, argues that the dataflow is, or is about to become, the most valuable thing in the twenty-first century.
Seeing this page, the number of patients with flu is reducing:
On Friday, my wife got a fever and I brought her to the doctor the next day.
The doctor said she caught the flu and she had to rest.
Needless to say, I have to do almost all the house chores.
I hope she will get fine today.
Seeing this page, the number of patients with flu is reducing:
On Friday, my wife got a fever and I brought her to the doctor the next day.
The doctor said she caught the flu and she had to rest.
The doctor said she caught the flu and she had to rest.
Needless to say, I have to do almost all the house chores.
Hey fever season has arrived in Japan.
I heard there is a lot of cedar and cypress pollen in the air in the area where I live now.
I hope this medicine will enable me to spend this season comfortably.
This book very impressed me when I read it a few years ago.
It is the most influential book for me, because this story is a metaphor of limited and spiritual poverty which are able to kill everything living and creative.
I think that is the best book of Marquez.
This book about incredible patience and dignity.
These novels about journalist who works in one Soviet newspaper and protests against the unconscious absurdity of the Soviet life.
It is an interesting story about nature of humanity which was shown through the incident with the bus which lost its way and got stuck in the mud.
It is about little boys who live the opposite evolution, turning from civilized children into savages who are able to kill.
The story of freedom, which implies responsibility, and the fact that youth and innocence aren't synonymous.
It will be interesting if you answer these questions: What is your top-5 list of favourite books?
What book is the most influential for you?
This book very impressed me when I read it a few years ago.
It is the most influential book for me, because this story is a metaphor of limited and spiritual poverty which are able to kill everything living and creative.
I think that is the best book of Marquez.
These novels about journalist who works in one Soviet newspaper and protests against the unconscious absurdity of the Soviet life.
Dovlatov has an original sense of humor and he is also a subtle philosopher.
It is an interesting story about nature of humanity which was shown through the incident with the bus which lost its way and got stuck in the mud.
It is about little boys who live the opposite evolution, turning from civilized children into savages who are able to kill.
The story of freedom, which implies responsibility, and the fact that youth and innocence aren't synonymous.
The less time I have, the more time I want to spend time to read books.
I might do it for a change unconsciously.
The less time I have, the more time I want to spend time to read books.
I might do it for a change unconsciously.
I watched a nighttime Dolphin performance in Aqua Park Shinagawa.
That was fantastical because which mixed with beautiful Projection mapping.
Thank you for your performance.
I think you told me before that it was getting better so why you can't be back to gym?
The problem is how can I travel there with him without anybody knows.
Anyway, I told him I'm not sure if I can meet him so I think he got the message that I'm not keen to do so.
Btw, Safy didn't like the idea to travel with him to Aswan.
This was an extra reason why I told him that.
Is it ok in western culture people who like each other or are friends to send nudes or show intimate parts of body during video calls?
While another Holland one said 'it happens but not normal and people who do it either pervert or stupid'.
So what do you think?
Hello, I'm currently preparing for English exam.
I really need help correcting my writing, it's little bit long tho!This is my essay below with question.
Issues regarding new traffic developments are always hot potato since lots of profits are related with it.
Some people insists governments should invest more on railway construction rather than roads for public benefits, while others disagree with the statement.
In my opinion, it is more beneficial to develop railways and detail reasons will be discussed in this essay.
Firstly, good public transport infrastructure contributes to improve environment.
In detail, people would prefer to use public transport than own vehicles if they can easily access to remote region by public transport.
Because they can save not only money but also time instead of driving.
As a result, decrease of car using rate may reduce air pollution.
As a similar case, Copenhagen, the most famous city for a lot of bicycle commuters by developing bike lanes, got clean air condition.
Secondly, improvement of public transportation is essential for balanced regional development.
To be specific, having better connection to other cities brings regional economic boom.
It shortened the way to Gangwondo, only taking 2 hours from Seoul station.
Although the Olympics was over, this railway is expected to carry a lot of travelers and stimulate economic growth in this district by experts.
Thus it is reasonable that government should allocate more budget on railway for the future.
It was impossible for you to tell if they were lying at you or not.
I was working in the school 1 year.
I decided to quit this job because I make small money there and I very difficult to work with childs 13-15 year old.
This job is require a patience,love to difficult childs.
For one year working I realized that this job is not for me.
School teacher in the Russia is not honorable and in your country?
How much make money school teacher in your country?
One of American friends spoke to my French friend in English but with French accent deliberatetly.
He said he does so as he loves everything about France, including their English accent.
But I remember he took more than a little red wine then.
I'm planning to go there on March, 2019.
However, since the travel fee for trip to Hawaii is very expensive, I'm looking for any way to go to Hawaii cheaper.
In addition, I'm concerning that it is difficult to go abroad accompanied with two children.
However, since the travel fee for trip to Hawaii is very expensive, I'm looking for any way to go to Hawaii cheaper.
In addition, I'm concerning that it is difficult to go abroad accompanied with two children.
I have traveled to Taipei this time, but I want to go to Taipei next time.
Noble and villain,
Among certainty and doubtful,
Out of mind and remained in mind,
Too away and too near...
Eternal and mortal...
Today I learned about the quantum mechanics and thought myself unenlightened in this field.
I hope to learn more knowledge about physics.
The main meaning is to study continuously.
The last time i made a post here, on Lang-8, was a long time ago.
Many things has changed since then.
I also found a job on a space research enterprise, where I work as Java developer, nowadays.
I also brok eup with my gf and I really dont know how to feel about it, yet.
It's pretty strange how things can change so quickly in lifetime.
this was my life change in this last year passed by away from lang-8.
Have you already buy a ticket?
There are several subway line in Ginza Station.
Ginza subway line is yellow line on the subway map.
Please do not take different line.
Asakusa Station is 10th Station from Ginza Station.
It will take about 15 minutes on the train.
If you have any trouble, Please ask to a train staff on the paid fare zone or on the platform.
There were a lot of people station.
Right now, I'm watching the TV.
The quantity of snow in this island during last winter made new record.
The temperature as well.
I felt spring is coming.
We might be on the border of seasons.
I was not able to take walk in the morning due to oversleeping.
There was something new which I started form today.
I decided to wear only two color clothes, black and white.
It definitely makes my choice for buying and wearing cloth easy.
How do you think about a man who ware only white shirts and black pants?
I didn't feel like I was alive for the last couples weeks because I was paranoid that the cancer came back.
I went back to the hospital to take another scan and then, I had to more test whether cancer sells or not.
I was scared to death when I was having a test and waiting for the all results.
I didn't feel like I was alive for the last couples weeks because I was paranoid that the cancer came back.
I was scared to death when I was having a test and waiting for the all results.
I really hope spring will come soon as I'm getting fed up with wearing jumper, caot, scarf and gloves....
I am a 5 years cancer survivor.
I didn't feel like I was alive for the last couples weeks because I was paranoid that the cancer came back.
I went back to the hospital to take another scan and then, I had to more test whether cancer sells or not.
I was scared to death when I was having a test and waiting for the all results.
I really hope spring will come soon as I'm getting fed up with wearing jumper, caot, scarf and gloves....
I had a stomachache that probably by Dumplings
I ate dumplings at dinner, after a while I had a stomahache...
I think it is due to dumplings absolutely but I don't care even now because it is getting better.
I learned from this case that I suppose to heat thoroughly from next time.
Playing TRPG is a lot of fun
TRPG is just like a electronic role play game.
In electronic RPG, the game already have a story and the game player follows the scripts written by game maker.
The game also have exquisite portraits, scenes and beautiful musics, used to inspire the player to imagine a different world.
Although TRPG is not so exquisite as electronic games, it has an ultimate freedom for players to take advantage of their imaginations.
Also I make a lot of friends playing TRPG, who have an imaginative yet positive attitude towards life.
My father was born in Niigata prefecture, where winter sports are popular, that's why I used to go to a skiing ground, and playing with a sledge when I was a child.
Firstable, I enjoyed skiing, but eventually I got interested in snowboarding, and I thought that snowboarders are so cool.
Recently the working environment start to change in Japan, but still, many executives think that employees are required a royalty of their company.
In my experience, I can recommend you to switch another job in few years.
Even if you switch the job in the same industry, there are many different things.
and no need to say, different people are working in another office.
That will change your mind, and helps to understand the thought of another people.
I'm sure you can get another aspect of work.
I am going to sever some friends.
Recently I am thinking about it is not to need any more the relationship that is shallow and light.
As the quality of relationship is more important than the quantity.
#451 Strange new insect species discovered in Amazon rainforest
A strange new insect species has been discovered in Amazon rainforest.
A team led by Harvard professor Rita Nelson has announced they have discovered a new species of butterfly on Monday.
Nelson, her team was wondering in the Tsuck Fov district, when they unexpectedly found a butterfly that looked completely different from any known species---it had sharp teeth and claws, just like iguanas.
They later confirmed that it did not belong to any known species of butterflies.
Today, I am talking about a least faovorite teacher.
Well,I have many subject why I hate him so I talk about some of them.
Recently,I got a test he is in charge of.
Its score was 47.
This score was not so bad but additionally he imposed homework on me.
Only on me he imposed additional homework to do.
Because I hate him.
Please correct my sentense
Resolutions in new year 
The spring festival of 2018 has over.
It's my first day back to job.
One of my colleagues was promated to be a team leader because of his fluent English.
But I have flushed my learning passions down the toilet.
I'm so sadly.
So here is my new year resolutions:learn English 
I NEED TO SLEEP, I'M VERY TIRED MY DAUGHTER KEPT ME UP ALL NIGHT; SHE HAS SIX MONTH AND SHE HAS TROUBLE SLEEPING DURINGTHE NIGHT.
SOMETIMES SHE FALL ASLEEP SUDDENLY BUT WHEN I PUT HER TO BED SHE AWAKE AND AFTER IT'S GOING TO TAKE ME ANOTHER COUPLE OF HOURS TO GET HER BACK DOWN.
IF SOMEONE OTRHER THAN RIGHT MY WRONG HAVE AN ADVICE FOR THE SLEEP OF MY DAUGHTER, I GLADLY ACCEPT IT.
THANK
You got schooled by someone who hasn't played as much as you has.
You got schooled by someone who hasn't played as much as you do.
Have you ever had such a beautiful dream that you strive in your half-sleep to hold on to every single second?
I had this fantastic dream last night, that kind of dreams which you just don't want to forget.
"What did you dream about", you may ask.
It is about murderous lipstick used by an android and brown "Rose", descendents of the Doctor and genetic mutations.
Last week end I went to Shiga Kogen in Nagano prefecture to ski.
This place is one of the most popular ski resort in Japan.
The reasons for the popularity are following.
Because Shiga Kogen is located above the mountain which is over 3280.84 feet, it's very cold and the snow won't melt.
It's too vast to play all courses in one day.
Skier can move easily between each ski resorts by transferring the lift.
In this time, I was surprised to know that many foreign skier visits Shiga Kogen.
Twenty years ago, there wasn't foreign skier.
It's great for foreign skier to visit Shiga Kogen.
In Japan, the number of skiers are decreasing every year and the number of ski resort that is closed are increasing.
Visiting Japanese ski resort helps for ski resort to survive.
Thank you foreign skier!!!!
Yesterday was the 8th of my eldest daughter's birthday.
These days, I was busy, so I haven't drunk at all.
Today, I'm drinking after my son went to bed!HAHA!!
Aaand, I'm so happy with this relax time!
Today, I'm drinking after my son went to bed!HAHA!!
Aaand, I'm so happy with this relax time!
Curling is very interesting sport
I am so happy that the Japanese women curling team for the the Pyeongchang Olympics won a bronze medal.
They fought against the England team for third place.
I was worried that they had might lost because the England team beat the Japan in the tournament.
That winning is the best record since the Japanese curling team participated in Olympics.
Attraction of this sport is team play.
A prayer who is going to shot last is considered very important but until the prayer shots, other prayers have to shot a stone accurately and take good position.
Through this Olympic, I found that curling was exciting sport and hope many people will know it.
Thank the Japanese curling team!!!!
I thought about the philosophy that Azeem held, and it somehow was giving me confidence to fight for my rights.
Aman Wadi was very happy to know that Aunty Fariha was pregnant again, and that her altra sound tests showed that she had a baby boy again.
Mother knew that if she replied, Awan Wadi would get angrier and she will make a mountain out of a molehill.
And some he leaves on us to deal with.
I had often win the races from my brothers, so from the bets, I had collected almost 200 rupees.
She had again started arguments with my mother.
They believed he listens the wishes and fulfils them.
Father believed that Pir Saeen to whom Aunty Fariha went was not the true saint.
He believed that Saen Shah was the true saint, so he sent Mother to his shrine.
Pinkey went with Mother, and all other children went with their parents.
He took a knife and started to peel of the potatoes.
However, other parts of their behavior might not be.
I cannot understand this why people misguide others.
Only God would be "unlimited".
Because I got free ticket.
Ganbanyoku means rock bathing.
The rock bath make me refresh.
Because I waste only with bedrock bathing, I attended a studio lesson.
It is a lesson program that mix various types of dance.
The teacher called me like coming near.
Because, this lesson had peas part.
I was excited that I suddenly danced in front of everyone.
There happened something with our constitution yesterday.
Even if you report your opinion successful on network, it will be deleted by the website as soon as possible.
Many people's account are closed.
Recently I have read a book which mentions The Cultural Revolution.
Some story which described the revolution's detail in the book are hardly accepted to me.
There happened something with our constitution yesterday.
The tragic irony is that we said the only way is emigration.
I've been keeping to post at least one entry a day and I can't decide a topic easily every day.
I thought about the philosophy that Azeem held, and it somehow was giving me confidence to fight for my rights.
Aman Wadi was very happy to know that Aunty Fariha was pregnant again, and that her altra sound tests showed that she had a baby boy again.
I mean she is going to give birth to her 4th baby boy.
I believe there are certain things that God deals with Himself.
And some he leaves on us to deal with.
To me, every human life is limited in some way.
so the question itself seems strange.
I stood silent for a minute and looked at his huge shelf of books.
I had often win the races from my brothers, so from the bets, I had collected almost 200 rupees.
She had again started arguments with my mother.
I quickly left for our room.
They believed he listens the wishes and fulfils them.
Father believed that Pir Saeen to whom Aunty Fariha went was not the true saint.
He believed that Saen Shah was the true saint, so he sent Mother to his shrine.
As Father saw them going, he asked my mother to prepare for going to the shrine of Saen Shah.
Pinkey went with Mother, and all other children went with their parents.
He took a knife and started to peel of the potatoes.
I wonder what those so called religious scholars would say if I asked them questions such as, "Is it easier for boys to follow Islam than girls?" or "Why are the rules for boys and girls different?"
Every human life and knowledge is limited.
Perhaps, Azeem was also unable to figure out the reality.
I thought about the philosophy that Azeem held, and it somehow was giving me confidence to fight for my rights.
Aman Wadi was very happy to know that Aunty Fariha was pregnant again, and that her altra sound tests showed that she had a baby boy again.
I had often win the races from my brothers, so from the bets, I had collected almost 200 rupees.
They believed he listens the wishes and fulfils them.
Do you know the most famous fashion entertainment show whose name is KANSAI COLLECTION??
My job is sales.
Everyday I raise money from companies for opening the show.
Companies can do public relationship in the show.
Since I ate paella for dinner last night, I still had a smell of garlic on my breath.
I tried to drink hot tea a lot and brush my teeth carefully for reducing the garlic odor.
Aman Wadi was very happy to know that Aunty Fariha was pregnant again, and that her altra sound tests showed that she had a baby boy again.
While they were talking, I went to Azeem.
And some he leaves on us to deal with.
They believed he listens the wishes and fulfils them.
As Father saw them going, he asked my mother to prepare for going to the shrine of Saen Shah.
Pinkey went with Mother, and all other children went with their parents.
You will ask for education from a dead person!
Your arguments have potential.
I feel our elders have resigned themselves to hopeless submission.
Every human life and knowledge is limited.
Perhaps, Azeem was also unable to figure out the reality.
My mind was unable to understand the ideas we exchanged.
They believed that he was making all up.
And I retuned to Japan last Saturday.
But I don't have English skill especially speaking, so I could not communicate with bussiness partner in English.
I decide to improve English skill.
This is reason to restart this web site, Lang-8.
In Camodia, I was surprised that many Japanese are here for sightseeing and business.
And there are many Japanese resturants.
Japanese foods were very good taste.
Submission to a International Conference
It will be held on this summer in Korea.
It's my first time to submit to an International Conference which will be held on abroad.
It's the first time to go abroad for these 18 years.
The last conference I participated in held in abroad was 2000 which was held in France.
However, the operations manager of that nursing home Izzy Nichols said pole dancing had already received the positive response from community, and people who thought pole dancing was dirty should get their minds out of gutter.
Nursing home will hold more pole dancing performance in future.
He got a quarrel with his girlfriend.
He had a trouble.
He said that his friend doesn't apologise.
A person who apologises usual is he.
He dislike it, but he is timid.
Also he loves her so much. So he wants to get a help from me.
I'm not good at treating a issue like a kind of that.
I wonder if he would apoloze again.
Also, I was majored in English literature at my graduate university, and I have been learning English so far.
I especially am good at reading and listening to English.
I am interested in working on the job relating to the state-of-the-art technology, arts, precious assets and so on.
I am highly motivated to challenge your clerical position where I believe these skills and experience of mine will contribute greatly.
A stage wich can has an adjustable proscenium arch, illuminated by footlights at the bottom and by front lights from above fixed by the brackets.
Before rise of the curtain the stage is closed with a curtain, which is raised at the end of each act.
Between a stage and auditorium can be an orchestra pit.
I have been cook myself since started living alone and lost my 5kg weight with Japanese style dishes.
Moreover I can eat some of my dislike foods now.
Good evening!
I ate Grasshoppers cooked in soy saucer the first time.
They looks creepy but,It was delicious for me!
It was expensive so,If I buy them next time is canned.
I ate Grasshoppers cooked in soy saucer the first time.
They looks creepy but,It was delicious for me!
It was expensive so,If I buy them next time is canned.
"We need to hand in contract for renewing as soon as possible."
The sound of the waves which rolled to the sands relaxes you.
And If you are tired, you just walk around the beach.
Yes, his parents are particularly glad of that when it comes to healthcare.
The 26th of January 2018, we were in the indicated address, in order to delivery the parcel but, It was impossible to contact with you, so we left a warning paper.
We don't have any telephone number of you.
We have kept the parcel in our Company Headquarters for a month, and due to our Company rules, we'll must go back the parcel next week, until then, you still can pick it up in the customer support timetable.
Your sincerely,
For instance, when living creatures for eat brought abroad and release there, the creatures replace original species living in the country.
Second it is because some kinds of native foods may be disappeared.
Food is an important culture.
And the price of the food will be unreliable.
Besides, because of the widespread use of Internet, rumors are also easy to spread, so people may buy the food above their needs being influenced by the rumors on the Internet.
Pyeonchang Olympics have finally over.
I merely watch TV, but I watched a lot during the Olympics.
The country that got medals the most was Norway.
It was 39 in total!
Maybe northern countries have advantage in winter events.
I got a cold today, so I took a day off.
I have a little fever, but my voice is not gone, my nose is not stuffed up.
I have nothing to do,so I wrote 3 journals in English today.
The pictures on the left and right show a place before and after our working.
The picture in the middle shows my members having a rest.
The grass was so dried that we cut and carry it easily.
I was surprised it was chilly, since Japan was still warm then.
Autumn leaves were so beautiful.
Summer is also good season to go.
Is there the value of life-long learning?
I think that there is the value of life-long learning.
One can find new things through long life learning.
To succeed life under limited days, one needs to learn something for long time.
In conclusion, I believe that there is the value of life-long learning.
I sometimes meet people who ask me changing our plan after we committed it.
I think that the plan is far future, it's ok.
like
"Can you change the plan from 10:00 to 15:00?
Are you alright for that?"
I want to say first,
You should explain the reason why you need to change the plan.
Most of them tend not to explain the reason.
I think if the favor is from my deep friends, I can handle with that because I think like this.
"We are a friend for a long time, I know sometimes this kind of things happen."
If I were them, I try to be follow promise...
Going shopping is better than shopping online.
My purpose is to tell that going shopping is better than shopping online.
First, when we go shopping, we can watch, smell, do and feel the thing that you want to buy.
Second, shopping on the web is hard for somebody to control.
Third, if we go shopping, we have to go outside.
When you go outside, you can widen your view wider than before.
I want you to watch the movie.
So this movie is now showing.
The movie was hit in America from the beginning.
The movie receive numerous film awards.
I was very moved by the movie.
First, the movie is a musical film.
Second, this is an impressive movie.
Third, this story makes you happy.
First, this is a musical film.
Music of it is very good.
And actors are famous singers.
Rebecca Ferguson, Keala Settle.
Second, this is an impressive movie.
This story is the opening of circus.
I like aquarium better.
Second, he is good at singing songs of musical.
Third, his sword fight is beautiful.
He suddenly starred in his debut work.
He appear on the musical this summer and sing solo songs.
Lastly, I spoke about his sword fight.
His judging feet is very dynamic.
We all knew it's wrong,but nothing we can do.
Our mouth and eyes have been taped to prevent a cry for help.
Next morning, I had sense of incongruity after washed my face.
When I saw mirror, I noticed my face became red.
what was it?
"Umm, It might be due to water" she told me.
"Well, I can not wash my face"
well, extravagant person" she said so with a laugh.
My skin is more sensitive than delicate.
It seemed Turkish water was not match my skin.
After breakfast, she told me.
"I don't want go anywhere, I want to be here and talk to you."
My purpose is meet to my friend, I just wanted to confirm that she doing well.
She can't bear to see me, she picked up suitably some famous a tourist spot.
you know a lot"
I have knowledge, but I'm not interesting.
"What is the place that?"
"The place where the foots smells"
"huh?" 
According to her, when she first entered the mosque with her husband, he seems to told,"This is stink of feet".
The Mosque is very holy place for Muslim, they must take off their shoes in the place.
Therefor, the mosque has filled of feet smells.
I thought, if hear such a thing the Muslims, it will get angry.
However, when I entered that mosque, I understood his feeling.
That's true!, this is feet smells!!
When I saw mirror, I noticed my face became red.
"Umm, It might be due to water" she told me.
well, extravagant person" she said so with a laugh.
"Where do you want go?"
"I know it, it is most beautiful mosque the best in the world and world heritage, isn't it?"
"What is the place that?"
"The place where the foots smells"
Next morning, I had sense of incongruity after washed my face.
My skin is more sensitive than delicate.
After breakfast, she told me.
"I know it, it is most beautiful mosque the best in the world and world heritage, isn't it?"
I have knowledge, but I'm not interesting.
Therefor, the mosque has filled of feet smells.
However, when I entered that mosque, I understood his feeling.
That's true!, this is feet smells!!
Next morning, I had sense of incongruity after washed my face.
When I saw mirror, I noticed my face became red.
"Umm, It might be due to water" she told me.
well, extravagant person" she said so with a laugh.
It seemed Turkish water was not match my skin.
After breakfast, she told me.
My purpose is meet to my friend, I just wanted to confirm that she doing well.
"I know it, it is most beautiful mosque the best in the world and world heritage, isn't it?"
"The place where the foots smells"
I have jumped at the chance to improve my English
I used Lang-8 for several years but then I decided to delete my account since I changed my plans for the future.
Unfortunately I can't study japanese anymore, because I have a little time.
If you were a acquaintance, please introduce her to me
I can see the light at the end of winter.
I checked the past weather information.
I can see the light at the end of winter.
I checked the past weather information.
I can see the light at the end of winter.
I checked the past weather information.
Okay, a knight comes to a bridge, and after the bridge, a troll lives.
The troll, as clean-living one, waits for wanderers and assaults them.
The horse can speak and it speaks to knight those things that usually inner voice do.
All others trolls removed to towns for work and yea, some ones get respectable businesspersons.
What could do the honest generous knight in this situation?
I can say it generic for modern literacy to upend things.
I read one or two pages a day and sometimes I left the books for long time.
I hope that if I start it now, it would take less time, than two years.
The book tell about hand tools for woodworking.
The horse can speak and it speaks to knight those things that usually inner voice do.
I hope that if I start it now, it would take less time, than two years.
The book tell about hand tools for woodworking.
If you got nervous by somebody's condemn, the first thing to do is observation them carefully.
If you got nervous by somebody's condemn, the first thing to do is observation them carefully.
Before rise of the curtain the stage is closed with a curtain, which is raised at the end of each act.
When I was a senior at high school, the class finished at 11 p.m. I got back home with four friends on foot.
There was a place where they always smoked on the way home.
They had bought some juices and wooden chopsticks at the supermarket, before they smoked.
They smoked it with wooden chopsticks and then drank the juices.
When I was a senior at high school, the class finished at 11 p.m. I got back home with four friends on foot.
They had bought some juices and wooden chopsticks at the supermarket, before they smoked.
They smoked it with wooden chopsticks and then drank the juices.
I have my PC but it has a lot of problem.
It is so old that I can use it only 1 hour without charging.
It won't sound.
It always noisy.
I can not connect a computer mouse to it.
And lastly I can start the OS of it with a probability of only about 10% because of fan error.
Today I took more than 10 minute to start the OS!
I can no longer stand.
But I don't know about the PC at all and have little money.
I watched a video that shows the sales of expensive home appliance is increasing.
These appliances enhance functions that can reduce time for doing household chores for working women.
The video introduced as follows: a robot cleaner,dishwasher, high functional microwave that cost double more than general one, and a washing machine where we can comand tasks via a smart phone.
In general, working women in Japan have to do all household chores after work.
It is a burden to do chores after work for them.
Therefore, it makes sense that sofisticated appliances would be a real help for them.
In my case, although I don't work every day, my husband is agaist sharing chores.
I use the website, NHK World to study English.
NHK World is the Japanese news website written in English.
This is for English speakers lived is Japan,generally.
I can easily understand it because I read a Japanese newspaper in advance.
We had yakiniku on two days.
I want to know what is it called in English.
I made these based on this recipe:
It was difficult that to make tortilla due to nearly round shape.
I cooked chili beans in a full of a pot, too.
The reason I chose Tortillas is as follows:
But, those freshly grilled tortillas were soft and tasted good.
I cooked chili beans in a full of a pot, too.
Before one of my acquaintances went to England, one magazine company told him "As I will introduce a famous fortune tellers to you, could you consult with her about the future of the Japanese imperial family?"
He said that the old woman obviously looks like a witch and ended up being said "The guradian spirit behind your mother is very good."
I am deeply interested in the international cooperation position offered at your company.
Graduating in 2016 with double degrees in Chemical Engineering and Political Science, I have always aspired to experience and become part of the dynamic world of international cooperation industry.
During my inernship, I had many chances to experience and see Mongolia's health sectoral problems and this leads me to apply for your organizations.
It is a greate news that Russian hockey comand wins the first place in the Olympic Games!
When I watched the game I was sad about Germany, but the second place is a good result too!
After this speech you will be able to know what music to listen to when you are tired.
The size gets bigger in this order, violin, viola, cello, contrabass.
We usually have to stand when we play every three musical instrument except cello.
But only cello, we can play it sitting.
The sound that people feel comfortable is in this range.
I decided to read it because it was recommended on a blog which was introducing books for web designers.
After three years I spent my time in Canada, my English is still low level and I need to do something with this.
After two hours I'm still looking up those words meaning.
It's like a small sized motivational book.
As I was reading the book, I wrote down a lot of words that I didn't know or want to memorize.
After two hours I'm still looking up those words meaning.
8 As for fashion influence, I suppose that...
9 People usually estimate your appearance in the 1st meeting
People collect various things as they want to get memories about that place wgere they were or want to have the biggest collection.
8 As for fashion influence, I suppose that...
9 People usually estimate your appearance in the 1st meeting
People collect various things as they want to get memories about that place wgere they were or want to have the biggest collection.
9 People usually estimate your appearance in the 1st meeting
I work in an office manager.
Who does your husband work?
My husband works as a full-time engineer in the organization.
From LA, the Japanese Restaurant replied to me.
I applied there because they said that they will support working visa.
The owner told me through Email that he wants to give me one-week trial term if I can work for him as long as I can go there on my own and stay for 10 days.
I've never worked for food service before but it's time to think about it deeply and before that, I need to ask about minimal salary.
From LA, the Japanese Restaurant replied to me.
I applied there because they said that they will support working visa.
The owner told me through Email that he wants to give me one-week trial term if I can work for him as long as I can go there on my own and stay for 10 days.
I've never worked for food service before but it's time to think about it deeply and before that, I need to ask about minimal salary.
Nevertheless, we have to accept that sometimes live isn't about only loving that person, but about looking forward and to keep going.
Not forgetting what happened between us, but learning from it.
I have a habit of drinking coffee in the morning.
Some people don't like coffee's smell.
Yesterday, I had an insomnia and could not fall asleep quily and there is nothing I could do but to toss and turn in bed.
But luckily I listened to a song that is soothing and fell asleep quickly.
I got up late this morning and the melody of the song kept stuck in my head.
It is really soothing and I could not help myself learning it.
I would like to search a new home because I had a new workplace and I will work at a new workplace in April.
Now I need about fifty minutes by Yamanote Line and on foot from the home to the workplace which is in Kyobashi.
How long do you take to your workplace?
How long does it take to your workplace?
How would you go to your workplace?
How would you like to come to the workplace?
I would like to search a new home because I had a new workplace and I will work at a new workplace in April.
The ideal time from my home to the workplace, it takes twenty or twenty five minutes by train.
Now I need about fifty minutes by Yamanote Line and on foot from the home to the workplace which is in Kyobashi.
Sometimes it takes approximately one hour however it is too long to commute to the workplace.
Yesterday, I went to Kyoto with my family with a train.
We visited Renge Oin, a temple which is poplar for a thousand and one Buddha statues.
My husband seemed to visit it for the first time and applauded the sight of statues.
He was surprisingly preachy and my husband tried to change the topics.
His speech went on so long that we fell asleep in the taxi.
In Kyoto, a taxi driver might be surprisingly preachy and a specialty.
We visited Renge Oin, a temple which is poplar for a thousand and one Buddha statues.
My son and I like this temple, because the scene of numerous statues is surprising and a masterpiece.
I often dropped by a store of tableware, because the area is famous for Kiyomizuyaki, gorgeous earthenware.
My daughter and husband often stopped by a shop for foods, and my son was pretty interested in a store for Japanese swords, though they were just fake ones.
He would remember the taste and keep asking me to take him to Kyoto or buy him it online.
When we transferred from Koudai Temple to Kyoto Railway Museum, we got in a taxi, though it is very rare for us.
In Kyoto, a taxi driver might be surprisingly preachy and a specialty.
I complete reading a book of interesting yesterday.
I was excited by them when I was reading.
The book told me how to use ward to be successful.
The direct effect us lot of energy to action positively therefore we can use it more carefully.
If I use a negative word, it goes failed.
It reminded me of how to use positive ward.
Who you?
She works in office Microsoft.
I have some questions about "what if an imaginary situation is something mixing up different times".
For example, when I want to talk about something happening in the past of an imaginary situation.
Because you "went" to a coffee shop and "saw" her sitting beside the window the previous day.
Then, You guys chat and have a good time.
Will you ask for her number?
Would you ask for her number?"
PS: By the way, since talking about the plot of a book, movie, or video can mix tenses like this to convey a better picture of what the plot is about, I think talking about something imaginary probably follows the same rules.
For example, when I want to talk about something happening in the past of an imaginary situation.
Down below are two examples.
Example 1,
-------------What I say to my friend:-------
Then, You guys chat and have a good time.
Will you ask for her number?
-------------What I say to my friend:-------
You were walking on the streets.
Because you "had been" to a coffee shop and "had seen" her sitting beside the window the previous day.
It seemed like she was your right one.
Would you ask for her number?"
Can I mix tenses like the above examples when I talk or write about something happening in the past of an imaginary situation?
Thanks you to help me study English.
When I returned, I tried to contact with you.
If I did something wrong please let me know I will correct.
Yesterday I found Japanese plum blossoms started blooming in the park.
The colors of them are various, such as white, light pink and vivid red.
But I prefer Japanese plum blossoms, because I feel like they have more modest tones than cherry blossoms.
The like dignified blooming flowers in the cold wind are stunning.
I feel like this winter might be colder than usual years.
The like dignified blooming flowers in the cold wind are stunning.
Yesterday I found Japanese plum blossoms started blooming in the park.
The colors of them are various, such as white, light pink and vivid red.
The like dignified blooming flowers in the cold wind are stunning.
I feel like this winter might be colder than usual years.
That was a business trip to join the Oracle's annual IT convention held there.
Apart from businesses, I was duly impressed by several things because, off course, it's my first time to be out of Japan.
They says "seeing is believing" and that was true.
One time, even on the street, a local who walked beside me abruptly asked me, "What on earth did those people appear from?", because the downtown of San Francisco might be unusually crowded by the participants of the event that week.
I went to Pusan, for buying books.
It doesn't matter when I was lived in Seoul.
I just finished the first reading in the book store.
I could not send my regards to my friends because I hurried to leave for SAT.
I hope you guys take care and see you again.
Okonomiyaki made by my mother is made from a commercially available okonomiyaki powder,and baked it after mixing with meats,cabbages,dried small shrimps and so on.
Nevertheless it is edible,but it isn't good.
Under no circumstances,it is a secret comment taht nobody can talk about.
It is natural that its taste vary from home to home,isn't it?
My daugter is one years old.
and she walked ten steps today.
I'm be surprized to grow her high speed.
and, I want to be speaking english,before she lean to speak japanese.
I fun to grow with my daughter.
There was a test ride of the ski at Tokura ski area yesterday.
They were models of next season.
I want to them.
Yesterday I cooked japanese food and ate with my friend.
For him, I thought that Japanese food was weak taste.
The day before yesterday, I went cooking school.
I cooked karaage, poteto-salad and hijiki-no-nitsuke.
There had so volumes.
This weekend were satisfying days to cook!
The cause of procrastination is expect which is too high even unrealistic.
If current task is to walk through a 10 meter long wood bridge, when the bridge is laid on ground, all people can walk through it easily.
But having unrealistic expect is like putting this bridge between two high towers, will make people be afraid of failure even success...
He got it from a member of the town community when he went on a bus trip together with members last weekend.
My husband hadn't known somebody who caught the flu on the bus, so I shouldn't blame my husband.
After he came back home, he said he felt chill in his back and asked my son and me whether it was warm enough in the living room.
He went to see the doctor on Thursday, which means that I spent three days exposing the flu virus without any protection.
On Friday evening, I had a sore throat and a headache, so I went to see the doctor on Saturday morning.
At the reception desk, a nurse asked me about my symptoms; I said, "I have a sore throat, a headache and a cough, but I don't have a fever."
When I measured my temperature in the clinic, it was 37.8 degrees.
It seems that I don't feel really bad even if my temperature is around 37.5.
I got the treatment for the flu and came back home.
In the daytime on Saturday, I did a lot of cleaning.
From Saturday evening to last night, I had a high fever on and off.
It wasn't so serious, so it was okay, but the saddest thing was that I couldn't join my grandson's one-year-old birthday party yesterday.
According to my husband, looking at me in my son's smartphone screen sitting on the shelf, my daughter said, "Mom looks like a portrait of a deceased person." 
"Yeah, it seems!" her daughter agreed.
I need to have some more rest.
Please take care of yourself not to catch the flu or a cold.
According to my husband, looking at me in my son's smartphone screen sitting on the shelf, my daughter said, "Mom looks like a portrait of a deceased person." 
I will try writing something in English everyday.
After the exam, they will be in a long summer vacation.
After that, I'm going to go back to Japan temporally for about 1 month.
Ok.
I've already pleased to writing in English today.
Wow today is really like one spring day.
I thought over about my study.
I might change the how to study.
I should have some times to study English and need to focus it...
This information will help you choose glasses or contact lens.
I mean they are not put directly in the eyeball.
This information will help you choose glasses or contact lens.
I mean they are not put directly in the eyeball.
Dear All
I wanted to tell my regard for them.
You will need to know this because it won the championship the past two years in succession.
You will need to know this because it won the championship the past two years in succession.
First, why did they become strong?
I wrote the entry that typing with a mobile phone is a hard time for me and one of my friends told me that autocorrection is useful.
I understood that Japanese mobile phones have only Japanese autocorrection.
I understand that I should not be lazy with checking something.
Each partner does not compete strength.
It is difficult to learn something alone by yourself.
If there are many people who learn the same thing, you should be able to learn well.
Please do not forget to be a good partner each other.
N', while it has ballads like 'Road to nowhere' which seems he sings about past and future of his career as a musician.
Guitar of Zakk Wylde also makes this album attractive.
'No More Tears'
One of my favirote albums is Ozzy Osbourne's 'No More Tears'.
For example, it has some aggressive songs like 'Mr Tinkertrain' or 'S.
N', while it has ballads like 'Road to nowhere' which seems he sings about past and future of his career as a musician.
Guitar of Zakk Wylde also makes this album attractive.
His powerful play and screaming sounds matches the voice of Ozzy in every song.
Could you correct the sentence?
Hi, I'm misaki.
I live in a place where the sea is beautiful in Japan.
My hobbies include drawing a sketch, reading books and comics, making a Japanese paper mask,etc.
I have started English again recently.
It's hard to learn English thinking. But I'm going to study hard from now on.
Seems like I am always got stuck by something unimportant.
And I always think about something long been forgotten by others.
Everyone do have their own pain.
Today I gonna translate another poem of Hai Sang.
make me thinking of it lifelong
missing the forever length of that moment
I saw the moon was nice, like at that moment I saw you
I'm not a digital native, and in those days I used to read audio mags with abundant ads of Technics record players and Sanui tape decks and Sony amplifiers and all other analog equipments, dreaming of the day I grow up and afford to have them all by myself.
However, now that the days of all those good old analog audios passed away, I can't get enough satisfaction any more.
Although I can get any type of digital audios, mobile or not, in reasonable prices these days, and they provide reasonably good sounds, I coudn't get satisfied enough and I don't know why.
I'm not a digital native, and in those days I used to read audio mags with abundant ads of Technics record players and Sanui tape decks and Sony amplifiers and all other analog equipments, dreaming of the day I grow up and afford to have them all by myself.
Nowadays there are many studies and research fields with focuses in history.
I am convinced that history is a discipline that has a great number of important approaches.
They have the wrong idea that the past has already happened and studying past events is a useless activity.
History teaches us about the way the world works, and it helps us to understand people and societies.
We can learn about some lessons from the past that could help us to not make the same mistakes, because events of the past shape actions to come.
In addition, everyday there are new discoveries of the past that help us to complete the puzzle of who we are.
I could have some free time last Saturday.
I took my daughter to her doctor after giving my wife a ride to the station nearby our house.
We had delicious foods and returned to our house.
She fell a sleep just after we arrived at our house.
She usually takes a nap for about two hours once a day.
At that time, my smartphone vibed.
He asked me to some advices about the design of his house.
Since I built my own house and live in the house now, and he is going to build his house soon, he asked me to advice.
After I answered his questions, I told him and another friends how my things are going.
We often share our recent situations each other.
Since one of them has gotten a mental sick before, he gave me some serious advices.
He strongly recommended that I get counseling when I recognize something wrong with my physical, for example, I can't sleep or I have a headache while heading toward work.
I promised that I'll get if I recognize something wrong.
I thought that even while I spent with my family.
I thought that the harder I work, the happier I can become.
Unless I do what I truly want to do, I might never become happy regardless of its salary.
If I change my job, my salary might become low, and might bother my family.
After this speech, you will be able to understand how attractive he is.
He won the grand prize at the contest.
For example, He won the prize at snowboarding competition.
First, this movie is musical, so music of the movie is very good.
I recommend you watch the movie.
All music of this movie is very good.
Actors are famous singers.
This story is nonfiction, the opening of circus history.
According to the weather forecast, today will rain, but the sun is coming out now!
The size gets bigger in this order, violin, viola, cello, contrabass.
We usually have to stand when we play every three musical instrument except cello.
But only cello, we can play it sitting.
But cello play this range!
After this speech you will be able to like Japan more.
In the air up above the ground level, your sense of taste differs due to the low pressured and dry atmosphere.
Finally, Heston invited the sceptic chef to a specially equipped room, and the stubborn chef conceded at last.
In the final scene of the documentary, BA passengers served Heston's airline food seemed very excited and satisfied.
I enjoyed watching Alpine skiing at the 2018 Winter Olympics, but Alpine skiing is not so popular in Japan.
What is the most popular winter sports in your country?
Travelers can save their money and also they know real life through staying local home.
Especially there are a lot of empty rooms in Tokyo because the number of people is decreasing.
For example, in my last birthday my friend Lady invited me to a restaurant for my celebration, so I wore a new, red dress and an expensive purshe, then I left at 6:00 p.m. because I needed to arrive at restaurant at 7:00 p.
m but I arrived later because the traffic was very difficult, when we met, my friend was very hungry and angry with me, then I apologize with her, then we enjoyed the dinner, but when we left two men stoled us, it was Friday at night and was a rainy day.
Lady and me were very sad, so I called the police and they met the thieves and they recovered our things, we were so happy for that.
I don't forget that day.
Winter Olympic in 2018 finished yesterday.
Two weeks flew by so fast.
Thanks for Olympic's excitements.
This translates to "Taipei in Chinese territory" There is no such land or country name.
In 2020, Taiwan will participate as "Taiwan" and the national flag will be able to participate in "Taiwan Flag".
Q?
Only the wallet sunk down,and the belly swelled up.
When I was hanging the laundry, there is a fat cat was in the garden.
If I build core muscles, I should be more healthy and play the ocarina better.
I knew our ocarina instructor sometimes wear them and walk or some training.
I checked to the on the internet.
They are more expensive than my shoes I usually to wear.
There was a big biscuit bottle on the courner on the room, which everyone can eat freely, and I ate it occasionally.
When I was preparing to leave my office, I noticed that I felt a nausea.
The reason isn't clear, but the amount of biscuit was abbarently bigger than the usual.
The biscuits might be dancing in my intestines at that moment.
I was hosted paella party in my house yesterday and invited my coworkers.
I cooked seafood paella and some Spanish dishes and all had good reputation from them.
I could spend enjoyable time.
I went to Yugawara city for a company meeting.
I hope summer come soon
I hope summer come soon
I want to warm season.
The dinosaur.
"When he woke up, the dinosaur was still there."
I had read it some years ago, but didn't find it really interesting.
I am not fond of reading much literature, but I think this is the reason why I like it.
During my lifetime I have ended up reading a lot of junk literature, especially when I read books that have been written recently.
To me, the current status of this art is very poor and it's not even a shadow of what used to be.
I am digging a bit into this because i want to remark the difference between these two types of literature.
What I like about "The dinosaur" is its simplicity.
However, the critics flattered his stories for their originality.
As for the meaning of "The dinosaur", I think it could have several interpretations.
Leaving metaphores aside, it could be that the dinosaur is part of a ficticious world where the man dwells, and when he wakes up he finds that he is still trapped there.
To me, there is not any meaning, or there is a less important meaning, and the quality of the story resides in its oddity.
Did you know this story?
I had read it some years ago, but didn't find it really interesting.
To me, the current status of this art is very poor and it's not even a shadow of what used to be.
I am digging a bit into this because i want to remark the difference between these two types of literature.
And I would love to learn more from experienced teachers.
When school has parents meeting, they are happy to see me and grateful me for teaching their child a skill.
I am very passionate person and attentive to details.
I think my teaching skills could be stronger.
I have been trying to seize every opportunity as I can to improve it.
I really want to get PGCE.
Then I jumped from his balcony to mine, the 6 floor is not short, if I fall,i will die, I just took a deep breath and jumped into the room, found the key finally.
I jumped back through the balcony, the action was elegant!And my bubby admired in surprise.
then I used the key to open the door to my home,on second thought,ah, why did I have to take a risk to jump back!?
For this reason, they prefer don't share their books with anyone.
I respect to these people, but for me it's different.
I mean, I never shared my books with anyone, or I only gave them to those people who I trusted them and wrote their names and the name of every book in my notebook.
Before every new year, I check my shelf book and give all books that I don't need them to everyone who wants to read them.
I felt that he is not so skilled, because he hurt me a few times.
I kinda of wanted to make a complaint of him and wished by doing so he will have his salary cut.
Today I had my hair cut.
The barber started cutting my hair and skipped the washing before that.
Day before yesterday four of us in my class went to the Ganga Ghats. We were assigned some homework on the Ghats.
We took photos and collected some information about the Ghats.
There are 88 ghats in number in Varanasi and each students was given a task to write on two ghats each.
Today, I printed out those pictures and tomorrow I am going to prepare a file.
Before going away, I will hand it to my friend Neha to submit it to the teacher for me.
After that, I will be going back to college only from 16th March.
I will go away to Bodhgaya first then going to attend Spring teaching in Sarnath.
In between, I will sometimes post my entry if some new thought or event occurs.
After coming back from the Ganga ghats that dat, I had an excruciating headache.
Going out in the traffic and hot sun is exhausting actually.
After holi, it will become hot rapidly.
It is going to burn down the earth and everything in it.
An once a week on Sundays I have a bath.
B: Yes, I like mornings, because it is start of a new good day!
Today is a sunday lazy sunday I woke up at 9.30 am when I woke up my head become so heavy then I had a four glass of warm water and then went to the toilet.
After freshing up I had my breakfast and started washing my some clothes.
After completed all of my work I went to the roof and seated with a glass of whisky it was amazing I feeling so relax staring at one place with a sip of my pack.
There had come the time of my execution, but the preparations didn't seem to be ready.
My neck was meanwhile waiting for the fall of the guillotine hanging before my eyes.
On my right, two man were having a seemingly friendly conversation.
One of them was not content having to work just before lunch.
Besides, one always needs a bit of rest after a work like that.
"I get home, and while I am eating, the only thing I can see is the last corpse's afterimage!", he said.
Then, he looked at me with a somewhat mean gaze, as if it said that I was not worth to be in the imagination of anybody.
"I understand you", he said.
They had probably laid me in a bad position on that bed, and that led to a very painful backache that was continuously growing.
In the sky, the sun had reached its maximum of brightness, and it was unbearably hot.
"Fine!
This can finally start", one of them said.
I saw a parade at Chinatown in Yokohama yesterday.
I was so impressed at performances of children whose schools are in the Chinatown.
I think many of them are Chinese or overseas Chinese.
They inherit the tradition of them.
There are such problems as nuclear pollution, waste of the rivers, throwing rubbish in the streets.
there is a lot of waste in the streets 5.
If we don't take care of our planet,we will kill ourselves.
There are such problems as nuclear pollution, waste of the rivers, throwing rubbish in the streets.
there is a lot of waste in the streets 5.
I live in Austria, Vienna and I study foreign languages.
I speak Russian, German, a little bit Polish and Italian.
Olga from Belarus.
this morning to attend TOEIC test on time.
There was a heavy rain while I was going out.
I really want to go home and change my snickers to slippers then, but I didn't, seems it isn't appropriate.
It is very distracting and uncomfortable during the entire test.
I didn't finish the reading parts, I feel very sleepy after listening 100 questions, I think I should get more practice being concentrate in such long time.
It is very tired chasing high scores sometimes.
I set an alarm at 8 am.
There was a heavy rain while I was going out.
I didn't finish the reading parts, I feel very sleepy after listening 100 questions, I think I should get more practice being concentrate in such long time.
I can anticipate the score won't be very pretty this time.
I think I need changes.
When you get used to a certain way of life your life is predictable and you think to keep it under your control.
To make changes means to lose control.
What can be more scaring then that?
Sometimes it seems to me that energy I could direct to positive changes in my life I waste on doubts, fears and useless thoughts.
I think I need changes.
When you get used to a certain way of life your life is predictable and you think to keep it under your control.
Sometimes it seems to me that energy I could direct to positive changes in my life I waste on doubts, fears and useless thoughts.
When you get used to a certain way of life your life is predictable and you think to keep it under your control.
Sometimes it seems to me that energy I could direct to positive changes in my life I waste on doubts, fears and useless thoughts.
However, I sometimes wonder why I should work every day apart from whom I love.
I worked for the entire holiday, the lunar New Year's days in Korea.
So my company compensated me for it, gave me an extra vacation days for me.
I am staying my home and pigging out every day.
I am studying English, but in a slow pace.
Ah- Living in a slow pace is very wonderful and precious.
I hope I could live like this after retirement.
I worked for the entire holiday, the lunar New Year's days in Korea.
So my company compensated me for it, gave me an extra vacation days for me.
HAHA
I sleep more than 12 hours every day.
But when I went the clothing shop lately, I tended to got a purple one.
Then I realized I was in middle age.
With a phone, we can enjoy music everywhere, and we can know everything around the earth in time.
Everything seems to be very convenient, but soon a phenomenon appears: more and more people are addicted to the mobile phone.
It is just the phone that causes the embarrass.
The phone shortens the distance between someone around the world but lengthens the distance between the man who is the closest person of the woman.
In summary, with the more rational use of the phone, instead of addicted to it, we will witness the better service the phone can provide for us.
As I have been stolen my ID to buy an electric appliance, I am deeply concerned about this issue.
Otherwise they do not know what to do and thieves can make money easily.
Secondly, police should be ready to solve internet crime.
Since it is quite different from conventional crime, they need to hire proper experts who can use skills to defeat the bad.
It is required to be done as soon as possible.
Thirdly, it is necessary to legislate to prevent consumers because law has not been designated to deal with the internet.
The government can make providers to cooperate.
I am afraid that they might prioritize their profit.
In conclusion, I suggest three measures to tackle rapidly increasing internet crime as I mentioned above.
Unfortunately, police is not willing to cope with cybercrime.
When I called, they did not accept my case.
They are overlooking criminals.
This morning, I sat down on the bathtub in which is filled with hotter water than usual to make my body heat up.
During the time I was thinking to express my next action in English as I talked to myself because I wanted to figure out the feeling of "was gonna".
It turned out that I was kind of being boiled up there.
However, I never realised that was the first misstep I had taken.
A few weeks after discussing with him, I realised I had nowhere else to get books from.
I tried to go through my favourite books, but eventually got bored of them.
So I decided to do the only thing that I had come up with.
I picked up my favourite books, put on a small back pack and departed to find one of those libraries he had talked to me about.
I put on skin cream after bath.
It is warmer and warmer, so I don't feel itchy on my body.
After bath, I've been putting skin cream on my body this winter.
This morning it snowed, but now it stopped.
He is cooking a home-made pizza.
After dinner I'll play with my one year old niece who I love, she's stolen my heart.
Recently I have rediscovered the joy of coloring books.
Later I drew and made the Art homeworks of my brother and cousins, just because I liked it.
I even think I got into makeup not to be prettier but to play with different shades of colors.
It feels a little silly to write but I think this could be part of my weekly routine not to get crazy about what life can throw at you sometimes.
Laura's apartment is great, super comfortable, cozy and, well located.
Our stay was lovely whether we were sit on the balcony, cooking or watching a movie.
By the way, Laura has a big movie collection that was very useful to us because we forgot the hdmi cable to connect our laptops to the tv.
We couldn't meet Laura but her mother, Monica.
Airbnb feedback
She was a great host and made as felt welcomed.
I spend more time with my family at home every weekend these days.
I wanted to go somewhere to enjoy with my family before, though, I try not to get any plans as much as possible these days.
Thank to that,my husband can relax and enjoy at home,however I think my son becomes out of shape.
I think he watched TV or smart phone too much every weekend.
I might have to take him outside,to be honest, I want to take off from parenting once in a while.
So enjoy our life!
Nowadays, anything you want to tell your country or community or even the whole world about it, you can share it in different ways and in easy manners.
Firstly, We are living in an overwhelming progress of technologies, you can share any idea, picture, video about anything in any country by using free social medias and mostly your post will spread in simple ways.
For example, my friend has done a nice project about medicine that done by doing a lot of research in our country, so he use facebook, snapchat, and instagram to share his project and give many glimpses and hints that attract audience to be curious to know more about this project.
His project toke two months to spread in all areas of the country, and he has taken various benefits and rewarded by the king of our country.
They advertise about this investment in all types of announcement, like posts on facebook, posters in the streets and near the public buildings, announcements in radio and television, advertisements in different websites in the Internet, and in the end, everyone I met was knowing or talking about this investment, or wanted to go and try their services.
But the other day I watched an youtube video of a conference where he was the speaker and thought I knew him.
Today, I went to Tokyo and also went to a shrine where there are lots of toy's cats!
From tiny one to huge one!
Today, I went to Tokyo and also went to a shrine where there are lots of toy's cats!
There are many sizes of cats.
The video that you were watching made you fell off your bed.
That kind of pizza is my go to whenever I order one.
A day as tourist guide
I have been watching Bo Burnham's clips and there is a line in his song 'Art is dead' I find really confusing:
English acquiring age is younger and younger...
The venue of Eiken, Japanese English proficiency test, occupied with children by90%, even their guardians accompanied.
I realized the age to acquire English is getting younger and younger.
I'm determined to take eiken 1st grade!
To day subject Game.
question: Will you like to play computer game?
answer: Yes I will like computer game.
answer: I will not computer game.
question: Do you like to play computer game?
answer: Yes I like computer game.
answer: I did not computer game.
question: Did you like to play computer game?
answer: Yes I like computer gamed.
answer: I did not computer gamed.
Here is an amazing place with so many strange things.
Example, I was take 2 hour on the way for just 5km from Dong Xuan market back my hotel, that terrible.
Here is an amazing place with so many strange things.
Example, I was take 2 hour on the way for just 5km from Dong Xuan market back my hotel, that terrible.
They said that they're going to cut off all the communications with the media.
The file was emailed you two days ago.
What song are you referring to?
You have to be able to build a fire in foul weather, pitch a tent, read a map, navigate by stars, know flora and fauna, in particular, be familiar with local predators and poisonous plants.
Well, I knew a lot of cool stuff from books, but my practical experience was limited by a few outings in the peri-urban castrated forests with heavy backpacks full of food, guitars, playing cards, and other useless doodahs.
Strangely, we could survive without alcohol, cigarettes, and as for charming girls in reasonably tight sports pants, they accompanied us only for inspiration.
Jack London, my greatest inspirer, wrote about people like us very clearly: there is certain kind of people who confuse their urban sentimentality and overactive imagination with the true sense of adventure.
Those people, make overambitious plans, buy expensive equipment, and deliberately ignore every single advice from experienced travelers.
So, being a weekend voyager and reckless couch climber, I had all those sins except, maybe, only one: I did listen carefully to experienced tourists.
I had to go down the dirt road a quarter of a mile or so and then turn left.
It was mid-spring, and the forest looked dull and scarce in color.
It would take time before pines and other trees get brand-new green dress and forest glades become flooded with wildflowers of bright colors.
You can find a surprisingly big variety of flowering plants in the taiga forests, especially in late spring, but the only true king of Siberian spring blossom is, undoubtedly, His Majesty Bagulnik.
Its scrubby bushes, dotted with tiny countless flowers and rosemary-like leaves are distant relatives of heather and are quite common in the Northern forests.
Whole fields of it, as well as single bushes, can be found almost in every corner of Siberia.
In the mid-early spring when the taiga forest, bleak and hungry, wakes up from the winter drowsiness, whole fields of it paint cliffs and forest valleys in hot pink color.
I dare say that this spectacle is no way less fascinating than sakura blossom.
Basically, there are two types of the taiga forest: light and dark.
But if on your way fir branches slap your face, beware -- this path was trodden by beasts.
Go back and find a proper way.
You might have heard about all kinds of dangers that wait for the man in Siberian taiga forest.
In real life, however, it happens on extremely rare occasions.
The exception to this rule is the time when those dangerous beasts look for a partner or foster their kids.
But there are two highly dangerous things you have a good chance to encounter in the taiga forest.
In order to protect yourself from those creatures you need special clothes, mosquito net, and repellent.
One of the reasons I chose mid-spring for my adventure was to avoid dealing with those tiny devils and hit the road before they hatch out.
The second deadly enemy of a traveler in the Siberian woods is low temperature.
I mean just low temperature, like 5-10 C above zero, especially in windy weather.
And if you want to be a really smart ass, take a pocket survival kit with you too.
The foreigner is hard to borrow a room in Japan.
Law of Japan protects tenant carefully.
Because so house owner sorts lessee carefully.
For example, it is very difficult evict a tenant.
Because so house owner sorts lessee carefully.
This is also pleasure.
thin coffin
But he thought the coffin was thin and not very fond of it.
His request is that when the coffin is returned, the coffin needs to be thickened by one inch.
But one day, his house was on fire, and the coffin was burned.
After he removed the scorched part, the coffin became as thin as it was.
She got married a dancer, who is three years younger than her, in 2007, and then divorced him in 2012.
She looked back on the reason why she divorced, and said, "Money was one of our major problems."
The topic was brought up by a news article, and one of readers quoted an ancient philosopher's saying:
Today was season opener of J League
I'm happy, because the team of my hometown won.
At the office.
"We are having long down time today."
"It sure is.
Why do you think such a long waiting time is happening?"
"I have no idea at all."
"We are having long down time today."
"It sure is.
Why do you think such a long waiting time is happening?"
I really regret paying for the expensive lesson fee.
I heard I could practice speaking over the half of time but it never seems that.
The school can be more expensive than any other English school.
The rest of class is 35 times.
Yesterday, I took my family to visit a very old community.
It have many old buildings and beautiful landscape.
Although some already had been fallen for a long time, the other still exited in good condition.
They made me feel come back to fifty years ago.
They were built by local red soil and stick rice mixed together.
I presented her a fancy cake which I bought at the cake shop close to my house.
I reserved it four days before, and I went to take it with my daughter in this afternoon.
When I got home and presented it to her, she said, "Oh, you don't have to concern about my birthday".
Anyway, I was very delightful to see her being happy.
Oh, do you remember the old place of Broadway?
Those of the days I really wanna hold you man.
On behalf of British Republic.
Your blues, John,,,,,,,,,,
I've suffered a lot lately and unfortunately everyone I thought that is my friend has just disappear.
When I was young, I visited there to play skiing.
There has a lot of good nature, good snow, good location.
If I have a lot of money, I want to buy a holiday home in NZ.
I know the other country such as swisland had already bun foreign home buy when I hear this news.
I feel little sad, but NZ government protect their people is important, too.
Scientists announced last Monday that they have mapped the complete genome of a vampire bat for the first time and found there exist certain DNA characteristics in the blood that help it grow only by consuming the special-flavor food, blood, which provides unbalanced nutrients only and also put itself in risks of diseases.
The common vampire bat and other two types of vampire bats, which are the hairy-legged vampire bat and the white-winged vampire bat, are the only mammals in the world that consume blood for living.
The common vampire bat is a Nocturnality and cave-living animal inhabit in Maxico, Central America, and South America and live through eating the blood of livestock like horses, or cattle.
Anyone who remember that time memories?
I have toothache today.
It is very hurt and I want to go a dentist.
It is very hurt and I want to go a dentist.
However, I don't have money now.
However, when I consider that how often people stereotype each other based on gender, nationality, race, religion, I feel sad.
You use a lot of categories to define people especially when you meet people for the first time.
It is because it is easier to put them into a certain category to expect their behavior and ways of thinking.
The inside of greenhouse was warm just as I expected.
Strawberries which were sour and sweet had a taste of spring.
But,It really had the taste and smell like a peach!
Spring doesn't come yet, but I can taste summer.
I spended the good day.
lost my work.
Last night, I was in home and I had just finished my work on a computer.
And Just as I was checking it over if I missed something or not before saving, electricity was off.
I'd backed up my work several time, but I've still lost small last part of it.
I was so frustrated and drained It has set back completing my work by almost one day.
The colors of the world seem for them totally in order.
They must be pushed that something is wrong with their perception.
I was given a five-page-photocopy from my English teacher.
Since my classmate and teacher recommend this story, I read it.
Classmates are suffering from weak eyesights.
He was given a tiny souvenir from her and bring it to his home.
At home, he gave it to his wife and told her all the story.
As she opened it, there were many demons out of it and she immediately ran away.
Finally she changed her mind, she and her husband had their precious life.
We enjoyed the fish and conversations.
With this treaty, Rome didn't considerate the land of the tribe as Rome's colony but in eschange when Rome needed soldiers the tribes must to provide them.
At the third century, Rome signed this treaty with the German tribes who lived close of the border of the Roman Imperium.
The German people started to be an important part of the Roman army in exchange of food and money.
But the Roman economy was reduced during the fourth and fifth centuries.
Rome couldn't pay the salaries of the "federati" so Rome decided to pay them with land.
The Visigods signed this treaty with Rome in 376, Rome accepted them as a "federati" and allowed them to stablish close of the riber Danube.
Two years later the Visigods rebealed against Rome and defeated the Roman army during the Adrianapolis battle.
This defeat supposed for Rome an high economic lost that forced Rome to reduce its army and increase its confidence on the "federati".
The West Roman Empire started to be reduced with the news treaties signed with the Germans to increase its army.
The Visigods signed a new treaty with Rome in 418, stablising the seed of the Visigod Kingdom.
The Visigods Kingdom extended from nowadays Spain to south of France.
When the news of the deposition of the last Roman Emperor arrived to the Visigod King Teodorico I, he decided that the treaty signed with Rome on 418 was over and declared the independence of the Visigod Kingdom.
The supermarket which is close to my house and my favourite will be closed next Tuesday.
I was really shocked and sad when I heard about it few months ago.
I have no idea what the reason for closing the shutters.
Still, there were plenty of flesh vegetables and meat, but not snacks and breads.
The flier said that it will have a big sale on Tuesday.
I like buying things with reasonable prices, but not this time.
My husband asked me to go up a snow mountain for a few hours to take pictures of a steam locomotive.
So I waited for him in the Kushiro Wetland visitor center for three hours.
I wanted to talk with internet friend so.
I mainly spent at the time in my car.
When I talked with Chinese friend by my mobile phone  in my car, an elderly woman who parked next to me suddenly opened my passenger car.
She shouted me.
I wondered I should reply her in Chinese.
It was really annoying me.
She is very straightforward woman who says what is in her mind.
It was a shocking experience to me.
I didn't need to force notes to come out.
Here's my Soundcloud account.
Hope you like them!
This afternoon, when I was singing songs as usual, suddenly I felt I was singing songs a lot easier than I used to.
I didn't need to force notes to come out.
I think I still lack power in my voice, but I was so happy that I could sing songs easily.
Some companies and local governments started to use easy Japanese language to foreign people.
I will write main three points.
Needless to say, Japanese people should use easy Japanese expressions to foreign people.
However, I am afraid that the Japanese language itself would be water downed.
Japanese people possibly will avoid using honorific and prefer easy expressions though we don't talk with foreign people.
I will link an article about the easy Japanese language.
Needless to say, Japanese people should use easy Japanese expressions to foreign people.
Japanese people possibly will avoid using honorific and prefer easy expressions though we don't talk with foreign people.
Some companies and local governments started to use easy Japanese language to foreign people.
In order to communicate smoothly, Japanese people have to keep in mind some points.
I will write main three points.
However, I am afraid that the Japanese language itself would be water downed.
They should've gone in and take down the killer.
They should've gone in and take out the killer.
Does sentence "B" mean to kill the threat?
Do sentences "A" and "B" mean to kill the threat?
I bought a hand cream and two piece of rags today.
The woman who called the FBI happened to know that he was a trouble person.
The woman who called the FBI knew that he was a trouble person.
Nobody liked how the movie started off nor how it ended.
The trip to that town would have been fun like an excursion, if it hadn't been a business trip.
The flower put on my left shoulder was given by my mother.
I would have wanted to ask him if he would really have liked that singer if it hadn't in the case.
The taste smelled like the first decade of this century.
Even if it had worked, I couldn't have been able to use it for that.
His face was telling that he couldn't believe that.
He showed me which app I should see to get the moment.
At the wing of the stage, there was no heating, but when I played Hikaru Utada as he had asked, I already sweated.
I should have felt like "It's easy, I can do it".
It played only a few seconds, but I was sure that all the people in the gymnasium heard that.
I didn't know why, but when I must have played the canon by Johann Pachelbel, the clever machine was tuned to a local FM radio programme.
Fortunately, after my first mistake, I did turn down the volume to the zero level after every mission, so it didn't actually whole the gymnasium sound yet.
Maybe I was impressed as a stupid new teacher who played the national anthem at a wrong timing, not by not wearing a necklace.
This weekend I went to the main campus in Aioi for the graduation.
I am a teacher, so it was for my assignment.
The trip to that town would have been fun like an excursion, if it hadn't been a business trip.
I was new, so there hadn't been any extra assignment before my arrival.
However, the organisor had decided to give me an assignment which seemed easy.
He took me to the wing of the stage of the gymnasium.
It was the old type that could play cassette tapes and CDs, and also function as a radio.
He asked me to play the first song by Hikaru Utada at 12:55:30 on the dot so that he could announce the beginning of the ceremony at 1:00.
He appeared to be a very punctual person.
I would have wanted to ask him if he would really have liked that singer if it hadn't in the case.
The taste smelled like the first decade of this century.
I couldn't be that rude.
He just asked me why I didn't have a watch with a second hand.
I tried to convince him saying that I could use my cell phone for that.
After he left, I asked another teacher who also had an iPhone for help.
He showed me which app I should see to get the moment.
At the wing of the stage, there was no heating, but when I played Hikaru Utada as he had asked, I already sweated.
I should have felt like "It's easy, I can do it".
My finger pushed the button and played the Japanese national anthem before he announced the time to sing it.
The song starts with a low tone, but everyone knows it and it is the Olympic season.
It has been played more often than usual on the news.
It played only a few seconds, but I was sure that all the people in the gymnasium heard that.
I was already sweating all over.
Not only I but also the old CD player were stupid.
I didn't know why, but when I must have played the canon by Johann Pachelbel, the clever machine was tuned to a local FM radio programme.
Fortunately, after my first mistake, I did turn down the volume to the zero level after every mission, so it didn't actually whole the gymnasium sound yet.
I apologised to the organisor after the ceremony was done.
My boss said that I would stand in the hall as a homeroom teacher next year.
I hope it will come true.
This weekend I went to the main campus in Aioi for the graduation.
It was not until I arrived at the school that I noticed that I had forgotten my pearl necklace.
You might take it as trivial, but I didn't want to make such a mistake that the other female teachers would insult me after that.
The flower put on my left shoulder was given by my mother.
However, the organisor had decided to give me an assignment which seemed easy.
I would have wanted to ask him if he would really have liked that singer if it hadn't in the case.
His face was telling that he couldn't believe that.
At the wing of the stage, there was no heating, but when I played Hikaru Utada as he had asked, I already sweated.
It played only a few seconds, but I was sure that all the people in the gymnasium heard that.
I apologised to the organisor after the ceremony was done.
I hope it will come true.
When I hear the story how did they approach to speak English or how to study other language,I think I can try more.
Sometimes there is a person who like to talk about gossips.
For a long time in Japan, it was a taboo to confess love from women to men, but only on this day it was allowed by present chocolate.
This year, it became a big topic that the advertising by confectionary maker of Belgium: Godiva Japan.
I am ready to lay out my vision and the goal of my life, but I cannot articulate the reasons for now.
The main character of "Anpanman" has a human body and bread head.
I think the strange story, but this anime is one of the most famous in Japan.
I had an experience to identify problems quickly and resolve them strategically.
As a marketing assistant in Cass marketing in university campus, I was responsible for planning and promoting brand and installing application campus to students.
I also reminded products that students were most interested in and I carried these products directly to attract students.
Except this experience, I worked a variety of events including music festival and sports event.
After received clients' complaints and handled with them, I learned how to solve problem wisely and cooperated well with others.
I know this position should act as a bridge between customer and advertiser.
With combination of my skills, I would like to contribute to and I'm confident I'd make a great fit this position.
I will follow up your schedule a time to talk with you more about this position.
I wanted to use Skype last week, but the PC's built in camera could not work.
Unfortunately, one-year guarantee for free repair was expired just a few weeks ago.
I don't want to pay such amount for repairing.
Then I ordered an external web camera at Amazon.
I hope it can work.
When I have day off, I always going work out at Todoroki studium.
There is really cheap to use only 330 yen include bath and sauna.
These are one of my way to relaxing and get rid of a tiredness.
I like watching American tv dramas, snowboarding, and taking part of music festivals.
Could "Galia counted the men passed out on the various pieces of..." be rewritten as "Galia counted the men who passed out on the various pieces of..."
"Galia counted the men who had passed out on the various pieces of..."?
Two days ago, my mother, who lives alone, called me and told that she wanted me to go to her house.
When I arrived at her house, she was cooking a lot of dumpings, which contained much chopped cabbages and minced pork.
After that, I took my mother to my father's graveyard.
It seemed to be tough for her to look for such a equipment and go there and get it because she is old and feels leg painful.
I have to visit my mother at least onece a month in the future.
After that, I took my mother to my father's graveyard.
It was the first time visiting since one month ago.
Next then, we went to a do-it-yourself store to buy a tap for the bathtub.
It is the latest book of a series which continues for over 20 years.
I will read the series from the top again.
Can you translate " Collateral beauty" in Japanese word?
I watched movie Collateral beauty.
I write it story.
Main character lost his daughter.
He can't acknowledge losting it,but he can do it slowly.
He notice a little happiness.
By the way,I have a questions.
I can't understand about "Collateral".
I noticed that Japanese translator has many diffictlty.
I watched movie Collateral beauty.
Main character lost his daughter.
He notice a little happiness.
By the way,I have a questions.
In Japan, college students have long spring vacation.
For me, it started on February 8th and will end on April 9th.
During vacation people often get lazy and so do I.
I don't like spending degenerate days so I frequently watch videos about successful people to get motivation.
For example, today I watched a video about certain marathon runnner.
That's why I know he is an extreme hard worker and he inspire my spirit.
In the video, they work very hard or do very hard training but perhaps they usually spend lazy days like me.
I don't want to know the truth because I want them to be my hero forever.
I couldn't believe that I worked overtime on the very first working day of the Dog Year!
It was really a bad start.
The rehearsal took much longer time than we expected.
And since ours is the last one to perform, the requirement is higher.
It was really a bad start.
She's the boss, so we had no choice but to modify details, tolerating hunger.
I have the own business with pure income over 1000$ per month and labour hours less than 3 hours per day
I bought a two-way bag that I can use it as a backpack and a club bag.
We call a club bag Boston bag in Japan.
When people sold club bags, they call them Boston Bag because student from Boston used them.
We call a club bag Boston bag in Japan.
Why do you think we call it so?
When people sold club bags, they call them Boston Bag because student from Boston used them.
The prefecture where I live is divided into 3 main areas,the sea side, the mountain side and the center,and there are various attractions,cherry blossom,swimming,climbing,skiing etc,so we can enjoy it in every season.
In particullar,our sake won the gold prize for five consective years from 2013 to 2017 in nationwide contest.
I hope it will win the gold prize in this year too.
and have lieved in Japan for about 40 years.
He retire this month and go back to his country.
I'm interested in Costa Rica because it's famous for no armed forces.
These are three people in my family: my mom, dad and me.
My dad is 63 years old this year who is from Tokyo.
And he has been working for only a financial institute over 40 years since he was graduated from a university.
My mom is 59 years old this year who is from the rural area of Ibaraki Prefecture near Tokyo.
She is also working for other financial institute.
I have 2 male cousin and a female one who are ll not married yet.
So our relatives are very worried about us.
After I get married, I would like to have two children because I am an only kid.
Above all that, I would like to return my parents back more early.
I was in San Ramon today, working and met a lot of new people.
I was there since 1 `o clock this afternoon.
There many fancy houses in San Ramon and I bet they are ridiculously expensive.
People from different parts of the city drive through there: from and to work.
The houses in which I live are also high but not as high as those in Palo Alto.
The reason why I can afford to live where I am is because I share it with my family.
English focuses on the loop of the words, which as if they are wrapping around the text field or display.
It seems computing words have lovely gaps to learn languages.
If I correct, I have discovered a new treasure for the natural understanding of English.
At a English conversation club
Everytime, when I joined conversation in beginner level in a English club, I was irritated.
I understand they can't speak English well that's why they are beginner.
But I don't like that they don't try not to use Japanese.
I think we pay money for talking in English but they make atmosphere which we speak Japanese in English club and it's natural.
I think it is no respect for other participants.
I had to stay at an airport waiting for a cancel of flights to Kobe.
My friend who took part in the same congress had waited for a cancel too with me, and complained that he was wasting his time at that airport.
But I was working daytime and city office was not near from my office.
If I could change on website or in smartphone, I would be happy.
A famous doctor of robotics thinks he finally succeed to make the best human-type robot of his career.
He orders the robot a glass of bear, then the robot immediately brings it to him.
"The doctor's right, this is really superb robot," he is pleased and expects wonderful holidays before him.
However, in a few days, the robot ceases all of a sudden.
It doesn't function even though he shouts orders at it, bang and shake it.
The doctor says contentedly, "the product has been perfectly functioning according to the specification.
A robot which never stop or malfunction will make humans unhealthy and metabolic.
He makes a presentation to MrN, who is a positive candidate for the 1st user of this product.
This can do anything and is the best robot for humans," he says.
MrN goes to the island's villa alone.
He starts to feel giddy, thinking that he doesn't have to either read the letters or receive calls while he's here.
He orders the robot a glass of bear, then the robot immediately brings it to him.
It does everything for him, making meals for him and cleaning and all.
"The doctor's right, this is really superb robot," he is pleased and expects wonderful holidays before him.
It doesn't function even though he shouts orders at it, bang and shake it.
"It seems like it has got out of order," he gives up and makes a meal for himself.
A month later, MrN returns to the doctor's place and demands his money back because the robot is defective.
I am might be taking the first step for learning metacognition.
Undeserved confidence might be followed by failure; similarly, baseless optimism could bring about hopeless future.
as you no doubt to surmise I've consider it as an west food.
an wikipedia page taught me the difference.
I still have no idea.
Yesterday, I watched a Pyeongchang Olympic Winter Games on TV.
A women's Japanese curling team won the bronze medal.
This is the first time Japan has won the medal in a curling of Olympics.
The Book of Mormon is a music theatre by Broadway.
The sightseeing bus ran swinging left and right on the icy road.
Then I thought myself that I can not live in a snow county like Hokkaido.
You can obviously see who will win in a competition where athletes compete for the time, but a competition where judges decide an athlete's score are unclear.
In figure skating, only Chinese judges gave a high score a Chinese acting.
If I was me, I would get off the train once and get on the car next.
- When do you take away a Christmas tree?
So, I take it away in the end of January.
In the evening I went to see the live of my favourite musician with my friend.
We got front row seat in the hall.
Her peformance was very emotional and exciting,we had a good time.
an interesting custom of funeral
It might be inappropriate to describe a funeral as interesting, but I hadn't seen it before even though I have been living in the same prefecture and it aroused interests in me.
Although it's been a while since they started to say that Japan entered the stage of an aged society, the departed lived quite long.
First, her family members and relatives wrapped lots of small amount coins one by one with colorful ORIGAMI, then put the coins into a big basket which was woven so roughly that it had even some holes.
Do you guys have any special customs of funerals in your places?
Your car,Please parking over there.
You can keep your baggage to counter.
Do you need change the clothes?
OK!Please follow me to changeing room.
You change it after,you have seats in lobby.
This Year Destined To Be A Lonely One
After I came back home from Thailand, a friend of mine asked me that do I need to meet some friends?
I said no one to meet.
But I am not really feel sorrow about that.
Maybe I am getting old or just because I've already accepted the reality.
Everything in my life should let it be.
No compulsion, no contention.
I'd like to make some plans for my study.
Not eager for quick results and quick gains.
Instead I want to learning step by step.
Btw, thanks for everyone who helped me.
In another way, learning means being lonely.
After I came back home from Thailand, a friend of mine asked me that do I need to meet some friends?
I said no one to meet.
But I am not really feel sorrow about that.
Maybe I am getting old or just because I've already accepted the reality.
Everything in my life should let it be.
When in my country is voicing time and Poland has to choose politicians who will be ruling the country everywhere we see promotions.
They tell to us that will improve all that country very fast and will provide better life here.
Really often most of these things are even impossible so how we can believe them?
I hate war, I hate hatred and I prefer solve the case with more calmly way.
That person should talk with another countries, not use violence.
All world and people who are living here need more calm and understanding.
"Bradman was just as effective in England as he was in Australia, and as a 21-year-old on the 1930 tour for the famous Ashes trophy, he scored 974 runs at an average of 139 point 14, with two double centuries and a triple, his then-world record 334 at Leeds."
"He would have averaged 100 in Tests had it not been for the supreme irony of scoring nought in his final Test match, at The Oval in London in August, 1948, within a few days of his 40th birthday."
A quiet man, he has allowed his bike riding to do his talking.
I'm getting happy I feel sunlight.
I'm thinking about plan that I will plant lots of vegetables.
I made an impulse buy because I was attracted by a tiger printed on the powder foundation.
I work as a web director,and I make a website which introduce recommend stuffs,clinics and so on.
I deal many kinds of industory.
Sometime, I make a website about plastic surgery.
After I made a website, I ran this website to make better results.
First, I should let my website to show top on Google,when people search,
Next after User come in my website, I make a lead to the official website which I introduce
I have ever been to Guam, Singapore and Vali, and I want to go to Britain and the United States and more.
After all I like travel and want to see many beautiful scenery.
Japanese people want to know, because they believe they can't talk properly without the knowledge of other's age.
At least, they must use the polite expressions when they talk to a person older than you, even one year.
However, when I talk in English, I feel super-free because I don't have to care about the whose age I'm talking to, even though I must struggle to make sentences.
Japanese people tend to ask others his or her age.
However, when I talk in English, I feel super-free because I don't have to care about the whose age I'm talking to, even though I must struggle to make sentences.
I can still remember how happy we were together 
I am representing my firm, the Forthright Consulting, to support the Marine Harvest and Heitsuk Nation proposal.
As per your Council Committee's request, I have researched and analyzed the possible development of a new fish farm in your territory.
In this report, I have included the potential benefits and possible risks of fish farms and working with the Norwegian company, Marine Harvest.
I believe that the development of the new fish farm is a sustainable project and brings the economic benefits to your Nations.
Section 1 provides the introduction to the current status.
Section 2 includes researches about pros and cons of the fish farming, the current challenges of your Nation, and the fish farming operations worldwide.
Section 3 examines the achievable practice and the case study of the Klemtu Nation, which has made a protocol agreement with Marine Harvest.
We believe the maximization of the economical profits at your Nation and the mitigation of concerns regarding a new Fish Farm are key for this project.
We will strive to establish a good relationship between your Nation and Marine Harvest, and bring the best outcome for both parties, the Heitsuk Nation and Marine Harvest.
Thank you for entrusting me and the Forthright Consulting and the opportunity to collaborate with your Nation.
The establishment of a new fish farms is not the easy decision to make.
Yet, we would like to help your decision as much as we can.
Please go through the report and feel free to reach out to me anytime if you have any further questions.
I just got out of a gym, and I'm on my way home.
I'm worn out and super hungry, so I'm thinking if I get something to eat.
By the way, I got my haircut yesterday.
My bangs were getting in the way, and the back was annoying.
Whole hair was messy, so I made an appointment of hair salon, and luckily I found the one available right away.
A hair stylist was not bad, I felt good while I was getting hair cut.
We entered a magnificent brick building, which looked as if it were a labyrinth.
There are lots of things I want to do." My granduncle smiled watching us.
Japanese business people enjoy the binge after work.
The Moving
My son is going to graduate the college in March, and starts working in Tokyo in April.
He needs to move near the work place at the end of February for some reasons, so I'm going to the countryside where he lives in order to help his moving at the day after tomorrow.
When he moved to his current apartment four years ago, I carried his belongings to the apartment by car.
My mother-in-law really likes cooking and giving someone dishes.
Anyway, I'm really looking forward to seeing if he kept clean the apartment or not.
I hope that it's not tough to clean the room.
A foreign tourist gets missed in Ginza city, Japan.
Aki is Japanese volunteer and speaks to him to help him.
It takes about 2 minutes walk from here to Ginza Station.
Go straight this street to the traffic right.
You may not see it interesting, but i would like to talk about buoyancy in animals, since I have to do a work for university on this topic.
On the other hand, buoyancy is crucial for those animals, like planktonic copepods, that can't do it.
They are unable to swim, and this is because they have to face the same drag force, namely viscosity, that other bigger animals do.
The strategies to become less dense are various.
This vessicle can retain gases of the circulatory system, and these gases make the fish less dense.
In swimming animals, the main advantage of buoyancy is to help to move horizontally.
Seals, which have a thick layer of fat under their skin, have been found to swim faster when they are neutrally buoyant.
I was chosed next contestant because the 1st winner declined the right.
Nobody expect me.
It was not good but I satisfied.
I participated a speech contest.
We can go to the contest untill 2nd winners.
One of the club asked a person expected from everyone, "Are you available next contest day".
Of course he said me nothing.
Anyway I did my best in my place.
My contents is good but the style to speak isn't good.
I won the 3rd place.
I was chosed next contestant because the 1st winner declined the right.
We can go to the contest untill 2nd winners.
I'm a bad speaker in the club.
Nobody expect me.
One of the club asked a person expected from everyone, "Are you available next contest day".
Of course he said me nothing.
Anyway I did my best in my place.
It was not good but I satisfied.
My contents is good but the style to speak isn't good.
T, why don't you wear glasses in public.
I guess I just don't like looking at the people in London.
Some even show their buttcracks when they bend down, which completely redefined the word hirsute.
Christ on a bike.
Some sniff their own smelly armpits.
Some even show their buttcracks when they bend down, which completely redefines the word hirsute.
But, recently I think keeping me busy is better than having nothing to do.
No woman will ever find it nothing less than inappropriate and hideous.
You are twenty-three today, I bet that in ten years from now, you will barely be twenty-four!
Please, keep in mind she is my mother and, was it for this only, you own her the same respect and consideration 
As I was isolated at the days, I wanted a friend.
I gave him a name "Sora".
Everyday, he flied more than one hour in the sky.
We were the best friends each other.
At my 20th birthday, she died.
I am very unfortunate that they are often hated in western countries.
E-bikes are normally heavier than other types of bike that don't have a battery. So e-bikes might be easier to make flat tires, compared to the other ones.
I often check whether or not air in a tire is enough not to make the tire flat.
I inflated a tire yesterday.
I had breakfast and a few cup of coffee a little while ago.
I have to go to a annual area general meeting this noon.
Probably, it is difficult for learn honorific expressions for most of Japanese learners.
However, these days, not only honorific expressions in daily conversations have rapidly become simpler and simpler, but also a lot of inadequate expressions have been overlooked or unnoticed.
For another example, the other day, I happened to watch a rerun of a historical play, which was first broadcasted more than 30 years ago.
Honorific expressions of Japanese are treasure for me.
I'm worrying that Japanese people might unwittingly almost extinguish them.
Probably, it is difficult to learn honorific expressions for most of Japanese learners.
However, these days, not only honorific expressions in daily conversations have rapidly become simpler and simpler, but also a lot of inadequate expressions have been overlooked or unnoticed.
I'm worrying that Japanese people might unwittingly almost extinguish them.
I watch English lessons on You Tube every day.
Because writing is the most difficult in learning English.
So, I've been putting of writing journals.
I should try not to putting off.
All of athlete curling are beautiful.
Their faces not only is good, they have a beautiful sportsmanship.
I love to eat a ramen, which is a Japanese noodle.
It basically has four kind of tastes, such as miso, shoyu, tonkotsu, and shio.
I'm big on the tonkotsu, so everytime I eat the ramen, it's always the tonkotu.
I have my favorite ramen restaurant my home town.
I always go to the restaurant whenever I have my day off.
Fukuoka-ken, one of the Japanese prefectures, is famous for ramen, and the area where so many ramen restaurants packed is ubiquitous.
Since my ex girlfriend lived there, I used to go and meet her on weekend when we were in a relationship.
After we broke up, I don't have chance to visit, so I wish I could go in this year.
The fountain pen
I don't have Pelikan yet, so I've always imagined how wonderful they are.
A few days ago, I found a Pelikan's pen that is from the 50s, it is old, beautiful, and practical, even it costs very lower than other similar Pelikan's ones.
However, I can't decide if I should buy the pen or not because I bought Montblanc quite recently so I have to save money.
Do you wanna end the class at 9:30 or you wanna have a full 30 minutes lesson for today?
Today my family enjoyed a concert of Masafumi Akikawa in the afternoon.
It was the concert full of efforts to please the audience by giving a pleasant and plain lecture about classical music and making great performance of Italian songs and Japanese popular songs and etc.
Because it was a small hall, we were able to see his facial expression clearly from our seats at the back and feel the stage was enough close.
Why do you think people attend collage or university?
There are three seasons to support my idea.
First, sutudents in collage can get various learning.
And they can learn a large number of understandings which would help their future job and carry much money.
In my case, I went to engineer cource in my university.
I got many kind of knowledge there and they are helping me very much right now.
My major was mechanical engenieering, especially metal cuttiing.
My job is shaping metal so I have to know point by point about the way of cutting metal.
I understood my job easily at first because it was my major.
As a result, I got promoted faster and earned bigger money than my coworkers by reason of first advantage.
It is clear that something which I got in university is the reason why I recieved much money and my major assisted my career.
Socond, we can get excellent friends in university.
Relatively, person in collage have a lot of free time in their compass life in my country.
Students see a learge number of person and make friends.
When I was in collage, I often hanged out with my friends.
We corporeted each other to pass the test every time.
I got strong conection with my firend throuth my campus life.
A while ago, they helped me in my job.
When I had a trouble in my work, I asked my friend to assist and they gave me some data and advices.
The data was very useful and the chips solved my probrem.
This experiment shows that it is very helpful for our life to have good friends.
Therefore, we should join collage and get a lot of friends.
Third, we can do anything in campus life because there is few restriction.
I traveled a lot when I was an university student.
I went to other contry and feel different culture.
When I went to America, I found there are very big diversity and I was very surprised.
In conclusion, I think we should take part in university for three reasons.
Therefor, I agree with this statement.
Is It A Positive Thinking?
If any misadventure happened to me, I think like that.
I thought to go shopping to buy books.
However, I will not go out today.
If it was good temperature, I would go to a bookstore.
Therefore, I will watch some movie at my home.
If it was good temperature, I would go to a bookstore.
Later the series were edited as a movie for theaters and premiered In Japan and Europe.
Generally, Japanese people, especially little girls, have loved this "Anne of Green Gables" for generations from decades ago.
First Japanese translation version published in Japan in 1952, which was translated by Hanako MURAOKA.
I think it's interesting that the title contains color RED while the original title has GREEN.
An TV Animation series of "Anne of Green Gables" was also made and broadcasted in 1979.
It was originally produced by a Canadian television as a mini-series, and aired in Canada in 1985, then in America in 1986, according to Wikipedia.
Later the series were edited as a movie for theaters and premiered In Japan and Europe.
First Japanese translation version published in Japan in 1952, which was translated by Hanako MURAOKA.
The number of companies that expand retirement age and accept work mothers is increasing.
Therefore, the country is trying to give subsidies.
One is authorized and the other is unauthorized.
Amount varies depending on the region.
In general, childcare fee is higher for unauthorized nursery schools, but in some cases educational content of unauthorized nursery schools should be better rather than authorized one.
Now I know, I've been stuck in '00s so that I am familiar with American sitcom "Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt".
I've been even feeling sympathy of it.
She is me!
Now I know, I've been stuck in '00s so that I am familiar with American sitcom "Unbreakable Kimmy Schmidt".
I've been even feeling sympathy of it.
I will hold a wedding ceremony after 2weeks.
Now,I use my time for preparation.
Collect some photos for profile movie,buy marriage rings....
Why I rub them until the tragedy happened?
Why is it left third finger??
Anyway,I hope to heal and get a thin finger that can wear the special ring on wedding ceremony.
My motivational letter.
Why I decided to apply for this program?
I expect from practice a lot of interaction with patients and doctors in a foreign language, participation in medical manipulations, and also traveling to nearby cities and countries.
Summer practice in Italy would be a great chance to get an invaluable experience; also it is a unique opportunity to check my skills in the situations and ambience different from the one I have now.
I want to show to my friends or even strangers what a great way it is to improve by getting out of your comfort zone.
It is a challenge to prove to everybody that improvement of others is one of the most efficient ways to improve myself.
I am sure the progress I will make will be significant and will also influence the people surrounding me both in Italy and in Russia.
Briefly about myself, I would like to note my important advantages for me.
I have experience of participating in international Olympiads and science fairs.
In high school, I won a lot of times an All-Russian and regional Olympiads by biology and ecology.
At the moment I engaged on research in Center of Obstetrics, Gynecology and Perinatology named after Kulakov V.
During my study at school and university I have been seen as a person who has maintained good relation with professors and classmates.
At school, I learned to appreciate sound knowledge and efforts needed to acquire it.
Throughout my extracurricular activities I learned how to be a result-oriented and motivate others.
The purpose of this community is to form a cohesive team of highly moral and qualified doctors with developed critical thinking.
I am sure that I am ready to take part in this interesting program and will do my best to succeed and show my admirable side.
This trip will give me the opportunity to broaden my horizons, understand the healthcare system of the European country, and strengthen the knowledge gained during my education in Moscow.
I expect from practice a lot of interaction with patients and doctors in a foreign language, participation in medical manipulations, and also traveling to nearby cities and countries.
Summer practice in Italy would be a great chance to get an invaluable experience; also it is a unique opportunity to check my skills in the situations and ambience different from the one I have now.
I want to show to my friends or even strangers what a great way it is to improve by getting out of your comfort zone.
Briefly about myself, I would like to note my important advantages for me.
At the moment I engaged on research in Center of Obstetrics, Gynecology and Perinatology named after Kulakov V.
I have always been on the top of academic ratings.
During my study at school and university I have been seen as a person who has maintained good relation with professors and classmates.
At school, I learned to appreciate sound knowledge and efforts needed to acquire it.
The purpose of this community is to form a cohesive team of highly moral and qualified doctors with developed critical thinking.
In the perspective, the development of the field of medicine and health care, as well as medical education in Russia.
I am sure that I am ready to take part in this interesting program and will do my best to succeed and show my admirable side.
I got 125 points more than before I taken a test 2 weeks ago.
My middle goal is getting 700 points by the end of this month but I couldn't get them.
I can still maintain a good motivation so far.
I've been study a TOEIC especially,I thought I need to improve my speaking skills at the same time.
One of my co-worker is old lady in her sixties.
She is working in the kitchen, but she comes to front to check how much tips we collect every hours.
She never doesn't ask me to move, just push my wrist.
And former day she took my lotto to the convenience store to check how much I hit.
Drunken Snowman
We found him lying in from of a liquor store.
He was terribly drunk and sleeping.
one of bottles was also lying.
I imagined that he hit it when he fell down on the ground.
one of bottles was also lying.
Can you see Pikachu standing on the mini igloo?
My Chinese colleague put it on it and took pictures.
I imitated her and took a picture.
My Chinese colleague put it on it and took pictures.
Renewable energy
Each time more countries pay special attention to renewable energies.
Specially, all those countries which have not got fossil sources.
Among, the current renewable energy sources are such as: wind, sun, water, etc.
Nevertheless, their main concern is that they are not very establish in their production.
Thus, the dependency of the fossil energies is total by the moment.
For this reason, many governments, from countries no generators of fossil energy, are focused on the development of renewable energy storage system.
The establishment of this technology obviously will involve an initial investment, probably, an important investement but later it will be recovered and addittionally, the beneficts for our health and our decendents will be unpredictable.
The use of renweable energy would reduce significantly the pollution and with that, the warming effect that it is provoking very strong changes in the world climate.
Yunishikawa Onsen is located in Tochigi prefecture north of Tokyo.
It was so cold and temperature was less than 0 degree.
A lot of powder snow was accumulated.
Normally nobody live in such a historical house any more in Japan.
He asked me to have a drink, I said I don't drink.
I used to get drunk just by a bottle of beer.
It felt terrible like having a cold when I got drunk.
I asked him how much you could drink till you get drunk.
He saw that I am wearing a white cloth with printed.
He suggested that I should wear cloth pure white without printed thing on it.
He also said that I couldn't get fat anymore and should work out often.
Due to heavy workout yesterday am not able to workout today, I had a pain in all over my body.
I wanted to drink liquor fortunately, one of my neighbours offered me local made liquor but when i opened the bottle its too stinky can not able to take one small sip.
I wake up late.
It was afternoon.
Lately, I realised how my english abilities were terribly stagnating...
that's because I definitely don't practice enough.
And so I was thinking that a good exercise could be to start translating short passages of a book.
I know that I betrayed you and turned away from you, wandering in the dense sea of falsehood and standing on my back near to infinity.
There is no reason to believe in it.
Do you need something else?
I won't never leave you again.
One week ago, I was in a train to go to the airport.
However that story is from my and my family life but concern mainly my grandma.
She was watching some movie but when we came she has to do something to eat for us.
They always has to give some food to us.
My grandma made sandwiches for me and my brother, she gave piece of cake for us and made a tea.
We were looking for one hour and finally we found!
She left them when she was doing sandwiches for us.
We wanted to go to the top of the mountain, then we spent around a hour to did it.
My friend said it was so tiring, then they went to sleep so early after took a shower.
So I focused on two things: the importance of highlighting words and concentration.
I think highlighting the keywords is a very good way to focus on the details of the content you're about to listen to.
When you start listening to the recording you will already have a clear idea of the topic and of some precise pieces of information.
Concentration is something you should also practice hard not to go nuts after a few minutes.
It's really useful, but there are some concerns for me.
If more useful input method emerged, I would do more task while my transit time.
I would start slow and I will do this maybe 30 minutes a day.
Even after I slept for 8hours at night, I woke up feeling groggy, tired and wanting to go back to sleep.
This is refreshing and weeks later I felt better.
It's walking helps me overcome my tiredness.
Just because I'm bored today, I want you to put on a fucking costume and bark at everyone who passes by.
They wanna understand why he did what he did.
I was all like, "Man, I'mma go to the beach so I can freak out everything with my cellulite."
You shoulda called them before stopping by their place.
Do you have any pen pals before?
However, I have learned Japanese for a few years due to the desire to speak to Japanese with their mother tongue.
It is because I have lost contact with my pen pals I ever had.
pen pals
Do you have any pen pals before?
At that time, I haven't started to learn Japanese.
The appearance of the website is the same as before, yet everything there became unfamiliar.
Do I need comma after Suddenly or it's optional?
I am studying English here in Chelsea because I chose to live here and I think it is important to know about the culture and the language wherever you are living at the moment.
I like to spend my free time at home with my husband, watching tv shows, playing a video game, reading a book or doing nothing.
Ice-cream and chocolate are my favorites.
I had only one day to explore this wonderful city.
And I really want to see it again
I take a shower and prepare a meal pre-workout.
I wait at least 2 hours to make a digestion and I spend that time reading, studying or watching a tv show.
At the gym I workout for 1 hour.
I divide my training between aerobic training and weight lift training.
I came back home, take another shower and have a dinner.
During the week I usually drive for Uber and Lyft picking up customers through the night until 8 am or 9 am.
I make part of a caterer staff.
When I finish work I go home, make my last meal of the day and go to bed.
It's been a while to write something here!
Lately I listen to English on Youtube.
If you go to a porn website I guarantee you that you will see something weird like stepmother or slave or something.
Takes all kinds.
The idea of someone wanting to have sex with me just because I look like I have jaundice.
And some guys nowadays have a weird sexual obsession with Asian women.
It is Sunday, but I woke up early.
I usually wake up at 6:30 for work on weekdays, so my eyes open at similar time even on weekends.
I used to stay in bed and watch youtube, until just before lunch.
But I realize it waste my time!
Today, I work up at usual time, and went to grocery shop - there are a few shoppers there, I loved it.
Bored as hell and I wanna get ill, so I went to spot where my homeboys chill.
Before I left, I hit to the party.
Damn hoe said something that made me mad.
She said something back.
I heard HOT got a comeback stage yesterday.
Since then, a plenty of idols sprouted out and fade away.
So I cannot ignore when I knew they had a plan for a concert.
Umm, I'm so excited for this.
This guy is just uh, baddass, man.
Recently, I become to be quick on the uptake.
So, I can concentrate how to look for posing, moving, and shape of dancing.
I want to dance so cool.
I want to be always good enough to do in front of people.
In case you were thinking about a situation that requires to buy something.
In case you were thinking about a situation that involves to buy something.
In case you were thinking about a situation that involves buying something.
I didn't think it, I started to study English, because I don't like a study English.
I thought a good, I started to study English, but when I student, I don't really like a study English lol.
I can change the my life for study English, so I'm very happy.
I make a friend of other company!!
So I'll do my best to more study English, and more make a friend's.
I want to meet more friend for I'll go to other company!!
Ah, I wrote to sentence is very no good haha...
Okay, thank you reading my entry.
I take a lot of time to learn English,but still can't write an essay over 100 words and describe a picture clearly to others.
I  really study hard for remembering new words and learning grammars.
Recently, I find a way to solve this situation that is to apply what I have learned before.
You will have a stronger memory about something using for many times such as you can identify your ID numbers very quickly.
So I will use knowledge in dayily life after learning it.
How have you learned the language?
Express your views on the importance and meaning of celebrations at every stage of a human life.
Young&single
These kind of people like spend time mainly alone so I think that every kind of celebrations spend together, without another people, just both of them.
They want to spend celebrations with their children of course and maybe also with grandparents to show young people that family is the most important and every important event should be celebrate in that way.
They could celebrate Christmas time, Name Day and birthday of their grandchildren.
For my part, I celebrate Christmas time with my family, my own birthday and birthday of my the closest family and friends.
Sometimes I also celebrate holidays and time when I pass all exams!
It's interesting that in old movies subtitles are at the beginning of the film.
One merchant would come by once every three to four months, by himself.
We had contacted for the first time when had asked him if he had any books, and started rambling about how my father's ignorance about books.
He would often tell me stories of the outside world, of other cities, of hidden libraries.
I would always listen to him share with me the details of the how some libraries might be hidden in the most unexpected places.
One time, I even decided to talk to him about Elina, and he MOCKED ME!
He indeed is a good man, but he has this bad habit of refusing to back down out of pride.
I TRIED TO CONVICE HIM ABOUT HOW SHE SMILED TO ME, AND HE STILL MADE FUN OF ME.
After Marja had written her essay she examined it thorougly.
After Add had spent all money he wrote a letter for his parents and asked for some more.
Before we maked a final decision we had consulted some experts.
When we arrived the cinema the film had already started.
Before Denis wrote this articel he had learnd a lot of documents.
Before we watched this film, we had read some review for it in all popular magazines.
Paul gave up smoking only after he had fallen ill seriosly.
After Bett had left ten kilos, she began to look much younger.
Interested let me know.
Interested let me know.
I went skiing five or six times a year every year.
In this season, I've already went three time.
I want to go skiing next weekend but maybe I won't be able to gather member to go.
The paradox of familiarity and the level of difficulty to describe that person 
I just realised that the more you know someone, the more difficult it becomes to describe it.
For instance, describing an acquaintance or a work colleague is quite easy but describing family members or even yourself is so difficult although objectively, you know much more about yourself than about, say, your neighbour.
please help me amend grammar
Natural Shell Conch Craft products, Home or Car Decoration,creative paper towel Box, Tissue box.
Home Furnishing creative ornaments.
Inspiration: the shell is packed on the beach near my hometown, and my family has always instilled a sense of environmental thrift, so I want to use them to decorate the world.
In a very accidental opportunity, my home paper box rotted a little, I use shellfish to stick, not only to reuse it, but also in a new style.
Warm tips:
1: Shell Conch is a natural thing and no perfect,Not exactly the same.,If mind the natural deformity, please carefully pat.
3: Coral, Tridacna Tridacna, gem category decorations, the use of natural materials, individual above will have a small flaw macula, mind the careful pat.
4: All pictures for the kind of shooting, due to different lights, display reasons may produce a little chromatic aberration, the actual color in kind as prevail.
thanks at all~~
I am so painful.
So many happy moments we have, he was so loyal and smart.
He can sit down, shake hands, go prone and play dead according to my command.
I feel myself now get easily forgotten the things I just did one second before, like a 80 years old lady.
I have a habit which is reciting English words everyday.
But these days, I can't remember the words I just learned as before I might get sick, mentally.
The winter vacation passes so quickly.
My Dad and Mom want me to return home during the lantern festival in five days.
Akmat: Do you speak english language?
Arthur: Yes I speak english language.
Akmat: Arthur speaks english languages.
Akmat: We speak english language.
I am and my friend Arthur we like play the computer game World of tanks.
It's curling game.
I work for the real estate company of Tokyo
I want to learn English while writing it about the story of the real estate industry of Japan and a favorite book and meal here.
The members are in the same society which was doing a volunteer work when we were university students.
We haven't seen each other for a while,but they haven't changed.
I had a great time there, so I'm hoping to have a get- together again soon.
"How many times have I told you that I did not want to be called Mrs B.
I don't know what!
"It's exactly that." Mrs.
In her turn, Miss Marple raised a doubt in her kind voice.
the garden!" exclaimed the doctor.
"It must be so nice to have a garden," sighed gracefully the beautiful and young actress Jane Helier.
Arthur, do you remember that case of Clodderham Court?
Bantry exhaled a deep sigh, convulsively clasped her hands together and her face expressed the greatest anguish, and she began to speak in a jerky voice.
Everyone was very ill and a girl, Sir Ambroise's pupil, succumbed.
"But, my dear friend, it is not possible that it is all.
Bantry, her hostess, glanced at him reproachfully.
Bantry slammed the catalog of seeds in front of her on the table.
The British Airways has had big troubles with the low quality of the meal service for decades.
So the executives asked Heston Blumenthal, who is a famous cook in the UK, to enhance the meals drastically.
This documentary reminded me of so-called 'the British Disease.' The BA executives just waited for the new dishes to come to their table, like it was somebody else's business.
Also, BA's chief chef wouldn't accept Heston's scientific advice: your sense of taste differs between on the ground and in the air.
However, the fact has been well-known among people in the airline industry for the last twenty years.
I can't let more people die with this sword!
Many of Gintama fans also love this part, because it's so touching.
In order to surpass his lost dad, he was always hummering away.
However, deep down, they knew in the end, swords are just assassination tools.
The protagonist with a sword Tetsuko made defeated the assassin.
Tetsuya: A sword that protects others, huh?
The Benizaruka arc is one of my favorite parts in Gintama.
The AI observes and learns from battles, and it becomes stronger and stronger through battles.
Tetsuya is a swordsmith who has nothing but swordmaking in his mind.
In order to surpass his lost dad, he was always hammering away.
He was always compared to his great dad and he suffered.
That's really up your alley, Tetsuko.
Ripsticks
I bought a ripstick today.
I bought last one about 3 years ago.
Therefore, it took long time I choosed it.
I changed my hair style to get very short.
Tomorrow I will meet my parents and will see what they think.
I like my new hairdo, and I want to keep short even though they don't like it.
good evening!
It was my mother bought over 10years ago, so it is old.
I can't play a beautiful sound now but, I'll practice more to play it!
It is the tradition that family will get together having dinner and play games during Chinese New Years.
They come from different countries, speak different languages.
I have to explain the game roles to them if they don't have this kind of games in their countries.
2 of spades is the biggest.
The smallest is 3 of clubs.
Who has 3 of clubs can play the cards first with any kind of card type.
I really like to eat and drinking sweet things, bot I knowing that sweet things are not good for hearth.
That's why I'd like to get rid of habit to take a sweet things
Sometimes I've been trying to get rid of take a sweet things but it's didn't work.
Especially when I feeling stress, I tend to eat a lot.
I really like to eat and drinking sweet things, bot I knowing that sweet things are not good for hearth.
That's why I'd like to get rid of habit to take a sweet things
Especially when I feeling stress, I tend to eat a lot.
At the restaurant.
"The schedule before this wasn't finished on time.
It's unusual for you."
"The schedule before this wasn't finished on time.
It went over 30 minutes."
For some reason, I feel al little bit well today even though today is Monday.
However, I have a trouble that I will buy whether text books or CDs.
I want to improve pronunciations and listening.
That's why; I need some text books and CDs.
However, I have some text books, so I will buy CDs for listening and speaking.
IT7ll be improved my English skills.
I'm going to strawberry picking tomorrow.
In Japan, If we pay a fee, we can eat strawberry as many as we want during a strawberry picking time.
It's hotter than outside.
According to the story I read a book, sunlight is reflected diffusely in a greenhouse.
I'm glad to be able to spend in a warm place tomorrow.
I was a lucky man on Sunday, because I didn't meet my enemy at an international communication association.
So I dislike him since I met him for the first time He has been rude since I met him for the first time.
I say to him that hello!
However, he doesn't say hello!
I will not meet him as I can, but it is difficult.
There were a young couple who were told how to send a package to the Netherlands by a postal clerk.
It seemed that it was their first time to send a package to overseas, so they struggled to write even address.
I knew that it was very difficult to translate the name of Japanese food into English, especially we have many Japanglish.
As a volunteer, I sometimes help foreign tourists by telling how to get to their desired destinations.
I'm 21 year old.
Today is first class of me after a holiday the Vietnamese Lunar New Year.
In my country, all student must attend 7a.
I'm not good at english, so I came here and wrote what I could write to help myself improve my english level.
I would like to keep this practice everyday.
I'll continue to studying English steadily.
Writing short posts will motivate me, and short posts are easy to correct for you.
His speech made South Korean people angry and they thought his speech was racialism.
South Korean people have practice of eating dog meat.
You often get angry me by scary voice, so I am often surprise that you get angry by a loud voice.
At that time, how do you feel?
You feel frustrations and dissatisfied to your duty.
I think make at yourself at the office, and you should have a good relationship with another employees.
I always calm and I give you comfortable.
Make at yourself comfortable as always.
I pray you will be good personality.
My favorite place, "Haast" is full of short trails where can go to beautiful waterfalls and rivers just 5 minutes walk.
Walking through trees tunnel colored by moss green...
you will find out such a nice hidden places.
It is a huge glacier in the valley of the mountain.
Looks small but in real it was so huge.
We walked a narrow glacier way where only one person can through.
To walk beside the big crevasse was so excited but also anxious.
I got my nails done and went shopping at Ginza.
I bought some nice spring cloths.
So, I had a break at Starbucks and had new beverage.
It is that when you don't understand what he or she is trying to say in conversation, what would you say?
In fact, most Japanese students in junior high think that they should use "Pardon?" in such situations.
In my opinion, today's schoolgirls have a too-striking make-up.
And I often cofuse them with the teachers!
Relaxing of broomstick
In Vietnamese families, broomsticks are daily used for a cleaning up.
During Tet holiday as known as a Lunar new year, however, they are relaxed, especially on the first day of the year.
This custom is popular in all through Vietnam and the origin of this custom came from an interesting fairy tale.
In the olden time, there was a woman who very excellent in cooking.
However, she often stole meat and wine for her boyfriend since she was appointed.
Once time, the Ruler of Heaven was going to hold a huge party for his magnates.
The feast was prepared quite well by her.
By chance hearing the new, her boyfriend broke into the imperial palace and then ate some of the foods on the sly before the party started but she was unaware.
The Ruler of Heaven found out something wrong on the feast and thus, the manager of the kitchen was summoned.
She was telling the truth about her boyfriend and the times she stole meat and wine.
She was sincere subjected to a punishment.
Ever since he punished her to turn a broomstick and made her work and scavenge to the home garbage every single day.
Many years have passed, the broomstick worked very hard.
The Ruler of Heaven was moved and so that he allowed her to off three days every beginning of new year.
Above story explained the reason why Vietnamese do not use broomsticks to clean floors during Tet holiday.
They would like to award the broom a pretty relaxing.
Even today, when people may equip vacuum cleaners for cleaning instead of broomsticks, but they still do not clear out dirt and trash at home, especially on the first day of the year.
Moreover, they believe that they don't want to sweep their luck and fortune out the house either when the new year has just begun.
Something about a traditional custom in the Lunar new year I would like to share you.
How do you think about this custom?
Are there any new year custom in your countries?
Please share for more information and correct this post help me.
She has gone out to suck in some cool air
Passing this test is useful to prove my English skill as I apply a job.
I got a score of 890 on the TOEIC test last year, but a EIKEN Grade 1 is challenging for me.
I think I need to practice writing and speaking English harder.
I'm considering taking a EIKEN Grade 1 test.
I got a score of 890 on the TOEIC test last year, but a EIKEN Grade 1 is challenging for me.
hope flared up inside of her
The police are surveying on complaints because that night club near high school has unwanted sound.
My mother divided a big chocolate cake into me and my young sister.
My one of a dream is publishing a book about my opinion.
He revealed that he loved with another girl.
I attempt to tell him I liked him.
That company focus to make a profit.
I wll find job in short order
Yesterday, I reply an email to my new colleagues.
Best regards
I was listening to the radio last night and a song started to be played.
"Jo" means "an area." But since 1980s or 90s in Japan, when the word, "gerende" was somehow introduced, and when ski resort companies used "gerende" to refer to their ski area and advertise it as a place to find a new love, people have associated "gerende" with their image of finding their love.
So, the Japanese word, "gerende" carries all these histories and images in itself.
Actually we wanted to play a table tennis but we cant't play because of full of reservation.
First I took huge mistakes.
I did two garter in a row.
I changed form of throwing and it worked well.
I did turkey in the second game so I was satisfied.
Some of them asked me what's turkey comes from.
There are many explanation but one of them is the following explanation.
This is a Chinese-English translation practice.
Important in Surrealism, this art work by Ernst has a view of dark late night as the background extending from the top of work to the dawn on the other side.
In the dawn, a girl waving a knife seems to keep the bird in the sky away, and at the moment another girl lies on the ground.
The right corner of the art work looks like a shape of a house constructed by wooden nails.
A man hugging a child standing on the roof tries to run away from something.
Does 'handler' refer to 'He' or it's a tool?
"He has proved to be as comfortable climbing as almost anyone, he can ride a time trial, and he is a brilliant descender, technically an almost-flawless bike handler who is even at home on the cobblestone roads that are common in the grand tours."
In any sport and in any walk of life you have people who try to cheat but I think we are ahead of that in most directions now."
A new Boy Wonder had arrived and Britain embraced the lad with the Clark Kent glasses"
One day Tom was at the meeting, the mayor mentioned the decrease in government funding in part of city libraries, and consequently the need to close some public libraries of the city.
Tom was very disturbed and announced at the meeting that he has an idea how to rescue the libraries, city administration should make a new tax for the townspeople.
But the idea was withheld.
The mayor announced that next Sunday all books from these libraries will be sold on the book fair, or annihilated after the fair.
I went to work today in spite of the day off, it's Saturday.
I was alone when I got my workplace, but after the noon, there are co-workers more than half of my department.
All of them know that they cannot get a salary for their work on a day off.
The rest of topics of the negotiations are already very advanced.
Both parties agree on the creation of two governments, a provisional one in Belgium led by Puigdemont aimed at internationalizing the Catalan cause, and the other one in Barcelona led by someone else aimed at starting a constituent process to create the new Catalan Constitution.
In addition, ERC proposes to implement measures in order grow social support for independence which would allow the new administration to take unilateral steps to confront Spain in the future.
JxCat filed a proposal to reinstate deposed government yesterday without reaching an agreement with ERC.
It also refuses the repression and the direct rule over Catalonia carried out by the Spanish government over the past few months.
Last week, ERC refused to support a proposal to amend the Presidency Law presented by JxCat in order to allow Puigdemont to swear in as president with enough guarantees.
This move together with other disagreements was seen as hostile by JxCat which decided to suspend the negotiations with ERC last Wednesday.
JxCat and ERC restarted their negotiations on the formation of a new government yesterday morning.
While JxCat contends that Puigdemont must be able to control the Catalan government from Brussels, ERC argues that it would lead to a confrontation with the Spanish government that they want to prevent by any means.
Both parties agree on the creation of two governments, a provisional one in Belgium led by Puigdemont aimed at internationalizing the Catalan cause, and the other one in Barcelona led by someone else aimed at starting a constituent process to create the new Catalan Constitution.
In addition, ERC proposes to implement measures in order grow social support for independence which would allow the new administration to take unilateral steps to confront Spain in the future.
JxCat filed a proposal to reinstate deposed government yesterday without reaching an agreement with ERC.
It also refuses the repression and the direct rule over Catalonia carried out by the Spanish government over the past few months.
Last week, ERC refused to support a proposal to amend the Presidency Law presented by JxCat in order to allow Puigdemont to swear in as president with enough guarantees.
This move together with other disagreements was seen as hostile by JxCat which decided to suspend the negotiations with ERC last Wednesday.
Since I like the outside, I like the one with a few filling.
Since my son is entering a Kindergarden in April, I have to prepare some items that are needed for his kindergarten life.
When I was little, it was common for mothers of kindergarten to saw bags and other needed items, so I still remember what my mom made me for my kindergarten life.
I decided to saw bags and other items because I'm not a working mom and I have some time to do it.
I'm not a sawing person, and my sawing skills are not that great.
However, he achieved the great results.
My sons like math, so they eagerly watched the drama.
Today, I watched a drama about a mathematician, Kiyoshi Oka.
Most Japanese can read English alphabet but many people don't used read characters with handwriting by who from other countries.
I worked with people from other countries, I sometimes couldn't read their memo.
Especially, I was often confused "1"and "7".
The reason is that we don't have a chance to read document in English with handwriting.
I am receptionist.
Why vegetables have been very expensive?
I wrote my entry on Lang-8 and then I received comments from my friend.
They growth is not good by means of this cause.
Why vegetables have been very expensive?
Today,I noticed that my family support me from the shadow.
Why I noticed it earlier.
Today,I noticed that my family support me from the shadow.
I hate myself.
I must more more study something.
Why I noticed it earlier.
I'm all talk.
Buenas tarudes.
Yo voy a trabajo a tokio hoy.
Ciao.
I've heard a play list with the famous cover songs recently.
Johnny Cash made cover of the song "Hurt" by Nine Inch Nails.
I think it is one of the best cover songs in the music history, because he transformed it into confession of the man who approached the last threshold of his long life.
Johnny Cash showed how musician could overcome musical genre borders and sing a song like it was really lived by him.
I've heard a play list with the famous cover songs recently.
It was a discovery for me to know that some famous songs are covers of the less popular original songs.
For example, the song by Nancy Sinatra "Bang Bang" is the cover of the Cher's song.
The song by Sinead O'Connor "Nothing Compares 2U" is also the cover of early Prince's musical project "The Family".
Johnny Cash made cover of the song "Hurt" by Nine Inch Nails.
I think it is one of the best cover songs in the music history, because he transformed it into confession of the man who approached the last threshold of his long life.
Johnny Cash showed how musician could overcome musical genre borders and sing a song like it was really lived by him.
I think that I have to work there at least for three years, but I am going to come home once a month.
I miss my family, but I'm looking forward to enjoy eating the local food that is really tasty.
I watched the ballet tonight.
I used to watch performing art when I lived in Japan.
Since I moved to the southern hemisphere, it's my first time, I watched dancing.
This ballet is inspired by the movie "The piano".
I've already watched the movie.
My favourite scene is in this movie that she throws the piano into the sea.
However, in the ballet, this scene is cut it.
I was really shocked.
They're so smart that whenever they talk everyone is speechless.
I'll take picture of it.
- He became famous for inventing the machine.
- The leaves of this tree turn yellow in Fall.
- He makes me feel like I want to kill him.
First Part
It's difficult to summarise the Fourth War of Italian Independence, because there were the alliances and yours breakups between Austria, Prussia, France and Italy.
Egli said just Roma is the capital of Italy.
The major problem was Vatican State.
The new premier of Kingdom of Italy was Ricasoli.
The Fourth War Italian Independence it part, in a sence and at the beginning, to the wider conflit austro-prussian, that Italy represented the Western front.
Austria ceded, after the defeat to the Prussia, Veneto to the France.
In this way he was cutting the supples from Austria came to the Austrian army in Verona and Trent.
In 1865 Florence became the capital of Italy.
They were near the Alps, a natural Italian border, but everything stopped for political reasons.
This one word became the motto of Risorgimento, and the symbol of discipline and devotion of Garibaldi.
The original of the telegram is in the national archive in Roma.
It remained to conquer the Vatican State.
Already the Romans talked about Alps as a border, then they conquered other territories and they created the Imperium.
It's difficult to summarise the Fourth War of Italian Independence, because there were the alliances and yours breakups between Austria, Prussia, France and Italy.
He said, about the Vaican State, 'A free Church in a free State', 'Absolute freedom of the Church' to reassure the Catholic Italians.
Egli said just Roma is the capital of Italy.
I--I wish I was if it's that what you get.
You're a.
You can breath.
You're third Oscar nomination, and you're a very young person.
I mean, there are people who go there their whole lives and don't even get one Oscar nomination.
Both of lifestyle books.
Now I have time to do something.
I will keep reading books for my future.
I work at a Bank.
As a volunteer, I sometimes help foregn tourists by telling how to get to the station or to the destination.
My mother have never talked with only Japanese.
My mother have never talked with only Japanese.
They've been living happily until the day he suddenly died.
Days have passed and her heart is still with him.
She wishes he would somehow come back at her door so that they could start living together like they always did, but she knows that won't happen.
She walks around and sees him in every little thing she sees, but her dream is the only place she can hold his hands, which she does every night.
I've never had an experience like this, so tried my best to imagine how it would feel to have someone you love die all of a sudden and be left alone.
As someone who wants to be a vocalist that can really connect to listeners emotions one day, I needed to put a lot of effort to follow the girl's emotions to really sing the song.
I worry about him.
He seems to have some trouble.
I hope I could help him.
It's a annual event, too.
I and my colleagues had to prepare next semester for welcoming new students.
It's a annual event.
On the other hand, I will be very nervous in three month.
I am concerned about the student's every action.
I am just thinking about whether new students understand the content of the lecture, whether the speed of my speaking is too fast or whether it is too small when I write on the blackboard.
The last post was back in 2011.
I use English everyday but only with children up to 12 years old.
It's so difficult to keep up the level of English even though I teach English.
I wish I could still use Lang-8 to improve English.
Is there anyone!?
I like it because of especial atmosphere, expecting of miracle, and nice traditions.
These pictures show packages of bean sprouts stand.
I saw two kind packages of the sprouts at the bean sprouts stand.
It is also said more delicious that the dish with the bean sprouts without their roots.
Which kind of bean sprouts do you usually use in the meal?
How many cups a day?
Yes!
you have to do the things you never do.
I can't decide to tomorrow schedule.
I want to go to capoeira lesson in Yoyogi-uehara or English meetup in Minami-ohsawa.
Maybe, I can't go to capoeira lesson in March.
But, If I go to English meetup, I can shopping in outlet mall.
English meetup in Minami-ohsawa is only once a month.
Today's lovely sunny day.
It has taken a bit long time since I had met one of them last time.
He was dating with a women when we met last time where we had a BBQ party.
He is not so young, maybe around 40.
So, I have guessed that he and his girl friend will get married soon.
I asked him when they will get married last night.
I was surprised and ask him why he and his girl friend broke up.
He answered the question.
His girl friend had returned to her hometown, Fukuoka prefecture.
They came to a conclusion that they broke up because it would be difficult to continue long-distance relationship.
I hope he can find a new and last women to be dating soon.
I have never had a serious sickness in my life.
My chronic disease is hay fever,rhinitis and nut allergy.
When I mistakenly ate a nut twice in an year,it brings on stomachache, nausea, chill.
Although I am really afraid of a nut, the severity of mine is mild level of allergy.
It is hard to gain weight for me.
So my weight of is not so changed during the past decade.
I have never smoke since I quit it six years ago.
And I have gone on working out like weight training and running fifth in a week, take protein powder every day and take six or seven hours to sleep every day.
Lately I nap fifteen minutes at lunch time so I comfortably stay afternoon.
The famous naked festival will be held on February 28th there.
On that day, it will be very crowded and it will be dangerous, so we went there today.
We prayed there at first and returned old charms and bought new ones.
I bought ten pieces of Naoigire for ocarina members.
I hope Naoigire will bring happy things to them.
Today I was almost driven mad by my supplier.
Two days ago I got an order from my customer.
Before I confirmed the order I negotiated with my supplier.
I asked him if the former price was okay and he confirmed.
So I sent the quotation to my customer and they confirmed.
However, when this order went through the next step, I asked my supplier for an official document with stamp.
He stopped replying me.
After few calls from him, today he finally told me.
The former price was not acceptable at this time.
He wanted an increase of 29% of the former price otherwise the factory was not willing to do it.
Even him was embarrassed.
He told me he would try to solve this problem.
Why not he negotiate with factory earlier and told me everything before I confirm order with my customer.
Now the order has already been confirmed, how can I ask for an increase of money?
And it's a customer who cooperated with us for the first time.
How can I recall my words.
Don't know what to do next now.
After a congress at Hokkaido, I came to Shin-Chitose airport.
I scheduled to go home at 23:00, but the flight was cancelled because of a heavy snow.
I and One of the participants of the congress, who reserved a seat on the same flight with mine, went to the spa of the airport, and took a rest until this morning.
Although my schedule was disturbed, but it was interesting and exiting experience for me!
When I stood in front of the poetic tablet of Yun Dong-ju with the poem "Prologue" carved into it,* which begins with "wishing not to have so much as a speck of shame toward heaven until the day I die," I felt a lump in my throat, and my eyes almost watered.
* Should I say "on it"?
I went to Doshisha University to see the memorial stones of Yun Dong-ju and Jeong Ji-yong.
When I stood in front of the poetic tablet of Yun Dong-ju with one of his poems "Prologue" carved into it,* which begins with "wishing not to have so much as a speck of shame toward heaven until the day I die," I felt a lump in my throat and my eyes almost watered.
When I stood in front of the poetic tablet of Yun Dong-ju with one of his poems "Prologue" carved into it,* which begins with "wishing not to have so much as a speck of shame toward heaven until the day I die," I felt a lump in my throat and my eyes almost watered.
Beef, and Norman conquest of England
When I was a high school student, I didn't used to be keen on the History.
I didn't like the History of Europe especially, because they seemed to be extremely complicated both geologically and historically.
There seems to be a plenty of Henry I and William II and someone like that anywhere and anytime of history.
The boundaries change continuously and drastically, and therefore I wasn't able to keep track of the historical persons or events at all.
However, recently I happened to know about a Norman Conquest in the 11th Century and found it interesting.
According to the article I read, during this period the English language changed a lot into the present style English.
Without the Norman Conquest, English may be intricate, difficult language to learn like German or other Germanic languages.
I studied German as second foreign language when I was a college student, and couldn't feel like I could master it at all.
A Interesting anecdote about the Norman Conquest is about the languages they used in that era.
The aristocrats used French while Anglo-Saxons used English, therefore, because mainly the former ate and the latter produced, the word cow has become to be called beef when they are regarded as food in English.
That has been my nagging question of all time.
Beef, and Norman conquest of England
When I was a high school student, I didn't used to be keen on the History.
I didn't like the History of Europe especially, because they seemed to be extremely complicated both geologically and historically.
There seems to be a plenty of Henry I and William II and someone like that anywhere and anytime of history.
However, recently I happened to know about a Norman Conquest in the 11th Century and found it interesting.
According to the article I read, during this period the English language changed a lot into the present style English.
I studied German as second foreign language when I was a college student, and couldn't feel like I could master it at all.
A Interesting anecdote about the Norman Conquest is about the languages they used in that era.
The aristocrats used French while Anglo-Saxons used English, therefore, because mainly the former ate and the latter produced, the word cow has become to be called beef when they are regarded as food in English.
That has been my nagging question of all time.
I didn't like the History of Europe especially, because they seemed to be extremely complicated both geologically and historically.
There seems to be a plenty of Henry I and William II and someone like that anywhere and anytime of history.
According to the article I read, during this period the English language changed a lot into the present style English.
Without the Norman Conquest, English may be intricate, difficult language to learn like German or other Germanic languages.
I studied German as second foreign language when I was a college student, and couldn't feel like I could master it at all.
The aristocrats used French while Anglo-Saxons used English, therefore, because mainly the former ate and the latter produced, the word cow has become to be called beef when they are regarded as food in English.
I've spent much time watching Olympic games past a couple weeks.
I've never watched this much games before because of time differences.
I don't do any winter sports myself but watching the games are really exciting!
I'm getting to know about it but still the strategies are too complicated to understand.
Also, I wonder what's the point of throw 8 times in each end, because the opponent move your stones and back to square one so easily and i feel like only the last a few slidings determine the outcome.
There is the last game tonight so I want to learn about the strategy more in detail.
I've never watched this much games before because of time differences.
Also, I wonder what's the point of throw 8 times in each end, because the opponent move your stones and back to square one so easily and i feel like only the last a few slidings determine the outcome.
Whenever I watch videos in which people describe an artificial intelligence world we will be living in and how convenient and intelligent life will be.
My feelings are that it always takes ages for those claims to come true should they will come true, but by the time that era comes I will have died already why should I give a fag.
I would never try to paint such a beautiful pic of the life I will have in the future just base on the fantasies and wild guesses people make.
I'm grow cold by lame act and unnatural situation of TV dramas.
A:There is no tears in the actor's eyes, but they plays a cry in TV drama.
Also in some scene, the actor only silent sob without cry out at the moment of his friends death.
Some character who just woke up from sleep but they can begin to do something smoothly.
These terrible acting make me to return from the world of TV drama world to the real world.
When yesterday I talked to one of my language partners, she already back to her family house, and she would meet her boyfriend there, duaring Spring festival, she had been her hometown, and her boyfriand came back to his family home.
I know that she will get married wiht her boyfriend next year, and her parrents met his parents to talk about the wedding ceremnoy last year, and they nust be going to hold a marirage ceremony next year, then, she already proposed to bank loann and had taken out loan with the bank, their new apartment will build by the end of this year, Surprisingly, I didn't expect thet she got married with her boydriend in her hometown so soon like this, She has just made a mariadge contrast there, marriadge ceremony wil be held next year.
I asked when her marriadge ceremoni would hold, she didn't know when, she is just depending her parents.
she used to say that she and her boyfriend don't pay any money but her boyfriand's parents should pay most of it.
It seems to me that they don't have much of a say in something to their bridal.
I was working a part-time job at a bakery when I was a student.
Until then, I had never worked a part-time job,so everything happened was fresh,exciting and fun.
The smell of fresh-baked bread stimulated not only our customers but also our stomach.
Especially, a fresh-baked white bread could be sold out soon.
On Fridays, in addition, little sleep is usually given, despite accumulated fatigue.
I gathered Ryota front of library.
We went to eat a soup dumpling right after we gathered.
After that we went to outlet moll close to Casino,but it already close at 6 pm.
I got $130.
When we go to back home we walked to home,but I had head ache.
I thought I got heat stroke.
It had 30 temperature outside tonight.
Today I got up early and starter to study English.
How and why are stereotypes are formed?
It could be unbeneficial because it keeps us from getting to know who they really are.
Media is just the main means of mass communication with an anonymous face.
In this season, many people are enjoying watching Olympic game on TV every day.
After Japanese athletes get gold medals, the rules have often been changed.
It is very nice room, so I may keep going back to this room for a while.
PCR is a very basic experimental method which is used in variety fields.
One of the tips of PCR is not to add too much DNA template in the first place.
This sounds preposterous because it is obvious that the more original DNA is, the more augmented DNA they obtain.
However, DNA sample sometimes contain substances which impede enzymes to replicate DNA.
Thus, when you do PCR, you have to meticulously examined the appropriate experimental condition in advance.
Do not make light of PCR even though it is just a rudimentary experiment.
I have written this down to buckle myself down.
Nowadays, I have failed PCR over and over again wasting time.
I don't have any plan for this weekend.
The first half of last year, I would wake up very early and take a train at around 6 am for commuting, and last half of the year, I shifted the time of getting on a train by one hour in order to get more time for sleeping.
And again, I am considering to change time to go to bed and get up.
I need to learn time management as well as objectives management.
What is mean?
Since residents of Mercosul are allowed to travel around South America crossing borders only using their ID, I do not have stamps on my passport attesting the exact dates of my trips to Argentina and Paraguay in 2010, that is why I informed approximate dates.
What do you say in English with GIKKURI GOSHI?
Upon stepping into the park, I felt something different.
After the game, they wept and the pictures was on the internet.
The place where I was taken as if I was on the dragon's back, it was Medieval Europe.
I found a cross in a dark atmosphere
Can you read this word of the title?
I captured curious about the word's meaning and its origin even though I wrote it myself.
The definition of "guardian" is not necessarily only parents.
As you may know, every words and phrase have the most suitable genre of writings respectively in which they should be used.
I am not that sure if the first English translation exactly means the ancient Japanese sentence, and I couldn't even translate the second one into English.
Can you read this word of the title?
I captured curious about the word's meaning and its origin even though I wrote it myself.
I'd never thought deeply about Japanese words and phrases until I joined this site to start correcting Japanese learner's posts.
I am learning a lot about my mother tongue day by day together with you.
The thing he said to me was not necessarily wrong.
I mentioned, "in the modern Japanese language." It implies that this word had been used with totally different meaning in the ancient Japanese language.
Ana-gachi meant "aggressively, forcibly, sincerely" in the ancient Japanese.
Can't we forcibly stop cherry blossoms fallen from trees?
As you may know, every words and phrase have the most suitable genre of writings respectively in which they should be used.
I mentioned, "in the modern Japanese language." It implies that this word had been used with totally different meaning in the ancient Japanese language.
Can you read this word of the title?
I'd never thought deeply about Japanese words and phrases until I joined this site to start correcting Japanese learner's posts.
I captured curious about the word's meaning and its origin even though I wrote it myself.
Tips to get a comfortable place on a crowded train in Tokyo.
Tips are based on my experience.
I hope these tips help you.
Place you wait to train
If you there is any station you often use for a commute or other things, you would better check the number of the car you suppose to get off.
That helps you get off smoothly.
What's more, you need to check the stairs where you suppose people would go, after they get off the train.
With that information, you can choose the place you wait.
Perhaps you think waiting in right or left line is insignificant but this tip is extremely useful.
If you wait in the other line, you would have to wait in the line because people keeping getting off aiming to stairs.
Go inside or go at the end
Near the doors tends to make a traffic jam and you'll be stuck if you stay there, so you'd better go inside especially in front of chairs as it is spacious.
If you are going to use special trains which do not stop many stations such as commuter-special-rapid, and if you are not staying in the first of a waiting line, it's good to drop at last.
As I mentioned, near door is a crowded place but if there are not so many stops it's a good place compared to stuck among people near doors.
For getting a seat you'd better be a detective!
Honestly, I do not good at detecting the person who gets off faster, but I'm sure if you could find the person and stay in front of the person, you would get the seat.
To be an early bird
Just it!
I update my profile!
I'm hifofumi and from japan.
I'm studying english!
My favorite things are music, cinema, fashion, art, cafe 
It's coming to spring soon!!
I want to look a Sakura quickly.
Anyway, I finished to my work, so what should I do after noon!
Do you think a good for this drink taste?
I don't think a good this sentence so please check a sentence.
please correct these wrong information to the fact.
I have a university entrance exam tomorrow!
I become naive in good way.
I want to tell my gratitude to many people who help me.
I become naive in good way.
I studied English and math in order to pass the exam.
My essay.
From the age of the ancient states, to the 21st century, so many people have been fighting constantly to be respected their minimum basic rights and freedoms, and demonstrated that the guarantee of human rights is the basis for justice and peace in our society.
The ignorance of basic human rights has brought such terrible histories as like the Holocaust and 731 units, and the humane aspiration for assurance of humane value and equality has greatly influenced the adoption of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights.
As the role of the government for ensuring human rights has become significant, provisions about guarantee of human rights have been described in the Constitution of many countries, and inside the society, activities for helping minority groups have increased.
From the mid-15th century to the beginning of the 20th century, Ghana was colonized and abused by Western powers such as Portugal and the Netherlands, and early realized on the importance of guarantee of human rights while suffering from innumerable damages from slave trade.
This awareness led to the first independence in sub - Saharan Africa in 1960.
Ghana appreciates and sympathizes with all moral and humanitarian efforts for the guarantee of fundamental human rights, and still working hard to provide the equal treatment for the minority group by supporting those who are still discriminated.
Just as many other countries in the world have done, the prime role of Ghana's prison was the accommodation of political prisoners by the coup, and even some of them were exploited in harsh circumstance when Kwame Nkrumah grouped cacao farms to mobilize private funds
The prisoners are isolated from society and must be responsible for their past, but they will someday return to society and live as equal people
Therefore, Ghana's prison has been focusing on their reformation and providing various support for their effective reintegration into society.
We would like to say that governments should pay attention to the rights of women and disabled people in the prison camp further from the improvement of treatment of simple prisoners.
Ghana concentrates on the implementation of the legislation that protects women and children from dangerous traditional practices such as the FGM, implements a women quota in the composition of the Prisons Service Council, and provides nursing homes and foster care facilities for the welfare of women prisoners.
Despite the fact that fair prison policies and rules are being enacted and implemented, however, Ghana 's circumstance of imprisonment are in poor condition, and still exists relative distance from the prison system of developed countries.
Ghana believes that the guarantee of social people and civilian-governmental humanitarian efforts towards to minority groups will ultimately lead to a virtuous cycle of future society.
And we finally hope that other countries in Africa will take care of the importance of ensuring the humane rights of minority groups or those who needs to be re-socialized, such as the prisoners, together with us.
We all know how hard to start a new language.
I have almost worked as a teacher in different types of schools, including kindergartens, primary schools and junior high schools.
In my brief teaching career I prefer first-hand experience because I want students to study more than those in classes and text books.
Therefore, I have made a survey from which it is concluded that boring textbooks fails to attract them.
Given that conclusion, I have changed the way of teaching and put multimedia into use, in order to guide them to learn gradually in context the way Chinese students do.
Moreover, I will show them more about Chinese culture like Chinese paper-cutting, calligraphy and Chinese songs.
Ever since I was in school.
Start learning a new language is hard for beginner.
But I find exciting ways to teach.
Make my own slides and learning Chinese culture events.
Like Chinese paper-cut, writing, songs and making dumplings in class.
In short, it shifts the focus from teaching a subject to teaching the students.
Therefore, one who makes it possible for a kid to learn even if he is different.
It's take about 10 minute.
My commute is used my car for 30 minuets.
I always listen to the podcast which is news programs.
The podcast is more interesting than TV shows,because there are a lot of comment or opinions.
Also the good point is updated every day.
My brother sent an email to me.
He said, "I will ask mum about a spring break plan." 
I suggest to him how about going to Onsen.
I am glad if she would want to go there.
However if it is Onsen, she might do not mind to go.
I think it is too important to have decent clothes and livings.
I have a dream to make gracious and classy living.
I promise you to fulfill my dreams.
His mistake was Intentional.
The other day, the US President Donald Trump met several survivors of the gun shooting massacre in Florida to lend an ear to the victims' voices in person.
When he seated himself on the chair, he grabbed a reminder sheet in his hands.
Also, the phrase sometimes has a slight nuance like, 'I understand your opinion and position, but I won't totally agree with you.' This is because the speaker doesn't listen to but hear you.
When he seated himself on the chair, he grabbed a reminder sheet in his hands.
Actually, this was the first time for me to learn this English phrase, so I looked it up in the online dictionary.
It seems that the expression shows someone your agreement or empathy without any particular intention in the daily life.
Also, the phrase sometimes has a slight nuance like, 'I understand your opinion and position, but I won't totally agree with you.' This is because the speaker doesn't listen to but hear you.
Is that worth being a reminder point to POTUS?
What do you think it would be good topics for it?
I expect that they'll bring up Olympic's games.
What kind of competitions so you focus on?
Which scene are you impressed?
It has been stoping snow for three days but it starts snowing again just now.
It has been stoping snow for three days but it starts snowing again just now.
So, I'll try to learn some questions in advance.
What kind of competitions so you focus on?
Which scene are you impressed?
I'll think of my answer while I'm driving.
It has been stoping snow for three days but it starts snowing again just now.
I was told that, but I actually have a mixed feeling.
English is a language that mediates my native language and other languages.
It was easy.
I sensed someone came and heard the person chatting with the salesman.
The other day, I saw packed unfamiliar fish in the fish section in the basement of a department store.
It was easy.
I sensed someone came and heard the person chatting with the salesman.
Then the second man told us to grill them without sprinkling salt.
If you find it's not salty enough after grilling, you can put soy sauce or something to adjust taste.
I grilled the fish as it was the next day, and it tasted good.
If I had sprinkled salt, it would have been too salty.
Thank you for your advice, the person who puts on brilliant red lipstick.
I want to be with him as long as possible in spite of his getting old.
"This is style what I like"
It's a long time which I didn't login this website.
I think it must be too lazy for me.
It need have a big determination to spend time to learn English everyday.
Despite me having grown up in a tight, warm family, I was quite a lone wolf...
Both of them never understood the beauty hidden in reading.
My father never understood the reason why I was reading books, and always tried to convince me on giving up on books.
In contrast, my mother was a well-talked woman.
She climbed the social ladder rather quickly after marrying my father, from what she told me, and ended working in a reputable mansion, under an extremely beautiful noble lady.
But as I entered the mansion and met Elina's eyes I felt a shock traveling through my body.
She had small, curly lips, and a black, deep iris.
She must have been known through the country...
I can't say things I don't mean at all because I feel these are kinds of lies.
I think people should tell truth from flatterers, but hearing flatterers may make them feel comfort.
I'm never nice, especially to men, but I think that I'm also honest to everyone, considering I never tell a lie.
In the past, I've commented how a lot of British series used to be transmitted in Latin America during my childhood.
I don't know, maybe that's one of the reasons I like London.
One of those series that left a great impression in me was "Enemy at the Door", that was about the occupation of one of the Channel Island, the only British territory that fall under the Nazi regime during WWII.
In my juvenile ignorance, I thought those were remote island, maybe close to the Falklands, and not between England and Europe, although I must confess that my mistake made the situation more interesting.
I deeply enjoy those old series, filmed in studio with few cameras.
They have a feeling of "telenovela", but with a worthy content.
So, it was a pleasure to find that series available in The Library of the Congress.
In my juvenile ignorance, I thought those were remote island, maybe close to the Falklands, and not between England and Europe, although I must confess that my mistake made the situation more interesting.
They have a feeling of "telenovela", but with a worthy content.
You can watch it here:
One of those series that left a great impression in me was "Enemy at the Door", that was about the occupation of one of the Channel Island, the only British territory that fall under the Nazi regime during WWII.
In my juvenile ignorance, I thought those were remote island, maybe close to the Falklands, and not between England and Europe, although I must confess that my mistake made the situation more interesting.
One of those series that left a great impression in me was "Enemy at the Door", that was about the occupation of one of the Channel Island, the only British territory that fall under the Nazi regime during WWII.
I deeply enjoy those old series, filmed in studio with few cameras.
I don't know, maybe that's one of the reasons I like London.
One of those series that left a great impression in me was "Enemy at the Door", that was about the occupation of one of the Channel Island, the only British territory that fall under the Nazi regime during WWII.
In my juvenile ignorance, I thought those were remote island, maybe close to the Falklands, and not between England and Europe, although I must confess that my mistake made the situation more interesting.
I deeply enjoy those old series, filmed in studio with few cameras.
So, it was a pleasure to find that series available in The Library of the Congress.
I understand that it is a day having no work to spare on a day not to write a journal.
I forget to leave it.
As associated symptoms, increasing pulse rate, respiration rate, and heart beat are observed.
However, when I think about the relationship of body heat and blood vessels, vessels are expended by high body temperature.
While I was studying, I had a question regarding blood pressure.
A patient sweats.
Sweating causes dehydration in the patient's body, so that ability of oxygen supply to cells decreases.
In this process, tachypnea is often seen on the patient due to the deficiency of oxygen.
As associated symptoms, increasing pulse rate, respiration rate, and heart beat are observed.
However, when I think about the relationship of body heat and blood vessels, vessels are expended by high body temperature.
It means, wider vessels reduce the pressure of blood flow.
Then, how does fever cause higher blood pressure?
I really don't understand why my listening skills will be improved.
I determined that I practice a lot every night.
What do you think of it?
A Japanese lady is missing. 
A 27-year-old Japanese lady from Hyogo prefecture has been missing since in the middle of this month.
A 26-year-old American man was arrested because he confined the lady to a room of B&B in Osaka.
Security camera caught them entering the building, but later, he came out alone with a big bag.
The police has been looking for the lady, but she's still missing.
I often say when you wonder whether you should do or not, it's better to do, because if you didn't do, nothing would happen.
However, I think young people meet people too soon after they encounter on the internet.
Of course, even if we dated a girlfriend or boyfriend for a long time, we would realize they are different from our thoughts after getting married, though.
Sometimes they misunderstand what we intend to say, and it may cause of the argument.
I'm not discouraging you to make friends on the internet, but I think it's better to exchange messages to see what kind of people they are before you meet in person.
I hope she will be found alive as soon as possible!
A 27-year-old Japanese lady from Hyogo prefecture has been missing since in the middle of this month.
Security camera caught them entering the building, but later, he came out alone with a big bag.
The police has been looking for the lady, but she's still missing.
You can use a dictionary to look after the meaning of the word.
I look up the dictionary when I want to know the meaning of the word.
I look up the meaning of the word by a dictionary.
I talk with them so much, and maybe I was talkative.
My English skills in getting better and better.
She is good at English,caring and active person.
I wonder how she gets such a time to do.
I have some questions
Thus, nobody notices if he presented at the party or not.
"In fashion show, designer's works should be spotlighted the most.
Models, music, and stage background should not distract people's attention."
This sentence was what I tried.
A car crash accident
I'm alive, but struggled by lots of work and some serious health problems.
Also I still recovering from a shock I've got after getting experienced with a terrible car crash accident I had last weekend that constantly ruined my mental health.
The day started very lovely.
I was exciting because of my upcoming fencing training and seeing my friends tonight.
There was extremely cold and snowing heavily and my friends and I were heading to the forest to take some winter pictures.
We were listening to our favorite music, joking and talking about our plans and nothing presaged any disaster.
But then I felt that something wrong happened with the car.
And then the driver started to lose control.
We have to make an emergency stop and tried to get out of the car but the doors were jammed..
I was terrified and frantically tried to open the door, but it was unsuccessful.
I wanted to call for help, but my phone turned off because it was too cold.
I felt incredibly anxious and hysterical.
I literally thought I was going to die.
My chest tightened and I felt unable to breathe.
And I finally understood, that I can't control my body anymore because I was derealized.
I stopped feeling any cold and couldn't move a muscule.
After 2 hours of experiencing of this terrifying condition I heard the voices of my friends, who tried to wake me up and get me out of car.
The help finally arrived, but I was frozen and unable to move.
They put me onto back seat of the car and we went home.
The realization that death was so close was driving me crazy.
I couldn't eat and sleep for 2 days and It was really hard to countine my studing.
Now I don't feel such an anxiety that I felt before, but my health is getting worse day by day...
I'm afraid that I urgenly need to get medical attention befote it's too late..
Some things as clothes, books, plates, music, movies and another type of things.
Maybe I need to sell or give to another people some things, because I don't need those any more.
If I only have that type of things I'm going to clean my house and my life.
I had used a PC cooler since I bought my current main PC.
Recently, it made noise a little so I bought new one: 
Using the fun, the temperature goes down to about 40 degrees C.
Arenius equation says that when the temperature goes up 10 degrees C then its life goes to half.
I use the fun expecting to extend the life of my main PC.
My previous main PCs were broken for around 4 years and I use the main PC for 3 and half year and on time is about 17k hours.
If I can use the PC for two years from now, I think the fun might be effective.
Recently, it made noise a little so I bought new one: 
Arenius equation says that when the temperature goes up 10 degrees C then its life goes to half.
I use the fun expecting to extend the life of my main PC.
My previous main PCs were broken for around 4 years and I use the main PC for 3 and half year and on time is about 17k hours.
Recently,I've read some story with food.
Like there are at the restaurant that the story move on. Or some essaies write about food.
Not serious, not difficult.
But I'd been hungry,when I was reading the food books. Then I couldn't stop to eat!
Unlike the translation, you can write your way using your limited vocabulary when your are summarizing the story.
And it will help improve your writing skill, I think.
Today, I'm going to summarize Hoshi's another flash story titled "Calamity".
He selected them especially with quick and sensible behavior.
He earnestly mends them, feeding, cleaning them daily.
When one of them gets sick, he gets worry about it more than himself.
Although he loves them really, that's not only reason he has them as pets.
In fact, he has narrowly escaped from a few disasters like the earthquake and shipwrecking.
Every time his mice begin to stir, he detects something wrong to happen beforehand.
He gets worry and moves to another house finally.
The new owner informs him that there's nothing special except recently the new residents come into the house next to his.
And it will help improve your writing skill, I think.
He selected them especially with quick and sensible behavior.
When one of them gets sick, he gets worry about it more than himself.
Although he loves them really, that's not only reason he has them as pets.
He believes that a mouse inherently has an ability to detect natural disasters.
In fact, he has narrowly escaped from a few disasters like the earthquake and shipwrecking.
I made my dress using a used-kimono.
This dress pattern has a short sleeve pattern, but I changed the sleeves three-quarter length with ruffles from conventional sleeves.
It's still as cold as ever, so I added the sleeve length by a few inches.
I think the dress goes well with boots and fur vest as a casual style.
I am often asked by people, "How to make a garment from a Kimono?" It's gonna be a long story, so I'll tell you another time.
In conclusion.
I made my dress using a used-kimono.
It's still as cold as ever, so I added the sleeve length by a few inches.
I sometimes used that restaurat a long time ago, and I went to visit with the desire to know what is going on.
It was crowded with many people as same as past time.
we were admiring a gorgeous mountain scenery 
We must have our own opinion, voice, to vote.
Our voice make the democracy stronger.
She has pitched against building a new road because a lot of trees should be felled.
Only a trickle of people survived the crash
A teacher radiated contentment when a pupil solved quite difficult math problem 
At the first part of the eighteenth century, France started to explore and colonice the west of the Misuri river.
Spain considered the territory that France was colonicing as its property, because Francisco Vazquez de Coronado had explored it and taken posesion for Spain in 1540.
He wanted interrogate them for collecting information about French interest on the territory.
He organised an expedition commanded by Pedro de Villanueva and composed by one hundred of soldiers and twelve Apache's guides.
Eurosport Poland cooperate with Krzysztof Gonciarz, polish Youtuber.
They work together at the Winter Olimpic Games.
I have been watching movies from Pyeongchang of Gonciarz for 2 days and I can regret that I did it so late because his vlogs are beautiful and there are a lot of interesting informations about WOG.
You can see a lot of things from behind the scenes and can meet the athletes you didn't know and it's so great.
I would like to watch for example a hockey final and I hope it will be able to wake up to me.
It's Friday evening but I don't rest because I have a lot of homeworks and midterms.
I like to listening commentators of biathlon: they are just great!
The Forthright Consulting Company provides consulting and advisory services to a variety of clientele over the years.
Especially, our history of working with indigenous groups has established a strong reputation among the First Nations in British Columbia.
In the past, we successfully helped to lobby government and made progress the legal rights of the Aboriginal peoples in Canada.
With the successful experience in farming Atlantic Salmon and four-star certified to the Global Aquaculture Alliance Best Aquaculture Practices, the company anticipates expanding their business in the Heitsuk Nation traditional territory, Bella Bella, BC.
my favorite teacher at school
My favorite teacher at school was the natural science teacher, her class was very entertaining and I remembered that she left us a lot of homework such drawing or cutting off images of animals, plants and part of cell.
And also I had a book with all records of newspaper and magazines.
And finally I remembered that her class contains poster stuck on the wall of animals, plants and planetary sistem.
In this letter, the signatories complain that governments, education ministers, and the editorial boards of newspapers anxiously await the results of PISA, which are cited authoritatively in countless policy reports, and these have begun to influence the educational practices in many countries.
In addition, these experts emphasize that PISA is an organ of the OECD and this is an organization that, by its nature and objectives, will always hypertrophy the role of economics in education.
The other is that the report is made by specialists in psychometrics, statistics and economics.
Pisa gives us data on the academic development of the countries, however some governments use that data poorly and become obsessed.
Exams are important tools to evaluate, but they become a problem when they become an end in itself, because education is not about preparing students to pass exams but preparing them for life.
Can you please check these sentenses below, which is about "my staying in London and Dublin"?
For London, I had lived there for 9 month in 2016 to 
After studying in London, I moved to Dublin as working holiday last June.
I was studying English for first 3 months in a language school and then I got a teaching job in a small language school.
I got 5 irish students who were complete begginers.
In the school, there were no teaching stuff like textbooks so I had to prepare them by myself.
Although preparing the class was a bit tough, there were good students, who were studying really hard.
During the holiday, I hanged out friends and we went to some cities such as Belfast, Galway, Alan irland etc.
It was great fun and I enjoyed myself so I miss those days.
Once upon a time in a magic forest, two friends that they were very close,because since they were a children spend time together.
they used to play together in the forest for hours; they liked to climb trees, annoy fairies and play hidding with the animals.
Althougt they were different physically, they had a lot of thing in common, they enjoy to be together.
She was a beautiful and tendernes princess, and he was a small, green gnomus with a gorgeous smile.
They both live separated by a river that cross the forest.
To cross the river was a really dangerous for them, for the strong watercourses, so they dreamed to buil a brige that united the both territories, this will benefit them and to habitants of the town.
Important economists have declared that the most of people will live in big cities, and small villages will be depopulated in 15 years.
But nowadays, a lot of families have thought about moving into rural areas because of the huge benefits which it involves.
If you are planning to have a change of air and live in a countryside, you should continue reading.
The most important one is that your health will impove in a short period of time, because of the atmosphere is cleaner and the air is less polluted.
Another point of wiew in favour of living in the country you may easily buy a house is cheaper than to buy one in a city.
In fact, there will be plenty of space to built a mansion and you can have garden or even swimming pool.
However, there are some disadvantages whitch you may take into account.
For instance, Living in the country is slower.
On the other hand, people there do not earn so much money and find a job is quite more difficult.
In addition, the access to shops you can have in the city is different in the country.
To sum up, living in the country may have a lot of advantages such as fresh air or less trafic.
However, a lot of people decide to stay in the city, due to the life in the town is easier.
Altought, if you are retired and you need a relaxed life it can be an attractive option.
Important economists have declared that the most of people will live in big cities, and small villages will be depopulated in 15 years.
But nowadays, a lot of families have thought about moving into rural areas because of the huge benefits which it involves.
If you are planning to have a change of air and live in a countryside, you should continue reading.
The most important one is that your health will impove in a short period of time, because of the atmosphere is cleaner and the air is less polluted.
Furthemore, the trafic is not so heavy.
Another point of wiew in favour of living in the country you may easily buy a house is cheaper than to buy one in a city.
In fact, there will be plenty of space to built a mansion and you can have garden or even swimming pool.
However, there are some disadvantages whitch you may take into account.
For instance, Living in the country is slower.
On the other hand, people there do not earn so much money and find a job is quite more difficult.
However, a lot of people decide to stay in the city, due to the life in the town is easier.
Altought, if you are retired and you need a relaxed life it can be an attractive option.
A Joke. A Crazy Murderer
They immediately call their headquarters and talk with their boss who asks what has happened.
They explain to him that a woman killed her husband; she first had stabbed him twelve times, shot twice, cut his head off then burned his body.
"Yes, she said that her husband had come into the kitchen while she was washing the floor." 
It has been a long time I write anything here.
I assumed that so many friends might be left the site.
In the late 1950s, Suburbicon is a small suburban community, where families, only white and middle class, enjoy a quiet life in pretty detached houses.
When the Mayers move into their home, the postman thinks they are furniture movers, because there are not Afro-American dwellers in the area.
Their neighbours are shocked, too, and immediately build high fences to be separated from them.
The family Lodge, composed of Gardner, Rose and their son Nicky, is not so close-minded.
From their patio, Rose, who became disabled after a car accident, and her twin sister Margaret, who often takes care of her, feel pity for young Andy Mayer alone in his backyard, and they push Nicky to play with the kid.
In the late 1950s, Suburbicon is a small suburban community, where families, only white and middle class, enjoy a quiet life in pretty detached houses.
When the Mayers move into their home, the postman thinks they are furniture movers, because there are not Afro-American dwellers in the area.
I get many ideas when I finished it.
The smaller aim is, the better you will do.
Because you'r not willing to do it if the work seem to be a lot or spend a lot of time at first.
But in the end, most of them will be stoping far away from finished.
As I read over the book, I finally find the answer that I set aims too big.
These lines are what one of Gintama characters, Sinpachi, said.
He told these his sister, Tae, who was made to get married with the head of a elite clan, Kyuubei.
This is because his dad and other members of the clan raised her as a boy.
Tae's been a strong womam, who never show her weakness.
They both grew up together and Kyuubei was admire her.
Kyuubei said to Tae, "If I become a strong samurai with a big heart, will you get marry me?".
Even when you're hurt or want to cry, forcing yourself to smile.
Always without saying anything to anyone, you bear the burden alone, decid alone and end up smiling alone.
He told these his sister, Tae, who was made to get married to the head of a elite clan, Kyuubei.
Gintama takes place in old Japan with futuristic civilization.
In old Japan, the head who succeeds their households was always a man.
Tae's been a strong womam, who never shows her weakness.
Funny moments on this part:
Even when you're hurt or want to cry, forcing yourself to smile.
Always without saying anything to anyone, you bear the burden alone, decid alone and end up smiling alone.
If you're hurt, then just tell us.
These lines are what one of Gintama's characters, Shinpachi, said.
He told these his sister, Tae, who was made to get married to the head of a elite clan, Kyuubei.
While Gintama characters always try to have viewers laugh, serious scenes always give me goose bumps.
Tae's been a strong womam, who never shows her weakness.
Today I was in the grim mood because I am ill.
But lately, I have taken some pills and my body temperature has fallen.
It is lugubrious to consider that it will rise again and cause my body to ache.
I feel great frustration that I have caught this disease and cannot even go outdoors.
I hope the owner to hire one more person.
I can not even dream to clean dining area.
I only can pile stock at slow time, nothing else.
I will report this filthy place to health inspector after quit this job.
Life is short, so burn it hot!
Help me correct the mistake.
My family business internet cafe.
And today I met 2 costomers from Russia.
I afraid to communicate with them bacause I not good English.
I don't know what do in this case.
I cannot remember the last time when I wrote here.
These days I was busy for new job search.
So I begun to study English again.
I was very frastrating.
I will tell you Japanese and please tell me English!
Due to seeing bad dream I woke up at 3.30 am today.
Dream was strange I saw lots of people running here and there I tried to stop someone then one child was stopped her forehead was painted with strange thing.
She grab my hand and tried to see my hand surface of line but after seeing my palm she became a cat and tried to biting me and then i throw away her.
Writing it down in a one place makes my understanding deeper and clearer.
All your attempts leads to nothing.
Tuned resource is a first state when you start do the right things to get energy from a resource.
If you do it regularly, your energy flow became more and more stable and sustained.
Developed state is when you know and easily do many great stuff in resource, get energy from it without efforts, and can shift your attention to other resources when needed.
Addiction - is a state in which you overdependent from the particular resource.
In many addictions you identify yourself with ideas or group of people.
You loose yourself.
Shopaholics, bodybuilders and gym bunnies trapped into addiction to their image.
Addiction here is might be money-grubbing and lust for money.
Economics has two pieces- money and living conditions.
They waste their time on information neither for using it in the future, nor for conscious pleasure.
For instance, often young mothers use the word WE, saying about the success of their child.
Excessive number of trainings.
Using strong medications to feel yourself good without medical prescriptions.
Love addict fixates himself on particular person.
Unimportant or too small in comparison to level of your personality.
Workaholics see the world by the lenses of work.
They tend to see the money as a consequences of lots of work.
Addiction here is when you dissolve yourself in group of people or merger with a person psychologically.
In addition to that, one of my best friends, who had one, told me that it was worth buying.
They asked many questions, saying "Alexa, what is the weather like?", "Alexa, Who was the first US president?" and "Alexa, At what temperature is water boiled?.
I tried doing some things with Alexa, but all I do now is just asking her to play music.
What I feel irritated is that she just say "I don't know that" when I can't say something right in English.
As far as my wife is concerned, she asks Alexa to count amount of time when she cooks.
I asked the friend who recommended Amazon Echo to me, for what he uses it, and I found that he also faced the same situation.
Olympic!
For these two weeks I've been watching olympic games on TV.
Especially, I like figure skating, speed skating, and curling.
In speed skating Japanese athletes won some medals.
I can't help crying when I'm watching them struggling to win.
Sometimes, or in many cases they can't reach a goal which they've been dreaming and making efforts for.
As in Japan many winter sports are not very popular,they sometimes can't find enough number of sponsors.
So after games I heard some athletes saying they didn't know if they would keep trying for another four years even if they themselves wanted to.
I love walking in park.
I would start slow and I will do this maybe 30 minutes a day.
I really enjoy my time while doing this.
Actually I went through a time when I felt tired all the time.
Even after I slept for 8hours at night, I woke up feeling groggy, tired and wanting to go back to sleep.
It's walking helps me overcome my tiredness.
After doing that, I can even focus on the morning class.
read less than before
People used to read books on the subway in my city, but now most people watch video or play games on their phones.
Actually I bought 5 books on Amazon last months.
All of them lay unopen.
I spent most of my leisure time on my phones.
In the front of the restaurant, they showed the price list, but it was lunch menu's price.
I wonder it they intended us to get more money.
Other customers were also asking about the price at casher.
I never go to the restaurant anymore.
In the front of the restaurant, they showed the price list, but it was lunch menu's price.
I wonder it they intended us to get more money.
I never go to the restaurant anymore.
My daughter and I went to a buffet restaurant tonight.
I wonder it they intended us to get more money.
I never go to the restaurant anymore.
Should Teachers Get Their Gun?
Every time a gun shooting tragedy occurred in the US, each President would refer to the necessity of the gun control policies.
I'm dubious whether all of them worried about the problem in earnest, but at least they 'appeared' to think about it.
Yesterday, I was totally surprised to hear the news that Mr Trump officially claimed more teachers should hold their gun at school in order to avoid criminals from approaching their students.
He went so far as to say that armed teachers should be rewarded some bonus.
She fiercely criticized a lot of politicians, including Trump, financially supported by the NRA, though her emotional voice apparently didn't deliver to the oval office.
Come to think of it, Michael Moore, who produced a controversial film titled 'Bowling for Columbine' in 2002, should make the sequel documentary with a candid interview towards Donald Trump.
I spoke with my boss after work and I told him I will leave my office next month.
I feel terribly sorry but I think it is necessary to improve my programming skill.
Please let me know your valuable opinions and suggestions about the translation.
In the eye-catching figure skating competition, Japanese skater Yuzuru Hanyu, previously suffering through injury, again competed against top skaters form all over the world and won the golden medal in the end.
He is the first figure skater that won the Olympics champion twice in a row in the past 66 years.
Another Japanese skater Shoma Uno earned the silver medal while the previous world champion Spanish skater Javier Fernandez took the bronze medal.
I reserved a apartment in this trip.
I thought that the house would be small for 5 people, It wasn't,It very fit for us.
When we arrived at the apartment then we realized that the apartment was pretty good, surrounded with mountain and tree, a very quiet place and more important things that all of us have a bed, It is awesome to me.
I'm going to tell them "group activity".
They always like to belong to some groups so that they can be relieved with having a sense of solidarity "I'm not alone".
As a result of it, they look all similar, their clothes and hairstyle.....
Of course, they assert their personality but it doesn't stand out in such an environment where all is heading in the same direction.
I think it will be better for student to choose a major field of study wait until the second or the third year.
I don't think that many students know what exactly they want to study before they go to a university or a college.
Actually many people are adrift of what they want to do with their life.
But months later, I realized I am not interested in it at all.
I hate reading mountains of cases.
I was so depressed everyday.
Also since I began speaking English, I had many opportunities to talk with many foreign friends as well.
I also met some American people, and I talked about a relationship between America and the UK with some American friends and British friends.
The first time, I thought this is quite strange that both of them are complaining each other.
I was wondering why do they hate each other.
Because they're kinda kinship.
But one day my American friend told me that around 18th century, there was a war between America and the UK and eventually America left the UK and that day is called "Independence Day".
I assume that this history is quite famous but personally I didn't know this incident.
So I slightly made sense that they don't like each other.
I think it is because Japan doesn't have any relationship like between America and the UK so I can't even imagine that we have another nation that speaks Japanese.
However, I do say it is sad that they don't like their kind of kinship.
And eventually, they said 'Even though British people said it's "a proper English", I don't afford it and ours is better".
On the contrary, British people said "Their slangs are cheesy, and our English is way better and "Proper" '.
A pop singer came to the 80th anniversary celebration of my high school.
I still remembered that the students kept screaming during his performance.
At the end of the performance, many students were so excited that they threw their stuffs into the air and rushed to the stage.
all you can drink until 120 minutes!
Today I couldn't access the computer my disk.
I thought it might be the problem of cable, so I decided to buy a new one today.
I wanted to come early and back to home early, so I set my arlam clock at seven.
The shops selling settings rewarding computer are nearly all closed, be the chinese new year is coming soon, they all come back to their hometown.
I saw only one opened shop.
The clerks call me in.
They bought me a new cable and try it in their own computer, but it failed anyhow.
The clerk thought I might buy a fake disk.
It's difficult to tell only by the appearance of it.
Finally I bought a new one which costs 400 yuan.
Today I couldn't access the computer my disk.
I thought it might be the problem of cable, so I decided to buy a new one today.
They bought me a new cable and try it in their own computer, but it failed anyhow.
It turned that his guess was right.
Finally I bought a new one which costs 400 yuan.
I washed curtain today.
Last year, I had a chain problem and this time, my bicycle had a brake problem.
Since the sounds of the brakes were very loud, some people turned around and tried to see what happened to me.
I thought that I caused a noise problem, so I finally went to a bicycle shop to get my bicycle fixed.
The shop owner was very good at his work, so it took him only five minutes to put oil on the parts of brakes and checked the other parts of my bicycle.
My husband and I went to Hokkaido to take pictures of steam locomotive.
It was 3 nights 4 days trip.
I checked in hotel at 20:30.
And I feel really disappointed that I couldn't tell my idea clearly.
I usually look up to someone who can speak foreign language fluently.
Though I've learned English and Chinese for years, my language skill especially in speaking is still poor.
Because I've worked trading company now, there are a lot of opportunities to communicate with foreign people.
To dance hip-hop is my hobby.
I am going to wear the sport clothes tomorrow to do sport at the welfare facilities.
I am going to buy something to give my mother at that covenience stor.
I am going to wear the sport clothes tomorrow to do sport at the welfare facilities.
I am going to buy something to give my mother at that covenience stor.
To-infinitive
To dance hip-hop is my hobby.
I am going to wear the sport clothes tomorrow to do sport at the welfare facilities.
I am going to buy something to give my mother at that covenience stor.
I am going to wear the sport clothes tomorrow to do sport at the welfare facilities.
I am going to buy something to give my mother at that covenience stor.
I have few opportunities to use English after I graduated from university.
My current job doesn't requires any English skills, so I don't have to study English.
Having been studied for a long time, that is waste.
And I'm thinking about quitting my current job and get a job that requires English skills.
I have less time after working but I'll try to continue studying again and improving my English skills.
I read two books for the past two weeks, and it was quite fun.
By the way, I bought a book when I was in the UK, but I haven't finished it because reading books in English takes forever.
This is my new resolution of this year!
Moreover, this bad effect lasts next day.
I think staying awake late is against the human nature.
I can concentrate my work.
why learn grammar 
There are four different traits about grammar.
Firstly, it's the knowledge about language.
Secondly, it's the ability to use language.
Thirdly, it's a rule that helps us talk about language.
Fourthly,it's the attitude and mindset or the way of thinking about language.
We can usually "Do" grammar automatically because we have gained tons of knowledge about it since our childhood.
If our ability of grammar is weak, people around us might feel uncomfortable with it and take a lot of energy to understand us even worse, have a bias against us.
If you know about grammar well, you can convey your thoughts clearly and other people trust you well.
Pain is partly similar to Weather
To save energy in our everyday life we should use water economically
I like Shiina Ringo which is a musician of Japan.
She directed promotion of Tokyo Olympic in Rio Olympic closing ceremony.
Her music has special air and I especially love her song's lyrics.
Painting School 
Today I went to my painting school to show my last piece of my current course.
I have been making starting it over four times, and I am fed up with it.
So, before going to school, I had made up my mind if she wouldn't like my fourth design, I would change the whole things in the design.
I was very happy even though I still have to work on it.
I think I probably will start my last course in spring.
I just can't wait!
Are there any good sysonyms to the phrase:
Are there any good sysonyms to the phrase:
This argument could be partially correct; however, it seems that the role of the extended family remains crucially in some Asian countries, such as Japan and China.
In Eastern Asian society, there is a trend that the birth rate decreases over year, as many families have only one or no child.
Even in China, there is a one-child policy lasting from the 1980s to 2017.
Cousins could be the closet play partners for the 'only children's childhood.
During my childhood and puberty, I frequently suffered from loneliness as many other 'only children' did.
We spent a plenty of time together just like siblings.
The similar situation exists widely in only child families.
Moving from children to elders, the aged people may face a problem that nobody takes care of them because they have only one or without any children.
In Japan, it is a significant social issue of elders without children.
In that case, the relatives, in an extended family, could be very critical to take care of each other and help others when they have difficulties.
Although the Asian countries have shifted to individualized society in a certain level, traditional culture still plays a vital role in the society.
We can easily find high quantities of family-own business in regions, such as HK.
Looking at the structure of the family own business, we can find out that those enterprises mainly base on extended families.
The role of the extended family may vary from countries to countries.
In some Western society, the extended families might have become less important.
However, the extended families still are very significant in the Asian society.
One of students of our English class talked us her travel to Spain.
A: I stayed four night six days in Spain.
A: With my three friend.
A: Of course, it was Sagrada Familia of world Heritage.
B: By the way, how much was the travel cost?
One of students of our English class talked us her travel to Spain.
B: How many days were you traveling?
Where did you go in Spain?
B: How does the time difference between Japan and Spain?
A: Tokyo is eight hours ahead from Madrid.
A: Of course, it was Sagrada Familia of world Heritage.
I absolutely recommend you!
B: By the way, how much was the travel cost?
Suddenly,I felt lethargy today.
I couldn't understand it reason.
I should probably change my thinking.
Suddenly,I felt lethargy today.
I got a book bill, which I bought online the other day, but I forgot to pay it, so I paid it at a convenience store today.
Right now, I'm busy with my work and don't have time to read it.
Now, i'm watching the Olympic Games with my wife.
It's Curing Game.
It's very exciting game.
Unfortunately, I couldn't take a pay leave afternoon.
But I left on time which was a good progress to me.
Because my eyes hurt very much.
I may well get an eye sickness.
I might well go to see an eye doctor.
Today I seat near to a big monitor for watching my excel sheets clearly and protecting my eyes.
Sometimes I wonder were they really working in the daytime?
I started to doubt that.
I was sure they had a good relationship so that they can work together smoothly.
I have not interested it and I don't want to work on these because skill is the only thing I can trust.
Never ever make friends with your co-worker which is one of my job bibles.
Everyone hates it when someone cut them off on the highway.
If I hadn't seen it on Internet, I wouldn't have known.
Yesterday, I listened to the slowest song ever and almost fell asleep on it.
Being the most motivated, we were chattering in Italian almost always.
I had made a hard training n Ajaccio.
The following year, in Privas, I had experience.
My students that I taught from one class to another for 4 years,were learning a lot.
What more could I have asked?
I tried to make my classes interesting by choosing the most attractive readings in textbooks and commenting them brilliantly, like an actor playing a one-man show on the stage.
However, I regularly gave them lessons to learn, homework to do, and heavy revisions to prepare their quarterly tests.
After ten years, I had a feeling that I was playing the same comedy perpetually..
A prisoner can go about his business in his cell, whereas I was bound to speak non stop, while supervising my class.
I often had sore throat.
The last year, in February 1954, I contracted a more serious illness: a rheumatoid purpura, which paralyzed me almost a whole term, mobilizing several doctors, long bedridden and put to a series of injections.
Some colleagues exhorted me to come back, while I was just recovering.
I had attended a training course in Paris for it..
It was a risk I had to take!
I was a strict, demanding, respected teacher.
I tried to make my classes interesting by choosing the most attractive readings in textbooks and commenting them brilliantly, like an actor playing a one-man show on the stage.
Bulling in my workplace
I'm annoying from a bullying in my workplace.
The bullying is conducted by both email and direct talking to me.
When I had a bulling, I usually lose my willingness to work in spite of a pile of work.
I don't have the confidence to keep me normal if such bullyings would continue for about five or six years before he retired...
Scamper on- what's mean?
I participated five meetings and wrote four reports.
In addition today was a parents visiting day.
It was the busy week I had never experience.
I wondered if I would go well.
Finally a weekend came.
I don't know why but I just remembered about my friend's ripped T-shirt that he asked me to fix when I was in a meeting.
I worked at an event related to high-tech industry as a temporary employee.
My job was very simple: scanning visitors' bar-code in the holder that hanged from their neck.
Whenever they went, stopping by booths, attending sessions, recieveing samples from promotional models, their bar-code was sccaned.
The organizer of the event will collect the data to find out what kind of people who were interested in a certain product.
The companies can analyze the data to develop their products that can meet customer's demand.
The visitor's behavior was monitered through being scanned.
The organizer of the event will collect the data to find out what kind of people who were interested in a certain product.
Then, they will give information to the sponcers, like tech companies.
new word from BBT3-10
Today's new word is "weird out".
I have already know "weird" as strange.
I saw the idiom like this
"If you join my experiment in a lab, it might wired you out."
Because Wolwitz's girlfriend asked Lenoard to go his lab to see the experiment.
Wolwitz didn't like it so he ordered Lenoard not to invite her to the experiment.
The days kept passing by and we all children were getting more mature and older, developing the ability to think, ask, and decide.
My cousins were getting even more independent and choosy with each rising and setting of the sun.
Pinkey had now reached Grade 8 too, which means it was time for our elders to stop her formal education.
To the contrary, they appeared more traditional and narrow-minded.
She accepted the prevailing belief that girls over age 14 are supposed to stay at home and help with household chores.
Every day I thought about my education and restrictions on my life.
The cold, wet sand on the bank was like due on the grass.
My father bought big tiramisu.
I think it os over one kilo gram.
It's delicious!, I'll boring to eat when I eat half.
When will cherry blossom bloom this spring?
It's about time I'm interested in that.
According to the Cherry Blossom Forecast by a weather forecast company, cherry blossoms are expected to start blooming at the same time as an average year or a little earlier in most cities.
The forecast was announced yesterday following January 25th and February 8th.
English version is also prepared.
In the recipe I have to boil for thirty minutes 
But, I wanted to eat early.
So I boiled for half of time.
Although their English skills will improve, they might not be able to graduate from their schools because they may not have enough time to study other subjects.
I attended a workshop where attendees practice delivering a presentation in English.
Although their English skills will improve, they might not be able to graduate from their schools because they may not have enough time to study other subjects.
I attended a workshop where attendees practice delivering a presentation in English.
Once you meet a man and realize This is yours!
You adore his thougts, eyers, speech...
Every his word and action,,,And you know He has the same feeings...
You must have the future...
But,suddenly,the awfully stupid things happen...
And both of you have to hide feelings and desires
Higashine city is located in the north of Japan, and surrounded by middle height mountains.
Some of manufacturing company's factories are here.
Our town is famous for "fu" which is breadlike food made of wheat gluten.
I sometimes stew it with potatoes, beaf, carrots, and onions, then season with soy source.
He bets they're enjoying the fine weather and the laid-back lifestyle there.
Hmm, the expression "laid-back lifestyle" is an idiomatic English.
I have had sore throat.
I also received nebulizer treatment at the nearby ENT clinic, which did a lot of good.
I have had sore throat.
I also received nebulizer treatment at the nearby ENT clinic, which did a lot of good.
I've been tempted to keep my household inhaler close at hand.
We have different choices in our life.
For example, we can choice our field of study at university, our job, our city for living, our partner, etc.
No doubt, some of choices can affect in whole life and others are less important.
Don't you think it's kind of playing with the word of "freedom"?
What a complicated vita we have!
We met each other for the first time it was one autumn night.
After that, we said Good-bye each other.
It made me that I was going to sad.
The days kept passing by and we all children were getting more mature and older, developing the ability to think, ask, and decide.
For example, I have decided that I will do my intermediate in commerce, not in medical or engineering.
The days kept passing by and we all children were getting more mature and older, developing the ability to think, ask, and decide.
Pinkey had now reached Grade 8 too, which means it was time for our elders to stop her formal education.
My brother and I felt sorry for her, but all other elders felt it was a right decision.
Every day I thought about my education and restrictions on my life.
Water kept pouring from the sink and the soap had slipped in it, and I was lost in thought with a plate in my hands.
I have to go for a race with my brothers.
I remember sometimes Azeem and I used to have the race on the bank of the river Indus when Father used to take us out.
I have to write a hypothetical letter of application for a post of a camp monitor in a summer camp, so not in all the writing give I real information about me.
I am writing to apply for the post of a camp monitor in your day and residential summer camp advertised in your webpage.
I have also led a young team in a sports competition for children at the age of 10.
For these reasons, I believe I would be suitable for the job advertised, as apart from my experience, I always try to make children enjoy doing activities or working as team.
I have been in Shanghai with my family for almost two years but will leave it this May.
As a memorable thing, we stayed in the hotel near the Bund for one day at the Chinese New Year.
I found a travel agency offered one night stay including dinner buffet, breakfast and one drink in the hotel bar at the cost of 150dollra.
I thought that was good price as staying in the hotel around the Bund was expensive.
The hotel we stayed in was pretty good.
It had a nice bar at the top floor, swimming pool and gym.
I and my daughter enjoyed swimming and my wife did some exercise.
After that we had dinner, there were a lot of dishes in the restaurant so my daughter was very happy and ate very much.
We stayed longer there so the bar did not allow my daughter to enter.
I and my wife take turns having a cop of beer at the bar.
It was really good so we enjoyed beautiful night view of the Bund.
I had a work almost 12 years.
I like working at there.
A lots of elderly pass away because their sick or old age.
I hope like it like nursing care work.
hello I'm su hee han I'm
I'm 12 year old
I like playing the piano and draw a picture finally 
These days I mainly made things
I am not good at English but iI want o learn a lot.
we may not communicate well...
Thak you for reading it.
He seemed to be happy, either.
I learened study English
But I should learn more
So diffecult..
you will have a nice day
I learened study English
you will have a nice day
Akito Watanabe won the silver medal in Nordic Combined.
All his athletic events had ended yesterday.
At that time, his coach said that Watanabe broke his ribs just before the Olympic game.
When he was interviewed, he did not say an excuse.
At that time, his coach said that Watanabe broke his ribs just before the Olympic game.
When he was interviewed, he did not say an excuse.
We took a taxi to go the my friend's house after left the airport.
The roads were very dusty, dust was falling on the taxi seat too, On the whole,not so clean.
Perhaps, I think it has many different point now, because my information is old.
Anyway it is the story more than 20 years ago.
Istanbul is divided into European side and the Asian side by Bosporus, and the European side is divided into old town and new town.
Our taxi was crossing Second Bosphorus Bridge, entered the new town.
Her apartment was in a quiet residential area, it seemed like a lie noises of until now.
When we arrived her house, I was surprised because it was very big.
I have heard that a person of appointed overseas, mostly they become able to rich life compared to in Japan.
Somehow it seems to be true.
There was many rooms and bathroom for visitor, in her house.
I told her, "What a wide house!
cleaning is hard, right?".
"No, a housekeeper comes once a week".
You are lucky".
We talked a lot, and I went to bed early that day in the big guest room.
The roads were very dusty, dust was falling on the taxi seat too, On the whole,not so clean.
Istanbul is divided into European side and the Asian side by Bosporus, and the European side is divided into old town and new town.
Our taxi was crossing Second Bosphorus Bridge, entered the new town.
When we arrived her house, I was surprised because it was very big.
I knew I would have a chance to see some pyramids including the famous Tutankhamen and his golden mask and valuable burial objects.
Actually, such Tutankhamen sort of thing was my original aim at first.
But at that moment, while I saw the pyramid of Ramses II, I kind of fell In love with him.
Well, definitely he must be a fashionable and handsome man!The only thing I didn't like about him was that he had hundreds of imperial concubine:p
The end
I knew I would have a chance to see some pyramids including the famous Tutankhamen and his golden mask and valuable burial objects.
Actually, such Tutankhamen sort of thing was my original aim at first.
But at that moment, while I saw the pyramid of Ramses II, I kind of fell In love with him.
Well, definitely he must be a fashionable and handsome man!The only thing I didn't like about him was that he had hundreds of imperial concubine:p
I love Chinese dumplings as ever.
What do you want to eat kinds of food before you will die pretty soon?
Indeed, I probably eat Chinese dumplings on the bed.
People will die someday, so I think that people have to enjoy doing your life.
What do you think of it?
I imagine that Japanese people don't enjoy their life, and Japan's policy is always confusing as always.
i wake up, and clean my room, then i go to my job that's take about a 8 hours, after i finish my job i go to a toys-store for buying some puppet for my daughter 
I should be study and effort to listening and pronunciation of English.
I review that how to study and I have to change how to study English.
I am going to study every night for about 5minuets, especially pronunciation and listening.
I have to effort to improve them.
The days kept passing by and we all children were getting more mature and older, developing the ability to think, ask, and decide.
Pinkey had now reached Grade 8 too, which means it was time for our elders to stop her formal education.
To the contrary, they appeared more traditional and narrow-minded.
She accepted the prevailing belief that girls over age 14 are supposed to stay at home and help with household chores.
My brother and I felt sorry for her, but all other elders felt it was a right decision.
Every day I thought about my education and restrictions on my life.
I have to go for a race with my brothers.
We have a bet of 50 rupees.
How dare he say such a thing?
I felt embarrassed and quickly took the soap out of water, and closed the sink.
I remember sometimes Azeem and I used to have the race on the bank of the river Indus when Father used to take us out.
I don't like two of colleagues at my department.
They have the worst relationships at this workplace.
Hifumi is always doesn't work at this office.
Reach is always abusing his colleagues, and he is always showing his power and his misunderstand knowledge.
He is pretty funny and liar.
I feel troublesome when I was talking with him about our duty.
com, a start-up fintech company in China who dedicates to improving financial industry using artificial intelligence technologies.
Do you understand my feeling?
I bet that you can't realize what my feeling to you, because you don't know me even though I know you.
It's typical fell in love situation in Japan.
The glasses look good on you, I think.
I want to see your face and I want to meet you once a day.
I want to hug you the whole day.
"It was her third World Cup title and the 29-year-old celebrated by announcing her engagement to be married in her acceptance speech."
You can go out through exit number 2.
You are living on sunday?
My daughter picked up the slack when I have a lot of work at home.
In her case, all the students in her class are jumping a big jump rope at the same time.
In a competition that will be held soon at her scool, students competes against other classmates about how many times they can jump with all the students of each class.
My colleagues picked up the slack when I got the full and took off from my work.
By the way, my daughter got hurt on her neck yesterday.
Her neck was red yesterday.
Today, the long scar on her neck looks like she's wearing a neckless.
In her case, all the students in her class are jumping a big jump rope at the same time.
In a competition that will be held soon at her scool, students competes against other classmates about how many times they can jump with all the students of each class.
I often rely on my daughter to pick up the slack with household chores.
She sometimes helps me to fold the washing.
Today, the long scar on her neck looks like she's wearing a neckless.
He took the "Spring Exam" through which he can only go to one vocational college instead.
We hope that he can go to one better college, but we can't force he to do things he doesn't want to do.
My nephew has nothing to do before he go to college.
We are all worried that whether he will do something not good or not, since he has a very long time to do anything he likes.
I am a indecisive aunt.
My nephew will graduate from highschool this June.
We are all worried that whether he will do something not good or not, since he has a very long time to do anything he likes.
I have visited Tokyo Disney Sea for the first time.
Most people say that they are too busy to read any books, but I think they can make time to read books if they try to do it.
In Japan, an increasing number of fathers spend a lot of time on taking care of their children on weekends.
On our way back home, we were caught a shower and got soaked.
I like Sandwich very much.
My favorite taste is "Hamutamago sand"
It use ham and boiled egg.
What is the secret of writing continuously on this website?
I would like to ask the question to the members who have continued to write.
I can not regularly find materials to write.
I think it is important to strive. But recently I have no motivation.
I can not bear to watch it.
He sits with a cuff over his chair and is licking his finger.
I've decided to practice English conversation.
So, I took an English conversation today for the first time.
I think It's more difficult to speak English than read.
I think one of the reson is that I didn't practice to speak it many times.
I hope I can speak English quite well by next year.
Accident Causing Injury or Death Happened Again and Again
My smartphone let me know that information was delivered this morning.
It said to delay of trains I usually take.
There was an accident causing injury or death early morning.
Accidents causing injury or death often happened on this rail road company.
Recently, school is very fun.
There are a lot of friends with humor, they often tell joke, and reply with joke.
Now PyeongChang Olympic is held.
Skate player,Yuzuru Hanyu and Shoma Uno,are got Gold medal and Silver medal.
I watch their play many times.
I like to give present, for example, birthday present, souvenir, and letter.
When I was junior high school student, I gave birthday presents for my pearents with my own money.
I like the time when I wait till the day that I give it.
A doctor and a patient were talking.
If you have a strong will, you can do anything even thing you don't think you can do.
The doctor tried to persuade him with passion.
I won't understand you at all!
If you have a strong will, you can do anything even thing you don't think you can do.
My senior has graduation ceremony next week.
I could cry for sad.
I am going to tell my heart for thanking.
I was considering how to be the Saiyan.
Have you continued to play this game from last time?
When lost, some people speak bad words to their opponents.
I hope those persons would keep their classes.
I feel confused that I found what I am doing is a waste of time.
I am tired of seeking new topic in my research, but I have to do it.
Maybe, I am not suitable for research.
I watched women's figure skating this afternoon.
Two Japanese skaters joined the competition.
Unfortunately, either of them couldn't win a medal, but they showed great performance.
Miyahara won the fourth place and Sakamoto won the 6th place.
So I'd like to use "win" for Olympic medals.
Two Japanese skaters joined the competition.
Unfortunately, either of them couldn't win a medal, but they showed great performance.
Miyahara won the fourth place and Sakamoto won the 6th place.
So I'd like to use "win" for Olympic medals.
It was sunny day and comfortable.
I saw some flowers outside so I felt the spring is comming.
There were a lot of plants that are similar sakura.
I took a lot of pictures of this place.
Man: You've an hour late.
My house have 4 floors.
There's a living room and a dinning room, there are 3 bathrooms, 3 bedrooms and two dogs.
I'm living in Viet Nam, Im 20 year old and Im a student.
I think, I will take a break now.
Can go to me and take video for the evening?
Why will you depart to Berlin?
Now only 7 hours, but shine the sun and very warmly.
There will be a good day.
Do you think at a party there will be many people?
Just now, one of my friends made profession of love to me....
I am sooooo nervous now, almost panic......
BTW, I have passed the first test of the postgraduate entrance examination and keep preparing for the second interview in next month.
Everyone has something good at or bad at.
Each time when I pronounced them wrong, my friend corrected me on Skype.
I couldn't pronounce them well because both of them are Japanese katakana words and I pronounced them as Japanese words.
I asked him if there was something good to memorize correct pronunciation, and then he told me to remember "Atlantic" when I say "lantern" and "eventually" when I say "event." 
His advice worked well on me and recently, I've been able to pronounce them better than before.
That's why people tend to write in present tense.
Dear Sir or Madam.
I was interested in your advertisement in University of Alicante  and I would like to have further information about which types of jobs I can find in Florida.
I am 19 years of age and I am studying at a Law School.
I would be grateful if you could full details of jobs related to law and kinds of accommodation in Florida.
I would be delighted if I could share room with a native student.
I also would like to know about the cost of the service you provide and if it is the cost of flight included.
Lastly, could you make me clear if work permit is required to stay the summer in the USA?
I look forward to receiving the information.
Surprisingly, we also did not have McDonalds or Starbucks.
Water was from the mountains from behind the house.
Additionally, we had a huge field for rice and vegetables.
Contrastly, I did not know how to read books, the clock, or left from right.
In primary school, I had only four classmates therefore, I did not feel a gap between us, even though I did not know the basics.
It took a long time to understand addition.
The teacher explained it to me using pictures of apples and asked me to count how many apples are there.
However, an apple and two apples are same shapes.
I was wondering why two of 1 transform into 2.
Furthermore, 1+0 was more difficult to understand.
I did not feel boredom without things such as amusement parks or karaoke bars.
This piqued my creativity and lead to cherish old materials.
For the first time, I faced poverty.
I then found out that my family could not send me to high school because of our financial situation.
From high school on, the tuition rises.
Unfortunately, in Japan, you have to wait until you turn eighteen years old to go to college, even if you passed the examination.
Indeed, my work has seeded my interest in learning traditional cultures and started studying cultural anthropology.
From my study, I realized that the best way to understand my own culture is to look it from the outside.
I believe that education cannot be completed only through school, so I am using my experiences towards school subjects to educate myself.
Since I started my first semester, I have been enjoying that classmates give me different influences, perspective, and motivation.
It creates an environment to improve my skills.
I feel like my room looks like garbage some days.
My mind is the same kind, too
A Suspension bridge hanging over precipitous cliffs.
The Rope is likely to be cut even now.
If even a small child cross it, it will imidiately be cut.
Recently, I started walking for my health and fat burning.
According to a web site, walking berfore a breakfast is the most effective for helth.
Furthermore, having a banana or a cup of coffee before walking will be effective to be promoted fat burning.
In particular, it says that we should not have fruits too much because fructoses will block fat burning.
There are many different opinions that some people prefer to spend their time outdoors or indoors.
In my opinion, I prefer to spend free time outdoors because it is advantageous for me to spend free time outdoors.
With the development of technology, we can work overtime and holiday work.
In addition, these days, electric devices have more convenient.
We don't need to go out even if you have a plan.
However, I prefer to spend a time outdoors.
For example, I worked for an IT industry.
Therefore, I want to do exercise when I have time.
I have been playing football on the weekend when I have time.
As a result, I change my mind and can be refreshed my brain by working out with my friends.
Secondly, moderate exercise develops our body and mind and stimulate the circulation of my blood.
I was into to watching tv series using Netflix.
It was quite very good.
Nevertheless, I was getting weight and change our body.
I get tired easily because I didn't work out.
I have improved my body since I start trying an exercise.
I'm going to write a summary of one of short stories l by Japanese Sci-Fi writer Shinich HOSHI.
A inventor thinks he finally invented a great invention of his all-time career.
The new invention is a pillow which can make users learn anything he wants to learn during his sleep.
It can apply the knowledge of data base inside into the sleeper's brain by way of electromagnetic wave.
This pillow is a prototype, so right now, it has only the data base of English language.
He lends this prototype to a neighbour next door who are eager to learn English but dislikes efforts.
The neighbor gets excited about this and takes it to his home.
Two months later, the neighbour comes to the inventor's home with the pillow, and says that this hasn't worked after all because he can't speak English at all.
The inventor gets disappointed at this and resigns his invention, wondering what is wrong with this.
A inventor thinks he finally invented a great invention of his all-time career.
The new invention is a pillow which can make users learn anything he wants to learn during his sleep.
Two months later, the neighbour comes to the inventor's home with the pillow, and says that this hasn't worked after all because he can't speak English at all.
She replies, he's all right except strangely he talks in English in his sleep and that scares his family.
He lends this prototype to a neighbour next door who are eager to learn English but dislikes efforts.
But my friend couldn't go to the school trip because she had flu.
So other friend and I bought gift for her.
We presented her them,and she was very glad.
Being Japanese means different here for me.
But I would say I just feel a bit sad that I became their friends because of my nationality.
I went to school trip in Nagano Prefecture and Tokyo for four days.
I am used to traveling, but arrival at the airport was delayed due to road closure of highway, so I panicked a bit.
I always use in-flight service on an airplane.
However, an audio trouble occured on the return plane.
Although arrival was delayed, I am glad that I could return home safely.
After leaving advertisement company, I went to Australia for working holiday almost 1 year.
Due to the long stay, I decided to change my work field and find a job as international sales.
During the period, we coordinate with client to develop the new project and product.
Besides, we also worked with other departments to develop in doors project to increase production capacity and received good feedback from our clients.
I went to Kyushu to meet a friend who are leaving Japan next month.
We met up at HAKATA, and after that across ARIAKE Sea by ferry, and went to friend's town.
Maybe some people says it's strange, but we used many public transportation, so that's why I felt like that.
Maybe it's only me, but even if it's same time I felt that to use many transportation is long time than to use car.
We made a list which to do for this trip.
To see beautiful mountain and sea.
To enjoy famous festival.
We've complete it.
It felt like we were playing RPG game and it was really fun!
Maybe some people says it's strange, but we used many public transportation, so that's why I felt like that.
Maybe it's only me, but even if it's same time I felt that to use many transportation is long time than to use car.
It felt like we were playing RPG game and it was really fun!
Shibuya has a lot of night clubs which include prostitute shops.
The main area of prostitute is Dogenzaka which is near from Shibuya station it takes eight to ten minutes from Shibuya station.
However, if you would like to play with porn star which is known as AV actress it will cost sixty thousand to three hundred thousand yen for fifty minutes to three hours.
I' m going to explain about a local delicacy to foreigners using three sentences below.
So, please teach me which is the better sentence about sentence No.1 and correct the other sentences include No.1.
So, please teach me which is the better sentence about sentence No.1 and correct the other sentences include No.1.
I' m going to explain about a local delicacy to foreigners using three sentences below.
So, please teach me which is the better sentence about sentence No.1 and correct the other sentences include No.1.
I have been sleepy from this week, so I'm very tired.
I hope it escape, however I'll get over the pain of the situation.
The crying baby began to laugh with great guffaws, Heehaw, Heehaw.
In order to improve my English, I begin to try to read the house on mango street.
when I read the passage at first, I was moved deeply.
and then printed it out.
as a result, I make a question list.
Wake up drunk on sky?
Not enough sky?
Raggedy excuses?
Keep keeping?
by the way,can you tell me how to ask the questions in English in a polite and clear way?
When we  want to give hope to our friends, or if we want to encourage someone to go on despite hardships in life, I agree with telling a lie.
But I told him, 
But my lies made him study harder than before.
A few weeks later, he could get a higher score.
The philosopher's stone is a legendary alchemical substance capable of turning base metals such as mercury into gold.
The Squared Circle is an Alchemical Symbol from the 17th century, illustrating the interplay of the four elements of matter symbolising the philosopher's stone.
They were even seen as having paranormal powers which enabled them to do all sorts of magical methods.
The use of technology seems like the act of alchemy.
There're four seasons in Japan, so we often talk about which season is the best but actually, I barely have my favorite seasons.
In spring, I have hay fever so I will be like had a cold and feel itchy for about three months.
In summer, there're a lot of interesting events but it's just hot, humid and uncomfortable.
In fall, it is the only season that I like!
Nice weather!
In winter, I hate the cold and it'll be boring after New years.
I assume there're only a few days that I can feel comfortable from the bottom my heart in Japan.
Of cause it depends on where you live though.
It is a flash card.
You can register a word and its definition into it.
You can also test your memory on it.
After work, I relaxed and watched TV in my room.
Could you please check below sentence??
I had the meeting my senior colleagues.
Thank you for your time to our session.
I learned these thing.
People have some situation which is stressful or bad mood.
I should clarify what I can do for Company from overseas.
Through the today's session.
I have to give strong impression in 2minutes talking.
Home work.
What Do I learn in overseas office?
What do I study in overseas office?
How do I contribute to the company when I return from overseas.
I said that I like English,but she said that I like Math.
I might feel that I was going to be black, so I said that my mom should call 119.
I had many kinds of check for five hours, but there was nothing wrong with my brain and body.
Since then, I got into the habit that I don't lock bathroom door at home, just in case.
I'm living with my mom, and it's dangerous if I lose my consciousness leaving the bathdoor locked.
After that, I realized that death is close to us.
I went black and was carried to the hospital by ambulance last October.
I might feel that I was going to be black, so I said that my mom should call 119.
I had many kinds of check for five hours, but there was nothing wrong with my brain and body.
Since then, I got into the habit that I don't lock bathroom door at home, just in case.
I'm living with my mom, and it's dangerous if I lose my consciousness leaving the bathdoor locked.
I might feel that I was going to be black, so I said that my mom should call 119.
I had many kinds of check for five hours, but there was nothing wrong with my brain and body.
Since then, I got into the habit that I don't lock bathroom door at home, just in case.
I'm living with my mom, and it's dangerous if I lose my consciousness leaving the bathdoor locked.
I don't know what will happen while taking a shower or going to the toilet.
Which do you like better, living in the city or the countryside?
If you catch a cold and need a drug, clinics and drugstores are all within walking distance.
As many people, who didn't learn english with a teacher and learn english by theirself, i faced with a lot of problems.
I have a good vocabuary, i am sure.
However, i am not sure that if i am writing something, i am writting it correct.
Essay is the one form of communications in english, can someone advice live chat or something in order to have more practice?
It's been a long time since I've posted an easygoing journal.
As you know if you see my journals, I tend to post serious, dark and heavy journals.
Apparently, this is because I'm a pessimist and have negative outlook on my life.
However, I've posted easygoing journals sometimes.
Most of them were the ones in which I wrote about situations where I had been for drinks with my friends.
After we gather each other, we will go to a cheap Yakitori restaurant.
Foreign people hardly eat the cuisine.
I'm sure I can enjoy the time.
I drink a lot of lovely beer, have much funny conversation with my friends and forget my pain for a little while.
Walking on the rails which someone laied for you.
I quote a famous phrase below.
Don't walk on the rails which someone laid for you.
This phrase means that you can not become truly happy while you are spending a life which someone expect.
Your parents expect that you graduate a top-notch university and enter a big company despite your true dream which you want to become a professional soccer player.
If you choose the way your parents expect for living up their expectation, your pain begins.
My parents expect that I walk on such a way.
I'm enough happy.
I'm happy?
Why can't I feel my strong and solid passion inside to work everyday?
Feel like Spring really comes.
It is so touching.
Before I read one of his poetry collection, I thought he loved life, rooted in real life.
Yesterday I read his other collection of the poetry.
He roots in real life, in his way.
Feel like his words real hit my heart.
So good poems.
Here is the one poem I try to translate.
Even then will be followed by the flowers fall, and then the leaves
Even then there will be only left with branch and branch
If birds want, go and build nest on my hand
If kids want, climb to my head and steal the eggs away
say something with no importance
So, When I die, bury me into a tree
just thinking of that, I have already overwhelmed by happiness
My close friend Mark recounted me of a scary dream he had last night, of which the complex and appalling plot woke him up in horror and drove him to put it down in the early morning.
He sent me a long message, and I translated it as the followings.
These days I have a problem with a posture when I take a pee.
All of my family except me are taking a pee sitting on the toilet.
So they want me to do that.
They tell me that when men take a pee in the stands, a pee sprays everywhere.
I really want to do as they want.
Carling 
The Japanese Olympic carling members advanced the final tournament in the Pyeongchang Olympics.
That was really great and many Japanese hope that they will win and get a medal.
I like to watch carling.
It looks easy to play but throwing techniques and making a best strategy each ends are important.
When I see that a stone thrown by prayer gets fast, hit another stone making a big sound, and takes better position, it reminds me of fighting sports.
Tonight the Japan team plays a match against the Korea team.
I do hope both will do the best.
I am an english learner.
I want to improve my skills in english but I don't have enough time.
I realize that one of the biggest difficult for me is writting.
I have to admit that I am not a good writer in english or spanish.
Some of my english teacher said me that one way to improve the writting, is read a lot, wherever the language english or spanish.
The point is that I don't find the inspiration to write.
Worse, I spend a lot time writing a simple text.
I wil try write a paragraph every day in lan-8.
Sometimes, I feel a little jelaus when I am correcting spanish text because some spanish learners have a perfect punctuation and grammar.
I hope some day write in english without complications.
My difficult 
Even so, I don't like to read a lot, I just read the news in the mornings.
Some of my english teacher said me that one way to improve the writting, is read a lot, wherever the language english or spanish.
The point is that I don't find the inspiration to write.
Worse, I spend a lot time writing a simple text.
I wil try write a paragraph every day in lan-8.
Sometimes, I feel a little jelaus when I am correcting spanish text because some spanish learners have a perfect punctuation and grammar.
I'm beginner at mirrorless camera.
I didn't have it at first, recently my family gave it to me.
I have studied about camera since then.
I'm strugglig to use ISO function especially.
It's difficult problem.
The Truth Is Cruel
People with bad personality are easy to succeed.
From now, I challenge audition for vocal.
From now, I challenge audition for vocal.
Yesterday, a friend of mine patiently explain in English what's Yin and Yang.
Obviously I've heard of it before, but I didn't know what exactly it is.
Despite she was kind enough to try it many times, I couldn't really get it after all.
The thing is how to deal with them, how to get rid of those evils."
Yesterday, a friend of mine patiently explain in English what's Yin and Yang.
Obviously I've heard of it before, but I didn't know what exactly it is.
Despite she was kind enough to try it many times, I couldn't really get it after all.
Today, I came across an article about discrimination, so the content is unrelated, but when I read the last part, I thought maybe that's it.
The thing is how to deal with them, how to get rid of those evils."
Obviously I've heard of it before, but I didn't know what exactly it is.
I have returned to this site for the first time in a year, but I can not find almost all the members of my friends list who continue to write.
I never felt bored, despite not having any friends there.
A granduncle of mine told me about science in parks.
My summer vacation flew by with extraordinary days.
I think I should eat more vegetables, but recently That is high expensive.
It might be more price rather than meat.
I don't would to get more weight.
Therefore I want to nutritional management.
It's difficult to ideal diet.
I think I should eat more vegetables, but recently That is high expensive.
It might be more price rather than meat.
I don't would to get more weight.
Therefore I want to nutritional management.
It's difficult to ideal diet.
I am thingking the company's name which will set up in Kyoto,Japan now.
This company will do the hotel besiness in Kyoto.
Can the follwing names be understaned?
Which is more smart name?
Please advice!
I am thingking the company's name which will set up in Kyoto,Japan now.
This company will do the hotel besiness in Kyoto.
It is not a short time for me.
I keep studying English but I'd forgotten this site for a long time.
My English skill is not improved much...
8 years ago, I couldn't imagine where I live, what I do now!
I thought why don't we go there together, and asked her.
I have been planning about the schedule with combining our preferences because I like to plan everything.
I think it is going to be very fun!
The emperor who had no clothes
But the performance is not going so well this year apparently.
My guess is that our company will be in the red.
I have been asking my coworkers about their thought of our company's problems.
There are two of the biggest problems of the company's president.
First is that he doesn't know how to put the right person for the right position.
Secondly He only like the employees who always agree with him.
We call him ''the emperor who had no clothes'' secretly.
Every day I have to breed 16 beef cattle.
It is very hard, but it is also a good experience for me.
The experiment was finished last January, so I go back to Japan now.
By staying in the outside of Japan, I was made to realize that my English isn't good enough to make me understood.
If there is someone who wants to language exchange with me, please send me a message.
I thought: "Why do I try to write down my introduction?".
I'm shin from Chiba-ken.
I work for an advertising company as a seles man.
When I have a free time, I study English, have a Yoga lesson, go shoping.
During summer, I often go to sea for surfing.
I've been passionated about English for a while actually, and putting so much time in it.
I used to stay in Canada for a year, that was two years ago.
As for my personality, I am really easygoing, not mad at someone easily.
In the future, if artificial intelligence translation is translated into an accurate text in all languages, it is a great progress.
But the ambiguity in Japanese is the beauty of Japanese culture.
In other words, human's translation capabilities are still excellent because human being have feelings and emotions.
I have a holiday on Saturday and Sunday, but I will go to ski area to go skiing.
She turned her staple food from bread into rice.
He was diagnosed as the flu.
My eldest son went to work this morning, but he came back home because of the rule of his company even though he is very fine.
I might catch his flu, but I really hope I won't.
One of them was "Serenely" and he asked me if I know the word.
I said, "I sound well when I sound sleep!" 
I hope everything is going well with you all.
My husband caught the flu and he's absent from work.
His fever has been up and down since Tuesday, but he thought he just had a cold, so he hadn't gone to see the doctor until yesterday.
My eldest son went to work this morning, but he came back home because of the rule of his company even though he is very fine.
I might catch his flu, but I really hope I won't.
By the way, while I was talking with a friend on Skype, he taught me a couple of new English words.
One of them was "Serenely" and he asked me if I know the word.
I am not sure how the gun control pans out in the United States.
The gun industry in the US is way bigger than the gun control movement and the industry has been lobbying from a long time ago.
This is what makes me be afraid of just jumping into a conversation without fearing any consequences, as you say.
Moreover, I often feel I lack words, especially adjectives, and of course phrasal verbs.
I wanted to show off the fabric, I changed the placement of pattern pieces.
I made big pleats and slit on the hem.
Only one thing, the front has some pleats on the neckline and below waistline.
The area was too narrow for me, and I reduced the amount of pleats to widen.
Anyway, the pattern make everyone happy.
My car need to take a car inspection once in 2 years in March.
Unfortunately my wife's car is in the same March.
There is a too big expence once in two years in March.
1 Why do you say it was my blame?
4 It was not my intention to give that impression, I understand it was a mistake, but please, considering that gift as a bribe is too much - It was only a mistake.
5 The reach of the investigations might approach the current vice-president, and maybe the president himself.
But, because of the time difference, on this side of the world we watched those matches in two different days, but in Korea, both games were played on the same day.
On the other hand, tonight is the final of Figure Skating Ladies, the short program was the day before yesterday, and today we will know who will win the medals.
6 And finally, I have tried to translate the next sentence to Spanish, but I was not able to understand what does it mean:
It is an advice, I understand that one must not cut ties with his career too early and begin working in something very specialized or technical or different to the career they decided to study in college
you even weren't there to see the events!
4 It was not my intention to give that impression, I understand it was a mistake, but please, considering that gift as a bribe is too much - It was only a mistake.
6 Nobody of my friends neither relatives watches the Olympic Games, they are losing it, for example, yesterday there was an exciting curling game; Switzerland defeated Great Britain - you should have seen that match - but today that Swiss team was beaten by the Sweden team.
But, because of the time difference, on this side of the world we watched those matches in two different days, but in Korea, both games were played on the same day.
6 And finally, I have tried to translate the next sentence to Spanish, but I was not able to understand what does it mean:
Can you explain me the meaning of that sentence, please?
It is an advice, I understand that one must not cut ties with his career too early and begin working in something very specialized or technical or different to the career they decided to study in college
My task has been increasing, and my paperwork has been piling up on my desk.
I tried to deal with them for a while, but I understood what I need is "Low accuracy and high productivity." Once I just submit them, incomplete documents should be send back to me.
Then, I just revise them.
Luckily, there are no mistakes in my document, one of my tasks will be finished!
Then, I just revise them.
Luckily, there are no mistakes in my document, one of my tasks will be finished!
It's just a rush job.
My hobby is to make electolic device.
My maked electlic device can grow vegitabuls.
I want to be able to read english for programing electolic device.
Whole of the city was covered with snow, and it looked like a city composed of snow and stone.
I took part in an congress and learnt many latest topics.
Today one of my colleague insist me to buy a beer for him.
I am suprise that he never took a liquor for the last one year since I am with him and asked me for a beer.
I bought only two bottle because i thought that he does not have a capacity to take more than one.
We sat on the bad i served the beer he took very fast and told me that one bottle is not enough for me.
I was wrong he had a enough capacity then I gave my half bottle to him and told him that tomorrow I will buy four bottle for you he felt not good than from where he took out half of the whisky bottle and told me that you have this coz i did not consume whisky.
Choose two quotes, rewrite it, explain why you chose that and how you interpret it.
I completely agree with that quote and I also try to live in that way.
In all life on our way appear many obstacles, many things which cause sadness, pain, disappointment and other these kind of feelings.
Many people also cause that feelings, maybe also they want to see our depression but we should hold our head up and smile and go across the life with humor, we should try to stay under and agree on that.
I completely agree with that opinion.
The most important is that we should give someone a hand who needs a help.
I have leave here so long time.
Most of the hip hop songs that I've heard from the 90s are about how it felt to be a gangsta.
If you hadn't passed up the opportunity of going to the beach, your skin would be darker.
An online clothing store, Stitch Fix has been getting popular in the US.
AI will select several pieces of clothing based on the input, and then, eventually the stylists narrow them down to five pieces for you.
You don't need to buy what you don't like, and you send them back with free shipping.
They charge 20 dollars on you as a stylist fee when you order, but the fee will be refunded if you buy at least one product.
I have a dream of becoming a fashion designer.
Actually, I also had thought the same way before and I didn't tell anyone.
One day, when I caught up with one of my best friends, I told him my dream for the first time.
Honestly, I thought he laughed or made fun of my dream, because I said it like I say a joke to hide embarrassment.
I was afraid to be laughed things I'm series about, and I knew that it wasn't realistic somewhere in my heart.
I couldn't belive in mysel.
Besides, I haven't learned fashion design and I don't know about it at all right now.
The response was different than what I thought it would be.
He didn't laugh at me, and belived in me.
When I came back home and cried with happiness alone.
He made me realize that it's okay to say my dream.
After that, I started to say it and no one laughed.
Uttering words might help drams come true.
If that's the case no one knows what's going on in the feature, I belive we should go on adventure and do whatever we really want.
I still don't stand at a start line, but I can say I'm heading to my dream.
That's what I used to think, so I didn't tell anyone.
One day, when I was catching up with one of my best friends, I told him my dream for the first time.
My response was different from what I expected.
When I got back home and cried alone with happiness.
I dream of becoming a fashion designer.
Telling your dream to someone is pretty embarrassing, isn't it?
However, one of my best friends changed my mindset.
Honestly, I thought he would laugh or make fun of my dream, so I said it like a joke to hide my embarrassment.
Besides, I haven't learned fashion design and I don't know anything about it at all right now.
He didn't laugh at me, and believed in me.
I was just happy.
When I got back home and cried alone with happiness.
If that's the case no one knows what will happen in the future, but I believe we should go on an adventure and do whatever we really want.
We shouldn't compromise and stay at stable jobs.
Sure that we are!
Being so intensively interest in politics I read newspapers articles, essays, and books about the field on a daily basis.
The writers always complain the fact that younger people prefer to do other activities but politics.
First of all, I began my analysis by reading different political programmes regarding distinct parties, what caught my attention was the completely absence of the teenagers in their programmes.
Secondly, I asked my college mates about politics, this is not a scientific study, of course, but it can give some ideas to plan an action!
For instance new laws with reference to colleges or apprenticeship.
Teenagers will be engaged in politics like never!
The boy was looking at me and smiled shortly after I felt in love him LOL
I almost kidded him nap LOL
He boasted me and showed the Star words of mask.
I wanted play with him and absent the school LOL
Today English is the dominant language a worldwide being spoken by 1.8 billion people across five continents from America to Asia.
It is used in a wide variety of fields; from medicine to computing, not surprisingly English is the most popular language to learn.
English is also required in travel and international competitions such as the Olympics that are held in English.
We cannot forget the importance of the language in a job research, a good knowledge of English can make a difference to get or not a job.
Cultural and economic trends may be dictated by no English-speaking people because the English-speaking countries have lost the power they used to have and their population is less young than the population in the developed countries.
In conclusion, it is true that at the moment English is No.1 as global language used as lingua franca, but its future is uncertain because of cultural and economic changes.
It's been a while since I write in English here for the last time.
I don't have much subjects matters to write, but I will try to write more in English.
Do you know that perfect two things exist in this world?
Those are the time and the cat.
The cat is extremely special existence that give the artistic beautifulness and a lot of healing to us.
However, at the same time, the cat is also existence like an aristocracy difficult to understand for our humans.
One is provide food to them, and another is to treat affectionately them.
We would not be perhaps able to perfectly understand the cat mind without becoming the cat.
Yet one thing is for sure, they've various ideas in regard to everything including the our humans that they own, and always prioritize their own ideas before our ideas.
If a dog jumps into your lap, it is because he is fond of you, but if a cat does the same thing, it is because your lap is warmer than other places.
Still, If you want the most noble and beautiful animal of all animals, you should keep the cat.
Today, after ten years, I was back there for a swim and I discovered that it is restored and expanded.
At the first floor there is a new gym.
I think I'll be back there more often.
Do you close door?
Yes i close door.
I don't close door.
Will you close door?
Oh, yes i will close door.
I will not close door.
Did you close door?
Yes i closed door.
I did not close door.
Is it correct?
What do you recommend?
I was thinking of some local confectionery, maybe, or perhaps a book he would read with pleasure!"
The last sunday i was travel with my family to the farm.
We wake up at 5:00 am and it took us two hours to get there.
At the arrive to the farm we unload our things from the car and we strech our legs.
During the rest of the day we had made many activities, like collect beans from the plants, look for blackberries and strawberries, dig up for yucca and collect oranges and lemons.
Before the sunset we take the road back, and enjoyed the view from the car.
A day in the farm
The last sunday i was travel with my family to the farm.
In the way we take a break for breakfast.
At the arrive to the farm we unload our things from the car and we strech our legs.
During the rest of the day we had made many activities, like collect beans from the plants, look for blackberries and strawberries, dig up for yucca and collect oranges and lemons.
Before the sunset we take the road back, and enjoyed the view from the car.
In the way we take a break for breakfast.
During the rest of the day we had made many activities, like collect beans from the plants, look for blackberries and strawberries, dig up for yucca and collect oranges and lemons.
Full steam, I dashed through the low-hanging branches of the tall fir trees, brushing the snow from the twigs as I raced head-to-head against the night.
Since my backpack was light and my only additional carry-on items were my pair of skis and a thin rope, I could set a quick pace, and only one hour later, I reached the car park of our inn.
In the valley, there no single trace of snow and the temperatures were mild.
Even so everything and every one was preparing for the arrival of winter.
The stockpiles of firewood reached up to the roof of the inn, and on the terrace, which was adjacent to the car park, the parasols, chair and tables had been replaced with ski racks and a metal grid for dirty boots.
A restless wind quickly plucked the last leaves from the trees, which did, however, not fall to the ground but rather flew upwards.
I decided to came back to learning English.
So long time I wrote nothing in English, so I need much time to think what to say.
This is very frustrating but I know very well it is necessary step to learn other language.
Recently in Japan the people is very enthusiastic about the Olympic.
Unfortunately I am far from my country so I can't catch up with those movements on time.
Especially I really got moved with the beautiful performance of Yuduru Hanyuu, who won a golden medal in figure skating.
I used to be a person not share my hardships because I think it makes other people worry me, get a negative emotion.
But I was wrong, sharing a pain is not a negative but natural.
And It really works.
Two, sit down at my chair, write about what causes strees and how I fix it.
And I often found a quick solution.
Three, Get sleep.
When I was a student at university in Japan, I belonged to a basketball team which have over one hundred students.
Last January, we had a party and we were supposed to meet in Sannomiya station at six p.m. I was a treasurer.
so I had to go there earlier and collect money for the party from other teammates.
However, I already arrived the station at four thirty.
I went to the cafe to study because I had much time until we met.
I focused on studying too much and forgot looking at time.
Then, there were a lot of messages and missed calls from my teammates on my phone.
I held all of my belongings and ran to the station soon.
When I arrived the station, my teammates were collecting money instead of me.
I felt terrible and so sorry for them bothering.
I apologized many times, but they told me it was unusual and forgave me because I had never been late for anything.
I need technique to deal with procrastination.
The next time I have to be punctual, I am going to act with thinking about time in advance, such as looking time frequently or setting the alarm.
It is rare that you always success in your life even if you keep endeavouring.
I will try to make a little more efforts without giving up.
Originally, I'm a left-hander.
But my mother forced me to use right hand.
I had to use right hand when she supervised me.
As a result, I can not write word with left hand but I can not draw a picture with right hand.
I've been working at the english preschool in Warsaw since November.
I feel like a mentally unstable person cause I experience as much emotions here in one hour as in one month working at the office.
I have this strong feeling that last sentence is totally wrong but I'm learning to talk and don't make my fear of making mistakes stop me before using the foreign language.
I'm slightly lower than average, and am quite fond about chemistry.
You might ask me.
Then, my large, snow-white colored curved horns.
Most people mistake me for a tiefling, ALTHOUGHT I AM NOT!
Is anyone interested in exchange language through Skype tomorrow?.
No matter what time, complete availability for tomorrow.
We started our chat at 11o'clock.
I invited them to have dinner in my city, but they both thought it's too far.
During the chat, Yan taught Ping how to make up.
Ping is on her third year at university, I think it's very necessary for her to learn that.
Yan also said, we should to join the students reunions as often as possible, because it's where couples are made.
Our days kept going and we all were getting mature, developing abilities to think, ask, and decide.
Pinkey had now reached Grade 8 too, which means it was her time to stop her education.
She thought like all other girls in Sindh that girls are supposed to stay at home and do the household chores.
I every day thought about my education and the limited life.
I put my tongue between my teeth and sought forgiveness from God.
I believe it depends on you either be a victim or a victorious.
I made this kimono for the party!
I made this dress using the used-kimono.
The sleeves of the kimono were too short for me, and I decided to use it for the project.
I love this simple top because it doesn't have a zipper.
I recommend the pattern to beginners.
I changed the three-quarter length sleeve with ruffle from the normal.
I had to make a tie for the instructions but I made the detachable bow instead of it.
I go to "Sunks" after dancing lesson.
Sunks is name of Japanese convenience store.
I come to there almost everyday. The reason why is that my friends is there for gathering.
My friends is almost athlete. Runner, swimmer, dancer, and more.
They come to there after training, too.
I'm so excited about it.
robot
If one day, Chinese people do not like to have children, and the population is less.
On the street, robots are driving cars, robots are selling movie tickets, robots are singing, dancing, and robots manager most things in our life.
If robots are as smart as men, all professions are not necessary.
It seems to be better.
But it semms a terrible world too.
Unless you turn down the heat on a cooker now, the chicken will be tasteless.
Turn down the TV and get on with your homework.
If only you were more hard-working!
My cousin is going to set up a company one day.
Turn off the road in five minutes.
Little did they knew, their child was to be found.
I went to a public high school near my home and then enrolled in a private university that took me an hour by train from my place.
I also started to be interest with a foreign country since I turned to be a university student.
Learning English at the language school in Brisbane, Australia, joining the organization for the international student and I traveled Asia and middle East as backpacking travel style for 6 months.
Although it has good memory for me now, my family were worried about me on that time.
I think my manager is not a good person because he asked me to do a lot of things even I told him that something wrong with my eyes and I wanted to go to the hospital.
He said it was ok and took care in front of many people but he added my tasks again.
I didn't go to the hospital too because I thought I could keep going.
It was kind of going back to my old days when I was a new person to my company.
The difference was I was working with some nice people than before.
Well, I think I shouldn't work for people which is my weakness.
Sometimes, people like evil who will frame you when you are weak or be leaning all of it.
Anyway, I hope I can take a leave tomorrow.
I have heard that I tend to be distracted and off the topic often when I speak, so I decided to write what I think, like a journal whenever I have a chance.
It's pretty hard for me to organize what I think by writing because I rarely write except simply taking a note of something.
It would be pretty short writing at first and I feel bored sometimes because I am not used to it.
so I work up to it without working too hard from the beginning.
If I stick to it, I will be able to improve organizing my thoughts and speak logically.
One day,a customer from China when she was trying on something one of our Japanese staff tried to introduce the item so hard.
But the customer told me the staff was so talkative,she let me so annoyed.
My mother was flying back Taipei yesterday.
We went Rome, Orvieto and several places in Barcelona.
I'm very closed to my mom.
Talk to my trip in Italy.
For example, Taiwanese would learn WWII or European history while having historical class in high school.
But, there would be only some paragraphs or several lines.
This trip was my first time to understand a few information about Mussolini and Hadrianus Augustus.
If you guys know any good website about this, please kindly recommend.
We went Rome, Orvieto and several places in Barcelona.
Asian daughters always consider too much.
In fact, it's not a negotiation but notification.
High salary is the most important thing that makes people work happily.
Eat delicious food and talk a lot...
I could have really nice time with my friends!
All presents are sweet!
When I correct English entries
Of course, we should make efforts to say or write better sentences without resting on our current English skills.
Well, when I correct Japanese people's English entries, even if they write Japanese version, I rarely read Japanese.
It's because I want to understand their sentences in English.
Since I'm not a native English speaker, I still don't know a lot of English expressions, so I sometimes ask the meaning of certain sentences, but it doesn't mean that those sentences are always wrong.
Some English speakers understand Japanese well, so when they correct Japanese people's English sentences, they might read Japanese to make sure the meaning of the sentences.
I read Japanese sentences only when they don't make sense at all.
When you write or say a sentence in English, what do you think is most important?
Even if you make some grammatical mistakes, if other people understand what you want to say, I think your sentence is fine, and you can communicate with people well.
Of course, we should make efforts to say or write better sentences without resting on our current English skills.
Well, when I correct Japanese people's English entries, even if they write Japanese version, I rarely read Japanese.
It's because I want to understand their sentences in English.
Some English speakers understand Japanese well, so when they correct Japanese people's English sentences, they might read Japanese to make sure the meaning of the sentences.
I read Japanese sentences only when they don't make sense at all.
Since I'm not a native English speaker, I still don't know a lot of English expressions, so I sometimes ask the meaning of certain sentences, but it doesn't mean that those sentences are always wrong.
I hope I can help people as much as possible, not only with their grammar or words but also with their context.
Today I participated an English conversation circle.
22 members appeared.
One of them is a small firm maneger and one of them is a teacher at a cram school.
A forigner said, "The speech and behavior of individuals is individuial responsible.
I agree but the other hand, I think that an edification is the issue of education.
Education shows a big power to give information and let people be happy.
Tomorrow I am going to my painting school to show my homework.
I am still painting to try to paint the best piece.
This morning, I found powder snow falling.
However, it turned out drizzling.
However, it turned out drizzling.
What is the thing that can be widely used in education, business, government, family and almost all the
Some people claim that the 21st century could not exist without the Internet.
For one thing, the children and young adults that use the Internet freely might get the wrong information by chance.
The Internet is so wide that it includes some wrong information such as violence and pornography.
That information can cause many bad effects on the children and young adults, which are bad for them are growing.
For example, there is some violence information in the Internet.
After the
children and young adults watch that by chance, they might follow the violence way from the Internet to solve the problems.
Consequently, we have to use some kinds of software to block this kind of information.
This highly technical software has already been developed well.
Parents can just trust this kind of software in order to prevent children from accessing the blocked websites,
which includes the wrong information.
As the Internet is used on the computers, it is related to the computers closely.
The computer is a highly technical machine that sometimes is hard to control.
As a result, some bad things may have loopholes to get into the computer such as the computer viruses.
If the children and young adults use the Internet freely without some safe programs their computers will probably be infected with computer viruses.
For example, many years ago, I used my computer on the Internet without any safe programs.
One day, I found my computer was abnormal and called a computer expert to look over it.
He said my computer must be infected with computer viruses from the Internet and suggested me to use the safe program to prevent the viruses.
used the Internet with the safe program every time and never get the computer viruses any more.
Furthermore, by using some filters we can save a lot of time to distinguish the useful and unnecessary information.
Most people use the Internet to find and get information.
There are so great quantities of information on the Internet that we usually have to spend quite a long time to find the useful information.
Whereas, if we use some filters, we can distinguish the useful and unnecessary information easily.
For example, my E-mail box always receives some pornographic junk mail, which are very disagreeable.
However, the Internet is such an interesting thing that people who enjoy it may keep on surfing on the net.
People who have little ability of self control will lose themselves in the information highway spending a long time in front of the screen, which is absolutely bad for their health.
Some people hold that children and young adults use the Internet freely can widen their eyes of the world.
However, I think using the Internet with the filters can also get the information much enough to widen their eyes.
Most parents do not use the filters because they do not know how useful the filters are.
The filters are so good now that we can choose the different ways to get the different kinds of information.
Using the filters can make the limit to help the children and young adults kown more about the things that are useful for them.
If the children and young adults use the Internet freely, they may lose their directions.
As a result, they might not only widen their eyes, but also waste a lot of time.
The filters can help us to prevent getting into the websites that we will never use them anyway so that we could widen our eyes of the world by using the filters.
Consequently, children and young adults should use the Internet with some new advanced programs to get the information easily.
The filters are so good now that we can choose the different ways to get the different kinds of information.
I ate African foods
Today, I ate African foods.
I hadn't known about African foods until I had ate it today.
Come back to write diary, yay
Keeping writing diary is a way to make me feel I'm still alive, I feel like that.
I feel I'm not happy recently but maybe it can make me feel better and record my feel now.
I feel realty makes me can't breath, I believe everyone else is the same with me, people are struggling to survive for their life, relationship or family.
They have their own issue, but trying to be happy is the most important thing, life is a long journey, finding our own way, fulfill your dream.
They have their own issue, but trying to be happy is the most important thing, life is a long journey, finding our own way, fulfill your dream.
Since I get up at 5:30 am, I don't have enough time to eat breakfast.
The one is tuna and mayonaise, and another is egg and mayonaise.
Of course, I drink coffee, which is my favorite.
Of course, I drink coffee, which is my favorite.
Today I will eat a convenience food, not in tin, but rather a dried spaghetti.
Watching Movie
to discuss whether an 18-years-old boy killed 
disappears gradually by discussion.
We can't deny people by race,poverty,life experience and other aspects.
However, in our country,it's still hard to see this spirit.
Power always concentrate on important officer.
By the way,what movie impressd you most?
What about 'he was showboating leading up to'?
'Took stock'?
"After winning gold in the 100 kilograms plus division at the London 2012 Olympics, Riner took stock for the first time."
'Went into meltdown'?
"The Rio victory also saw calls for Riner to look at a career change with UFC fans salivating at the thought of the great Frenchman taking his dominance inside the Octagon."
If you want to see beautiful scenery, I recommend you to go to Cinque Terre, if you love the see.
I just arrived airport, I felt so tired.
I gonna take a nap right now.
When we were children we usually imagined ourselves being famous actors or musicians.
However, have we ever wonder how their lifes are?
Are they really enjoing their jobs?
On the one hand, being a celebrity have many advantages.
First of all, famous people have normally huge fortunes.
They can travel wherever they want or buy thing that ordinary people could not imagine.
Besides, they can enter to fancy lounges or restaurants where the entry is only allowed for important people.
Moreover, they may dress stylishly, no matter the money.
On the other hand, being famous evolves a lot of risk.
They are incredibly exposed and also their private life and their close family.
The society want to know who are their partners or when their babies are born.
Some of them had been victims of kidnapping or even murderer as John Lennon, which is really scary.
In conclusion, we all see their luxurious lives as the perfect life.
Althoug in my personal opinion, If we take into account all the factor for and against, they are not happier than the ordinary people.
Essay: Being a celebrity: a dream or a nightmare?
When we were children we usually imagined ourselves being famous actors or musicians.
Everybody have at least one favorite famous person to admire.
However, have we ever wonder how their lifes are?
First of all, famous people have normally huge fortunes.
Moreover, they may dress stylishly, no matter the money.
On the other hand, being famous evolves a lot of risk.
They are incredibly exposed and also their private life and their close family.
Some of them had been victims of kidnapping or even murderer as John Lennon, which is really scary.
Althoug in my personal opinion, If we take into account all the factor for and against, they are not happier than the ordinary people.
Essay: Being a celebrity: a dream or a nightmare?
When we were children we usually imagined ourselves being famous actors or musicians.
Everybody have at least one favorite famous person to admire.
Besides, they can enter to fancy lounges or restaurants where the entry is only allowed for important people.
They are incredibly exposed and also their private life and their close family.
The society want to know who are their partners or when their babies are born.
Some of them had been victims of kidnapping or even murderer as John Lennon, which is really scary.
In conclusion, we all see their luxurious lives as the perfect life.
Althoug in my personal opinion, If we take into account all the factor for and against, they are not happier than the ordinary people.
Abenomics refers to the economic policies which is adovocated by Prime Minister of Japan,Abe Shinzo.
He advocated three approach for overcoming long-term deflation.
Firstly,more aggressive monetary easing from Bank of Japan
Secondly, fiscal policy that allows to revitalize the economics by using natinonal currency.
And Ficnally, structural reform.
However, I feel these strategies haven't been successful because average wages doesn't increase.
In addition, he said that address to improve working environment and raising women's wages and states.
But unfortunately these problems still remain to be the same and nothing change significantly.
Also he advocate new measure, called discretionary labor system.
I think it's like a flexible work times.
In current situation, this measure will make overtime-working even worse.
It seems to me that it promote an inefficient working style of Japan.
I strongly hope that our country's economics revitalize.
We have other difficulties such as aging population and declining birth rates.
Last thing I really want to say that the govenment should cut the number of the Diet members and lower their salaries.
But until I've seen his pyramid, I didn't know he was a handsome man too.
I was touched by his love when I saw the queen temple and her statutes which Ramses II built for her.
But until I've seen his pyramid, I didn't know he was a handsome man too.
I couldn't send text messages, mails or even call.
Fortunately, I met a foreigner girl who was really friendly.
She had the kindness to lend me her phone to send an email to my father.
Pinkey had now reached Grade 8 too, which means it was her time to stop her education.
Pinkey was forced to stop going to school as I was.
She thought like all other girls in Sindh that girls are supposed to stay at home and do the household chores.
I every day thought about my education and the limited life.
My classmate gets pregnant.
I surprised when I hear it and I wish her happiness.
I think that pregnancy is miracle.
We can create new life by love.
I want my baby someday but I can't imagine realistically now.
Why do a pill in America very big in size?
Every pills sold in pharmacies in America is huge in size.
It is as big as not to be able to swallow it at once.
Every time I take a pill I feel like it stuck in my esophagus.
I particular, It is dangerous for the elderly who has weak ability of swallowing.
As the most developed country in the world, they mush have skills to form small pills containing enough amount of ingredients.
I think all the sister siblings are the same, we fight for trivial things and another 5 mins make up the problem, and suddenly quite and etc.
We share clothes, make up, and anything.
I often fight with my sister because of clothes and toys when we were young.
It would be different if you are boys siblings or mixed siblings.
But maybe some boys sibling are also like that?
This is my third year of the dog,if I could make a wish that I hope my dog would come to life.
Nearly 5 years old,my dog which was suffering terrible disease that lead to death.
My lovely dog,wish you are not afraid the loud sound under the ground,wish you will be health forever in heaven.
formal letter to Embassy 
However we were planned to visit Seoul in February 2014, granted our visa but something came in my work and we changed our plan, went to Paris for business trip in March 2014.
The purpose of our trip is firstly, we would like to visit Cosmetic Ingredient and Technology Exhibition in Seoul from April 17th to April 19th.
My sister lives in London she stated a skincare cosmetic business year ago and doing very successful.
Therefore she recommended us to explore the Cosmetic Ingredient and Technology Exhibition and my wife considering to starts natural skincare cosmetic business in Mongolia.
Secondly I really wants to sightseen around a downtown of the Seoul city and we would love to eat traditional Korean dishes.
The tick tock of the watch that I have on my nightstand doesn't let me sleep.
The mosquito that came in through the window's kitchen didn't let you sleep last night.
The mosquito that came in through the window of the kitchen didn't let you sleep last night.
Today I registered myself as a volunteer at the International Association in Sanda City and started to teach Japanese, yay!
My boss is a rare person for Japanese, who wouldn't ask his subordinates to work overtimes.
I arrived at the place at 6:20.
She said that they have always been suffered from a lack of teachers.
"Several years as a volunteer in Asago City" seemed to be an enough qualification.
"Do you care about the native language of your students?" That can be interpreted in "Do you mind if you are going to teach non-English speakers?" 
They couldn't expect me to understand them in their native languages and it worked well.
Today, the organiser deployed me with a new student.
At first, I felt a bit nervous at that unfamiliar classroom where nobody knew me.
However, after the session of one and a half hours, when the organiser announced that today's class was over, I was totally happy.
I taught her and said, that she should ask that question only to happy teachers like me.
I hope that she also enjoyed the time learning together.
Today I registered myself as a volunteer at the International Association in Sanda City and started to teach Japanese, yay!
My boss is a rare person for Japanese, who wouldn't ask his subordinates to work overtimes.
The International Association provides Japanese classes for both adults and children, and one of them is on Thursday evenings from 6:30.
I informed beforehand that I would like to join the class as a volunteer via e-mail, but I hadn't written that much about myself.
She said that they have always been suffered from a lack of teachers.
"Several years as a volunteer in Asago City" seemed to be an enough qualification.
"Do you care about the native language of your students?" That can be interpreted in "Do you mind if you are going to teach non-English speakers?" 
They couldn't expect me to understand them in their native languages and it worked well.
Today, the organiser deployed me with a new student.
At first, I felt a bit nervous at that unfamiliar classroom where nobody knew me.
However, after the session of one and a half hours, when the organiser announced that today's class was over, I was totally happy.
I showed her some phrases which can used at the faculty's room, because she is working as an English teacher at some Japanese public schools.
I taught her and said, that she should ask that question only to happy teachers like me.
I can answer "I love teaching, that's why I am here!" but sadly not every teacher answers like that.
I hope that she also enjoyed the time learning together.
Our days kept going and we all were getting mature, developing abilities to think, ask, and decide.
Pinkey had now reached Grade 8 too, which means it was her time to stop her education.
I every day thought about my education and the limited life.
I put my tongue between my teeth and sought forgiveness from God.
I believe it depends on you either be a victim or a victorious.
Water kept pouring from the pump, and I was lost in thought, with a plate in my hands.
I'm confused how to use "continue" words.
I can't understand this sentences.
I think it usually used only verb, but those are adjective or adverb.
In thsee case, does it used with adjective or not adverb?
How long can you be pacient without having reply from your friends?
Despite going week at the knees, I was able to approach to him.
She's very self-conscious, so I'll go to a party only due to her.
Although we were wandering for a long time, I contradicted my friends' idea to call our parents.
I can memorise many details from lessons.
I propose to be obedient to my common sense.
I recieved a warm reception at my new job.
I wish I would go to this concert in August.
I like tha night sea.
Especially, I like the fullmoon night sea.
The dark sea reflects moonlight in silver.
The dark sea is like a big creature,and the moonlight on the surface of the sea comes straight to me.
When I look at waving it, I feel calm.
Sometimes, I imagine looking up moon from the shallow seabed.
If there are many people, I lose my concentration 
Today, I had a meeting where everyone speaks English.
I didn't understand them.
One thing is of course, due to my English skills.
But, regardless of language, I tend to lose my concentration when there are many people.
I feel there's somebody else deals issues instead of me.
After this speech you will be able to know what music to listen when you are tired.
After this speech you will be able to like them.
For example, the whole place was covered with snow.
Too many e-mail.
And I always concerned if I get e-mails.
I check if I get e-mails at least once several minutes.
I should never think of my e-mail when I am doing other works to do them effectively.
Japanese Subculture
I think it reminds you of media contents like anime, manga, and video game.
At the same time, that subculture's shortcoming are pointed out sometimes.
From a viewpoint of immature person like me, people who used to like them but start to alienate and switch to social activities and hobbies seem like those who are desperate to adopt the reality and have no room to think of other things, and eventually throw away their innocent and pure heart.
Meanwhile, those contents are being sophisticated now, some of them are enough to be seen as profound.
In comparison to my childhood, Japanese subculture could change rapidly and attract a wide range of people.
Furthermore, it would play an important role in the future of Japan as a competitive strong point.
What do you think of Japanese subculture?
At the same time, that subculture's shortcoming are pointed out sometimes.
From a viewpoint of immature person like me, people who used to like them but start to alienate and switch to social activities and hobbies seem like those who are desperate to adopt the reality and have no room to think of other things, and eventually throw away their innocent and pure heart.
Meanwhile, those contents are being sophisticated now, some of them are enough to be seen as profound.
Furthermore, it would play an important role in the future of Japan as a competitive strong point.
I don't trying to use the smart phone in such day.
Today is rainy day.
I don't trying to use the smart phone in such day.
because it would like as little as possible to avoid the wet.
I reluctantly went to store.
Once I exercise then I get motivation.
Today is rainy day.
because it would like as little as possible to avoid the wet.
I need to go to shopping to obtain ingredients.
Toy with CD's with an elastic cord
This toy is made with a thick elastic cord that I had boughth at a sailingboat shop.
Daan likes it to hit against the cord and the CD's and he also likes it to pull on the elastic cord en let it go.
He also goes with his hand to the disks to let them spin.
Actually I had planned to make this toy on an wooden stand but for now it is an elastic cord that I have to fix on the toys-bow that belongs to his wheelchair.
In the mean time I have made a lot of toys with such an elastic cord.
I will wait for my feelings to rise.
Leaning language
Today, I'll talk about learning the language.
I'm learning English and you guys also must be learning some languages because you are using this website.
I've been in Australia for a year and 4 months and it's my the first abroad.
My English is much better than when I was in Japan but, It's still hard to talk with native speakers because they speak so fast and connecting words and words.
So listening skill is one of the big issues for me.
If there are subtitle on when I talk to people, it's going to make it easier.
What is the hardest point when you learn the language?
Learning language is really long way, but it'll grow me up a lot and always show me another world.
I think there is no solid limitations for human being.
If you feel something impossible, if you have a mind to change the situation, you should strive against it.
Perhaps you can do it until today or tomorrow or the day after tomorrow.
Report on Social Problems Social Problems in My Country
The purpose of this report is to list the main problems my country have as well as their causes and consequences so that they are covered on the documentary that the television company I am working for is preparing on this issue.
However, when people are asked about what worries the most, they have no doubt about it; the unemployment, especially amongst young people, and the high levels of pollution.
It was then, however, when they decided that it was time to work outside the home.
Not having enough jobs for everybody made unemployment increased and even these days, the country remains having this problem.
That is why, despite being Spain a very sunny and windy country, we have continued relying in fossil fuels.
This issue will also entail that they will have children late and as result, the Spanish population will age.
As for pollution, many Spanish cities are already suffering its first consequences; people having more breathing problems, cars banned from entering in city centres and more forest fires than ever.
If the government do not invest more money in renewal energies, the most likely scenario will be that Spain will become a desert.
The purpose of this report is to list the main problems my country have as well as their causes and consequences so that they are covered on the documentary that the television company I am working for is preparing on this issue.
However, when people are asked about what worries the most, they have no doubt about it; the unemployment, especially amongst young people, and the high levels of pollution.
E., the country has the highest unemployment rate in it.
Not having enough jobs for everybody made unemployment increased and even these days, the country remains having this problem.
This issue will also entail that they will have children late and as result, the Spanish population will age.
To try to improve the high levels of pollution, the government should encourage people to use public transport and environmentally friendly vehicles rather than be so dependent on their old cars.
This happening every year held in Dubai.
The first period will hold in Riyadh on March and the second will hold in Dubai on May.
Probably it will be so interesting!
A mite of bragging
My German studies got better too.
I didn't remember the translation at all, but I did understand almost everything of it!
That was the moment of a true glory: one of my dreams came true.
Hope I'll do even better.
I like watching movies, reading books, eating delicious foods, nature and hot spring!
I'm larning English myself since May 2016.
But recentlly I don't use English so my English is bad and bad think.
And I want to have fun talking with you!
Especially,bitter taste is my favorite.
I like to drink in a coffee shop, but also like to buy favorite beans and grind it in my house.
There are some people who succeeds in work.
They earn decent wages, get a fame and are looked up to by everyone around him.
However, I don't have a sense of responsibility and a leadership.
I wonder if earning decent wages, get a fame and being respected by people are my true wish.
I feel the anxiety when I see our master.
In which both the change of profession and not be a teacher I think that she need something another.
Hello I have some first conditional phrases could you check it up?
If i make ten exercises i'll finish the course til monday
If you take it you'll have to cary about him while his life
If you eat this cake you have to run for 2 hours to burn the calories you've get.
If I choose this route I might get a wonderful journey
If he borrow your car you'll never se it again
if you miss this opportunity you going to struggle the whole your life
If i need your advice i'll ask you
If you go to a date with MH i'll.
I kiss you when i'll see the rainbow
If i see the miracle i'll tell you
thanks in advance 
I went on one day trip to the hot spring last weekend.
This month is birthday month for my boyfriend.
We go to the trip in February and September every year.
Last year we went to Saipan, this year, I also had wanted to go abroad.
But my tooth decay got worse and I have to pay expensive treatment cost.
But, hot spring was good.
I like to submerge an outdoor hot spring when chilled winter.
If you have a time, let's go to hot springs.
Now is the best season for go to the hot spring!!
So far I haven't bought it by myself.
However, I should have had my company paid for it.
Since he likes to listen unhappy stories, he smiled while he was listening my poor iPhone story.
It is difficult for English learners to answer a question in English that they can't even answer in their native language, unless they prepare for what to answer in advance.
I've had a difficulty to answer when I had a job interview in my current job.
I was asked this question from an interviewer that '' Why do you want to work here?", what I said was " Well, as you can see, my background doesn't relate to your job, but I was inspired of outdoor advertisments when I visited to NY.
There were a banch of ads there, they had a good design with a creativity, and I thought that how atrractive the ads are.
It made me feel that I want to involve in them and evolve them into farther ads.
After I came back to Japan, I started looking for a job in an ourdoor advertising company, and then I found a job offer of your company."
After I answered, the interviewer asked me that " What can we expect if we hire you?" I answered the that " I'm not sure if I'm capable of contributing and making a profit because I don't even have an experience working in sales department, but I have an exceptional communication skill that I can cover a lack of the experience.
I'm sure I can have a further relation with your clients using the skill."
"No, it is impossible at least several decades.
Although China has developed its economy remarkedly over the past few decades, it still has lots of problems.
While the rich enjoy the benefit of the economic development, there are still the poor in need for financial aid to get the minimum happiness.
Some of the poor are even illiterate and don't have enough money to get private education."
"But, you can see huge wealth gap everywhere in the world.
"To be a global leader, a country should be more open-minded in terms international relationships because the leader should consider the benefit of the whole members.
"I got your point.
but I think it's beside a track.
To be an economic leader, a country doesn't have to get great leadership.
All it needs is absolute economic power, which derives from plenty of natural resources, labor force and etc.
"I would say kind of power shift is going on in the world.
A few decades ago, it was Great Britain that led in the world.
Now, China is building its presence as a leader in the world.
The CO2 emission from China is highest in the world, which means it is damaging the earth 
Planet earth is screaming because of CO2, which could result in the suffering of we human beings."   
China is actually shifting to an environmental-friendly country.
"Hmmmmm, why don't we discuss this topic over cups of coffee later?"
Do you know the comic called "JoJo's bizarre adventure"?
It's a Japanese comic written by Hirohiko Araki and it has lasted over twenty five years.
Characters in the comic have super natural powers called "STAND" which is like a ghost.
For example, The hero in the chapter 3 Kujo Jotaro has the STAND called "Star Platinum".
It looks like ancient worrier in roman period and has incredible speed and agility, and also has magnificent power.
In addition, Star Platinum can stop the time in 2 second.
Kujo Jotaro gets to be fighting against other STAND owners using his STAND.
It has been seven days since the new year's Eve.
My mother-in-law and I prepared a fancy dinner for the new year's Eve.
For the next seven days.
We visited our relatives and friends.
In the new year, I hope all my family members' dreams come true and good luck in everything.
I am so busy that I don't have time to write an essay.
Have you ever experienced things like this?
The thing which had been just a small part of English sound, it actually had not even been a part, has suddenly been recognized as a word at some point.
The latest word that has caught my attention was....
I had to spare some time to find this word in dictionaries as I didn't know the spelling.
The thing which had been just a small part of English sound, it actually had not even been a part, has suddenly been recognized as a word at some point.
You don't know the meaning of the word yet, but once you are aware of it as a word, it lingers in your ears whenever you watch Youtube or listen to podcasts.
I had to spare some time to find this word in dictionaries as I didn't know the spelling.
The thing which had been just a small part of English sound, it actually had not even been a part, has suddenly been recognized as a word at some point.
The thing which had been just a small part of English sound, it actually had not even been a part, has suddenly been recognized as a word at some point.
You don't know the meaning of the word yet, but once you are aware of it as a word, it lingers in your ears whenever you watch Youtube or listen to podcasts.
I had to spare some time to find this word in dictionaries as I didn't know the spelling.
This story doesn't have any punchline.
Have you ever experienced things like this?
The thing which had been just a small part of English sound, it actually had not even been a part, has suddenly been recognized as a word at some point.
You don't know the meaning of the word yet, but once you are aware of it as a word, it lingers in your ears whenever you watch Youtube or listen to podcasts.
I had to spare some time to find this word in dictionaries as I didn't know the spelling.
This story doesn't have any punchline.
Finally, his muscles.
I want to describe aquarium and zoo.
This information will help you decide where to go on dating in the future.
First, why it is better.
Next, where is the best.
You will need to know this because it won the championship the past two years in succession.
First, why did they become strong?
Third, the stadium.
Just looking at it makes me feel calm.
Next, relaxation.
Third, lot of way to play there.
I want to tell you how attractive he is.
Next, how well he sings.
Third, how well he acts in sword fight scenes.
I've been suffering from a backpain since I was a teenager, and now it's getting worse and worse.
Yesterday, I felt pain on my lower back when I was walking.
It lasts after I take a sheet.
After that I am always worried and care about my lowerback.
Sometimes pain disappears temporarily, but it resumes soon.
Today when I was sitting down on a train, gradually pain becomes severe and I felt I couldn't stand it.
I was scared because I've never felt pain while I'm walking.
After that I am always worried and care about my lowerback.
Sometimes pain disappears temporarily, but it resumes soon.
Moreover most people in the world have Internet devices.
Therefore it enables us to connect them and ask some questions which we want to know easily.
By knowing it, we are facing on many troubles or problems.
All things considered, we should be wise to use the Internet when we are looking for the information.
Kimono fabric has beauty that usual fabric don't have.
However, it tend to be tacky.
I am glad that the kimono changed to the nice dress.
I am often asked by how to make a garment from a kimono?
This pattern is a PDF sewing pattern, and it was easy to use!
It was divided by parts.
You can print out only what you need the parts.
We didn't use to have a computer.
Did they use to work together?
Where did you use to go to school?
Are you used to send e-mails to all your friends and family?
My sister used to have a short hair when she was younger.
Japanese won the gold medal in women's team pursuit last night.
The Individual athlete in Neterlands superior to the member in Japan.
Japanese won the gold medal in women's team pursuit last night.
Japan played against the Netherlands in the final.
The Individual athlete in Neterlands superior to the member in Japan.
However, if Japanese play with team, they can work effectively.
That was impressive.
The Individual athlete in Neterlands superior to the member in Japan.
However, if Japanese play with team, they can work effectively.
I would love to show my dresses to you for DIY Dress Contest.
This was the first time to use their patterns.
I love the dress pattern at first.
I really love the pleated centre panel, cocoon-shaped and big pockets, especially the banded hem is so lovely.
I didn't make a gathered hem but I made big pleats and slit on the hem instead.
I wore the dress several times already, and it's lovely and incredibly comfortable.
Dear John!
Long time no seen you, how are you?
Last time we met we used to speak a lot about various training methods.
This is the first time I write here in English...
And is difficult doing everything!
This is the first time I write here in English...
I mean, watching films?
Listening to music?
My grandma raised me when I was about 7 for 10 years.
Since I had no mom, she treated me and my sister like her daughter.
And then, I ended up moving out at 17 to find my self and make myself feel free.
She used to sell vegetables on the street, like a vendor.
She grew up just surviving and sparing money right after Korean War.
Money was all to her.
And she was very proud of her achievement.
I feel sorry for her because she forgot to cook and lost her energy to do housework.
Thus, she asks me to do laundry, cook and all.
I love my grandma and I wish she lives well and long.
I am really intresting about your opinion if you have any advice for me in therms of gym or outdoor trainings?
I am really curious about whats your thoughts on this?
The temperature is perfect as well in autumn.
I took many attractions, some were temporary closure though.
It was my first time to watch a parade show seriously.
I only knew the fire drill or the earthquake drill for most ordinary people or students before.
Earthquake is a kind of natural disaster, fire is a kind of natural disaster if it's caused by lightning.
It's a sad indictment of society that we have this shooter drill things.
Today when I reading news which reported Marjory Stoneman Douglas High School shooting in Florida, I saw a phrase called "a shooter drill".
It's a sad indictment of society that we have this shooter drill things.
Traffic jam in Jakarta is very hard.
I live in Jakarta for 3 months.
But some Indonesian said it was also a life while you were in traffic jam.
Although it has many difficult things which I understand, I read easily and fast!
education system in China city
There is always a huge gap between the education system in city and in countryside.
City means more resources and better facility in China.
For example,International school, where you can expect most of the classes done in English, can be find only at city not in coutriyside.
It narrated what I wanted to achieve so brilliant, I liked it so much, and I decided write out main points.
All good people of Oz must wear green glass.
When I first time decided to learn English, I was looking for a book for self-study.
It narrated what I wanted to achieve so brilliant, I liked it so much, and I decided write out main points.
All good people of Oz must wear green glass.
When I first time decided to learn English, I was looking for a book for self-study.
Es war ein Bisschen peinlich aber man kann nichts machen.
I don't know much Acronyms.
If I know much, I will enjoy English more.
I don't know much Acronyms.
I live very near.
Do you live in a house or a flat?
i'm working for poultry business farm as an accounting and general affair associate.
the company own by a German holdings which has more than 20 group company and operate worldwide.
our company executives are all German people, so we use English for all communications.
i sometime feel difficult to communicate with them.
i can't speak English fluently, and they also nonnative speaker.
It's been about a month since I'd written my entry on Lang-8 last time.
I like this life but sometimes I don't know what to do when it comes to share my current status.
In this way, I'd like to introduce you my favorite stationery as I found them looking around my desk.
I also like doodling using this pen with same reason above.
Hopefully, It would be more easy to write if outer periphery were thicker.
This pen never be out of ink even though I've been using it for a couple of years and sometimes leave it keeping open the pen cap for a while.
There are variety of colors and all of them are beautiful.
Writing can be erased rubbing by a rubber equipped on the pen cap.
I love import stationery since they are very stylish appearance and sometimes colors are unlikely to Japanese products.
My Favorite Stationery Ranking Top3
It's been about a month since the last time I'd written an entry on Lang-8.
Somehow my writing letter becomes cuter and more stylish.
I also like doodling using this pen for the same reason above.
It would be easier to write if the outer periphery were thicker.
This is the best pen ever to write without any pressure.
I love this pen and consume one in about two weeks.
Please let me know if you know good products.
my child
i have a daughter.
she is a year and four month.
she just start to walk and little speak.
i can't get what she say correctly but something she try to talk to me everyday.
so cute.
she loves picture story books.
everyday she brings many books and hand me to read.
but she wanna me to read same book many time so i sometime ask her to bring another one. but she doesn't.
she loves it and she wanna listen the story many time every day.
but she wanna me to read same book many time so i sometime ask her to bring another one.
but she doesn't.
she loves it and she wanna listen the story many time every day.
It's Not Inferior-To-Superior Relationship
Although I hated a whiff of smoke, I liked even the whiff of smoke from him.
I wanted to remember all of him that I knew, so I began using his license plate number as my passwords.
Since when I graduated from high school, I haven't seen him, but almost my passwords still include the four number of his liscense plate number.
Several days ago, I opened a new bank account and needed a password for deposit and withdraw.
I agonized whether I used the four number again or not.
I decided to compose a new password for the new account.
After then, I tried to withdraw some money from ATM yesterday.
I have to go the the bank to creat a new password.
Although I hated a whiff of smoke, I liked even the whiff of smoke from him.
I wanted to remember all of him that I knew, so I began using his license plate number as my passwords.
Since when I graduated from high school, I haven't seen him, but almost my passwords still include the four number of his liscense plate number.
I agonized whether I used the four number again or not.
However, I couldn't recall the new password and failed to withdraw with the wrong number three times.
How old is your oldest acceptable age for your husband?
I like speak English but I'm not good at read and write English.
I thought the reason why.
that is because, I don't like to study grammar.
If i want to study grammar, would you tell me how to study it effiviently??
Today is the first day back to office.
Got an order from my customer in West Africa.
This feeling is so nice, kept me busy for the whole morning until now.
I have done a lot of things other couldn't understand.
I always try to be careful in chosing what I wear.
I'm always dressed tidily when I go out.
He is not lame, but he always wears casual clothings which are a lot alike.
I'm always dressed tidily when I go out.
One day, I found a package of curry spice delivered from the famous company GABAN at amazon.
I have bought another spice from GABAN and it was good, but expensive.
This is not the one and it was cheaper.
I bought it, but it was so bad that I gave up eating it and threw it away.
My hobby is mountain-climbing.
I want to have a hair cut every three months.
I've cut my hair by myself since I was a first grader in high school.
Now, I'm thinking about having my hair cut at a hair salon so as to change up my hair.
However, I was told by my girl friend that I should graw my forelock to my eyebrows and I looked better with it.
Now, I'm thinking about having my hair cut at a hair salon so as to change up my hair.
However, I was told by my girl friend that I should graw my forelock to my eyebrows and I looked better with it.
Today I ate Thai food as dinner, and It is very delicious, but expansive.
because the food are very little and the price are high.
We have two people that ordered four items, and we eat all of them.
Do both sentences have same meaning and make sense?
And, What do you think which sentence is better?
I would be grateful you would create the invoice requesting payment from the publisher.
Abundance of Subtitles in Japanese TV Programs
Japanese TV programs, especially some variety shows, tend to use too much subtitles.
I'm not talking about the subtitles like CNN news with English subtitle.
Japanese TV programs do put Japanese subtitles on their Japanese Language programs, and it's not for persons with hearing disability.
I'm not sure of their purposes, but I guess this would make spoken language more explicit or understandable or something like that.
Of course, there are critical opinions about this trend.
I'm afraid that this would make Japanese less intelligent in the future.
Japanese TV programs, especially some variety shows, tend to use too much subtitles.
I'm not talking about the subtitles like CNN news with English subtitle.
Japanese TV programs do put Japanese subtitles on their Japanese Language programs, and it's not for persons with hearing disability.
I'm not sure of their purposes, but I guess this would make spoken language more explicit or understandable or something like that.
I'm afraid that this would make Japanese less intelligent in the future. Dick.
So you should read this!
Next, thoughtful story.
Third, twist and shocking ending.
First, indoor or outdoor.
Next, the city center or in the mountains.
Lastly, charge.
One of a members in an English study group said to me.
Sugar is good for our brain.
I think She and her family have never worried about their health conditions.
My friend and I went on a trip to Yamanashi during last summer holiday.
It was cloudy when we arrived at there but it gradually became sunny and we eventually could prayed it.
And,we could see the magnificent view of Mt.
after the final reserve determination date, there is no more determination of the amount of projected profit oil and transfer of additional interest between KNOC and the Government.
It's the first time I write here for a year.
It doesn't mean I haven't learned English, on the contrary, I've kept teaching myself English almost everyday.
I've just found it hard making progress by studying by myself.
Although I'm sure my hardwork has paid off, I can't expect myself to improve my English skill so much, especially speaking.
I used to forcuse on memorizing new words or phrases and waching English TV or movies.
Now along with those things I'm trying put words that I've accumulated out through writing and talking to myself.
I'll see how it works well for me.
Worn out chairs, tables and many other objects were untidily dispersed awaiting their turn to be repaired.
The carpenter took a pencil and drew a line on the enlarged fingers, grabbed a saw and cut them following the sketch.
Actually, I want to take a nap more.
It's been a long time to come and write some words here.
Even I'm still in the middle of learning English, I feel like to learn other languages.
Chinese or Japanese, or Spanish.
but right now, i have to concentrate in my own study...
A husband was laying on the hospital bed and said to his wife,
The wife thought a little while and said in a small voice,
The wife thought a little while and said in a small voice,
I got a new job at a purchase department in a shipping company.
The job interviews were held three times and that was very tough business for me.
Meguro has a river whose river side has beautiful cherry blossoms every spring.
Ave the sentences below grammatically incorrect?
I supposed to go to a famous place in my hometown but I gave up. Because I got caught the traffic jam.
After this speech you will be able to like them.
After this speech you will be able to like Japan more.
After this speech you will be able to learn about trouble of living in snow country.
a Letter of Application for a Job
My first interest in NPO first began when I took a class about it in university.
I have studied about it in Japan, and I have been very interested in the difference between NPO in Japan and that in the United States since I came to the United States last September.
I have been participating and researching some organizations as a volunteer.
I have also been a captain or a leader of basketball club in school for nine years.
For last one year, I was a treasurer of the basketball team in university.
We have over one hundred students and a lot of events, so I managed a lot of money.
I have enough confidence in myself doing something what I am given with responsibility, and I am good at planning something and achieving the goal with cooperation.
I am impressed with you organization's strong vision and would be honored to be involved in your new project.
I think I have the background to be an asset to your organization as a head of new project.
My experience of a treasurer would allow me to step into your position and hit the ground running.
I look forward to speaking you soon.
Even though it is true that in light of the recent events, one can only feel ashamed for supporting the rights that have caused so much mayhem in the first place, there is no reason to believe that monsters will stop being monsters overnight by changing the right of million other people who do not hold any other interest but to protect their loved ones and property.
There is a debate for every backpacker who want to venture visiting the " Parque Nacional Torres del Paine".
For those who do not know what the "Torres del Paine" are, they are a group of spectacular and majestic mountains located in Chile South America, recently declared the eighth Wonder of the World.
Returning to that debate, we all discuss what kind of trail to do before venturing  there is the "W" and "O" trail, if you are rookie and going for the first time, it is better that you do the "W" if you go a second time, got more time, and very good physical condition, you can do the "O"trail then.
Damns!
Anyway I have asthma, I'm always late, lol!
On my next day, I went through "Los Cuernos" area, my third stop, hiking downhill, its like you want to cry, it's another world, it's another scenical place, you feel peace, your heart beat so loud, no words just watch the panorama in silence, thinking about how tiny we are in this world.
Sometimes I think that to watch sunrises and sunshines in there, it should be mandatory, sprcially before to die.
There is a debate for every backpacker who want to venture visiting the " Parque Nacional Torres del Paine".
Oh surprise, I was very confident though, I feeling very brave and I chose the" W" trail starting from "Laguna Amarga", in the Park entrance.
I arrived to my first stop " Laguna Amarga", it is a green, blue, red lake as beautiful as hypnotic, it looks like an illusion.
After that I went to "Campamento Torres" and I left my backpack there, to walk free of weight.
All was going well until I had to reach other place, "Mirador de las Torres" my second stop on the itinerary, I was practically climbing a mountain with no end, I slowly walked pff, some foreigners passed next to me who did not get tired, no effort and no mercy, nor complained, while I took breath and strength to continue, I was also a foreigner but what the hell do these foreigners eat?
There is a debate for every backpacker who want to venture visiting the " Parque Nacional Torres del Paine".
For those who do not know what the "Torres del Paine" are, they are a group of spectacular and majestic mountains located in Chile South America, recently declared the eighth Wonder of the World.
Oh surprise, I was very confident though, I feeling very brave and I chose the" W" trail starting from "Laguna Amarga", in the Park entrance.
I arrived to my first stop " Laguna Amarga", it is a green, blue, red lake as beautiful as hypnotic, it looks like an illusion.
After that I went to "Campamento Torres" and I left my backpack there, to walk free of weight.
Anyway I have asthma, I'm always late, lol!
I returned to "Campamento Torres" later, I was tired but I could not sleep because was excited about that experience.
On my next day, I went through "Los Cuernos" area, my third stop, hiking downhill, its like you want to cry, it's another world, it's another scenical place, you feel peace, your heart beat so loud, no words just watch the panorama in silence, thinking about how tiny we are in this world.
Sometimes I think that to watch sunrises and sunshines in there, it should be mandatory, sprcially before to die.
I felt that I left something of myself there, a piece of my soul maybe, I felt like was leaving home and something it told me that I must go back, again, I hope so!
Nobody tell you that you can leave a part of you in this place, a new check I guess!
In the end, I arrived to "Laguna Amarga" where my group and I could see two pumas in their natural habitat, another wonderful and sudden event and we closed with a flourish.
A single word to summarize this trip, the word would be "SUBLIME",  it's another universe, a fantastic space to raise awareness and find your self.
During the mess, a young employee who has just joined last Spring quit suddenly without any notice.
He hasn't even tried to remember his job but just do what the other worker told him to do, so I think he didn't have any motivation from the beginning.
He called the office on Sunday and quit spontaneously so just has left the unfinished work as it is.
He hasn't done any important job but I made him to read meaters instead of me, so I had to do that in heavy snow.
According to his dad who came to the office and talk to the boss, he didn't like this reading meters by himself.
It was surprising that his dad even came!
If it was my geranation, he would be scolded that I'm too naive and wussy.
I logged in Lang-8 for the first time after a while.
During the mess, a young employee who has just joined last Spring quit suddenly without any notice.
According to his dad who came to the office and talk to the boss, he didn't like this reading meters by himself.
I logged in Lang-8 for the first time after a while.
During the mess, a young employee who has just joined last Spring quit suddenly without any notice.
He hasn't even tried to remember his job but just do what the other worker told him to do, so I think he didn't have any motivation from the beginning.
He called the office on Sunday and quit spontaneously so just has left the unfinished work as it is.
He hasn't done any important job but I made him to read meaters instead of me, so I had to do that in heavy snow.
According to his dad who came to the office and talk to the boss, he didn't like this reading meters by himself.
If it was my geranation, he would be scolded that I'm too naive and wussy.
As far as I know, we're supposed to take IQ test in elementary school.
I guess many Japanese people know the word "EQ", but it's not that common.
Today, I read an article online, the title is "What's intelligent people really like."
When we bumped into certain information, intelligent people are able to get way more things from it.
They're able to read between the lines, see the intention behind it, and find out the unwritten rules inside of it.
Today, I read an article online, the title is "What's intelligent people really like."
Today, I read an article online, the title is "What's intelligent people really like."
When we bumped into certain information, intelligent people are able to get way more things from it.
Confused Myself
During the Olympics game like current Pyeongchang Olympics, almost all TV programs would run breaking news captions immediately after Japanese players win the medal of any color.
A short while ago, I was watching some recorded TV program and there came a breaking news announcing winning the gold medal, and foolishly I switched the channel to the program which seemed to be broadcasting live the Olympics game.
That news was of women's team pursuit last night.
I recently exchanged the OS of my laptop computer from Windows 8 to 10.
Since I did it, the number of times of PC-freezing increases.
Besides that, I feel very stresfull, because I'm not still used to the OS.
Two Exhibitions I Want to Visit
There is a museum near to my home.
Recently, there has an exhibition for antiques of Pompeii.
These antiques were borrowed and shipped from Italy.
I have an interest in that exhibition.
I want to go to visit it.
Another museum in my city is holding an exhibition for ancient treasures of Afghanistan.
I want to visit there too.
Today, one of my cowokers told me that it is really good to run outside in the morning to start off a good day.
I'm really open to gaining whatever things I heard, so whenever soneone tells me something good, I want to try and see whether the thing is good or bad by myself.
preparing to move house
There are 2 weeks left to leave here.
I clean up my house every day.
I have been trying not to buy many things, because I know I should leave my house in 2 years for my job.
My house has better feel with less things after doing Dnshari.
My house has better feel with less things after doing Dnshari.
I started watching it because I had heard it's a great material for English learners and now, I'm really into it!
Though I thought it was not that good than I had expected when I had been watching the first season but I believe it gets more exciting with each episode.
All main characters are fascinating but my best one is Ross.
I started watching it because I had heard it's a great material for English learners and now, I'm really into it!
Though I thought it was not that good than I had expected when I had been watching the first season but I believe it gets more exciting with each episode.
I had not been handled that until I work at current company.
That is very important for promoting our company and products.
So I have a little pressure and feel highly motivation.
Oosugi Ren who is Japanese actor passed away last night.
He was really good actor.
Please correct following sentences more natural for natives.
The M fab system changes the common sense of semiconductor fabrication.
So, even a student.
M fab makes semiconductor more creative.
This simple idea made a new semiconductor fabrication system. It is M fab.
We will be free from too much cost and time.
I hope to go to the PyeongChang!
I'm very cold from this morning, so I don't catch the cold.
I wearing cloth of winter, so it wear keep on warm.
The weather is repeat to cold and warm recently.
I difficult health management.
A famous female columnist made a problem with twitter.
"I have something to say to people of TV industry.
Her intention is that only medalists are commendable at the Olympic Games, and the people who cheer medalists are ordinary.
white lie
I had to tell a white lie to my parent.
My mother came back to home after the operation.
Every time snowed heavily.
My visa is tier 5 which is able to work for two years.
I've wested a term four month of my visa in Japan so I can stay only one more year.
I really like British magazines so I thought I wanted to gain a lot of experience here.
My visa is tier 5 which is able to work for two years.
I've wested a term four month of my visa in Japan so I can stay only one more year.
I am doing a photography.
I will write about Japanese religion, though I'm afraid it will be a little difficult for me.
Many Japanese are not puritanically religious including me.
It is said that 99% of the population are Shintoists while around 80% are Buddhists.
I guess that the monotheism and the polytheism can coexists somehow but I'm not sure.
I'm a Buddhist formally just because of my parents, family, but I don't think I identify with any religious organizations of Buddhism.
Furthermore, I may believe in Shinto, not a specific god but multitudinous, multitudinous gods, rather than Buddha whom I don't know well.
And in my opinion this kind of not-so-religious custom is not so bad thing, because there have been full of confusion around the world throughout the history, not to mention the terrorism.
I do agree this proverb.
I also want to say the intellect is mightier than all kinds of weapon!
Sometimes, the intellect can be replaced by love or good will.
Therefore, I want to develop my intellect and make the best use of it in my dailylife.
Speaking of which, I felt the power of intellect in a heart warming story on a TV show the other day.
A mother who was a prison breaker and led a new life by assuming a new identily was sentenced to 18 years' imprisonment.
Her family was all surprised to this becuase they didn't know about their mother's real past.
And they made a homepage to save their mother.
Many people who was helped by her wrote letters to the court to send her back to her family.
And the court decided to shorten the imprisonment from 18 yearts to 13 months.
In Japan which many foreigners love as a very kind country, this kind of things never happen.
To be honest, Japanese people are very indifferent to others by nature.
I was very moved and found that this story is very unique and interesting.
A mother who was a prison breaker and led a new life by assuming a new identily was sentenced to 18 years' imprisonment.
A mother who was a prison breaker and led a new life by assuming a new identily was sentenced to 18 years' imprisonment.
Although they were very shocked that she didn't reveal the truth to them, their love for her didn't change at all.
Many people who was helped by her wrote letters to the court to send her back to her family.
who is my miss right?
I come to bus station to pick up Nancy today and plan to give her a surprise.
So I arrive at the station an hour earlier than she arrives.
Because the New Year just passed, a great deal of people comes back to work from hometown to Beijing.
I imaged that when she sees me how happy Nancy is.
When I woke up the other day, I turn on the wifi and have a look at the wechat as usually.
The signal is so bad that there is nothing messages.
I think I should make good use of this day to review textbook, prepare for work.
From the message I can judge she wants me to pick up her.
I run toward to the subway.
Nancy is in internship now; she will work here three more months and then be postgraduate.
Who will go to school three years.
I try to find a girl to marry in my heart.
Nancy is so adorable, but how long our relationship will last?
Little cold
Today is little cold than yesterday.
So, I feel no good, but I'll do my best to my work!!
After finishing today and tomorrow, I have day off haha.
What should I do next day off?!
I don't know, if it's busy today, but I want to busy day, because I think it's very fun busy day!!
So if it's busy day, I'll do my best today too!!
Anyway, today's English challenge!!
I can't take one's eye's off for TV, because I had fun watch to Olympic.
I don't think a good sentence, so please check a sentence.
It is famaous news that Ice skater Kodaira got a gold medal in Olympic.
In Addition,She got forcus on her behavior.
She said I have a confidence for my life.
I finished deciding my new team members about next fiscal year yesterday.
I have to apply for test on TOEIC on website shortly after attending a school.
I frequently have been met with my friend this month.
we usually met at a gym to train.
Generally we are training a different time at another places.
It can let the other students still feel confident when they are frustrated or enter a bottleneck on their study and research.
It's ridiculous, I looked around my laboratory and I didin't find any students accord with such description.
That's so tough stuff though, that's the faithful aim that I'm learning English.
That's so tough stuff though.
My daughter was a good mood this morning.
She was really in a bad mood yesterday morning.
Maybe in the worst mood ever.
I usually change her diaper first after she gets up every morning.
She rejected it yesterday.
Also, she didn't try eating the breakfast that my wife made.
She was just rejected everything yesterday.
My wife was told by my daughter's teacher that my daughter ate lunch completely in the nursery school.
In reversal, she asked me to feed the breakfast just after she got up this morning.
I appreciate for that someone makes foods for me.
That is a matter of course.
I want my daughter to learn that.
While I was talking with the staff, I felt like I was a little in bad mood without any reason.
The sudden call woke me up, and I was still half asleep but answered the phone.
While I was talking with the staff, I felt like I was a little in bad mood without any reason.
I do hope nobody calls me in the morning.
I really moved and I'm proud of them.
I really moved and I'm proud of them.
Last night, I watched the women's speed skating team pursuit at the Pyongyang Olympics on TV.
"The cooks almost always put in the charlottes quantities of small pellets in pink and white sugar.
When I heard that there was a Russian charlotte at dinner and that the husband had written to someone about a hundred and a thousand, I naturally brought the two things together.
I immediately understood that he could not let this little girl, young and pretty, in peace.
Europe was divided religiously because at that time some countries of Europe were supporting the Protestant reformation, and they considered the Ottomans as extrategic partners against the Catholicism.
With this treaty the Pope of Rome allowed the Spanish King, Felipe II, the freedom of a military action in the Mediterranean sea.
The Pope was interested in stopping the Ottoman advance and he hope that Spain faced up this thread.
I don't know why the Spaniards called this city Lepanto.
He spent five years as prisioner of war in Argel.
When he retourned to Spain, he started to write books.
When he wrote Don Quijote, the best book of the Spanish Literature, he added one chapter were a character who could be him explains his experience as prisioner of war in Argel to Quijote.
He died shortly after publishing the last book of Don Quijote.
Prisioner of War in Argel
Europe was divided religiously because at that time some countries of Europe were supporting the Protestant reformation, and they considered the Ottomans as extrategic partners against the Catholicism.
He spent five years as prisioner of war in Argel.
When he wrote Don Quijote, the best book of the Spanish Literature, he added one chapter were a character who could be him explains his experience as prisioner of war in Argel to Quijote.
I often watch Olympic games on TV.
I did not expect that Japan's curing team put up good fights.
I often watch Olympic games on TV.
Film shooters are a Palestinian and an Israeli, and they interviewed people who they met along the route 181 which is 1947 partition line.
Both Palestinian and Israeli live together in the Never Ending Story if I am allowed to say such irresponsible opinion
The day before yesterday, I went to a cultural centre to watch a movie named 'Route 181'.
Film shooters are a Palestinian and an Israeli, and they interviewed people who they met along the route 181 which is 1947 partition line.
Both Palestinian and Israeli live together in the Never Ending Story if I am allowed to say such irresponsible opinion
The day before yesterday, I went to a cultural centre to watch a movie named 'Route 181'.
Film shooters are a Palestinian and an Israeli, and they interviewed people who they met along the route 181 which is 1947 partition line.
Both Palestinian and Israeli live together in the Never Ending Story if I am allowed to say such irresponsible opinion
I am so tired that it seems to me I cannot go on foot,cfnnot eat, sleep, do anything...
I wold like back to my childhood...
There my parents were young, and my grandparents were still alive.
I also wanted to buy bulgur, but alas.
At home there is oatmeal and cutlets made by my mother - nor bad.
Oatmeals will be in the breakfast and the lunch tomorrow.
I walk to home confidently with the bread in the bag.
And, there is still a coffee and a milk, why did I get upset?
He was disappear for two weeks, in the morning the call was as nothing was happen.
In this time I need an explanation, otherwise I will leave without hesitate.
In this time I need an explanation, otherwise I will leave without hesitate.
A waitress said to the customer who came from large nation in Asia that
"Please refrain from exploring inside of kitchen.
However, it was wasting time.
When I was a student, I went on trips with whole students on the same grade which was called shuugaku-ryokou, which means school excursions.
During the trip, we all expected to stay awake all night and the most pleasure was talking different things with my friends together in one room.
We soon got tired from talking and slept quietly.
But it can't be him!
Okay, there's just a few days left for this week to end...
I really like fashionable.
Especially,I love glasses,Glasses make you look intelligent!!but it's very high price.
I really like fashionable.
Especially,I love glasses,Glasses make you look intelligent!!but it's very high price.
This means it will help the economically deprivileged while at the same time being environmentally friendly.
I asked a question out there on the English Learner stack website, and also received an good answer.
Do the negative-polarity adverbs in them trigger inversion? and why?
When a man only thinks of himself, he loses his friends.
Today i wake up so late.
I missed the bus for the office then i took a private cab and reached the office.
My whole day was going wrong, someone said that if your starting day was bad then the whole day will be going bad.
I missed the bus for the office then i took a private cab and reached the office.
My whole day was going wrong, someone said that if your starting day was bad then the whole day will be going bad.
This title is derived from the song, but I try to think about what I want.
That's the workplace that each person consider of others.
In the terrible one, each person is tired of working there, so they wouldn't do anything but their duty.
They never try to help other people because it just means that they have to work more.
By doing things right, they would feel left holding the bag.
However, I think, the more we help each other, the easier we can work.
That's the workplace that each person consider of others.
I want something just like such workplace.
In the terrible one, each person is tired of working there, so they wouldn't do anything but their duty.
I want something just like such workplace.
The same with jpeg image on a computer.
170 words analysis of a graph 
The graph presents the percentage of Australian people who did regular exercise in 2010, divided by sex and age range.
As it can be clearly seen, in general women did more physical activity with a considerable gap from men, with the exception of teenagers from 15 to 24, where males register a higher figure of 52.8%.
My TOEIC pretest is coming on Friday.
I expect that how many points I can get at that time.
but, I thoroughly study and maintain my motivation.
I want to get more than 700 points on TOEIC on Friday.
I don't like to read, but I try to at least read a book written in English a month to improve my English.
I used to buy paper books, but I found that electric books on Kindle were much cheaper.
I urged my children to read books, but they didn't want to.
They were so excited about it, because they really wanted to have their own tablets.
So far, they are willing to read more than before.
I bet that there will be no going back once you try it.
I got Kindles for each of my children and told them that they were allowed to get whatever e-books they liked.
The rules of game are following.
Number of players in the game more than 2.
The player who said a noun not satisfying the rule are loser and dropped off by the game immediately.
And the player who cannot say any noun is also loser.
If all nouns are said, the game is finished.
The players who could continue to say a noun satisfying the rule is winner.
The rule must be decided carefully.
A good rule is that anybody can easily judge whether said noun is OK or not.
So, let's play the simulation of the game.
I have the impression, we are building up a society where we have a tendency not to care about people around us.
Cities are increasing in population and as a consequence, some neighborhoods are crammed and that it would have give us as a result developing people social skills.
But the facts show us other reality.
When I was a child, I used to live at a neighborhood where all the children loved to play outdoors in some square or park.
We loved to practise sports in the streets, we found wherever place the right one to have fun.
I made good friends in my childhood, and even now I have a close relation with some of them.
This has a high impact in the way we are relationing among us.
I was being a couch potato for the whole afternoon, watching TV series focused on medical related affairs.
I also categorized several pics and then photoshopped to release on social media to get likes.
I seldom did that, but choosing pics and then using apps to combine them and adding moods or explanations is really a time-killer.
It's the last day of the winter vacation and Spring Festival Holiday also!
I spent some time accompanying my grandma, sharing my trip by showing her photos because soon I will be busy for the new semester.
work in large company
Because the training system there is well-organized.
It is friendly to newcomer.
I worked as an intern on a big law firm in my city last month.
The assistant taught me how to write a official document, what was the right format and how to get back to customers.
I joined to the dinner.
I will value to spend such a good time with my family.
Actually, my boss told me to move to another factory next April.
Today I feel the ligaments of my left leg, which have been torn for a quite long time, don't hurt as severely as the other days, however I cannot take the risk of going out for exercise still.
Yesterday I told Sophia I had started to hate talking with Finae on all the stupid extreme music she likes, but when she's gone the same old solitude hit me once again.
Walking on the main street, I made my way through gangs of youngsters in black down jacket who hid themselves in the hazy light of street lamps and the smoke of inferior cigarettes.
The writer started his travel for one year, and actually he continued to explore the world for six years!
I just started to read the book and I found this book is very dangerous for me.
So far I just read a few pages, but I already became to want to quit my job and prepare for traveling!
Last night, I was introduced the book titled "How to Travel the World on $50 a Day".
The writer started his travel for one year, and actually he continued to explore the world for six years!
I just started to read the book and I found this book is very dangerous for me.
So far I just read a few pages, but I already became to want to quit my job and prepare for traveling!
Today, I learnt diversity at workplace in the class.
My lecturere gave an example of Language barrier and he said that I have a language barrier in English because English is not first language.
These people like me need visual things to explain something rather than just only explanation.
I know he didn't make fun of me through giving my example in front of the class but I felt like my English skills was denied completely even though I always work hard.
When he was talking about me in the class, I laughed at him and then I don't know why my confidence of my english was loosing.
is there anyone can understand my feeling?
Let's talk adout happyness!
In my opinion I happy women because I have a little son.
Whatever others may say, just persist in my goal.
A younger brother addicted to the lottery and his older brother tried to exhort him, but failed.
Jacques Valle and the movie Close encounters of the third kind
He studied mathematics at La Sorbonne in Paris and then a master degree in Astrophysics.
Since he was very young he was attracted by UFO and related topics.
These interests accompanied him when he moved to USA, where he pursued a prolific carrer as writer and UFO researcher.
When Steven Spielberg was in his tweenties, he read about Jacques Vallee, which gave Spielberg a deep impression.
In his third movie, Close encounters of the third kind, one of the main roles is a french scientist, who was inspired on the life of Jacques Vallee.
The Peoung Chang Olympic was finally held in Korea and I'm enjoying watching this these days.
Watching the games is always exciting and I can't stop watching them once I start watching them.
Especially I can't take my eyes off when I watch the games such as speed skating and short track because they are the games which Korean are good at.
Today I watched the medal ceremony award of Korean women short track team.
They got the gold medals and looked very happy and emotional.
Yes, they have prepared this game for a long time, at least over 4 years and they were picked up as the members of the national team among many people.
I heard that the process of the practice is very hard.
At the same time it got me thinking like "When is my Olympic day?" and I thought like if there is the day, I also have to prepare the day hard like them to get the best day ever in my life.
It is easy for people to compare other people's lives with themselves.
Since I am a human as well, I started comparing my process of thought with my life.
The Peoung Chang Olympic was finally held in Korea and I'm enjoying watching this these days.
Watching the games is always exciting and I can't stop watching them once I start watching them.
Especially I can't take my eyes off when I watch the games such as speed skating and short track because they are the games which Korean are good at.
Today I watched the medal ceremony award of Korean women short track team.
Yes, they have prepared this game for a long time, at least over 4 years and they were picked up as the members of the national team among many people.
I heard that the process of the practice is very hard.
I don't know how they felt exactly, but I was overcame with emotion as well.
At the same time it got me thinking like "When is my Olympic day?" and I thought like if there is the day, I also have to prepare the day hard like them to get the best day ever in my life.
It is easy for people to compare other people's lives with themselves.
Since I am a human as well, I started comparing my process of thought with my life.
Nowadays a great number of commuters and business travellers have decided that they can work from railway carriages as successfully as they do it from their offices, making phone calls.
Other railway companies are not eager to take steps against those who treat the carriage as their personal office space preferring to rely upon ostracism by fellow passengers.
Other railway companies are not eager to take steps against those who treat the carriage as their personal office space preferring to rely upon ostracism by fellow passengers.
I ate fried food twice in a raw.
After dinner, I exercised for one and a half hour, but I still feel guilty.
Tomorrow I want to exercise more to take off this feeling.
I watched movie "The Greatest Showman" last holiday.
I liked the songs in this movie, and bought a this movie's soundtrack.
I listen it everyday.
When I notice, and I sing it.
The most listning song is "the greatest show".
It maked me fun.
Shopping at Shinjuku
Today, I went shopping at Shinjuku.
After that, I went to a cinema and watched an interesting movie.
Haha, Chinese people are really enthusiastic to receive the guests, and one of our most important event to receive the guests is to invite them to have a great diner.
Do prepare a great appetite when you are in China: too many delicious foods to taste!
Concerning media, I myself can feel this kind of manipulation, like I said in your class, I read news in English, French and Chinese to broaden my vision and learn languages at the same time.
However, sometimes I feel the reports about China are often biased, which is the same case about Chinese media when they report things in the west.
So maybe this is a bonus of learning the new language: we know more about the whole world in different voices and ideologies.
*When I went to a bank, it had already closed it.
*I didn't like a cat, but it is starting to grow on me, since I started to live alone.
the beginning is always hard time, so I get tired easily in short time.
so I will work up to it.
If I stick to it, I will be able to get the good result which I want.
*I've put off to touch base with my friend whom I haven't seem long time and I got around to do it.
*I didn't like a cat, but it is starting to grow on me, since I started to live alone.
*I've put off to touch base with my friend whom I haven't seem long time and I got around to do it.
Very early flight.
I booked a flight which is departure at 5:30 day after tomorrow.
It sounds pretty tired, but I'll over it.
After weeks of mutual discrepancies and reproaches between JxCat and ERC on the formation of a new government, both parties appear to be close to reaching a final agreement.
Sources of the negotiations said that Puigdemont would lead a symbolic republican government in Brussels aimed at internationalizing the Catalan cause while someone else with executive powers would do the same in Catalonia.
Nevertheless, Puigdemont would still hold the responsibility of the designation of the government and the power to decide on calling new elections at any given moment.
First, pro-independence parties would use their absolute majority in Parliament to proclaim the legitimacy of Puigdemont to be president.
Right after, he would nominate a candidate for investiture as a head of government to exercise the functions of president of Catalonia, but with republican criteria.
However, this move would allow pro-independence parties to confront the Spanish government within the current Spanish legal framework and internationalize the Catalan case.
Thus, the third option and the most feasible one would be Elsa Artadi, who could have the responsibility of leading the country for the next four years.
After I left there, I was walking through in front of Mcdonald, I had a sudden urge to eat French fries, but I was restraining myself from eating it for my diet.
Recently, my pants have no space and needless to say, I've put on weight.
So, I'm even seriously thinking that I have to go on a diet.
When I was riding my bike and almost passing through a flower shop on my way home, many beautiful different kinds of flowers piqued my interest and I couldn't help but stop.
A shopkeeper came toward me and said to me, "How may I help you?" I asked him giving me his recommendation of flowers for my small flower bed.
About two years ago, I found a bud that I have never seen before suddenly appeared in my flower bed and it grew very fast.
It became about 2 meters high and the symbol tree in front of my house.
I thought it was a bird's work.
I looked for the name on the internet.
It was a tree called, "shimatoneriko" in Japanese and "evergreen ash" in English.
Unfortunately, because of the typhoon last October 22, the tree leaned forward badly.
My husband uprooted the tree because it might damage to our building itself.
It might be my fault or because of the tree.
Even though I didn't want to stay there for such a long time to bother his work, I think I was there for thirty minutes or so.
Finally, I bought three packages of different kinds of bulbs.
According to the shopkeeper, they don't need extra work, so all I should do is plant and leave them as they grow.
I will take care of those flowers very well as my best.
This afternoon I went shopping.
I saw some flowers at a supermarket, but I didn't buy anything.
After I left there, I was walking through in front of Mcdonald, I had a sudden urge to eat French fries, but I was restraining myself from eating it for my diet.
Recently, my pants have no space and needless to say, I've put on weight.
So, I'm even seriously thinking that I have to go on a diet.
When I was riding my bike and almost passing through a flower shop on my way home, many beautiful different kinds of flowers piqued my interest and I couldn't help but stop.
A shopkeeper came toward me and said to me, "How may I help you?" I asked him giving me his recommendation of flowers for my small flower bed.
About two years ago, I found a bud that I have never seen before suddenly appeared in my flower bed and it grew very fast.
I thought it was a bird's work.
I looked for the name on the internet.
It was a tree called, "shimatoneriko" in Japanese and "evergreen ash" in English.
I was wondering how many meters more the tree would grow.
I had kinda mixed feelings, though.
It might be my fault or because of the tree.
Listening to this situation, the shopkeeper kindly gave me a lot of good advice.
Even though I didn't want to stay there for such a long time to bother his work, I think I was there for thirty minutes or so.
Since there were no other customers, I guess the shopkeeper was also happy to talk to me.
According to the shopkeeper, they don't need extra work, so all I should do is plant and leave them as they grow.
I will take care of those flowers very well as my best.
A shopkeeper came toward me and said to me, "How may I help you?" I asked him giving me his recommendation of flowers for my small flower bed.
About two years ago, I found a bud that I have never seen before suddenly appeared in my flower bed and it grew very fast.
It became about 2 meters high and the symbol tree in front of my house.
It might be my fault or because of the tree.
I will take care of those flowers very well as my best.
I saw some flowers at a supermarket, but I didn't buy anything.
After I left there, I was walking through in front of Mcdonald, I had a sudden urge to eat French fries, but I was restraining myself from eating it for my diet.
Recently, my pants have no space and needless to say, I've put on weight.
So, I'm even seriously thinking that I have to go on a diet.
A shopkeeper came toward me and said to me, "How may I help you?" I asked him giving me his recommendation of flowers for my small flower bed.
It became about 2 meters high and the symbol tree in front of my house.
I looked for the name on the internet.
I had kinda mixed feelings, though.
Listening to this situation, the shopkeeper kindly gave me a lot of good advice.
The flowers look rare and beautiful.
According to the shopkeeper, they don't need extra work, so all I should do is plant and leave them as they grow.
According to the shopkeeper, they don't need extra work, so all I should do is plant and leave them as they grow.
They consider that the results of the latest election do not allow them to take unilateral steps any longer.
At least not until the support for independence reaches more than 50% of the votes in an election.
I had the same problem few years ago and I finally found my healthy balance.
I might say It was a hard time for me to get use to all of these changes.
Secondly you should walk to your job It is the easiest way to work out when you do not have a huge free time schedule.
Do not be desperate.
A bad habit: Watch video clips too much.
One of bad habits I want to get rid of is that I watch video clips excessively.
Regardless of Youtube clips or TV shows once I jump into that visual, I find myself spending much more time than I expected.
The problems are not only It takes my bunch of times, but also It entails other bad effects.
For instance, bad posture brings me a stiff neck.
Two, the eyes go dry.
I read somewhere else.
Those passages drove me to ponder it tonight.
I have a T-shirt printed ' NAVY'.
How do you think of this logo?
I bought this T-shirt at Korea long time ago.
What does 'NAVY' means?
I will throw out my t-shirt if that logo has wired meaning.
I have only 4 days to go before studying abroad.
Honestly, I'm feeling mixed of nervous and excited now, so I'm trying to being positive and have confidence in myself.
Today, I want to write about Japanese job hunting culture because I can't explain well in English.
Japan has unique system of job hunting.
Japanese companies prefer to recruit new graduates and Many they simultaneously hire new graduates once a year.
One of the reasons they prefer to hire new graduate is they are easy to train to fit their corporate culture.
So new graduates have a andvantege in job hunting in Japan and most of them start woking soon after graduating.
Usually, in their senior year, they start prepareing for job hunting like attending career seminars and this job hunting generally continues in the June or July in their senior year.
During job hunting period,most of them dye their hair black and wear in black suit.
It looks really strange and lack of individuality.
In addition, most of them even don't come to University until finishing their job hunting.
but I hope this explanation could make it sense.
The second option would be Jordi Turull, who will also probably be suspended by the Spanish Supreme Court in a few months.
After weeks of mutual discrepancies and reproaches between JxCat and ERC on the formation of a new government, both parties appear to be close to reaching a final agreement.
Sources of the negotiations said that Puigdemont would lead a symbolic republican government in Brussels aimed at internationalizing the Catalan cause while someone else with executive powers would do the same in Catalonia.
Nevertheless, Puigdemont would still hold the responsibility of the designation of the government and the power to decide on calling new elections at any given moment.
Right after, he would nominate a candidate for investiture as a head of government to exercise the functions of president of Catalonia, but with republican criteria.
However, this move would allow pro-independence parties to confront the Spanish government within the current Spanish legal framework and internationalize the Catalan case.
The second option would be Jordi Turull, who will also probably be suspended by the Spanish Supreme Court in a few months.
Thus, the third option and the most feasible one would be Elsa Artadi, who could have the responsibility of leading the country for the next four years.
She led his campaign for the Dec.
21st election and is also currently leading the negotiations of JxCat with ERC.
Presumably, her election as president would allow Puigdemont to hold the executive power of Catalonia since she would be willing to be directed by him at a distance.
As for the formation of a government, JxCat and ERC are decided to split the portfolios 50-50 and each party will decide on its own ministers.
They consider that the results of the latest election do not allow them to take unilateral steps any longer.
At least not until the support for independence reaches more than 50% of the votes in an election.
There was a rumor about a love affair between my former boss and my former co-worker.
They are same age and they've been working together more than 10 years.
Moreover, both of them like playing golf and they practiced together.
I know thins because they don't do it only by themselves, they collect other people as well and and practiced it together.
I've been there too.
Since they seem they have very close relationship my co-workers saying a lot of things about them behind them, like "Are they dating?","No, I've hared that she thinks they are in relationship but he thinks they are just friends.","They are just friends"etc...
My opinion was "They are just friends" because they don't hide their relationship.
They go to lunch together very obiously, they don't go to golf by themselves.
My boss sometimes talked me about her.
I thought if they were in relationship, they wouldn't do those things.
So my conclusion was their relationship was "very good adult's friendship" 
Surprisingly, on last Monday,out of the blue, my co-worker working with him at a different project from mine texted me.
"You already hared...?
They got married!"
This cought me off guard.
To be honest my boss doesn't look like a guy who's interested in marriage.
I thought he likes being loner.
Sorry I like delusion.
He uncovered about their marriage only at his project, but couple of days later, most of workers in my company got know about it.
People really like gossips!
I watched the movie called "Kick Ass 2" on Blu-rays this night.
I watched the previous movie day before yesterday and I can't wait to watch it.
"Kick Ass 2" was actually not better than I expected, because the screenplay was not good.
And I couldn't concentrate in the movie because too many characters are there.
They surely had what they want to do and must do for themselves and other people in their town.
I had been there with them.
I decided, from now on I need to do three things every day.
Correcting and posting dairy on site lang8, exercising hearing of foreign languages and reading.
I have written dairy on this cite nearly a year.
I have known many new friends.
During the winter vacation, sometimes I don't know what to do at home.
I decided, from now on I need to do three things every day.
Correcting and posting dairy on site lang8, exercising hearing of foreign languages and reading.
I have written dairy on this cite nearly a year.
I have known many new friends.
This is a good habit.
Last night I couldn't close my eyes, whereas I couldn't open my eyes today.
I think my boss didn't realize what I was doing these days even I sent email to report my job situation.
Whatsoever, I decided to have a rest on Friday.
Could you correct it please
English tutor responsibilities are
Organizing and planning classes.
I have a question about English.
Ken has a lot of friends who help him when he is in trouble.
Ken has a lot of friends to help him when he is in trouble.
Or, are both of them correct?
Reading skill is worse than I imagine
I know my English writing skill does have problems.
But I recently noticed, my reading skill is worse than my writing skill.
If the thing written in it is saying the opposite thing from my understanding which is not necessarily correct, I tend to ignore it.
This is very scary thing.
I don't know how many of things I had ignored.
Lucky thing is that I still haven't caused any serious problems.
But I must need to improve my reading skill.
My sweet baby started eating baby food three weeks ago.
Next week, boiled and mashed carrot, pumpkin and spinach were added.
At this first month, he ate the baby food ones a day.
Next second month the frequency of eating will be increased to two times a day.
I want to say about my grandmother's illness.
By the time she was there we visit her.
She passed away and right now I regret I didn't drive to her always.
She very felt pain, didn't remember the basic details of her life.
This is not normal ageing.
Maybe it isn't a cancer but I think the mental illness is worse.
May the worst, I don't know.
Every treatment requires the cure.
Even the love!
health, family and love is very important part of us.
a half marathon
I have not been doing any exercise for a long time and I had such a fear that I might not be able to run the entire course.
I started practicing running a few months ago, but every time I run, 2 or 3 days after the exercise, my body began aching.
This delayed muscle pain indicates clearly that I am getting old.
Also, what makes things worse, my joints get painful.
This is the first experience I have never had in my whole life.
Some parts of my body had never had a pain before I practiced running recently.
I'd like to watch the Olympic game from 8 p.m. The curling game of Japanese women will be on air.
Of course, I do, too.
In such the situation, some songs help me to feel refreshed.
He won this year's several Grammy Awards.
This is because I like a Hip-Hop music which is kind of melodious, but I didn't feel so on the album.
I have 6 people in my family.
My dad lives in Sendai and my mom lives in Fujieda where is her parents home.
After he lost his parents and retired his own job, he currently lives as he like.
My dad lives in Sendai and my mom lives in Fujieda where is her parents home.
They had got a divorce several years ago.
My dad has free spirited.
After he lost his parents and retired his own job, he currently lives as he like.
Juan: Whose is this umbrella?
Juan: DId Someone forget its umbrella in the hall?
Juan: Whose is this umbrella?
Alberto: Not me
Diana: Not me
Do you go?
Juan: DId Someone forget its umbrella in the hall?
Motivation is a very important thing to make a good performance in a job, but it is hard for us to keep motivated for good.
If I didn't have the goal, my day would become mundane.
I believe that Lang-8 is one of the useful instruments for us not only to practice writing in a language we are learning but to be able to exchange interesting information about the difference in culture, history, etc between people from various backgrounds.
I thought that it was an imperative sentence, but I found that 's' was added the verb "sharpen."
I thought that it was an imperative sentence, but I found that 's' was added the verb "sharpen."
I often think that I can do what we really can't do correctly.
However, when I notice that I can't do it in fact, I try to accept my present situation.
I often think that I can do what we really can't do correctly.
That just means I don't have enough ability to let him listen to me.
I often think that I can do what we really can't do correctly.
I just might be a big head, or it may be very hard for me to know myself.
However, when I notice that I can't do it in fact, I try to accept my present situation.
That just means I don't have enough ability to let him listen to me.
I easily misunderstand what I really can't do.
If the other person doesn't listen to me, that's not his fault.
That just means I don't have enough ability to let him listen to me.
I want to go to the convenience store but it is too cold that I don't go outside.
- I had a lot of liquors.
Japanese women's carling team, "LS Kitami" is going to play against Suisse tonight.
They eat snack in the halftime, we call a halftime snack time.
In the previous game, the halftime was not broadcast, many people protested it to NHK.
By the way, they ate the snack called "Red Silo".
Japanese women's carling team, "LS Kitami" is going to play against Suisse tonight.
If they win the game, they will advance to the semifinals for the first time.
They became popular.
There is a halftime in the curling game.
They eat snack in the halftime, we call a halftime snack time.
In the previous game, the halftime was not broadcast, many people protested it to NHK.
By the way, they ate the snack called "Red Silo".
They became popular.
Many people have ordered it.
The dog was initially a type of semi-wild hound pet by Taiwanese aboriginals in high latitude areas.
It can not only walk on rugged mountain paths agilely but also weave among lush jungle bushes easily.
Two lackeys of the ministry have put up at the same inn as we.
Two lackeys of the ministry have put up at the same inn as we.
This high-pitched sound accompanied me on my way towards the valley.
It was interrupted only when the sharp metal edges pushed against the mountain side, making the snow groan softly under my weight, or when my turning manoeuvres caused small avalanches that quietly trickled down the slope.
Marriage makes the relationship of married couple be strong.
I've been married for more than 22 years.
As I remember, my wife and I had a lot of troubles and problems.
However, I really feel that the marriage makes the relationship of us be strong.
As I remember, my wife and I had a lot of troubles and problems.
However, I really feel that the marriage makes the relationship of us be strong.
Marriage makes the relationship of married couple be strong.
However, I really feel that the marriage makes the relationship of us be strong.
My back was pushed by the power of something.
The mountain is about 600 meters high.
I started the hiking at 3:00 P.
even though the sunset was at 5:40 P.
I didn't know whether I could touch the top of the mountain and come back to the start point until the sunset, but I decided to go where I ended up.
This mountain is located near the city and has some nice city viewpoints, so I could enjoy the nice and beautiful city views on the way.
The altitude was getting higher, the remaining snow was increasing around the trail way, and then finally the trail way became the white way.
The signboard showed "almost there!" and something showed below the letters"Third-grade elementary students in 1983".
My back was pushed by the power of voices that was uttered by the little men 36 years ago.
the words encouraged me and made me feel something heartwarming.
Of course, I had reached the mountaintop and could afford to come back the start point until sunset.
I think It was amazing and fantastic things.
I want to remain such behind words that will help someone out in the future.
Xiongzhiyi
Xiong zhiyi went to Chang an to participate in the imperial examinations.
That was the autumn,it had been raining several weeks.
This person was called fan Ze, he would attend to the eaxm too.
But his horse died, the money was used up too.
Xiong zhiyi give his horse and money to fan ze.
Fan Chi Chi finished the exam, and he passed the exam.
But xiong did not go to the exam this year.
There is one of my friend who really loves to save his money all the time.
He always tries to find cheap meals because he does not have money for using.
Usually, I see that he looks not so happy and the only moment when he looks happy is to check his balance.
Although there are advantages to save your money like for your emergency situations, I strongly insist that you should feel happier when you earn money to use it.
One of my friend who loves to save his money does not use it for even what he really needs because he does not like to draw from his savings.
I assume that even after he got old, he cannot use his money because he uses to save his money too much.
On the other hand, once you learned how to use your money properly, you can choose what is really important for you, and what is really necessary for you.
In my country, Japan, a lot of people prefer to save their money for the future and they enjoy it.
Plus, you can also use your money for getting more money like by investing for yourself, stocks, electric currencies, real estates or anything not just saving it.
For these reasons show, you should enjoy your money when you earn it to use it.
In conclusion, I believe that people should feel happier when you earn it.
Not only because does this help to enjoy your life, but also you need to learn how to use your money properly.
Usually, I see that he looks not so happy and the only moment when he looks happy is to check his balance.
By just saving your money, you are not able to learn anything.
Plus, you can also use your money for getting more money like by investing for yourself, stocks, electric currencies, real estates or anything not just saving it.
Actually, this phenomenon is becoming a more serious social problem these days because most people tend to save their money rather than to use it, and consequently, the economic cycles are not going well.
However, I agree with the statement that it is better to enjoy your money when you earn it for following reasons.
There is one of my friend who really loves to save his money all the time.
He always tries to find cheap meals because he does not have money for using.
Usually, I see that he looks not so happy and the only moment when he looks happy is to check his balance.
In addition, you should practice how to use your money properly for the future.
On the other hand, once you learned how to use your money properly, you can choose what is really important for you, and what is really necessary for you.
Plus, you can also use your money for getting more money like by investing for yourself, stocks, electric currencies, real estates or anything not just saving it.
I believe these make your life more valuable.
For these reasons show, you should enjoy your money when you earn it to use it.
There are many different opinions that many students choose to attend schools or universities outside their home countries.
In my opinions, it is advantageous for many students to attend schools or universities outside their home countries.
I feel this way for several reasons, which I will explore in the following essay.
To begin with, there are a lot of social issues such as an aging society, declining population, and the recession.
With the development of technology, we are required to grain a degree and certification.
Academic background is very important to get a better job in modern society.
Therefore, Many people make a plan to study abroad, so that many people need to obtain special skills and ability to secure our lives in the future.
For example, my friend went studying abroad to study to get an international qualification.
If he gets that, he would be promoted to the high position in the future.
The English is very helpful skills in every aspect of my life in the future.
Studying abroad can learn a great way of perspective.
A couple of days ago a foreigner ask me how to go to the Umeda sky building?
I told her "Umeda sky building, down this street and the traffic accident turn left then you should take a walk for 5minutes and you will find it".
Uh,,,I wonder she could get the place??
It was loooong day today.
I was exhausted and felt like dying from work.
I was exhausted and felt like dying from work.
There's no come back after doing that.
When I watched curling of PyeongChang Olympic on TV,I felt the it is very interesting.
Because players picth a stone for target that I absloutely don't expect.
And I know it started with "hello" and, the next thing you know, you're trying to be nice, and some guys getting too close trying to pick you up.
It's the same old song and dances, but I think you know it will.
And I know it started with "hello" and, the next thing you know, you're trying to be nice, and some guys getting too close trying to pick you up.
Trying to get you drunk, and I'm sure one of your friends is about to come over here 'cause she's supposed to save you from random guys.
When I got home, may I practice for dance lesson?
You were tired today.
When I got home, may I practice for dance lesson?
- Yes,you do.
It has passed about 30 years since I came to Tokyo.
Since I head the YouTuber's opinion, I try to use my dialect sometimes.
When I use dialect in my head, I became a slight another personality.
Nowadays, computer games has gained increasing popularity among young people, although playing computer games sometimes can have a harmful impact on their work but it can help young adults to exercise their brain and make more friends.
Playing computer games can impair young adults health and therefore have a negative influence on their work.
The first reason for this is that young adults might always play computer games for a lot of hours in a row and feel frazzled and fatigued.
A consequence of this is that they may find it hard to concentrate on their work and can barely finish their job tasks on time.
Some video games, such as detective games and drawing games, are designed to develop their brain and therefore allows them to be more bright.
For example, if young adults often play some detective games, the speculative nature of which is likely to enable them to be more analytical and smart in solving real life problems.
Likewise, if young adults are addicted to play drawing games, they might tap their potential in drawing.
Computer games also play a vital role in building up interpersonal relationship.
For example, young people might meet many friends in some interactive games online and if they become friends offline, they may have a large friend circle and can seek help when they need it, like when they need to borrow money to help out an emergency problem.
All in all, Even though game addition may have an adverse impact on their work, it might enable them to be more smart and enlarge their friend circle.
Dear Meary san
I,d like to appointment with you.
How does your schedules on next week?
Could you reply to me?
Are your school subjects taught in your mother tongue in your country? #1752
I understand that the reason why the Philippine people can speak English very fluently.
However, she told me that most of their weak points is English grammar.
I had known it because some other online schools' teachers' feedback comments contained: "I am looking forward to *see* you in my class again!"
Are your school subjects taught in your mother tongue in your country? #1752
I took an online English class with a teacher called "Lovely" tonight.
We discussed educational system in the Philippines and in Japan.
I understand that the reason why the Philippine people can speak English very fluently.
However, she told me that most of their weak points is English grammar.
I had known it because some other online schools' teachers' feedback comments contained: "I am looking forward to *see* you in my class again!"
I took an online English class with a teacher called "Lovely" tonight.
We discussed educational system in the Philippines and in Japan.
I learned that in the Philippines, except for the Tagalog language classes, or their mother tongue classes, all classes are conducted in English.
I understand that the reason why the Philippine people can speak English very fluently.
However, she told me that most of their weak points is English grammar.
I had known it because some other online schools' teachers' feedback comments contained: "I am looking forward to *see* you in my class again!"
I took an online English class with a teacher called "Lovely" tonight.
We discussed educational system in the Philippines and in Japan.
I learned that in the Philippines, except for the Tagalog language classes, or their mother tongue classes, all classes are conducted in English.
I understand that the reason why the Philippine people can speak English very fluently.
However, she told me that most of their weak points is English grammar.
I had known it because some other online schools' teachers' feedback comments contained: "I am looking forward to *see* you in my class again!"
But the result of the replacement turned out to be failure.
I thought you would memorize the lyrics of the song by now.
The band replaced their former vocalist with the winner of Korea Got Talent.
I saw the today's morning news program on TV.
I saw it from the middle of the news, so I didn't know where it happened, but a woman was arrested because she was trying to smuggle two kilograms of gold bullion, hiding in her rectum.
Her walking was so weird that it caused attention of the officer in the airport or seaport.
They finally detected the metal reaction in her lower stomach, using a metal detector.
Finally they found she was holding two kilograms of gold in her rectum.
How could she hidden it in her rectum although it weighed too much and it occupied so much space?
How would she take the gold out of her body after she succeeded in smuggling?
Would she poop the gold?
By the way, I remembered the English word, "smuggler," by Captain Solo in the movie Star Wars.
Han Solo acted by Harrison Ford in Episode 4 was really cool.
For example, they can play with children and spend their time for hobbies.
For example, quitting job earlier is a very premium for workers, so they will spend much money because of pleasure.
However,I wonder what well-balanced diet is.
There are lot of vegetarians in the world, on the other hand,there are lot of persons who are on a low carb diet.
I confused.
Please could you tell me how much and what Japanese people should eat.
Of coarse, I think moderate exercise and sleep are good for our health.
When a husband came back to his house, he found a naked man who lay down on the bed.
And when he opened the closet, he found his wife with no clothes was hiding.
When a husband came back to his house, he found a naked man who lay down on the bed.
I opened this and found a wine and a card written as "Congratulations" was in it.
Apparently, it seems to be present that I applied for a campaign of SUNTORY wine present 4 months ago.
I got a happy feeling from this unexpected event!
Many people around me watch TV to see entertainment programs, but I like to watch educational ones.
For breakfast I habe cereal and a cup of tea.
I usually have breakfast at home, but sometimes I have breakfast at work.
At the weekend I sometimes go to restaurant.
I like pasta, I don't like rice.
In my country people habe eggs for breakfast.
I suppose I can put down my irritability to the fact that my team has come off badly in the competition.
I've broken out in a rash and now I am going to see a doctor.
Have you ever broke down with the chickenpox?
Recent days, I've get new friend of Arizona.
She is an Native American.
I'm happy and chatting with her on LINE.
I'll receive a new microphone soon, I can talk her.
Already we text chat so much.
Last night I fried squid and vegetables and ate it.
What is more, 
I realize that the italian, very more than others persons, use gestures for communicate.
The significate of some common gestures that the italian use, are not knew by other, I didn' t know this.
I realize that the italian, very more than others persons, use gestures for communicate.
The significate of some common gestures that the italian use, are not knew by other, I didn' t know this.
Have you ever heard of coffee bags?
I can just throw away the bag when I finished making it.
My friend said he's never heard of it in the US.
Now I'm sipping a cup of coffee that I made from a coffee bag.
I'm wondering if you ever heard of coffee bags.
I shared some with my sister and also brought some back to my hometown to drink with my siblings when I visited there for my mother's memorial service.
I can just throw away the bag when I finished making it.
My friend said he's never heard of it in the US.
I'm wondering if you ever heard of coffee bags.
Since an American friend of mine loves coffee, so I sent him a box to let him try it.
I can just throw away the bag when I finished making it.
Now I'm sipping a cup of coffee that I made from a coffee bag.
The man used to be an employee of Idemitsu Oil Company and stay wtih his wife in Saudi Arabia and Lebonon.
They went back and forth between the two countries during 1970's.
A war inevitably happened to break out in Beirut after they left for Saudi Arabia.
Finally they seemed to be suspected that they were inside with guerrillas.
Where can I find the site which translate me the sentences?
I dislike the google translate, is very wrong.
I usually drink a cup of coffee after my lunch, with some milk and sugar.
But I learned that drinking coffee is not good to your health.
Especially those people who are sensitive to the cold.
But I am feeling very sleepy right now without the coffee after my lunch...
Do you drink coffee everyday?
The girl's father recommended her that she should be given 100 yen extra every time she saves 500 yen because he want her to save it for herself.
I really enjoy writing English essay!
I know only limited grammar and phrases and I can only write simple sentence...
but many foreign people understand it and reply about it!
I thought that studying foreign language was boring some years ago.
I think what I was did not know true charm of studying foreign language.
So you have to know this charm When you study foreign language.
I know only limited grammar and phrases and I can only write simple sentence...
I thought that studying foreign language was boring some years ago.
I think what I was did not know true charm of studying foreign language.
One of the things that make visitors to Japan uneasy may be the fact that not a few Japanese are wearing masks which looks like surgical ones in a public space.
People wearing surgical masks around might scare foreigners, thinking of a outbreak of some dangerous flue.
Ordinal Japanese wear masks daily during their commuting, shopping or even having a date.
The purpose to wear masks varies from preventing from catching the flue to keeping their face warm in Winter.
Young female would wear them for going out without their make-ups, hiding their makeup-free faces.
For myself, I wear them in order to keep moisture in my mouse during sleep because I have a bad nose and tend to breathe through my mouse.
One of the things that make visitors to Japan uneasy may be the fact that not a few Japanese are wearing masks which looks like surgical ones in a public space.
People wearing surgical masks around might scare foreigners, thinking of a outbreak of some dangerous flue.
They don't have to be afraid, though.
Ordinal Japanese wear masks daily during their commuting, shopping or even having a date.
The purpose to wear masks varies from preventing from catching the flue to keeping their face warm in Winter.
Young female would wear them for going out without their make-ups, hiding their makeup-free faces.
One of the things that make visitors to Japan uneasy may be the fact that not a few Japanese are wearing masks which looks like surgical ones in a public space.
Then Japan is the tourism country." Indeed many foreigner come to Japan and enjoy, but we have to think about those people who do not come to Japan.
japan is surrounded by sea and has smaller realm than other continental countries.
In 1960s, Japan imported many resources and made many industrial commodity and export it.
But, These days, many Japanese factory that are used in 1960s are closed.
It is because developing country surrounding Japan improve quality of products and they can produce at low costs.
So we can not win the race of product definitely.
If we do not think how can we get foreign currency in modern society, we must disappear.
Then I think tourism is one of the biggest way to solve this problem.
But it is not enough and we have to look at foreigners who do not come to Japan.
If we look at and think about them, we can find reasons why they do not come to Japan then we can reform or change something for them.
Perhaps that change makes foreigners who have ever come to Japan happy.
Then tourism is very good way to solve problem and If we want to be true tourism country, we have to look at those who do not come to Japan.
I got home-made Japanese crackers again, one is salt taste and another is sweet soy source taste.
My friends really loved them, so they asked me if they could bring back some because they are fasting then.
so when the neighboring lady visited, I told her that I had less than half it.
I got pain at my heel when I was on a road with my sneakers that I'm not use well last weekend.
It was so painful then I put papers into my shoes but it didn't work nice.
At that time I found and picked up handkerchief on the road block and replace the paper.
I commute by train,however,there are not a lot of trains running on the day,because it is a local rtrain.
If I will miss my train it is the worst thing,because only one train runs in an hour.
Therefore,I must by all means finish my work and get on the train.
If I will miss my train it is the worst thing,because only one train runs in an hour.
Therefore,I must by all means finish my work and get on the train.
Heart is said " shinzou" in Japanese.
I wonder if they have same mistakes.
It might be interesting to be able to know the difference of Japanese and English by translations.
But spending time when I sink on the ground and keep myself up is my responsibility.
When I frustrated, I have to come up with something special solution.
Also I have to prove something special what I got in meantime.
Anyway, what I want to say is "I don't want to write cover letter." T^T 
The recipe is time consuming but it is easy, requiring patience as you add ingredients by turns, beginning with a classic flavor base, or 'soffritto', with each turn lending another layer of flavor, followed by gentle simmer.
Candies made their debut in 1973 and broke up at the height of their popularity in 1978.
The song describes a girl's positive feelings along with spring scenery.
My friend suddenly fell down.
As soon as he fell down, he stood up and ran to the opposite direction of me.
When I turned the corner that he had just turned, I could see he was sitting on the ground with grabbing his knees.
He told me that he was so embarrassed than pain.
It has a monthly meeting.
I don't know why important the meeting.
I don't like afternoon meeting, because I all ways almost fall asleep the meeting.
I don't like afternoon meeting, because I all ways almost fall asleep the meeting.
I cannot rise my concentration.
I recommended this restaurant for oter friends.
You just fade away, but I still...
Maybe that is illusion.
I would rather not have some medical test items, such as gastroendoscopy and electrocardiography, but I really do not want to get my blood drawn.
Additionally, my blood vessel of the arm is thin, so a nurse always does not insert the needle into it the first time.
Although that is also painful, there is no point doing that.
I close my eyes tight not to see that but I often open them out of curiosity and regret it.
It is acceptable for me that the pain of injections is the same level as mosquito bite.
I`ll apply for my company's overseas trainee programme at next fiscal year.
For the reason, I have been keeping a diary in English, studying at an English language school and reading news in English.
Uncle visited my house to see baby
17, when my family is having lunch, my phone rung and I got call from uncle.
After 5 minutes from his call, he arrived at my house.
I saw he wanted to hold a baby.
In that time, baby started to cry, I recommend him to hold baby to cradle a baby.
A baby stopped to cry after few minutes.
I thought he was grate father again and only he could raise three children.
After 5 minutes from his call, he arrived at my house.
I saw he wanted to hold a baby.
In that time, baby started to cry, I recommend him to hold baby to cradle a baby.
A baby stopped to cry after few minutes.
I thought he was grate father again and only he could raise three children.
I will go on a bussiness trip tomorrow.
the destination of that is Tokyo so I concerned about snowing because it may be snowing sometimes recently.
as far as remember, we had a very snow a month ago.
at that time most public transportation system did not operated.
Needless to say such kinds transportation system are panctuarly, just in time.
I use all afternoon for the event.
Subtitles for a short film
What does it mean to salt by eye.
Seems that someone is worried that you might hurt yourself for want of practice.
I've made a video of a proposal to show during the New Year show tonight.
You've brought that again?
Was it with you?
There's no place to move.
Convenience is the way to degradation, young people, as well as alcohol.
Make the light.
We'll be remembered young.
Maybe, you'll stop doing stupid staff.
Gosha, let's celebrate a holiday normally at least once.
I've never seen her trying so hard.
You aren't, but if you think she doesn't take care of you, how should I call you then?
She treats you like a child nursing you all the time.
Know it from your personal experience, right?
Vasya, arrange a screwdriver.
We've been together with it longer than with you.
Carefully
Young lady, you know that not all of the electricians are alcoholics.
Why have you done it?
What did you send him for?
You don't give a damn about anything, that's why we've broken up.
We'll be in the dark, but all together.
And look a us!
Why are you climbing through the balcony.
Japanese Olympic team members have made great performances in Pyeongchang Olympics.
Yuzuru Hanyuu for a japanese figure skating ahlete won gold medal.
He got a big injury on his foot while he was practicing four month ago.
Since then he had to focus on the treatment for the injury and could not skate however his performance in this olympic was amazing and a lot of audience were impressed by the performance.
What does it mean the expression "poop in my pants"?
I heard my colleague is going to be quit.
She is one of the most knowledgeable person about our consumer products.
Therefore many people are concerned about upcoming product.
But fortunately 6 months remain to the launch.
I started learning English at lang-8 from seven year ago, but I couldn't continue a diary.
I decided to write a short diary at here evryday.
I've been having a runny nose recently because of hay fever.
You can enjoy cherry blossom viewing in Spring, so I like Spring.
But at the same time, I hate Spring due to hay fever.
I just will do my best not to protect from flower pollen.
I went to the hospital for physical examination.
Then the doctor said, " If you came later, I would be off work." 
The doctor read my test result and said, " Furtunately, it's not too late to see a doctor." I was frightened after heard that.
Then the doctor said, " If you came later, I would be off work." 
Asking some questions are always a great way to start a conversation with someone that we meet first, so I'm going to write about the questions in English because I'm not good at asking.
Please correct me if I made any mistakes or there are more natual way for asking in questions below.
How many age differences are you ok in terms of dating with someone?
How do you spend usually your money on?
it must be higher than me.
Did you see a girl just passed by?
she was really hot.
Why does your hair have baldness?
you are still 30 right?
it's too early to get bald.
Why did you have a day off yesterday?
you should tell me about that when you want to have the day off.
Is this your first time to visit in Japan?
which place have you visited so far?
Do you have any recommendations for fun around here?
I'm just visiting, so I don't know so much around here.
Why does your country have a lot of people who had a plastic surgery?
Many people with big eyes look like similar to me.
Last Sunday, I joined Kyoto marathon.
Kyoto city is famouse for sightseeing and some foreign runners also joined.
Starting position was two sports stadiums because the number of runner was so large that one stadium can't play role.
I loved the ambiance that every runner helps each other and runners was encouraged with the cheer and help of people.
I became to feel like joining again next year.
After goal, I went to eat with my friends.
Not surprisingly, my legs were so sore next day.
I was worried when they changed all the products to mixed vegetable because she is not eating other brand taste foods.
Anyways the new tomato mixed food was really loved by her when she eats.
I have been keep sleepy days from last week.
I had a lot of sleep time, however I'm sleepy.
Uh,I think so cause of stress, so I hope I want to live stress free.
Either way, I'll try to take it easy for today.
- A certified psychiatric social worker.
- Engaged in supporting people with some kind of disabilities to obtain employment in the vocational rehabilitation center, which is run by the biggest private company in the welfare field in Japan.
- Studied mental health, especially the way to promote vocational rehabilitation of people with severe mental illnesses in the master's program at the university in Japan.
Meanwhile, the main goal of the Canadian Federal Government's policy was to cease the Aboriginal culture in the nineteenth century.
As mentioned above, their policy ultimately limited parents to in contact with their children in order to eliminate the Aboriginal government and impose the Canadian culture of exploitation.
Bev Sellars refers the Indian act as the racist legislation, stating in his book "the 'Indians' were put into the same categories as people and the mentally disabled despite any intelligence shown by any individuals." I was very shocked how their rights were ignored and persecuted over a century.
The First Nations were obligatorily relocated their reserved from agriculturally valuable land onto remote and economically marginal reserves.
In early 1886, the First Nations were discouraged to visit their children at the residential schools as the pass systems, which limits the First Nations to go outside of their reserve, were established.
For the same reason, they were banned to celebrate their traditions and family gatherings.
How devastating is it to see their children were injured, traumatized and being missing at the residential schools, especially when they were not able to go out of their reserve or put in jail for nothing?
These facts lead me to think that we must investigate the relationship between the Heitsuk First Nation and the Canadian society as well as the Hudson's Bay Company as a case study, with which they dealt since 1833, to understand their thoughts and characteristics further on what extent they are willing to do a business with the public company.
The First Nations have been standing up for their rights until the Canadian constitution acknowledges the Aboriginal rights in 1982 and still now.
On the other hand, the modern Canadian society feels remorse and penitence to the acts of cultural genocide and aims to revitalize good relationships.
As well, the United Nation declared on the Right of Indigenous People in Article 19 and 28.
Although we cannot undo what our society has done, we now can only strive for re-establishing good relationships with the First Nations.
That being said, being chosen by the Heitsuk First Nation was the sign of the trusting relationships we, the Forthright Consulting, established over the years.
I would like to propose what is the best for both parties, the Marine Harvest and the Heitsuk First Nation regarding the issue of salmon farming.
At the same time, I would like to conclude with the wish to assist the Marine Harvest to understand our complicated Canadian history and apply a culturally appropriate strategy on this matter.
Yesterday, I spent too much time on finishing my works, and I arrived at home very late.
Processing my work, I came up with the idea that doing over time was as worse as leaving undone tasks on the desk.
I stayed at my office until late recently, to keep the deadlines of my work.
The main reason why I had to linger at late was my slow processing speed.
Other colleagues usually go back home finalising their works on time, so I can't avoid to say that my processing speed is very slow.
I have felt nervous since yesterday, because I received contact from a friend whom I don't like yesterday.
My English teacher on Skype told me her private story this morning.
I knew that she had Pilipino boyfriend who lives in Singapore.
She went to Singapore twice or third times in a year.
She said she felt something bad for him last year.
He went to Las Vegas and his souvenir for her was only a magnet and a key holder.
About one week ago, she happened to find some pictures that her boyfriend visited five stars hotel in Singapore.
He lives in condominium in Singapore.
She thought why he needed to stay at the hotel in Singapore.
She asked him about it and she knew he had an affair.
She decided to break him up.
My housemates took me to hiking to Wicklow last weekend.
I'm absolutely into nature since I was a kid so my heart was pounding with joy!
During half an hour drive, scenes were gradually changing to the countryside with foliage.
thanks, mother nature lol The winding road in the middle of mountains are usually coated by concrete in Japan in order to prevent rockfall though, it isn't there.
It was interesting and I felt like I saw it as it is for the first time.
After got out of the car, we strolled towards a little hill.
I wondered why some of them were put on robes, not all of them.
My housemate explained that it will be freezing in the midnight so they were bundled up.
But I wasn't still convinced.
That's because how the owner knows which horse feels cold nevertheless the only word they can say is "whinny"!
The valuable horses were kept warm." said, he.
I am keeping training.
At first, I wanted to get my big body.
I hated lower body training, such as squat.
But I realized the importance of lower body, then I am training for lower body for main.
So I'll do my best to practice a saxophone.
I can't play a saxophone since came in Hiroshima.
So I must make a free time, but I'm very busy these days haha...
Ah, I don't go to fishing too...
Anyway, I'll go to have fun this week!!
I remember that I brought some medicines from Japan.
I think it is ok because the output of next fiscal year is not a software but algorithms and their evaluation plan.
It would be possible to order a software development by rest of budget in this fiscal year.
One women was walking towards me waving her hand.
She asked me if I go to the downtown.
I don't drive a taxi, even more my car doesn't look like a taxi.
That was wired situation.
The train which I would ride is delay.
So,I'm on Cafe.
I wait train start.
It was sunny day yesterday, but it is cloudy today.
I thought spring has approached yesterday, but it might far still far now.
Above all, do you live in the area where you can clearly recognize every season?
There are some countries in the world where all seasons are summer like Hawaii.
I had liked summer the best before. I wanted to live in a country where all seasons are summer.
I think summer in Japan is tougher than the one in other countries since the summer in Japan is also really humid.
Coldness prevents me doing something.
It was sunny day yesterday, but it is cloudy today.
I thought spring has approached yesterday, but it might far still far now.
There are some countries in the world where all seasons are summer like Hawaii.
I wanted to live in a country where all seasons are summer.
However, now I like spring better tmy han summer because I have felt summer is tough to spend because of my aging.
Coldness prevents me doing something.
Coldness takes away a positive thinking from me.
For Know Real Country, Go Countryside
Famous commentariat said that.
Hard workers go to work with their tired, they had to do overtime day by day.
Economic productivity has decreased as white shirts overwork.
Hard workers go to work with their tired, they had to do overtime day by day.
My room has bad reception, so if I use a camera, it slows down the connection.
When the lesson is over, I usually say "I wanted to tell you more" "I'd like to talk to you again" "When will you disclose the the lesson time?" My favorite teacher is very popular and it is difficult to make a reservation.
It is necessary to keep reservation slot early.
It might be a good idea to do what i want hard.
I wish I was getting stronger day by day.
I dont know this is correct or not but, i read on Pinterest, that:
Every day, the heart creats energy that enough for a truck goes 20 km.
On whole life, thats stretch of road is the same as the distance from the earth to the moon and back.
Recently I moved to Melbourne to live with my husband.
And of course my english is still not good, at least not as good as to speak like a native speaker.
If you have the same interest with me, I would love to be friends with you.
It's been a month since I joined my company.
In a weekly meeting, basically I had been just listening but from today, I have to say what I've done the last week, and what I'm currently working on.
It's a pretty good thing for me to get more chance to speak English at work but I'm afraid to get questions...
Because what I worry is not speaking but listening.
It's a pretty good thing for me to get more chance to speak English at work but I'm afraid to get questions...
Because what I worry is not speaking but listening.
I have been to the driving school since the end of January.
In usual, the schedule of training is announced on the Internet and we book an free hour, but in February, all schedules are booked.
So the driving school conduct the drawing to choose trainees since February.
Trainees who want to practice driving go to the school and draw a lottery.
Only if we get a winning number, we can practice driving.
When I graduated a junior high school I got a signature stamp, and I register it as a "zitsuin".
However, the case became worn out so I had wanted a new case for the signature stamp.
A Case of A Signature Stamp
When I graduated a junior high school I got a signature stamp, and I register it as a "zitsuin".
However, the case became worn out so I had wanted a new case for the signature stamp.
A Case of A Signature Stamp
However, the case became worn out so I had wanted a new case for the signature stamp.
I'm glad because I've finally found it.
There are many different opinions whether some young children spend a great amount of their time participating in sports.
To begin with, these days, electric devices such as video games, tablets, and a smartphone has become more convenient and more efficient.
These children can't do some activities as well as studying subject because they don't have fundamental strength.
For example, when I was a kid, I was belonging to the football club.
I had better strength more than other my friends.
I was able to play the sports and study subjects because moderate exercise stimulates our brain.
As a result, I could not only play the sports but also study subjects.
Spending time in sports improves our brain.
Secondly, Spending time in sports keeps the health condition.
For instance, when I was a junior high student, all almost my classmates got flu.
However, I didn't get flu because I belonged to the football club.
Since I was a kid, I had a habit of playing the sports.
That's why I couldn't get flu.
thus, playing sports has a lot of merit in our lives.
In conclusion, I strongly assert that it is advantageous for young people to spend a great time of participating in the sports because the sports affect not only our brain but also our body.
It was used to banish tyrannos, but it was also used to hold brilliant politicians in check.
I return this site.
I had visited to London for bussness among 2 weeks, and went back home 5days ago.
I felt my english level is very low and I must study hard.
I had visited to London for bussness among 2 weeks, and went back home 5days ago.
I felt my english level is very low and I must study hard.
In fact, it has been so long time since I didn't use Lang-8 for checking my English.
Today, I start again because I want to improve my written English.
Meanwhile, I can record the process of the improvement of my English.
Many people can know the real Chiang and the real history of the Republic of China via it.
I cannot wait to meet her.
Probably because I had learned German for a long period of time before I learned Spanish.
This morning I studied verb "to have" and I saw my reality.
But I have a good health.
I have a loving family.
I electrically stimulated something for six hours a day for four days.
This sentences have two "for".
It just doesn't feel right to me.
Many people are worried of my safety.
Many people are worried for my safety.
Because my doctor's advise, I haven't squat when strength training and lead to my gluteal muscles are very weak.
But my training coach consider my legs' muscles are any no problem, just I too believe my doctor's advise.
So I train my gluteal muscles recently.
Hope my gluteal muscles can be wiry.
But I not understand many sentences, because I not enough vocabulary.
js for continually growing my vocablary.
My learn English motivation was growing, because I couldn't talk with community members well enough.
Beside this, I need more listen skill.
I seek the way to growing it.
I participated a TOEIC lesson at a school today what I waited.
One of my classmates said "yay I got a 760 points on TOEIC" 
I felt like so disappointed because I fault her right now.
To be honest,I hate losing to everybody.
I impressed by her and I decide to study harder.
She had no choice but walk.
she complained it.
Then I pulled her hand, her glove was taken off.
It made her so fun.
We repeated it over and over again until we got to the kindergarten.
And she laughed a lot.
We participated on Japan Day was held by Japanese learner in Khartoum University.
Through Japan Day We told for Sudanese about culture of Furoshiki and Mottainai and separate waste collection.
We all explained in Arabic and it was very difficult.
However there are some visitor can speak Japanese, we were helped by them.
Next year, I want to be able to explain in all!
When I think about future, I tend to see worst aspect.
I have a habit to surprise people.
I am delighted to surprise even my family.
For example, when someone in my family have a celebration for something, I will prepare an unexpected gift.
At such time, I can hardly wait for seeing them surprise.
My habit
I have a habit to surprise people.
I am delighted to surprise even my family.
For example, when someone in my family have a celebration for something, I will prepare an unexpected gift.
Vasa museum
The Vasa museum is the mostly offered museum in Stockholm.
Indeed the museum is individual and interesting one.
In the year 1628 sinked ship was taken out of the sea 333 years later.
The visitors could visit the original ship.
The story of th evessel is memorable because it sinked after 2 kilometres on the first sailing.
The Vasa just sailed out the port when fell to the right side near to Djurgarden island it sinked soon.
Probably the reason of the tragedy was the disproportionately narrow hull.
The crew could not keep in balance the ship.
The ship was tried to taken out from the sea several times in the 17th century unsuccessfully.
The other day, I read an article about Ingrid Betancort who had been abuducted for 8 years in Colombia.
Then I asked to my Paraguayan friend how do the Paraguayan think about her abcuction.
She said "we don't care because we have own abdcutor in our country"
I've been thinking Paraguay is pretty safe country.
I didn't know some people are also abuducted here too.
I always watch CNN in spanish to learn other accent soI almost never watched Paraguayan news.
I like it because for me it means purity, peace and begining of something new.
I was 19 and it was my first time when i went to another city alone just to see the beauty of the world.
Nothing especial, just seeing the sights.
Since then I like traveling most of all in my life and trying to show to my kids how funny and interesting this was of knowing the world is.
Better manage your Android libraries with Docker
Let us assume we have two distincts Android projects: first one is a library providing useful methods, and the second one is an Android application using this library.
My goal is that my Android application uses up to date library with one command only on library project.
Here are the solutions I have been through and why I dislike it:
But some servers may not allow override existing versions of library, which will force you to not forget to bump version number each time.
Furthermore, you will have to carefully manage versions numbers with the rest of your team in order your update to not be overridden by someone else.
But this would force you to revert many changes before committing your work.
This was my favorite solution from long time, mainly because it perfectly solves this problem.
But installing and configuring a local server for each member of your team may be painful.
Furthermore, it will need resources from your computer permanently, as an Apache server is generally always running on a computer.
Because it solves perfectly the problem, creating a local server will be the solution we will use.
The GitHub project consists in two Android projects:
As you hold your wagon's ropes tight in between your hands, you notice how the amount of trees surrounding you is diminishing.
You start hearing a monotone flow of water, and see how a huge metal-made red-colored structure is emerging from your side of the valley and connects with the opposite side of it.
As you keep driving your wagon and approaching the bridge, you also notice how the sounds your horse's hooves produce is slowly turning more metallic, and how your wagon's tremble is losing strength.
You feel a small bump, as your wagon goes on the bridge, quickly followed by the crackles of the wheat you are transporting.
As you are about to get off it, right after feeling another bump, you turn your head toward it's bottom, curious about it's structure.
You notice four metal pillars erecting from it's base and growing toward the violent water's surface, colored with a dull brown color in corners that make contact with the water.
She's very good at photographing, so all her photos fascinate the viewer.
Her teacher suggested Barbara participate in this contest, and she agreed, because she dreamed of visiting Venice.
She called her best friend Ann straight away and told this wonderful news.
The architecture of Venice amazed them with the magnificence of the facades of buildings.
Colorful houses, bright sunlight gave the charm of Venice.
The photos that Barbara made turned out to be colorful, saturated and spiritualized.
This journey has brought her inspiration for future photos.
It was the best holidays!
Barbara to study photography courses.
She's very good at photographing, so all her photos fascinate the viewer.
Her teacher suggested Barbara participate in this contest, and she agreed, because she dreamed of visiting Venice.
Now, however, she had received this incredibly exciting email.
She called her best friend Ann straight away and told this wonderful news.
The architecture of Venice amazed them with the magnificence of the facades of buildings.
The photos that Barbara made turned out to be colorful, saturated and spiritualized.
It was the best holidays!
I had the quasi-nationalist pride that marked hip-hop in the '80s.
It is observable, as Jay would say, on any Martin Luther.
We will decide our new team in a meeting.
I bought bundle deal which included flight and hotel on Expedia.
It only cost 1,200 dollars for four people, including round trip flights and three nights stay at hotel.
It was our first time to try the airlines.
I found that Spirit makes a lot of efforts to reduce the costs.
They don't have cushion on them.
They only have very small table on them.
Today I continued my actions of change my life and I enjoying it.
I watched with my friend the Black Mirror s4e5.
I am going to talk about a book I read recently.
The title is ' Hunt for the Wilder people'.
This was the most hit movie in New Zealand in 2016, I had watched the movie first and it was great that's why I decided to read the book as well.
I am living New Zealand so I could follow some Kiwi jokes, accent and location, these were familiar with me.
These reasons made me enhance to read it even I had already known the story.
A summary of the book is an orphan boy was adopted by old couple, then young boy and old guy went to an adventure.
It is like a human drama, however I actually liked it was their sense of humor.
To be honest, I couldn't understand some jokes but could comprehended when I read the book.
I was so happy to finish the book because I don't read an English book often due to my second language.
It is quite tough to concentrate reading English book.
Sometime I totally lost 'who is who', however I really enjoyed it because I love the story.
I feel small fulfillment when I enjoyed a cup of tea after I've done dishes,finished laundry and cleaned a room.
The First Spaniard Who Won The Olimpic Games
This important event for the Greeks was celebrated each four years in Olimpia.
At the beginning, only Greeks disputed the Olimpic Games until 146 bC when Rome stablished Greece as part of its imperium.
The culture of the ancient Rome was very influenced by the Greek culture, and the Olimpic Games started to be an important event of Rome.
Athletes of the Roman provinces went to Olimpia each four years to participate in the Olimpic Games.
He was a patrician who wanted to develop a political career.
He disputed and won the chariots races in the Olimpic Games.
His victory in the Olimpic Games made him known in all parts of the Roman Imperium, and was useful for him to him to develop his political career becoming senator during the Reign of Trajano.
Nowadays he is known as the first Spaniard would won the Olimpic Games.
The First Spaniard Who Won The Olimpic Games
This important event for the Greeks was celebrated each four years in Olimpia.
Young Man, Please Take that Semi-Automatic Rifle and Point It at a "Terrorist"!
The United States isn't the only country with liberal gun ownership laws - Switzerland, that bastion of peacefulness, has lax gun laws too.
This is roughly a quarter of the rate in the United States."
"The Weapons Law recognises a qualified "right to acquire, possess and carry arms."
members believe that gun ownership is essential to their self defense, whether against criminal attack or government tyranny.
The US, the country which out spends the rest of the world's countries combined on "defense", on the other hand, is bounded by Canada, Mexico and two vast oceans.
Sad to say, it's hard to avoid the conclusion that US culture is inherently violent.
Although thick, heavy, monstrous tears fell from my quivering eyes, not even their combined would be enough to smother the flames.
I thought that whatever I was going through God knew about; and maybe he had written my fate to be no different than the millions of other girls in Pakistan, who were deprived of their rights.
Life forms in the space
In this year the Nasa had launched a new telescope in the space called Tess, in march it will ispect more then 200.000 of star in the galaxy.
The exploration will last two month, the objective of this test will be to find another life forms, to do this it will find the presence of the oxygen in the atmosphere.
Another objective is study the alteration of the lights of star when a plantes come in front of.
It contained an applying sheet too.
Perhaps, the tournament in Tokyo might be the last tournament that we are able to entry.
It said that they will hold a practice gathering for the three teams and take interview.
I hope we can win the first place again!
As I wrote before, we won first place in the Robot Scavenger tournament in Ueda last year and UCV holds the tournament.
It contained an applying sheet too.
GO TO WORK ABROAD: AN EXCITING OPPORTUNITY OR A SCARY ONE?
Anyone have thougt about going to work or study abroad almost one time in their life.
Nowaday, there are many people who abandone their countries to look for a job in any another side.
Although, other continent.
It always causes controversial because of the factors to consider.
Furthermore, it can be also a good oportunity to be able to discover another different culture, for instance, new food, new life style, new hobbies.
In adition, taking that kind of risks you can try to start a new life by yourself and prove how many things you can get.
Which can be really unconfortable.
You have to take account that if you feel ill, there will be no one to look after you.
In conclusion, there are many benefits if you are a risky person.
Anyone have thougt about going to work or study abroad almost one time in their life.
Nowaday, there are many people who abandone their countries to look for a job in any another side.
Although, other continent.
It always causes controversial because of the factors to consider.
On the one hand, working abroad is certainly a really interesting option to learn a new language or to improve your level and to have more oportunities to find a better job when you come back.
Furthermore, it can be also a good oportunity to be able to discover another different culture, for instance, new food, new life style, new hobbies.
In adition, taking that kind of risks you can try to start a new life by yourself and prove how many things you can get.
On the other hand, If you consider that you are homesick or you feel lonely when you are away, you should look for other opcions.
So, you will need to buy new clothes.
In conclusion, there are many benefits if you are a risky person.
On Saturday I relax, but I get up early.
I read papers and watch news on TV.
I never cook in the evening.
I dinner in a restaurant.
She told me that the next lesson we are doing exercises about grammar, speaking and listening.
Not only am I a little bit worried about it, but also I'm excided because I could improve my level considering.
He was trying do avoid it and he was rather doing other duties.
He also wanted to give his little stepsister one as a birthday present.
Everyone promises things which are impossible to achieve, nobody thinks for people but only for them and for the success of their party.
In italy next month there are political elections.
I'm worried about it because any canidates are a good politician.
Everyone promises things which are impossible to achieve, nobody thinks for people but only for them and for the success of their party.
I'll finish internship in six months.
But still need to successfully pass all the exams.
I try to learn English by himself.
Registered on this site for a long time, but did not really use it, I do not know how it works and how it usefull and convenient it will be.
I decided to set up camp on the gentle rocky slope of a low cliff, covered sparsely with tall slim pine trees.
Somehow I decided that bears and the late twentieth sentury scalp hunters would avoid that cozy place, probably because that stunning view might have been a bit disturbing for their simple minds.
I climbed onto the slope, dropped my backpack on a flat dry rock coated with a loose layer of tiny branches and dry pine needles, took a deep breath and look around.
The sun was going down to have some rest and, probably, to catch up with some friends.
But the sun was still shining over the top of the cliff, painting the endless forest hills and distant rocky ridges warm colors of pink, red and yellow.
I could even recognize a few patches of snow still hiding among the rocks and lowland valleys between the hills.
Spring always goes green and naked.
I felt like an old storm-beaten salt stranded on an island full of bloodthirsty savages and ferocious beasts, doing his job with a knowing grin.
After a few attempts and hitting some sensitive parts against the trunk, I managed to climb up into the tree and, at the height of about six meters above the ground, set up a new camp.
I was falling into sleep like an elevator on the loose, being cut off from its cables, into a bottomless shaft.
I popped out of my dreams like a cork from a bottle of sparkling wine.
For a moment, I had no idea who and where I was.
It took me some time to process why I was hanging in a sleeping bag tied to the tree.
Little by little, I regained control over my hands and, after a while, over the rest of my body.
I pulled myself together, bent my knees slightly, as I was taught in parachuting courses, and released my grip.
I was cursing myself over and over again.
Then I clenched my fists and burst into even more spiteful curses which exist only in the Russian language.
Sleeping in the tree!
Who, the f..., sleeps in a tree?
Are you a f...
I was shedding curses like a dying millionaire would have thrown his money to caner funds.
Curses, however, were of very little use in my current situation.
Insults cannot make people warm or feed them.
Where is damn firewood?
There were no gangs of bears or felons in sight rushing to take my life.
If I was gonna die that night then it would have happened not because of bears but because of pneumonia.
I found myself standing on the same rock where I stood during the sunset.
I saw the same landscape, but now it was dull as if painted in pale blue ink.
The silence reigned both outside and inside of me.
My eyes were wondering pointlessly through the night; then, I looked up.
I had never seen the Milky Way in such glory.
Soon, I was sitting near it rubbing my hands and warming up my numb body.
I became a normal, ordinary man who was trying to survive sailing through the endless gale of his consciousness.
My mind was restless that night, like a hungry dog who noticed its owner approaching him with its food bowl...
I had gotten a huge inspiration from what I had just seen and felt.
I mused that in the past there were fewer people and they died easily and frequently.
Now there are far more people around the globe, they live longer, but still, die.
The number of deaths, though, never changed.
We just made it turn slower.
I watched a few films on last weekend.
I want to write here about two films which I think the most interesting.
This film about relationships between a famous couturier and his muse.
The cameraman's work is perfect.
The film is full of beautiful close-ups and the lighting seems like a natural and it is also perfect.
I was enjoying of the actors play by Daniel Day-Lewis and Vicky Krieps.
I'm sure that "Phantom Thread" will win Oscars in a few nominations.
This film about one woman whose daughter has been killed, but the police couldn't find a murderer till seven months.
So, after all the woman was in rage because of the police who didn't do anything for investigation.
The woman bought ad places on the three billboards and placed these texts: "Raped While Dying", "Still No Arrests?", "How Come, Chief Willoughby?".
I like idea how the loner hero who is finding justice becomes an antihero.
The hatred breeds hatred.
Also I like the actors play, script and characters.
I want to write here about two films which I think the most interesting.
This film about relationships between a famous couturier and his muse.
I was enjoying of the actors play by Daniel Day-Lewis and Vicky Krieps.
It's a pity that Vicky Krieps hasn't been nominated for Oscar, because I think her actor play in this film should be appreciated.
I'm sure that "Phantom Thread" will win Oscars in a few nominations.
This film about one woman whose daughter has been killed, but the police couldn't find a murderer till seven months.
The woman bought ad places on the three billboards and placed these texts: "Raped While Dying", "Still No Arrests?", "How Come, Chief Willoughby?".
It provoked a huge social resonance, but it didn't stop the main hero.
I like idea how the loner hero who is finding justice becomes an antihero.
Also I like the actors play, script and characters.
For watching the starry sky, going to the desert will be a good idea.
Because, desert's sky is empty of any buildings, skyscrapers, etc.
Meanwhile, exactly there you can concentrate on staring at the stars without any city's noise.
I bet you will drown in watching unbeatable stars and huge endless sky.
That time you confess how much human is trivial against the beauty of this greatness!
The MOL Triumph sailed into the hamburger port at 10 PM on Monday.
The ship sailed to Hamburg firstly.
New Song Released for DRAEMON's New Movie
Gen Hoshino, Japanese famous musician, released his new song, Draemon two days ago.
This song was made for Draemon's latest movie.
One day was enough for the music clip uploaded in Youtube to get more than million views and more than 3000 comments.
There is no doubt this tie-up has boosted his famous further and now various people ranging from kids to elderly love him.
It does not go so far as to say that he is one of the top emerging artists as ever.
In that moment while being held by rainwater, I was enshrined in a sanctuary that hid me from my burdens.
My mind and my senses, having been entranced by the deluge of heavenly water falling down on me, was utterly unaware that my cousins had become fixated on staring at my body through my white,cotton kamiz, which was becoming ever more diaphanous.
However, I couldn't ignore Aman Wadi's voice.
As my senses returned to the world outside of my brief respite, I noticed that my teenage cousins were staring at my body curiously.
My favorite dress was burning right before my eyes.
Although thick, heavy, monstrous tears fell from my quivering eyes, not even their combined would be enough to smother the flames.
She looked at me a moment.
I felt I was too angry and was concerned about being rude, and disrespectful to my mother.
He looked around the mess of dishes and the flames of the burnt clothes.
As soon as I reached the door, I eavesdropped what they were discussing.
To me it seemed as if Father followed the religious beliefs that the Imam of the mosque admonished to him with a blind faith, never questioning in rational thought for himself or in front of others.
I thought that Allah was kind and he loved all human beings, including girls.
I thought that whatever I was going through God knew about; and maybe he had written my fate to be no different than the millions of other girls in Pakistan, who were deprived of their rights.
Engulfed by a cloak of torrential rain, the grime, heat, anxieties, and tension that had encrusted themselves on my body like a layer of pollution were finally driven away.
My mind and my senses, having been entranced by the deluge of heavenly water falling down on me, was utterly unaware that my cousins had become fixated on staring at my body through my white,cotton kamiz, which was becoming ever more diaphanous.
After changing my clothes, I took the broom and went to the kitchen to sweep the floor and to wash the dishes.
Although thick, heavy, monstrous tears fell from my quivering eyes, not even their combined would be enough to smother the flames.
I shouted at mother.
I felt I was too angry and was concerned about being rude, and disrespectful to my mother.
He looked around the mess of dishes and the flames of the burnt clothes.
As soon as I reached the door, I eavesdropped what they were discussing.
To me it seemed as if Father followed the religious beliefs that the Imam of the mosque admonished to him with a blind faith, never questioning in rational thought for himself or in front of others.
I thought that Allah was kind and he loved all human beings, including girls.
I thought that whatever I was going through God knew about; and maybe he had written my fate to be no different than the millions of other girls in Pakistan, who were deprived of their rights.
At Rovaniemi, where are located on arctic region, I wished to see auroras.
Therefore I dream seeing auroras in Canada.
At Canada, I also want to watch an live ice hockey game.
I will be overwhelmed by the powerful plays!
I hope I can finish his sweater until we have spring.
The day after tomorrow my girlfriend will come to me.
She lives in Nizhny Novgorod, it's 400 km from Moscow, and we don't see each other often.
Soon she will live with me.
I wait that moment a lot.
She lives in Nizhny Novgorod, it's 400 km from Moscow, and we don't see each other often.
But while we live far away.
The day after tomorrow my girlfriend will come to me.
She lives in Nizhny Novgorod, it's 400 km from Moscow, and we don't see each other often.
But while we live far away.
In the end of the Spring the will end her education.
I wait that moment a lot.
Luckily, there is a big bookstore close to the office, so after work, I went there to buy it.
I felt nervous, but I pretended that I enjoyed having a small talk for a while, then we arrived at the building.
I almost forgot to buy an English textbook which I use when I study English on the radio.
I frankly asked her whether she went straight to a station, but she told me that she wanted to go to the building which the bookstore is in.
I felt nervous, but I pretended that I enjoyed having a small talk for a while, then we arrived at the building.
If I had had perfect confidence in myself, I could have told her that I have skill in English.
I'd rather not say anything than say something stupid.
You need to make sure you don't have any of those problems before thinking about doing that.
I never thought that I would be able to write English this much.
I know my English is still weird, but I'm wondering if I became a youtuber, there would be any listener for my videos.
Weirdness can be an accent of my character, right?
But, what kind of topic, should I give?
Just thinking and Imagining don't charge you any money.
My daughter and I cooked curry two days ago, but we didn't intend to eat the curry the day when we cooked it.
We knew that curry get tastier the next day than the cooking day even though we were not sure of the scientific reason.
Anyway, the panda has this irresistible charm built in every part of it.
So the panda is totally winning the cutie contest
Do you know that Panda in Chinese is Bear Cat?
so, they are officially the bear cat.
Some parts of this post may be considered an adult content.
In certain kind of the races, since ancient times, a male's worth has been decided by his pe**s size.
Regardless of everything else, the one with big pe**s is better.
The one with bigger pe**s is more popular.
The one with bigger pe**s has an easier time hailing taxis.
Above all else, the one with bigger pe**s is a superior creature.
Because while hard work can make up for a luck of talent, nothing can be done about pe**s size.
A: H, he's not tiny.
Because while hard work can make up for a luck of talent, nothing can be done about pe**s size.
In certain kind of the races, since ancient times, a male's worth has been decided by his pe**s size.
Regardless of everything else, the one with big pe**s is better.
The one with bigger pe**s is more popular.
Above all else, the one with bigger pe**s is a superior creature.
One with a tiny pe**s has no right to be king.
These are some conversations between the Gintama characters.
They are arguing about which prince will be the next king.
One has a bigger pe**s but is worthless, while the other one has a smaller pe**s but is capable 
A: H, he's not tiny.
C: Don't go there.
A: Can one rule the country with one's pe**s?
What's a pe**s anyway!?
He became king solely through the size of his pe**s!
If you took his pe**s away, what would he have left?.
B: then, what are they?
When I come home late, I feel troublesome for ironing my business shirt.
I want a robot which does it instead of me.
I saw the movie "Kick Ass" today.
I heard it is really cool movie, but I haven't seen it yet.
But I think characters are lively and I excited to see the movie from beginning to end credit.
She is young and very short, but she is incredible strong, so she "hit" many villains while you blinking.
I'm waiting to go to school there reason why is holiday.
I try to get high score on TOEIC this Friday.
I don't know what my job is called in English but I carried lots of cardboard boxes flowing on Conveyor belt today.
6 pm to 10 pm, I have worked for 4 hours and a little while ago, got home and took a bath.
When my daughter was eating rice ball, she divided it in half and said "sharing" in English.
She gave me a half of it.
She's clever, kind, and pretty!
B:Yes, I have stolen the last one.
A:I heard you play the piano, too.
B:Yes, I have stolen the last one.
Is piano more difficult than violin?
My family consists of five members: my father, mother, two elder brother and myself.
Big brother is 6 years elder than me and another is 3 years elder than me.
She is taller than her others colleagues.
She is taller than her others colleagues.
New year holiday is over.
Everyone need to back to work tomorrow.
And I'll fly to Kyoto this Friday, I have to prepare my baggage these days.
Why I can't understand English speaker.
I think that the reasons are which one of following.
I don't know the meaning of word or idiom.
Check following.
Then I check whether I can understand the statement without dictionary.
Therefore I know the meaning of words or idioms.
I'll try to practice English composition today too!
Mom,Will you change a time to take a bath.
I was going to finish to practice English composition this daytime.
Mom,Will you change a time to take a bath.
I was going to finish to practice English composition this daytime.
Mom,Will you change a time to take a bath.
I was going to finish to practice English composition this daytime.
I was looking miserable because something happened 3times at welfare facility.
Japanese teams are doing pretty good so far in Olympic games!
Curling is not a popular sports but I presume it will get popular after Olympic.
The team is consisted by 4 players, lead,second,third and skip.
One of them throw a stone on the ice and two of them sweep the ice with brash.
There is a target of circle which is radius of less than 4 meters.
It seems very difficult to throw the stone stops in this circle.
I have not write English in Lang-8 in a few days.
It's hard to learn a foreinger language in old days.
But now the intennate are strong.
We have lots of way to learn English.
- I didn't think, I would have fainted.
"- Tottenham is a great team with strong players that are also technical we closed ourselves also thanks to their qualities and then football is incredible Buffon saved a great occasion for their 2-1 and then we almost scored the 3-0."
He will be behind with the preparation, we have three or four days to recover the others and we will but we have Sturaro, Marchisio, Bentancur: we have the players to face the derby."
They are more heavy, we have to stay positive: we can still make it to the next stage."
I also love it and have some related goods such as stationary on which my favorite characters are printed.
Some people have a smartphone case or a wallet, wear a T-shirt, on which their favorite ones are painted.
These days, purchasing goods is not only prosperous, but also visiting the setting attracts a lot of attention.
Various of beneficial effects are often seen there.
Persistence of reputation is second to none when it comes to speaking language like a baby.
Alright, let's write some.
Recently I started to study again, I'm trying to get into University, medicine.
It doesn't help that I get easily distracted and I'm kinda lazy.
And I'll fly to Kyoto this Friday, I have to prepare my baggage these days.
I saw her when I went to America as my study abroad for 4 months.
She was really friendly and we became a good friend quickly.
The points that I really respect her is she stays in Oregon alone to go to her university and she always works out so hard.
I also live in Tokyo apart from my family but, in her case, she's in overseas.
She likes to go to gym and eat food to satisfy her appetite and get enough nutrition.
We're not pure anymore like when we saw 3 years ago and our situation completely changed, but our good friendship hasn't changed.
We're not sure where we will work in the future but we hope to gather once a year even after we're hired by Japanese companies that would force us to work overtime.
I had an unusual work shift today and I went to the office later than always.
At work I was asked to research on some cybersecurity information.
After that My coworker and I moved to an other building to attend a meeting.
I never speak there, just listen to them and write down topicks, I even don't understand what they're discussing!
The shift was changed because I had a meeting outside the company in the evening and it wouldn't finish in our standard working hours.
At work I was asked to research on some cybersecurity information.
As most sources are English, it took me more than a few hours to get it done.
After that My coworker and I moved to an other building to attend a meeting.
Its members are from different companies and we talk about the international trends of cybersecurity.
I never speak there, just listen to them and write down topicks, I even don't understand what they're discussing!
I always get uncomfortable and nervous to be there and I just don't know what to do there.
I posted about hay fever on lang-8 last week.
After that, the question arised: Why do many Japanese people have hay fever?
According to some article, one in four Japanese suffers from hay fever.
In addition, it is said that national land development also is related to hay fever.
Pollen which falls to the ground flies into the air by automobile and they gain entry into our body.
Background Of Hay Fever
After that, the question arised: Why do many Japanese people have hay fever?
According to some article, one in four Japanese suffers from hay fever.
I was curious about that and searched on the internet, so I would like to write historical backgrounds of why so many Japanese people have hay fever.
The growth of them reached their peak and finally, they have started to spread a lot of pollen.
In short, that is mainly because the government planted too many trees which cause hay fever.
Pollen which falls to the ground flies into the air by automobile and they gain entry into our body.
Few decades ago, marring without arrangement was said to be immoral.
It is became more major to find partner in the workplace.
But these days it is not usual to work for one place for a life.
Changing occupation got increasingly popular in Japan.
There are some surveys show that couples who like each others looks keep relationships longer than others.
Judging by pics is not bad way to find the bae, I guess.
Selfie shows the personality.
What do you see through the selfie at tinder?
It was difficult to quickly pass over the stories.
when there was fire raining down from sky, would I be ready to crawl on the ground to help the injured?
The author 's frail in describing the scenes was so great that after imagining every scene, I closed the book and cry; Relly terrific!!
Sometimes you can't express your feelings in any way; you can't convey the pain and sufferings you have experienced or witnessed in any way and this means that the real scenes were more gruesome than what have been described.
Noone has ever escaped a war without being hurt someway.
The least is that his or her spirit has been crushed.
Why so many violence?
How a human 's spirit can have the capacity for accepting these so many crimes?
This could be understood from word to word of their speech.
when there was fire raining down from sky, would I be ready to crawl on the ground to help the injured?
The author 's frail in describing the scenes was so great that after imagining every scene, I closed the book and cry; Relly terrific!!
The spirit of all those who were in the war were full of wounds.
This could be understood from word to word of their speech.
I plan to do some report for the interview that after Chinese New year but it is only 50% done.
I am worried about if the company make an appointment with me.
This holiday I looked a lot movies to try to relax and forgot the unhappy things as possible.
However I dream and awoke that at middle night sometimes during th holiday.
Finally,a new year is starting,I hope I can change job easily.
It's one of the largest lakes in Europe with fresh water and includes about 660 islands.
Originally, the lake was a part of gigantic Baltic Ice lake, which was formed by glaciers.
Afterwards, lake Ladoga became an important trade way.
So the fortresses Korela and Oreshek were built, which it's possible to visit nowadays.
The peaceful landscapes of Lake Ladoga always attracted spiritual societies as well.
The first monastery was built here on the Valaam island.
During the Great Patriotic war in 1941-42 the only way, connecting Leningrad with the rest country went across Lake Ladoga both in summer and winter.
The road was called "The road of life" and it still exists and has the same name.
At the end of the road there is a monument "The broken ring" which symbolizes the breaking the Nazi siege of Leningrad in 1943.
There are so many amazing places around Saint -Petersburg.
It's one of the largest lakes in Europe with fresh water and includes about 660 islands.
Originally, the lake was a part of gigantic Baltic Ice lake, which was formed by glaciers.
As the Ice lake dried gradually, it was divided on the Baltic sea and lake Ladoga.
Afterwards, lake Ladoga became an important trade way.
Sweden and Russia fought for it for a long time.
So the fortresses Korela and Oreshek were built, which it's possible to visit nowadays.
During the Great Patriotic war in 1941-42 the only way, connecting Leningrad with the rest country went across Lake Ladoga both in summer and winter.
The road was called "The road of life" and it still exists and has the same name.
At the end of the road there is a monument "The broken ring" which symbolizes the breaking the Nazi siege of Leningrad in 1943.
His mother is very anxious about his first day with other kids and she fears that his son could feel ostracized.
In order to make the things easier, she has previously met the headmaster, and both have planned a visit of the school before the school year begins.
Auggie does not want to show his misshapen face.
K.
This means equivalent to flipping your middle finger.
Understanding different cultures is important in the modern society because most of us will work in another country, with someone who has a different culture, at foreign capital companies.
If You could build a good relationship with them, it increases the productivity.
Adding diversity to your team will allow you think about the strategy from many kinds of aspects, thus having a good impact on the company.
The other day, I worked at a hotel in Tokyo Disney resort for only few days.
I was so crazy for Disney until I was a junior high student so I knew all about Tokyo Disney resort.
A while back, I dreamed to have a wedding ceremony in Tokyo Disney resort, I applied for its brochure even though I was only 12 years old.
At that time, I was convinced that I will never get tired of Disney.
Because I come to not sleep by it and I sometimes watched its screen in the dark.
People say you should buy a crock with alarm but it is a bit difficult to wake up by it.
Where Do You Put Your Smartphone On When You Sleep?
It is not good to put a smartphone on a bed when I sleep.
Because I come to not sleep by it and I sometimes watched its screen in the dark.
People say you should buy a crock with alarm but it is a bit difficult to wake up by it.
It's hard to me learn especcialy English.
I don't have any oblogation or too high expectations.
I learn yet a week!'.
It's may joking, not really life.
Every language need of the time!
Our school has students from 3 years old to 80 years old.
This is motivations before starting to study English.
So first, want to make clear why my students want to learn English.
Therefore, I always focuse on helping my students gain self-confidence.
It was a warm thawy day.
On the way to the subway station, I found Japanese apricot trees were in bloom and at the same time I caught sight of something under a tree alone.
I picked the glove up and hung it on its branch so that the owner of its stuff could see it.
After getting off the subway, I bought a SAKURA Strawberry Pink Milk Latte at Starbucks before I went out the ticket gate, and then, the same thing happened.
There was a man's glove on the floor.
Since it was warmer than usual, I supposed the owners took their gloves off on their way and pushed them into pockets or something but they didn't realize one of them slipped off.
That was like a missing sock syndrome, so I decided to call it "a spring missing glove syndrome".
I have a reason to support my opinion.
First, students have much more time than businessmen to use for themselves.
But most of students don't know how to use time very well.
So if I could teach students how to handle time, they will be able to use time without wasting it.
When they do volunteer works, they do something kind using their time for others even strangers too.
That kind of experience makes them kindness person.
It means that volunteer work creates self-improvement on the students.
I think it's better to put volunteer works on the education field.
That is the reason to agree with that idea.
I hope everyone is willing to give a hand to people need help in the future.
Can I get a late, please?
Large, Medium, Small.
one and half of the sugar, and with soy milk, please.
pay cash or card?
It's $4.20, please.
What are you planning on today?
I'll go to the park and have BBQ.
Melbourne national park.
not so.
maybe it takes 10 mins on foot.
here is a small latte.
A few weeks ago, I was made interview, I was so excited to get a job until now I still excited.
I made plan in my mind after I get this job what should be do,I want buy new car and learn driving.
In the end of this week I will know if I accepted in this job or not.
I am really hope acceptance of the job.
When I saw the first time Narita Airport, I was surprised because of it was very big and clean.
I wanted look the all day long if I have time, but I thought it is not enough just one day.
I looked at the airplane from airport lobby.
The airplane of Turkish Airlines was an airbus, all the other air plane of around was jumbo jet.
It looked like a adult and child, I felt uneasy.
"Is that ok?
does it really fly?"
When I got on the airplane, I felt strange smell, I have never been smell such a smell so far.
It will be probably, this is atmosphere of the Near and Middle East.
When I arrived Istanbul International Airport, it smelled same smell as an air plane.
Istanbul International Airport of those days was small and dark.
I felt especially, because of just I looked Narita Airport before 12 hours.
After finished entrance into country, I walked toward to gate and I found my friend in airport entrance.
But she told me.
Your alone time was only during the airplane.
Your mother took you to Narita Airport, right?"
How unkind you are!
I came from a long distance to see you.
It is frustrating, but it is true.
At last, I have arrived, I came alone." 
In Japanese, we often write the month and the day like this:
Last December, I bought a book "Wonder".
An English teacher recommended this book for English learners on Twitter.
I read a few pages last year and then I forgot about this book.
I thought this book is difficult for me.
I put the book near my pillow.
I see the blue covered book every day but I haven't read it.
I want to read the whole of this book.
Anyway, read it, read it and read it.
Many people said this book was an emotional book.
It has been so hard to read for me so far.
One of my dreams is traveling to NY and taking a walk at the Central Park.
My karate master is trying to have a karate brunch in NY.
Whenever he talks about the brunch, I say, "Master!
He said to me he would have a karate event there this spring and asked me if I want to join it.
I'm so excited when I imagine that I will be there.
I booked the flight ticket and now am looking for the place I will stay.
Yuzuru Hanyu won figure skating.
The Olympics is a place where athletes around the world dream of.
There are plenty of drama.
Is it strange even I'm already 50 years old...
Is it strange even I'm already 50 years old...
I went to English school today afternoon for the first time in a month.
I feel that my speaking skill become be a little better than before.
On the other hand, one of listening is not so good yet.
Last week, I went to nursing home to see my grand mother in law.
She said that my brother in law has changed his job.
He is 42 years old same as me, I think it was a big decision for him.
I wrote about the gold medalist, Nao Kodaira yesterday.
Usually, a company adopted an athlete to advertise the company.
However, if a hospital adopt athletes, there is any merit in the hospital.
Even if she takes a gold medal, the patient will not increase.
The manager of Aisawa Hospital is wonderful.
I wrote about the gold medalist, Nao Kodaira yesterday.
She was looking for a job before graduation from university eight years ago, but she not able to find a job.
At the time, the local hospital called Aisawa Hospital adopted her to support.
Usually, a company adopted an athlete to advertise the company.
However, if a hospital adopt athletes, there is any merit in the hospital.
Even if she takes a gold medal, the patient will not increase.
However, if a hospital adopt athletes, there is any merit in the hospital.
She was looking for a job before graduation from university eight years ago, but she not able to find a job.
Usually, a company adopted an athlete to advertise the company.
She was looking for a job before graduation from university eight years ago, but she not able to find a job.
At the time, the local hospital called Aisawa Hospital adopted her to support.
Usually, a company adopted an athlete to advertise the company.
However, if a hospital adopt athletes, there is any merit in the hospital.
Even if she takes a gold medal, the patient will not increase.
Time value in the market is a boss would like to pay how much money to hire.
Not kill time.
I will meet my friend who I like very much at this weekend.
My friend and I like movies, so we will talk about movies very much.
And one of my friend found a Israel restaurant, so we will visit it.
I will meet my friend who I like very much at this weekend.
My friend and I like movies, so we will talk about movies very much.
And one of my friend found a Israel restaurant, so we will visit it.
My friend and I like movies, so we will talk about movies very much.
And one of my friend found a Israel restaurant, so we will visit it.
I myself don't play the shogi game, though I vaguely know the rules of this game.
Now Shogi is being much talked about, because recently Shogi programs have been getting stronger and stronger, and began to beat the professional players.
These days no professional player cannot beat the best software called "Ponanza".
He became a professional shogi player at the age of 14 while he was a junior high school student, the youngest of all time.
Below is the footage of the time of his winning to become 6-dan.
Shogi is a two-player strategy game like the chess or go.
I myself don't play the shogi game, though I vaguely know the rules of this game.
These days no professional player cannot beat the best software called "Ponanza".
He became a professional shogi player at the age of 14 while he was a junior high school student, the youngest of all time.
More than that, he won 29 consecutive games since the first game of his professional career, a new record.
Below is the footage of the time of his winning to become 6-dan.
I think it is because we're going to hold an Olympics in Tokyo, 2020, so many people from abroad are interested in our what our culture is like.
A tourism in Japan has continued to increase because of it.
It affects also on our economy because they spend a lot of money on many things, so we receive tax from the spent money.
However I'm worried about our economy after the Olympics, which will be not as good as the economy we have.
That is why I'm also coucerned about a job industry that I work, which is an advertisment, especially OOH.
That's short for Out Of Home Media, which is my job department.
I suppose it will be obsalete or at least we won't make a good profit.
That could make our salary low, and I guess some of employees could be less motivated.
Even now, The OOH is not getting popular compared to other advertisments.
I want to avoid these things happened to me, so I change my career by using a good English skill, and get recruited!
It's been a while since I started to go on a
I lost some weight, but my body shape hasn't changed as I expected it to be.
I know toning up my body takes a long process that needs more than a few months, but I want to see how my body will change as soon as I can!
So, I decided to try "30 days squat challenge".
It is one of the ways that helps your body shaped up in a short period of time.
This is how it should be done: Start 50 times of squats a day, and add 5 times of squats every following day.
I even had a little pain in my thigh musle.
But now I'm comfortable with the pain!
I know toning up my body takes a long process that needs more than a few months, but I want to see how my body will change as soon as I can!
So, I decided to try "30 days squat challenge".
It is one of the ways that helps your body shaped up in a short period of time.
For me, the first day was hard.
I can't wait to see how it works on me.
Weight exceeded 70 kg.
It is fat naturally.
In the morning yogurt and French toast.
Lunch is a sandwich.
In the evening, dumplings and rice, miso soup, natto, fried potatoes.
Sweets with breaks in the morning and noon.
My father is going to operate next month, so I will return to my parents house before that.
It seems to be major surgery.
It seems to be extracting part of the liver and gall bladder.
But what should I talk to?
Perhaps grandchildren will not be shown either.
It was a gentle silent father if I think now.
My old brother is a mental illness, my young brother is a freeter from social withdrawal.
He was clumsy and vulgar, but he was a serious and good person.
I have an impression he often laughed.
He raised plants and had a kind heart.
Do I need to use commas in such situations
"That is a secret," he said, mysteriously.
"How did you get in?" inquired Jane Gladys, with a distrust.
When they are used as ADJ, they both mean something uninteresting and plain.
Today My daughter's friend came to my home.
When I came back, there were Takoyaki on the table.
It has gone long time since my daughter's friend left my house.
Takoyaki became cool so I warmed it by a microwave oven.
One Japanese men lost to get a medal.
Western festivals are welcome in China.
It's not surprise to see an impressive tree decorated with lights and stars outside a hypermarket when Jingle Bells is singing.
The crowd take pictures of themselves with those who dress like Santa Claus.
For openers, the mixture of different cultures is destined.
China's economy is forging ahead.
Many foreign investors not only pump money, but also culture into the rising power.
The tendency of fusing western culture into the the East is unstoppable and inevitable.
Second, China has a long history of more than 5000 years and has been through a myriad of wars and manifold invasions of other countries, yet none of them has changed her people and culture.
Therefore, some western cultures do bring some fresh air for us, however it wouldn't uproot what our ancestors had left for us.
We respect cultures of every hue, notwithstanding that we have different behaviour and religions.
Viewing the coexistence of western culture and eastern culture, the idealist say let it go; the realist say let it be; the rationalist say live and let live.
I'm really appreciate if someone help me.
"The product received impacts largely enough that its frame was distorted and it cannot be used as it is."
I think both are similar for my ears.
I think both are similar for my ears.
They like British English.
What different Australian English to NZ English.
I actually don't tell almost of my friends about my currently job
I have work as handing flier, but almost of my friends don't know about that because I'm part-time-job worker.
Basically, a part-time-job are not good impression in Japan much less a man who will becoming 30 years old after cupple of years that's like me.
However, I have a reason why I'm working as part-time-job worker.
I 'm intention to indipendent as own business which is import business.
That's why I need to some time to look up some information for import business and I already have been starting to import of some product from china.
They always said"You suppose to be full-time employees" but it's not my plan anymore.
Since then, I hadn't told my friends what I'm doing now.
Today is happy in particular.
Because my best friends gave a birth for the first time.
I heard his baby is girl.
I will present him on Sunday since we have a deinking party on the day.
I heard his baby is girl.
His wife likes a Disney character, so I will give him its design towel.
I will present him on Sunday since we have a deinking party on the day.
People should improve their sleep 
Thanks to the lang-8...
However, every if he told me to write in English, I feel I could complete the task.
At least, I never felt I didn't take on do the task.
Thanks to lang-8, I can feel so and I can have a self-confidence.
One of my friends was fired just because she worked almost five years.
In Japan, there is a new law that if someone worked at the same workplace more than five years as non-regular employment, those people who wish to work as regular employment can be a regular employee.
I hate such employers and such a law!
In Japan, there is a new law that if someone worked at the same workplace more than five years as non-regular employment, those people who wish to work as regular employment can be a regular employee.
I hate such employers and such a law!
One of my friends was fired just because she worked almost five years.
In Japan, there is a new law that if someone worked at the same workplace more than five years as non-regular employment, those people who wish to work as regular employment can be a regular employee.
I hate such employers and such a law!
Re-start
There is one Q&A in one day, and are totally 366 Q&As about many kinds of theme.
Winter Olympics held in Pyeongchang!
All national people are excited!
As long as you have worked hard, all the players are winners, regardless of winning the medal or not.
Of course, it is true that racial equality is strongly needed, but if we ignore biological differences that exist in actual, minority people would be owned more burdens.
Usualy speaking,Airplanes flight day time.
Because I also have a night duty today, I slept day time.
i hope that everyone will enjoy a good time with their family during a Lunar new year day.
i help my grandmother, and mother to cook the foods for the ancestral rite.
In addition, the number of foreign young people which visit to Japan to learn and work has increased year by year.
I love it!When I was young, I often listened to it.
I mean, in the law, cats or dogs are assumed as in things, so you were not gonna arrest by police even though you killed all cats and dogs on purpose as in crime of murder.
I have read the novel called Higurashi no ki recently.
It is historical fiction novel written by Hamuro Rin who is from where I live, Kokura in Kitakyusyu city.
It was published in 2011 and was adapted to the movie afterwards.
So, it was a little ashamed not to read this book until now.
It is a story of the samurai named Toda Shukoku who is going to be executed by hara-kiri on a charge of commit adultery with one of the mistress of the feudal lord.
The story follows the other samurai named Danno Shozaburo who is also about to commit hara-kiri on charge of affair involving bloodshed in the castle.
He was exempted from that charge but, he was ordered to keep an eye on Shukoku in order to make sure if he would commit hara-kiri.
As he started living with Syukoku and helped his works, he gradually got to know him and ended up admiring him.
He was exempted from that charge but, he was ordered to keep an eye on Shukoku in order to make sure if he would commit hara-kiri.
Then, he started wondering why he did affair and made much effort to reveal the truth in order to help him.
I just recommend this novel one hundred present.
I feel like the Japanese spirits deep inside of me was summoned while I was reading.
I have read the novel called Higurashi no ki recently.
So, it was a little ashamed not to read this book until now.
When you stuck middle of it you cannot do anything excluding gripping handle.
It waste time and money.
Complete banning cars from city centers would reduce the volume of traffic there.
Then you can use your time more useful and improve work efficiency.
these new tires are awesome!
Naturally, he is one of the greatest boxer ever in history.
It's a bit shame that I've never known such a great man until I saw one of his match against Pacquiao.
When people call his name, the word of " Money " is put in front of his sir name.
Maywhether, he is acutally a living American legend who holds the most splendid record ever of all boxer's records.
We know the total fight money he's earned in all his career, which is an incredibly big amount that also weighs the gravity of his exisitence.
Probably there are many kinds of answer for this question.
My answer for this is that if I have many friends, I can do more kinds of things than if I do not.
In my experience, I often climb local mountain alone.
Then they know what I did not know and realize many thing that I could not realize even though we used the route what I often use.
For another example, my friends may know the means of solving problem that I did not know and teach that to me.
As I have explained, I can improve my knowledge by my friends' teach, then I can do more kinds of things.
So, they were spend for a while and I had to take care my daughter and grandchildren for about two weeks.
She got better and went home, but I was very tired.
Because it was "shopping day" once every two weeks this weekend.
The gymnasium will be cold, so I'm think about what to wear.
I played the piano for the first time in a while day before yesterday.
According to the article,there are now more pet cats in Japan than pet dogs.
This was announced byThe Japam Pet Food Association, based on an annual survey.
I think also we can keep a cat easier than a dog, because a cat require less care.
My uncle has a fat cat,and so cute.
But,I can't touch the cat, so I am allergic to them.
I am just looking.
She has been celebrating her birthday according to a lunar calendar, which makes me confused every year.
Unlike the last days I wrote for her, I added with some words about being healthy.
I find she is not as well as she was.
Somehow I bought a coupon for gym and sauna as a gift.
So if you have one who can share the same value and really support you, please cherish the time that you could spend together.
So if you have one who can share the same value and really support you, please cherish the time that you could spend together.
The subject of this paper is to comprehensively analyze the two main pillars of rural relief policy under the Grate Depression.
However, this movement had serious side effect to the local labor market because it recommended the middle class farmers to reduce the hired labor supplied from the poorer stratum.
The shrinking of the local labor market had to be covered by the public work for poor farmers that of another pillar of the rural relief policy.
Therefore, it is said that these two policies had a complementary relationship each other and had policy integrity to some extent.
This paper examines the case of Kamisato Village, Shimoina District, Nagano Prefecture and clarifies whether this complementary relationship could have succeeded to help the rural farmers who were suffered from the economic damage of the Great Depression or not.
First, the Kamisato village forest with abundant wood resources played an important role to overcome the Great Depression by providing village residents the opportunity for earning wage income.
Second, however, even in the Kamisato village, there had been a possibility of rising confrontation between the hamlets where the residents had utilized the village forest in everyday life and the other hamlets where the residents had little experience of working in the forest.
Third, the public work for poor farmers financially supported by the central government complemented the job creation in village forest and ease the confrontation between the hamlets in Kamisato village.
Please, tell me if it is possible to use both the past indefinite and the past perfect in the 1st part of the sentence as there are two actions and one of them was prior to the 2nd one.
Today I passed my junior school.
I happened to be there when the classes were over and they were walking out of the school gate.
The neighbor changed a lot that I could hardly tell.
I didn't see any eateries around in which I dined before.
Today I passed my junior school.
They were wearing the same uniform as I wore before.
The neighbor changed a lot that I could hardly tell.
I didn't see any eateries around in which I dined before.
I did not have any days off recently, so I want to have my time.
I went to a coffee shop and have breakfast, but it was not so good.
I took a day off today because I was exhausted.
I did not have any days off recently, so I want to have my time.
High technology vs Low technology New one vs Old one
This Winter is colder than last year in my town.
I wake up at midnight and cannot sleep afterwards recently.
We need to keep up with changing times because we couldn't survive in this modern society otherwise.
For instance, when we are talking to youths, we need to know the trend among their community.
It seems that Minions movies are very popular and watched by the majority of youths, so through referring to trendy topics, we can relate to them and form a good relationship with them.
Youths are crucial in creating a new wave in the organization.
Older people tend to think traditionally and in the old-fashioned style.
Also people high up in the organization are conservative and it is hard to incorporate youths' ideas into their agenda and the way of running their organization.
My complexion is a little bit darker than most of other Koreans.
I am quite satisfied with my skin color and not eager to have 'white' skin, which means bright skin in Korean, but sometimes I envy 'white' skin, though.
Someone might think that Korean's preference for white complexion is because of westernized standards of beauty or racism.
We can definitely say big eyes with double lids, a high nose, and long legs, which Koreans admire, became determinants of beauty as a result of westernization and influence of mass media.
There is a 'Josun' dynasty a hundred years ago, which had lasted for approximately five centuries and there were '9 factors' to be satisfied to be considered as a beauty: white complexion, teeth, and hands; black eyes, hair, and eyebrows; red lips, cheeks, and nails; short ears, teeth, and jaw; moderate intervals of breasts and eyes, and broad forehead; soft and slender fingers, waist, and feet; thin fingers, ankles, and nostrils;nice and thick lips, arms, and hips; long height, hair, and hands.
Josun was a kingdom valued scholars over physical workers and warriors.
And scholars who mostly worked and stayed indoor hardly had tanned skin.
Preference for white complexion might stem from a desire for a higher class, scholars.
It's during campaign of certain anime at convenience store.
It's might popular, so I rush went to there.
I was get it.
I think so there is crowd in there to after school.
It's during campaign of certain anime at convenience store.
I'll get to no payment it if I buy a specific item
I was want to get this good.
It's might popular, so I rush went to there.
I was get it.
I am glad I went shopping before school.
I think so there is crowd in there to after school.
It's during campaign of certain anime at convenience store.
I'll get to no payment it if I buy a specific item
I was want to get this good.
It's might popular, so I rush went to there.
I was get it.
I am glad I went shopping before school.
Visit indoor park
There is indoor amusement park.
It takes 7min by car from my house to there.
The park is small area.
There are 6 bounce houses in the park.
On week day, which is from Mon.
The park consists of two area.
One area is in blight and another area is in dark.
In blight area, there is very big slide that is about 200-inch height.
The slide angle is about 60 degree.
So it is steep sloop and the speed when I slide was very fast I expected.
In the dark area, there is very wide flat bounce house.
We can free jump.
The park is for not only children, but parents also can play with the bounce house.
We do not need extra cost for parents.
You can pay and enjoy with your children.
Did foreign language learning have a good impact on you?
Language learning is like adventure to jungle.
You may get a lot of benefits at the point where you got through obstacles such as jaguar, poisonous snakes, crocodile, and so on.
Language learning is like adventure to jungle.
Finished master thesis!
I've just finished writing master course's thesis.
I'm pleased to the degree of the thesis.
Now, I'm plenty of time to do what I like to do!
Solis hooks up with her boss?
I bought a car in installments earlier this year.
So I can't afford to buy that expensive motorcycle.
So I can't afford to buy such an expensive motorcycle.
Just his presence dignifies the event.
New president is elected.
And we realize changes in diplomacy.
B: Why do you say in that sarcastic tone?
If I have a time to spend in other country, I would like to go to Hong Kong.
It is such an international or multicultural city so I would like to experience such cultures.
Second, I am studying Chinese now so I want to use it.
When I was in junior high I went there.
I went there as school excursion it was so much fun.
There were so beautiful ocean.
I participated in farm stay then, and they give me they gave me some fruits and it was so delicious.
Her mother is 87 years old and she has been on dialysis more than two years.
She has been stayed in a hospital for fracture of the femur since last December.
Her mother often yells even though night time, so she had to move to single room.
My acquaintance wonders if she can continue to pay it.
She wants her mother to live longer, but she tires of everything.
What does "one hour day or hour" means?
People on trains usually use a smartphone during their commute.
This is how I save money 2
At second, I effort to make meals by myself as far as possible.
It costs at least 500yen per a lunch.
You can save money if you take handmade lunch to my office.
236. When and Where Can You Relax Most?
When and Where Can You Relax Most?
I usually think about what to do, but never about relaxing.
As opposed to plenty of free time expected, however, I keep a busy retirement from my hobbies.
One of my hobbies is singing in chorus, and for now I belong to three different choirs.
Another hobby I spend a lot of time on is English learning.
I do a lot of activities regarding English, but the thing that required me most is giving a speech for the Toastmasters Club meetings.
So you see, I have to keep energized to cover all the things day by day.
There has been no room of relaxing in my life.
As opposed to plenty of free time expected, however, I keep a busy retirement from my hobbies.
One of them requires the chorus members to sing without a music on stage, so we have to spend time reviewing and memorizing the music piece, which makes my life busy.
Another hobby I spend a lot of time on is English learning.
Deciding on a subject to speak about does take a lot of time as well as memorizing and practicing it, and speaking in front of other people tenses me up.
It was pretty hard to keep up with the pace of reading, and as the deadline came closer, I became tenser.
I do a lot of activities regarding English, but the thing that required me most is giving a speech for the Toastmasters Club meetings.
I also used to read English books with a teacher, on a one-book-per-month basis, for over two years.
My dear friends, I hope you help me edit it.
If you have any idea about how to improve the content, please leave a comment.
When I heard of this speech title, I felt a bit perplexed.
As opposed to plenty of free time expected, however, I keep a busy retirement from my hobbies.
I do a lot of activities regarding English, but the thing that required me most is giving a speech for the Toastmasters Club meetings.
Deciding on a subject to speak about does take a lot of time as well as memorizing and practicing it, and speaking in front of other people tenses me up.
Reading one whole book for a next lesson made me busy.
It was pretty hard to keep up with the pace of reading, and as the deadline came closer, I became tenser.
Apart from these activities I go to the fitness gym for my health three to four times a week, spending about three hours each time.
One of my hobbies is singing in chorus, and for now I belong to three different choirs.
When and Where Can You Relax Most?
As opposed to plenty of free time expected, however, I keep a busy retirement from my hobbies.
One of my hobbies is singing in chorus, and for now I belong to three different choirs.
Yesterday and Today is warm.
If I am free I help you.
If he runs every day he will lose weight.
If the director hired him, the company will raise its incomes.
If the plane had taken off on time, you would have been on time to the meeting.
If I am free I help you.
If the director hired him, the company will raise its incomes.
My school results would increase if I studied more.
If he had been here on time, maybe he would have arrived at Miami.
If the plane had taken off on time, you would have been on time to the meeting.
Since this month, I've come to drink coffee a lot because I've worked for my brother-in-law as a temporary job.
Anyway, today, let me tell you simple secret when you make a drip coffee.
You just steam grounded coffee powder in a paper filter for 20 seconds before you pour all of the boiled water.
The flu epidemic of this year is about to end.
Class closings closed one after another at my son's school.
We always put the mask on our mouse.
And soon will come a spring vacation of school.
I am going to return to my parents home in Sendai for the first time in a year.
Children and I have looking forward to it.
I would like to explore a nostalgic city when I return home.
where refers to a place, not a time, but I notice there are some texts that combine" time" with "where".
One day, if you two had uttered the same phrase at the same time, you would have a possibility to get ice cream from opposite one, all you had to do is say "happy ice cream" earlier than another one to get it.
I guess that it's already an old-fashioned phrase or local culture's words.
My country has much coastline.
A:How about in your country?
B:What about in yuor country?
"She failed the credit for the class 'Accounting'."
"So, she will retake that class next term."
That is required course but elective one."
That is required course but elective one."
That is required course but elective one."
Some students prefer to study alone. Other pefer to study with a group of student.Which do you prefer? Use specific reasons and examples to support your answer
There are many different opinions whether some students prefer to study alone or others prefer to study with a group of student.
In my opinion, I prefer to study alone rather than with a group of student because it is more advantageous to study alone than with a group of student.
I feel this way for several reasons, which I will explore in the following essay.
To begin with, there are some the way of studying especially, alone or group.
studying with a group of student sometimes help us teach some subjects each other if I don't know about knowledge.
However, studying with a group of student can't focus on studying for exams.
Also, I got distracted to study that.
Finally, they start talking about something instead of studying.
On the other hand, studying alone is able to concentrate on studying subjects.
Even If something can't understand, it is easier to get a lot of information from the internet using a smartphone.
For example, when I was a high school student, I always studied alone at home or library.
I could focus on studying the subject as well as do thorough reviews over and over again.
As a result, I got a special license and result.
If I studied with a group of student, I couldn't get that.
Secondly, studying alone is able to learn things at my own pace.
We can manage time schedule depends on health condition.
Nevertheless, Studying with a group of student can't study time schedule on my own. We must care about other students.
The way it is not efficient to study with a group of students compared to study alone.
For example, I studied my friends when I was a university student, Actually, I got a cold, but I promised to study together with my friend because he couldn't understand this chapter.
However, I wasn't able to pass the exam of a chapter because of a nasty cold.
In conclusion, I strongly that people prefer to study alone rather than with a group of students because studying alone can not only focus on studying but also manage time schedule.
I just realized my net income is way less than I expected.
I didn't think the tax and all were that expensive...
It's been a very long time since I wrote my latest diary.
Actually it's been 3 months already TT
1st semester is over.
It's Spring break now.
Thank you for your hard work until such late time
I have studied English very hard now,because I have university entrance examination in a week!
These days, I realize that nothing is more important than fundamental ability when I study English.
For example,memorizing words,checking grammar,and so on.
When I read long thesis that was used in exam,I could not catch the meaning though I had studied advanced technique of rapid reading.
Then,I took word flashcard and worked on it hard.
I completed flashcard with taking a week and read that thesis again,I could catch the meaning more clearly,rapidly and easily!
This realization is very important in my means of studying.
I think that the same is true in many case,So I make good use of it and improve my study efficiency.
Cell phones should be allowed in school.
I think cell phones should be allowed in school.
First,cell phones have many useful function.
If you use it,you can improve your work efficiency.
For example,when you find words that you have never seen,you can use cell phone in order to search the meaning of the words and you can do it more faster than using paper dictionary.
It applies wherever you are,of course in school.
Second,student can use cell phones in the class without checking mails or SNS.
But,young people have better knowledge to get along with cell phones than aged people.
So you have to believe students and allow it.
In conclusion, cell phones should be allowed in school because students have good sense and can improve efficiency.
Admitting One's Mistake
It's very hard for us to admit our mistakes, because we usually do things which we think right.
However, we don't have enough time to consider whether these are really right, so we often make mistakes.
If we really did each thing, we wouldn't do anything.
And we also should be generous to others' mistakes.
It's very hard for us to admit our mistakes, because we usually do things which we think right.
If we really did each thing, we wouldn't do anything.
Thus, we should know we easily make mistakes and try to correct them immediately.
And we also should be generous to others' mistakes.
If we really did each thing, we wouldn't do anything.
And we also should be generous to others' mistakes.
Talking What We Want to Do without Thinking Feasibility
I went to Shinjuku to meet my friend in my previous workplace.
A shop staff sneezed.
Japanes women carling team won by Sweden.
I was watching that game on TV with my daughter.
I don't know carling game rules well.
My daughter wrote national flag and 'Japanese team, you can do it!'.
In the later part of game Japanese was in disadvantage situation, score was 2 to 4.
I thought Japanese team will lose, but my daughter believed that Japanese team can win and Japanese team believe win themselves too.
And then Japanese team won.
We were glad that win.
However I worried about the time because it was too past the time which my daughter have to sleep.
Thinking about the Future of TV CM while Watching a Coca-Cola CM after the Olympic
Just after the broadcasting of 1500 meters of speed skating, in which Ms.
Of course, it wasn't possible for Coca-Cola to predict the exact result of games, so this CM was selected after the result had come.
Since the expressions used in legal sentences are so special that it is hard for me to read them.
I know I should consult experts, but It would cost too much.
After generally work, I joined study meeting of allergy.
After generally work, I joined study meeting of allergy.
There was nothing annual expect for me.
The athletes who won medals in the Olympic Games are getting short of sleep or complaining of bad health because they are responding to interviews from daily media.
The media should rest the tired medalists.
Maybe most of them were office workers talking about business or something.
Since they talked very loudly, I just had a quick look at them.
They seem like just in their middle or late teens, wore rid rips, and dressed like adults in bars.
Again, we heard that one of them said "Yeah, and the 32 years old 'old man' told me...."
I sensed some of adults in the same cafe froze for a moment.
They seem like just in their middle or late teens, wore rid rips, and dressed like adults in bars.
I made a lot of effort to make me seem like a mature woman.
They seem like just in their middle or late teens, wore rid rips, and dressed like adults in bars.
They reminded me of myself at that time.
I made a lot of effort to make me seem like a mature woman.
Again, we heard that one of them said "Yeah, and the 32 years old 'old man' told me...."
I sensed some of adults in the same cafe froze for a moment.
It was crowded, but calm.
Maybe most of them were office workers talking about business or something.
Since they talked very loudly, I just had a quick look at them.
They seem like just in their middle or late teens, wore rid rips, and dressed like adults in bars.
They reminded me of myself at that time.
I made a lot of effort to make me seem like a mature woman.
Again, we heard that one of them said "Yeah, and the 32 years old 'old man' told me...."
I sensed some of adults in the same cafe froze for a moment.
The two maps below show an island, before and after the construction of some tourist facilities.
Overall, it can be clearly seen that the unmanned island became an enticing holiday destination.
To begin with, the width of the island remained approximately 260m, with a beach in the left side.
This beach is now used for swimming, while a pier was constructed in the bottom, where people can enjoy two yachts.
Another noticeable change is that a reception was built in the center, from which people can go to accommodation areas, to the left and right of the reception.
New vehicle tracks were put to connect the pier and the reception as well as a new restaurant to the top of the reception.
Furthermore, footpaths were set between houses and the beach.
Can you jump on the back of the truck?
Can I hop in your car?
Are you interested in the marketing?
I have attended a lecture where we learned about the marketing several years ago.
The teacher tought the attendants the concept and some basic thinkings of the marketing.
I touched the marketing for the first time.
On next day, I bought a book written about the marketing put forward by Philip Kotler.
Last Sunday, I went to hospital and then, my doctor permit me to start physical exercises.
Immediately, I went to Pilates studio after that.
I think it is very difficult to play badminton again but I will resume practicing it soon
I have work day from today, so I'll do my best to my work.
I don't know, it's busy today.
Ah, I don't go to my work lol.
Anyway, today's challenge to English!!
Do you want to go place?
Last night's dinner is Yakiniku.
I have a hay fever from this morning, so I'm pain.
There are so many fine restaurant.
We're going to a Spanish restaurant and having Gambas with sangria.
To like something is the most important in my life.
I think that to like something is a source of everything.
I hope you can find what you like the best.
for your delight future.
Jump-Start My Husband Car
This morning, my husband didn't start the car.
At that time, no one had jumpercables in neighbors.
He brought back the jumpercables from work to home in hurry.
We popped their hood and connected both cars with the jumpercables.
I started his car, and then the engine worked well.
We should've bought the jumpercables.
At that time, no one had jumpercables in neighbors.
He drove my car and went to work.
He brought back the jumpercables from work to home in hurry.
My last weeks was so hard for me.
I passed it all, fortunately, but I didn't revise English.
I hope as soon as possible I will revise all words and I will come back to think in English.
I should primarily talk a lot.
I hope I will enjoy this time.
This is my first step to come back every day learning English.
I know it doesn't look good, but I will try to do it better.
The last weekend, a Kyoto marathon was held.
This was the first time for me to watch actual runners.
Everybody passed me away so quickly.
I was jokily thinking that I should have asked him to wear a salient bunny or panda cap.
I don't know if there is similar existence in other countries.
Generally cheering people take runners'. It's opposite.
He was looking toward that student uniform guys!
Will you accept Facebook friend requests from your parents or relatives?
Usually young generation of Taiwanese will try to avoid parents facebook friend requests.
so we either ignore their friends requests or accept it, 
and then create another new facebook account, 
we don't wanna parents violate our privacy, 
but somehow, Asian parents can be pretty controlling, 
they might mad at you, and complain why don't you accept their Facebook friend requests.
What will you do?
Yesterday, I attended a patent's strategy meeting at our headquarters in Osaka.
Then, I moved to Kyoto to meet a professor in Doshisha University.
I'm so confused at what's happening right now.
I'm so confused for what's happening right now.
It reminds me of old Hargraves, who lived in Mount.
And yet she allowed herself to be courted by the old Hargraves, who gave her an apartment in the neighboring town.
"The facts are so similar, are not they?
Stayed at my Office
Yesterday, I was the last employee who stayed at my office.
As a result, I had to start my desk works in the evening.
Furthermore, I made many mistakes there and I had to use up much time for resolving it.
After he played one on one with the trash talker, he went, "I can't believe that's all you've got."
I would've to call you in five minutes.
After he played one on one with the trash talker, he went, "I can't believe that's all you've got."
I would've to call you in five minutes.
I hope you enjoy this music, too.
Do u name ur possession?
If you have deep affection or attachment to ur possession, u might sometimes name it.
It's like you humanize it or u infuse a life.
The big event is a 'terminus ad quem' from which is possible to discern a countless gradient of individuals.
Once gathered up in that junction, they reveal themselves as individuals, and pay for it.
But that event is one and only, unrepeatable, and extremely postponed: indeed, postponement intended as a subsidiary event is properly defined by the Final Judgement, the model of every wait.
In the fable of the Final Judgement, everybody fall sleep on its own to get awake together.
The big event is a 'terminus ad quem' from which is possible to discern a countless gradient of individuals.
But that event is one and only, unrepeatable, and extremely postponed: indeed, postponement intended as a subsidiary event is properly defined by the Final Judgement, the model of every wait.
The big event is a 'terminus ad quem' from which is possible to discern a countless gradient of individuals.
Once gathered up in that junction, they reveal themselves as individuals, and pay for it.
But that event is one and only, unrepeatable, and extremely postponed: indeed, postponement intended as a subsidiary event is properly defined by the Final Judgement, the model of every wait.
At 9 am to 11 am this morning, I played badminton with other team in Taichung.
At 9 am to 11 am this morning, I played badminton with other team in Taichung.
I like sleeping because I can watch a dream.
It's a dreamily.
I was doing photography job in Japan as well.
However it was not field I want to do, so I thought I need more challenging and adventure.
That's why I came here.
I'm a obstinate and don't listen to other people.
But I'm always thinking I want to be a real people person.
On the other hand, in the United States of America and Europe, workers make an agreement concerning their scope of works, working hours or work locations.
Today, working population in Japan is gradually decreasing.
However, it is really difficult that couples raise their child while accepting overtimes and long-distance transfers.
That is the problem between couples raising child in Japan.
One thing I notice in the funeral is that they have a lot of wreath in the funeral hall.
Like Korea, It is a customary to give wreath with their company's name on it for funeral.
2- I've never had a Japanese girl friend even though I work for a Japanese company.
A friend of mine heard of this, and said,"Japanese girls love K-pop, why do they don't love you?."and I answered, " you seeing me comes up with any K-pop?
I'm 33, too late to dress K-pop and act K-pop.
When seeing the floor plan of a house in England, I found that there are the words, "Jack and Jill Bathroom" and "Jack and Jill En-suite."
Though I usually saw just "Bathroom" and "En-suite," I saw the above two for the first time.
What do they mean?
I laughed recalling an incident this morning while going to college.
Outside the gate is an IIT institute' back fence where the people around throw their garbage.
When I was crossing that area, I saw two women throwing sags of garbage over the fence.
They told me they were throwing garbage.
I again asked " Is there a garbage bin over there"?
They said no.
I asked them what was there and they said it was an IIT Institute.
I asked them, "so"?.
They told me everyone throws here I should also throw.
I told them I did not want to throw because I take my garbage to the garbage bin.
Am I a good model to my children of a man who is in touch with his emotions and who shows them in the right ways?
Sentence 2: Announce in a train
Sentence 2: Announce in a train
Question about How to Use a Comma
A: I like cars and I often go for a drive.
She was talking to the media like there wasn't happened anything that day.
Does the word "it" can be took out in sentences "A," "B," and "C"?
She was talking to the media like there wasn't happened anything that day.
Does the word "it" can be took out in sentences "A," "B," and "C"?
In ten days it will be celebrated the Andalusia day.
My niece, the daughter of my sister, will had a party at school.
In that day, all the children used to go to school dressed with the traditional costume and they used to eat traditional food from our region.
They will sing Andalusia anthem in public all together at the school yard.
When I was a child in that day all the children used to breakfast typical toasted bread spreaded with olive oil and a bit of salt on it.
Our region is the major olive oil producer in the world from far.
We are very proud of it and because of that we use it a lot in all our dishes.
The weather is warm most of the time, and the sun is shining the ninety per cent of the year.
We have a fertile ground to produce vegetables.
Our land is a mixture of high mountains and seaside which give us a contrasted gastronomy.
They will sing Andalusia anthem in public all together at the school yard.
In ten days it will be celebrated the Andalusia day.
They will sing Andalusia anthem in public all together at the school yard.
Unless you cut down the number of cigarettes you smoke every day, you'll have cancer.
By way of contrast, her brother is rather lazy.
He prefers lying in bed all day to work out.
Peru: An Important Narrator of Soccer Passed Away Today.
He was the main narrator in the last years of soccer here.
He narrated both the matches of the Peruvian soccer team and the matches of the league soccer.
For example, two years ago, the team which I am a fan won the national league championship soccer, after more than 30 years, it was amazing for my city.
Of course, the narrator of that match was this journalist.
Last year the Peruvian team qualified for the World Cup, and he was the only narrator of all matches, during the whole qualifying campaign.
In recent interviews, he told that he expected to narrate a goal of the Peruvian team in the World Cup.
How ironic is the life.
Of course, there are others narrators, but, as I wrote lines above, he was the most important and famous.
He suffered a heartbreak meanwhile he was playing football with some of his friends.
He narrated both the matches of the Peruvian soccer team and the matches of the league soccer.
For example, two years ago, the team which I am a fan won the national league championship soccer, after more than 30 years, it was amazing for my city.
Last year the Peruvian team qualified for the World Cup, and he was the only narrator of all matches, during the whole qualifying campaign.
In recent interviews, he told that he expected to narrate a goal of the Peruvian team in the World Cup.
The tournament will begin in next June.
How ironic is the life.
Of course, there are others narrators, but, as I wrote lines above, he was the most important and famous.
He suffered a heartbreak meanwhile he was playing football with some of his friends.
Countermeasure Against Cold
Warming the soles of the feet makes warming the whole body.
We can spend without heating in the house with floor heating.
I always try to warm my feet even for sleeping.
After the figure declined until 2003, the year 2005 saw the highest amount of expenses by the German approximately $95 million.
Finally, the expense by Austrian people, with $30-40 million until 2001, burgeoned after 2001 to reach about $70 million in 2005.
"Welcome back", he said when I returned to the office after being one week on sick leave.
I did not know if I should laugh or cry.
I like them a lot and still remember all of these lyrics.
I went to a bar with a female friend last night, and I heard English songs I really like there; Honesty, Your Song and Yesterday Once More.
I went to a bar with a female friend last night, and I heard English songs I really like there; Honesty, Your Song and Yesterday Once More.
I found some beautiful Chinese sentences, so I translated them to English and shared with you all, my friends.
Time travels in a flurry and blurrily, if not you stop and review it in a far distance.
Actually, we are putting on the make-up ourselves.
I spread stars across the sky along the travel of time.
Although mountains and trees remain, I have no longer walked on the stream of yesterday.
The Pueblo's Uprising
The Spanish laws of that time forced to the Spaniards to treat the Native Americans humanely.
The Spanish colonicers ocupped the Pueblo's fertile lands displacing them.
But this laws was difficult to apply in the North of Mexico.
I think it might be because I overslept today, instead of waking as early as always.
I think I'll just eat dinner and head to bed today.
Why I choose to speak about this TV show. Because, I like very much the science fiction topic.
But it was not the case with this TV-Show.
Life doesn't always go our own way.
I like this idiom above.
Can I use it on someone who is feeling down to to encourage them?
For example, like this "Don't let it get you down, man?
By the way, I often hear English speakers say "man" at the end or beginning of the sentence.
I'm sorry if I've asked you this before, is it okay to use this usage of, "man" to women?
About my job and how we work today.
I'm one from a generation of pressure free education.
Honestly, some of us give priority to our private lives.
The Japan's education changed in around 2002 and those who were born from 1894 to 2004 apply to the generation.
Dealing with unreasonable complainers are tough, though.
Now, I'm required to tell thing employees that just start working.
I hate to tell off someone even if they make big mistakes.
Can I use it on someone who is feeling down to to encourage them?
For example, like this "Don't let it get you down, man?
Life doesn't always go our own way."?
I'm sorry if I've asked you this before, is it okay to use this usage of, "man" to women?
I almost fogot what I was going to write about.
About my job and how we work today.
I'm one from a generation of pressure free education.
Many elderly people don't have good impression on adults from the generation, because they consider those from the generation are selfish and irresponsible.
The Japan's education changed in around 2002 and those who were born from 1894 to 2004 apply to the generation.
Dealing with unreasonable complainers are tough, though.
I've heard dry cleaners get complaints the most out of all of industries.
Now, I'm required to tell thing employees that just start working.
Life doesn't always go our own way.
Can I use it on someone who is feeling down to to encourage them?
For example, like this "Don't let it get you down, man?
I'm sorry if I've asked you this before, is it okay to use this usage of, "man" to women?
About my job and how we work today.
Honestly, some of us give priority to our private lives.
The Japan's education changed in around 2002 and those who were born from 1894 to 2004 apply to the generation.
I hate to tell off someone even if they make big mistakes.
First attempt to prose in english
He calmly blew the greyish smoke out of his mouth when suddenly a loud knocking noise made him startle from his thoughts of self-pity and confusion.
Since the explosion in Babylon he admitted to himself that he actually loves Justin.
Brian made himself vulnerable.
It's been six weeks since they last saw each other.
Since the last time they lay together on the sheets Brian was lying on lonely by now.
I'm sure that this would spare me a lot of time.
I have to admit that I'm really great at procrastinating, hence maybe I should just blame myself.
Now a question: by writing this silly lines have I used constructively my time or have I just wasted it again?
I like travel.
We went to nightclup.
We went to herfriend's house.
We went to breakfast at her friens's house in the morning.
I just killed a mouse in the toilet bowl.
I killed that mouse with plunger.
I hit the mouse so hard that its organs was thrown up.
It was so disgusting that I could not describe how gross the scene was.
This book presents Japanese history, tradition, law and manners in that time.
It shows to me how different point of view and behaviour people, who lived in that time had, compare to people who lived in Europe at the same time.
I know that, even now it is big different between people's mentaly from European and Asian, but it seems to me that this different decreases each century.
Maybe it is globalization's effect, more interaction beetwen many cultural, what gives better understanding each other.
On the one hand I would like go back in time for a while, and see how different world was, because books don't tell us many things, but on the other hand, in medieval times countries and nations were more closed for foreigners people and it was harder to explore.
I do remember the time I was in love for the first time when was in school.
He was my first official boyfriend.
Actually I was really fussy when I was young.
I liked the guy who must taller than me, nice physic, funny, love animals and nature, inteligent and must complete six faces of the Rubik"s Cube easily.
I know it sounds stupid especially Rubik's Cube part.
but I liked that kind of sharp boys when I was teenager.
He took me to go to the planetarium or cinema to watch Sci-fi films as a date which I loved.
I fall in love with him.
However we had to go different university so we walked different paths in the end.
That's typical.
What was your first love?
Actually I was really fussy when I was young.
I do remember the time I was in love for the first time when was in school.
I liked the guy who must taller than me, nice physic, funny, love animals and nature, inteligent and must complete six faces of the Rubik"s Cube easily.
He took me to go to the planetarium or cinema to watch Sci-fi films as a date which I loved.
I'm glad to join muscle training class after work.
We went to the cute cafe where my friend would recommend.
I ordered sweets like cream puff.
After that, we talked a lot about life.
We don't have difinite dream, but she has to decide on the cource to take after graduation, because she go to junior college.
When I heard about her thinks, It always made me think about a lot of things.
Also I thought, for example, when I said that I want to speak English fluently.
Just saying is easy for me.
On the contrary, actully, it's difficult for me to action.
I tend to escape from difficult things, but I want to change my life, so when I go study abroad, I may become storong.
I want to challenge a lot of things by my self.
I refreshed by spa.
I enjoyed to meet him.
I enjoyed to join muscle training class after work.
I really enjoyed to join nail art class.
I could relaxed by yoga class and nap.
Experienced bad things and good things during a trip is very normal.
Trip Is A Good Way For Learning
I still learn something from it.
When you review them, you might just had a good laugh.
Trip Is A Good Way For Learning
Experienced bad things and good things during a trip is very normal.
Here I particularly give my daughter a big praise.
I still learn something from it.
Here I particularly give my daughter a big praise.
She is great!
He's act is no adult action
The actress has acrossed area and appeared army ahead
Mary apes animal be mom angry 
I enjoyed to take lunch with my coworker.
When I returned at home I found in my shoes a gold coin and in it was sculpt an arrow.
Even you were the richest one in the world, you can't buy time.
I don't want to work much overtime.
I think, "Time is money" means you can trade one for the other.
You can take a faster transportation using the money.
You can get a faster computer using the money.
These will shorten your work time.
So you will get more free time, right?
However, we can buy the time to a certain extent.
Today, I read a magazine called "Asahi Camera"
The monthly magazine mainly contains pro photographer's interviews and taking photo techniques and various tips about photography.
This time, the magazine featured an unauthorized use of photos.
According to it, many creators suffered from unauthorized use.
I think that it is a critical issue.
I went to capoeira lesson Today.
But, This lesson on Monday was last lesson today.
From next month, The lesson has only on Thursday and Sunday.
I think that I can't join to the lesson.
Because, I join to lesson of back hands spring on Thursday.
And lesson on Sunday is very far for me.
Long time Ago, He sent me messinser and called any where,any times, any circumstances.
I know, he is working and busy.
I want that he wonder me and is always worried about me.
And i hope he think about our future
Cause my boyfriend. Long time Ago, He sent me messinser and called any where,any times, any circumstances.
I know, he is working and busy.
I want that he wonder me and is always worried about me.
And i hope he think about our future
I was very appreciated an apartment manager today.
That was for about 3:15 pm today, I've visited some apartment to handing fliers.
However I was refuse to handing fliers by almost apartment manager.
If I couldn't posting all of fliers I can't finish my job, That's why I was getting scared me, and then one of apartment manager said "If you couldn't posting, you can't back home right?
I really appreciated him from bottom of my heart.
I joined the cooking event yesterday.
It is a service to learn a cooking from foreign people at his or her house.
The cooking teacher was Russian woman and she was very nice.
Russian food takes long time, because most food need to be boiled well.
Eventually it took 4 hours to make all menus, but every Russian food was so great.
When I got this question at first, I absolutely have no idea.
This part of me are both a strength and weakness depending on a situation.
but now I truly need to understand and listen to their sorrow and anger.
If this call "mature', I want to be mature.
Why are there people who speak more than three languages fluently around the world?
Is their brain a big difference from my brain?
It's still cold, but we can feel spring will come soon.
When it will get a bit warmer, I want to go out to get them.
Yesterday I ate dinner at a hamburger stake restaurant with my niece and nephew.
It was more fun than I thought it would be because there were little children.
They looked fun.
I thought I had done well on the exam.
Importance of routine
Last week, we had a long holiday.
It seems to enough time to relax and refresh myself.
but It was miscalculation.
My family was keen because we have a lot to do with memorial service.
As a result, My parents fought.
It seems serious.
they couldn't talk each other 2 days, until the end of holiday.
but I went to work, communicated with coworkers, talked about weekend, My mood grew better.
today's topic was a little bit difficuly, but I really enjoyed that.
The depressed mood disappeared.
Tonight, I recognized that keeping my daily routine would help my mental health.
My Sunday is mostly dedicated to Shanti because when it us sunny I give her a bath.
Last Sunday, a chilly wind was blowing throughout the day so I couldn't bath her but yesterday the sun was warm.
I went in the morning around ten which was even after giving her breakfast but there was no water in the locality.
I came back and went again after lunch but again no water.
However, the little boys brought two buckets of water from their house and they also helped me around.
I had brought them chocolates so that they gave me a helping hand if needed.
A dozen children gathered around watching and two took turn to pour water for me.
I gave one of them my mobile to take some pictures along with all of them.
After washing her I put some powder on her body as her body was filled with ticks.
I had many class work but I preferred to spend my time with Shanti.
This morning when i woke up, I felt so bad because for me, it is like opening the gate of hell.
The experience is really hellish.
I feel there is no particular place called hell or heaven.
When I and my boy friend come up in conversation the topic, we was calm.
My boyfriend gave me some advices.
=My boyfriend gave some advices to me.
I want to make English composition to compare it with my real life.
But, it is difficult to me that is making English composition from this theme.
Thank you for reading!
When I and my boy friend come up in conversation the topic, we was calm.
But, it is difficult to me that is making English composition from this theme.
=My boyfriend gave some advices to me.
But, it is difficult to me that is making English composition from this theme.
When I and my boy friend come up in conversation the topic, we was calm.
My mother made me the SUKIYAKI.
I want to make English composition to compare it with my real life.
My mother made me the SUKIYAKI.
I remember when I was young and I was courious.
For me on every corner there was things to discover.
One day, many times ago, I meet a girl, Ann,I staied whit her for a couple of days and taught her how hunted the wild animals.
Last week I saw Ann, now she is a very nice girl, she is a scientific advisor and she travels all over the Europe for subscribe agreement with the partners of her company.
I examined what methods are available for using smart phones overseas.
I was good to switch to cheap sim.
I also understood the means of transportation at the site, and I want to investigate the point of view.
Let's check the English of technical terms of cultivation and brewing.
We went to neaby grocery store to buy some food for dinner.
At that time, it was over 11 p.m. I wanted to sleep early because I was supposed to get up early for work.
I said "When I get home, I will grind myself and work hard."
However, everyone burst out laughing because I mistaked the way to read kanji.
I have a slight cold, though.
Oh,gosh!
I might have become a maudlin drinker as I got older.
This is Japanese university entrance exam.
Can you solve this question?
This is Japanese university entrance exam.
What does 'puts more money in the hands of the farmers', 'see', 'socially-aware customer' mean here?
I added the corn paste into the cream stew, but sadly no one noticed the corn flavoure in the cream stew.
Other examples are electronic blackboards, lessens we can listen to via smartphones, and so on.
I had Sushi for dinner today.
Today, I went to kaiten Sushi restaurant called Kurazushi.
it is one of major sushi restaurant.
Today I saw a photo on Instagram which captured the front page of a book.
